
 
 E-text prepared by Jonathan Ingram, Lisa Reigel, and the Project Gutenberg
 Online Distributed Proofreading Team (http://www.pgdp.net)
 
 
 
 Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this file
       which includes links to images of the original pages.
       See 23684-h.htm or 23684-h.zip:
       (http://www.gutenberg.net/dirs/2/3/6/8/23684/23684-h/23684-h.htm)
       or
       (http://www.gutenberg.net/dirs/2/3/6/8/23684/23684-h.zip)
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
       Words in italics in the original are surrounded by _underscores_.
 
       The one Greek word has been transliterated and placed between
       +plus signs+.
 
       Ellipses match the original.
 
       See the end of the text for a more detailed transcriber's note.
 
 
 
 
 
 KEATS
 
 POEMS PUBLISHED IN 1820
 
 Edited with Introduction and Notes by
 
 M. ROBERTSON
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Oxford
 At the Clarendon Press
 1909
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 The text of this edition is a reprint (page for page and line for line)
 of a copy of the 1820 edition in the British Museum. For convenience of
 reference line-numbers have been added; but this is the only change,
 beyond the correction of one or two misprints.
 
 The books to which I am most indebted for the material used in the
 Introduction and Notes are _The Poems of John Keats_ with an
 Introduction and Notes by E. de Selincourt, _Life of Keats_ (English Men
 of Letters Series) by Sidney Colvin, and _Letters of John Keats_ edited
 by Sidney Colvin. As a pupil of Dr. de Selincourt I also owe him special
 gratitude for his inspiration and direction of my study of Keats, as
 well as for the constant help which I have received from him in the
 preparation of this edition.
                                                             M. R.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
                                                              PAGE
 PREFACE                                                        ii
 
 LIFE OF KEATS                                                   v
 
 ADVERTISEMENT                                                   2
 
 LAMIA. PART I                                                   3
 
 LAMIA. PART II                                                 27
 
 ISABELLA; OR, THE POT OF BASIL.  A STORY FROM BOCCACCIO        47
 
 THE EVE OF ST. AGNES                                           81
 
 ODE TO A NIGHTINGALE                                          107
 
 ODE ON A GRECIAN URN                                          113
 
 ODE TO PSYCHE                                                 117
 
 FANCY                                                         122
 
 ODE ['Bards of Passion and of Mirth']                         128
 
 LINES ON THE MERMAID TAVERN                                   131
 
 ROBIN HOOD. TO A FRIEND                                       133
 
 TO AUTUMN                                                     137
 
 ODE ON MELANCHOLY                                             140
 
 HYPERION. BOOK I                                              145
 
 HYPERION. BOOK II                                             167
 
 HYPERION. BOOK III                                            191
 
   NOTE ON ADVERTISEMENT                                       201
 
 INTRODUCTION TO LAMIA                                         201
 
   NOTES ON LAMIA                                              203
 
 INTRODUCTION TO ISABELLA AND THE EVE OF ST. AGNES             210
 
   NOTES ON ISABELLA                                           215
 
   NOTES ON THE EVE OF ST. AGNES                               224
 
 INTRODUCTION TO THE ODE TO A NIGHTINGALE, ODE ON A GRECIAN
   URN, ODE ON MELANCHOLY, AND TO AUTUMN                       229
 
   NOTES ON ODE TO A NIGHTINGALE                               232
 
   NOTES ON ODE ON A GRECIAN URN                               235
 
 INTRODUCTION TO ODE TO PSYCHE                                 236
 
   NOTES ON ODE TO PSYCHE                                      237
 
 INTRODUCTION TO FANCY                                         238
 
   NOTES ON FANCY                                              238
 
   NOTES ON ODE ['Bards of Passion and of Mirth']              239
 
 INTRODUCTION TO LINES ON THE MERMAID TAVERN                   239
 
   NOTES ON LINES ON THE MERMAID TAVERN                        239
 
 INTRODUCTION TO ROBIN HOOD                                    240
 
   NOTES ON ROBIN HOOD                                         241
 
   NOTES ON 'TO AUTUMN'                                        242
 
   NOTES ON ODE ON MELANCHOLY                                  243
 
 INTRODUCTION TO HYPERION                                      244
 
   NOTES ON HYPERION                                           249
 
 
 
 
 LIFE OF KEATS
 
 
 Of all the great poets of the early nineteenth century--Wordsworth,
 Coleridge, Scott, Byron, Shelley, Keats--John Keats was the last born
 and the first to die. The length of his life was not one-third that of
 Wordsworth, who was born twenty-five years before him and outlived him
 by twenty-nine. Yet before his tragic death at twenty-six Keats had
 produced a body of poetry of such extraordinary power and promise that
 the world has sometimes been tempted, in its regret for what he might
 have done had he lived, to lose sight of the superlative merit of what
 he actually accomplished.
 
 The three years of his poetic career, during which he published three
 small volumes of poetry, show a development at the same time rapid and
 steady, and a gradual but complete abandonment of almost every fault and
 weakness. It would probably be impossible, in the history of literature,
 to find such another instance of the 'growth of a poet's mind'.
 
 The last of these three volumes, which is here reprinted, was published
 in 1820, when it 'had good success among the literary people and . . . a
 moderate sale'. It contains the flower of his poetic production and is
 perhaps, altogether, one of the most marvellous volumes ever issued from
 the press.
 
 But in spite of the maturity of Keats's work when he was twenty-five, he
 had been in no sense a precocious child. Born in 1795 in the city of
 London, the son of a livery-stable keeper, he was brought up amid
 surroundings and influences by no means calculated to awaken poetic
 genius.
 
 He was the eldest of five--four boys, one of whom died in infancy, and a
 girl younger than all; and he and his brothers George and Tom were
 educated at a private school at Enfield. Here John was at first
 distinguished more for fighting than for study, whilst his bright,
 brave, generous nature made him popular with masters and boys.
 
 Soon after he had begun to go to school his father died, and when he was
 fifteen the children lost their mother too. Keats was passionately
 devoted to his mother; during her last illness he would sit up all night
 with her, give her her medicine, and even cook her food himself. At her
 death he was brokenhearted.
 
 The children were now put under the care of two guardians, one of whom,
 Mr. Abbey, taking the sole responsibility, immediately removed John from
 school and apprenticed him for five years to a surgeon at Edmonton.
 
 Whilst thus employed Keats spent all his leisure time in reading, for
 which he had developed a great enthusiasm during his last two years at
 school. There he had devoured every book that came in his way,
 especially rejoicing in stories of the gods and goddesses of ancient
 Greece. At Edmonton he was able to continue his studies by borrowing
 books from his friend Charles Cowden Clarke, the son of his
 schoolmaster, and he often went over to Enfield to change his books and
 to discuss those which he had been reading. On one of these occasions
 Cowden Clarke introduced him to Spenser, to whom so many poets have owed
 their first inspiration that he has been called 'the poets' poet'; and
 it was then, apparently, that Keats was first prompted to write.
 
 When he was nineteen, a year before his apprenticeship came to an end,
 he quarrelled with his master, left him, and continued his training in
 London as a student at St. Thomas's Hospital and Guy's. Gradually,
 however, during the months that followed, though he was an industrious
 and able medical student, Keats came to realize that poetry was his true
 vocation; and as soon as he was of age, in spite of the opposition of
 his guardian, he decided to abandon the medical profession and devote
 his life to literature.
 
 If Mr. Abbey was unsympathetic Keats was not without encouragement from
 others. His brothers always believed in him whole-heartedly, and his
 exceptionally lovable nature had won him many friends. Amongst these
 friends two men older than himself, each famous in his own sphere, had
 special influence upon him.
 
 One of them, Leigh Hunt, was something of a poet himself and a pleasant
 prose-writer. His encouragement did much to stimulate Keats's genius,
 but his direct influence on his poetry was wholly bad. Leigh Hunt's was
 not a deep nature; his poetry is often trivial and sentimental, and his
 easy conversational style is intolerable when applied to a great theme.
 To this man's influence, as well as to the surroundings of his youth,
 are doubtless due the occasional flaws of taste in Keats's early work.
 
 The other, Haydon, was an artist of mediocre creative talent but great
 aims and amazing belief in himself. He had a fine critical faculty which
 was shown in his appreciation of the Elgin marbles, in opposition to the
 most respected authorities of his day. Mainly through his insistence
 they were secured for the nation which thus owes him a boundless debt of
 gratitude. He helped to guide and direct Keats's taste by his
 enthusiastic exposition of these masterpieces of Greek sculpture.
 
 In 1817 Keats published his first volume of poems, including 'Sleep and
 Poetry' and the well-known lines 'I stood tiptoe upon a little hill'.
 With much that is of the highest poetic value, many memorable lines and
 touches of his unique insight into nature, the volume yet showed
 considerable immaturity. It contained indeed, if we except one perfect
 sonnet, rather a series of experiments than any complete and finished
 work. There were abundant faults for those who liked to look for them,
 though there were abundant beauties too; and the critics and the public
 chose rather to concentrate their attention on the former. The volume
 was therefore anything but a success; but Keats was not discouraged, for
 he saw many of his own faults more clearly than did his critics, and
 felt his power to outgrow them.
 
 Immediately after this Keats went to the Isle of Wight and thence to
 Margate that he might study and write undisturbed. On May 10th he wrote
 to Haydon--'I never quite despair, and I read Shakespeare--indeed I
 shall, I think, never read any other book much'. We have seen Keats
 influenced by Spenser and by Leigh Hunt: now, though his love for
 Spenser continued, Shakespeare's had become the dominant influence.
 Gradually he came too under the influence of Wordsworth's philosophy of
 poetry and life, and later his reading of Milton affected his style to
 some extent, but Shakespeare's influence was the widest, deepest and
 most lasting, though it is the hardest to define. His study of other
 poets left traces upon his work in turns of phrase or turns of thought:
 Shakespeare permeated his whole being, and his influence is to be
 detected not in a resemblance of style, for Shakespeare can have no
 imitators, but in a broadening view of life, and increased humanity.
 
 No poet could have owed his education more completely to the English
 poets than did John Keats. His knowledge of Latin was slight--he knew no
 Greek, and even the classical stories which he loved and constantly
 used, came to him almost entirely through the medium of Elizabethan
 translations and allusions. In this connexion it is interesting to read
 his first fine sonnet, in which he celebrates his introduction to the
 greatest of Greek poets in the translation of the rugged and forcible
 Elizabethan, George Chapman:--
 
      _On first looking into Chapman's Homer._
 
      Much have I travelled in the realms of gold,
      And many goodly states and kingdoms seen;
      Round many western islands have I been
      Which bards in fealty to Apollo hold.
      Oft of one wide expanse had I been told
      That deep-brow'd Homer ruled as his demesne;
      Yet did I never breathe its pure serene
      Till I heard Chapman speak out loud and bold:
      Then felt I like some watcher of the skies
      When a new planet swims into his ken;
      Or like stout Cortez when with eagle eyes
      He stared at the Pacific--and all his men
      Look'd at each other with a wild surmise--
      Silent, upon a peak in Darien.
 
 Of the work upon which he was now engaged, the narrative-poem of
 _Endymion_, we may give his own account to his little sister Fanny in a
 letter dated September 10th, 1817:--
 
 'Perhaps you might like to know what I am writing about. I will tell
 you. Many years ago there was a young handsome Shepherd who fed his
 flocks on a Mountain's Side called Latmus--he was a very contemplative
 sort of a Person and lived solitary among the trees and Plains little
 thinking that such a beautiful Creature as the Moon was growing mad in
 Love with him.--However so it was; and when he was asleep she used to
 come down from heaven and admire him excessively for a long time; and at
 last could not refrain from carrying him away in her arms to the top of
 that high Mountain Latmus while he was a dreaming--but I dare say you
 have read this and all the other beautiful tales which have come down
 from the ancient times of that beautiful Greece.'
 
 On his return to London he and his brother Tom, always delicate and now
 quite an invalid, took lodgings at Hampstead. Here Keats remained for
 some time, harassed by the illness of his brother and of several of his
 friends; and in June he was still further depressed by the departure of
 his brother George to try his luck in America.
 
 In April, 1818, _Endymion_ was finished. Keats was by no means
 satisfied with it but preferred to publish it as it was, feeling it to
 be 'as good as I had power to make it by myself'.--'I will write
 independently' he says to his publisher--'I have written independently
 _without judgment_. I may write independently and _with judgment_
 hereafter. In _Endymion_ I leaped headlong into the sea, and thereby
 have become better acquainted with the soundings, the quicksands, and
 the rocks, than if I had stayed upon the green shore, and piped a silly
 pipe, and took tea and comfortable advice.' He published it with a
 preface modestly explaining to the public his own sense of its
 imperfection. Nevertheless a storm of abuse broke upon him from the
 critics who fastened upon all the faults of the poem--the diffuseness of
 the story, its occasional sentimentality and the sometimes fantastic
 coinage of words,[xiii:1] and ignored the extraordinary beauties of
 which it is full.
 
 Directly after the publication of _Endymion_, and before the appearance
 of these reviews, Keats started with a friend, Charles Brown, for a
 walking tour in Scotland. They first visited the English lakes and
 thence walked to Dumfries, where they saw the house of Burns and his
 grave. They entered next the country of Meg Merrilies, and from
 Kirkcudbrightshire crossed over to Ireland for a few days. On their
 return they went north as far as Argyleshire, whence they sailed to
 Staffa and saw Fingal's cave, which, Keats wrote, 'for solemnity and
 grandeur far surpasses the finest Cathedral.' They then crossed Scotland
 through Inverness, and Keats returned home by boat from Cromarty.
 
 His letters home are at first full of interest and enjoyment, but a
 'slight sore throat', contracted in 'a most wretched walk of
 thirty-seven miles across the Isle of Mull', proved very troublesome and
 finally cut short his holiday. This was the beginning of the end. There
 was consumption in the family: Tom was dying of it; and the cold, wet,
 and over-exertion of his Scotch tour seems to have developed the fatal
 tendency in Keats himself.
 
 From this time forward he was never well, and no good was done to either
 his health or spirits by the task which now awaited him of tending on
 his dying brother. For the last two or three months of 1818, until
 Tom's death in December, he scarcely left the bedside, and it was well
 for him that his friend, Charles Armitage Brown, was at hand to help and
 comfort him after the long strain. Brown persuaded Keats at once to
 leave the house, with its sad associations, and to come and live with
 him.
 
 Before long poetry absorbed Keats again; and the first few months of
 1819 were the most fruitful of his life. Besides working at _Hyperion_,
 which he had begun during Tom's illness, he wrote _The Eve of St.
 Agnes_, _The Eve of St. Mark_, _La Belle Dame Sans Merci_, and nearly
 all his famous odes.
 
 Troubles however beset him. His friend Haydon was in difficulties and
 tormenting him, poor as he was, to lend him money; the state of his
 throat gave serious cause for alarm; and, above all, he was consumed by
 an unsatisfying passion for the daughter of a neighbour, Mrs. Brawne.
 She had rented Brown's house whilst they were in Scotland, and had now
 moved to a street near by. Miss Fanny Brawne returned his love, but she
 seems never to have understood his nature or his needs. High-spirited
 and fond of pleasure she did not apparently allow the thought of her
 invalid lover to interfere much with her enjoyment of life. She would
 not, however, abandon her engagement, and she probably gave him all
 which it was in her nature to give. Ill-health made him, on the other
 hand, morbidly dissatisfied and suspicious; and, as a result of his
 illness and her limitations, his love throughout brought him
 restlessness and torment rather than peace and comfort.
 
 Towards the end of July he went to Shanklin and there, in collaboration
 with Brown, wrote a play, _Otho the Great_. Brown tells us how they used
 to sit, one on either side of a table, he sketching out the scenes and
 handing each one, as the outline was finished, to Keats to write. As
 Keats never knew what was coming it was quite impossible that the
 characters should be adequately conceived, or that the drama should be a
 united whole. Nevertheless there is much that is beautiful and promising
 in it. It should not be forgotten that Keats's 'greatest ambition' was,
 in his own words, 'the writing of a few fine plays'; and, with the
 increasing humanity and grasp which his poetry shows, there is no reason
 to suppose that, had he lived, he would not have fulfilled it.
 
 At Shanklin, moreover, he had begun to write _Lamia_, and he continued
 it at Winchester. Here he stayed until the middle of October, excepting
 a few days which he spent in London to arrange about the sending of some
 money to his brother in America. George had been unsuccessful in his
 commercial enterprises, and Keats, in view of his family's ill-success,
 determined temporarily to abandon poetry, and by reviewing or journalism
 to support himself and earn money to help his brother. Then, when he
 could afford it, he would return to poetry.
 
 Accordingly he came back to London, but his health was breaking down,
 and with it his resolution. He tried to re-write _Hyperion_, which he
 felt had been written too much under the influence of Milton and in 'the
 artist's humour'. The same independence of spirit which he had shown in
 the publication of _Endymion_ urged him now to abandon a work the style
 of which he did not feel to be absolutely his own. The re-cast he wrote
 in the form of a vision, calling it _The Fall of Hyperion_, and in so
 doing he added much to his conception of the meaning of the story. In no
 poem does he show more of the profoundly philosophic spirit which
 characterizes many of his letters. But it was too late; his power was
 failing and, in spite of the beauty and interest of some of his
 additions, the alterations are mostly for the worse.
 
 Whilst _The Fall of Hyperion_ occupied his evenings his mornings were
 spent over a satirical fairy-poem, _The Cap and Bells_, in the metre of
 the _Faerie Queene_. This metre, however, was ill-suited to the subject;
 satire was not natural to him, and the poem has little intrinsic merit.
 
 Neither this nor the re-cast of _Hyperion_ was finished when, in
 February, 1820, he had an attack of illness in which the first definite
 symptom of consumption appeared. Brown tells how he came home on the
 evening of Thursday, February 3rd, in a state of high fever, chilled
 from having ridden outside the coach on a bitterly cold day. 'He mildly
 and instantly yielded to my request that he should go to bed . . . On
 entering the cold sheets, before his head was on the pillow, he slightly
 coughed, and I heard him say--"that is blood from my mouth". I went
 towards him: he was examining a single drop of blood upon the sheet.
 "Bring me the candle, Brown, and let me see this blood." After regarding
 it steadfastly he looked up in my face with a calmness of expression
 that I can never forget, and said, "I know the colour of that blood;--it
 is arterial blood; I cannot be deceived in that colour; that drop of
 blood is my death warrant;--I must die."'
 
 He lived for another year, but it was one long dying: he himself called
 it his 'posthumous life'.
 
 Keats was one of the most charming of letter-writers. He had that rare
 quality of entering sympathetically into the mind of the friend to whom
 he was writing, so that his letters reveal to us much of the character
 of the recipient as well as of the writer. In the long journal-letters
 which he wrote to his brother and sister-in-law in America he is
 probably most fully himself, for there he is with the people who knew
 him best and on whose understanding and sympathy he could rely. But in
 none is the beauty of his character more fully revealed than in those to
 his little sister Fanny, now seventeen years old, and living with their
 guardian, Mr. Abbey. He had always been very anxious that they should
 'become intimately acquainted, in order', as he says, 'that I may not
 only, as you grow up, love you as my only Sister, but confide in you as
 my dearest friend.' In his most harassing times he continued to write to
 her, directing her reading, sympathizing in her childish troubles, and
 constantly thinking of little presents to please her. Her health was to
 him a matter of paramount concern, and in his last letters to her we
 find him reiterating warnings to take care of herself--'You must be
 careful always to wear warm clothing not only in Frost but in a
 Thaw.'--'Be careful to let no fretting injure your health as I have
 suffered it--health is the greatest of blessings--with _health_ and
 _hope_ we should be content to live, and so you will find as you grow
 older.' The constant recurrence of this thought becomes, in the light of
 his own sufferings, almost unbearably pathetic.
 
 During the first months of his illness Keats saw through the press his
 last volume of poetry, of which this is a reprint. The praise which it
 received from reviewers and public was in marked contrast to the
 scornful reception of his earlier works, and would have augured well for
 the future. But Keats was past caring much for poetic fame. He dragged
 on through the summer, with rallies and relapses, tormented above all by
 the thought that death would separate him from the woman he loved. Only
 Brown, of all his friends, knew what he was suffering, and it seems that
 he only knew fully after they were parted.
 
 The doctors warned Keats that a winter in England would kill him, so in
 September, 1820, he left London for Naples, accompanied by a young
 artist, Joseph Severn, one of his many devoted friends. Shelley, who
 knew him slightly, invited him to stay at Pisa, but Keats refused. He
 had never cared for Shelley, though Shelley seems to have liked him,
 and, in his invalid state, he naturally shrank from being a burden to a
 mere acquaintance.
 
 It was as they left England, off the coast of Dorsetshire, that Keats
 wrote his last beautiful sonnet on a blank leaf of his folio copy of
 Shakespeare, facing _A Lover's Complaint_:--
 
      Bright star! would I were steadfast as thou art--
      Not in lone splendour hung aloft the night,
      And watching, with eternal lids apart,
      Like Nature's patient, sleepless Eremite,
      The moving waters at their priest-like task
      Of pure ablution round earth's human shores,
      Or gazing on the new soft-fallen mask
      Of snow upon the mountains and the moors--
      No--yet still steadfast, still unchangeable,
      Pillow'd upon my fair love's ripening breast,
      To feel for ever its soft fall and swell,
      Awake for ever in a sweet unrest,
      Still, still to hear her tender taken breath,
      And so live ever--or else swoon to death.
 
 The friends reached Rome, and there Keats, after a brief rally, rapidly
 became worse. Severn nursed him with desperate devotion, and of Keats's
 sweet considerateness and patience he could never say enough. Indeed
 such was the force and lovableness of Keats's personality that though
 Severn lived fifty-eight years longer it was for the rest of his life a
 chief occupation to write and draw his memories of his friend.
 
 On February 23rd, 1821, came the end for which Keats had begun to long.
 He died peacefully in Severn's arms. On the 26th he was buried in the
 beautiful little Protestant cemetery of which Shelley said that it 'made
 one in love with death to think that one should be buried in so sweet a
 place'.
 
 Great indignation was felt at the time by those who attributed his
 death, in part at least, to the cruel treatment which he had received
 from the critics. Shelley, in _Adonais_, withered them with his scorn,
 and Byron, in _Don Juan_, had his gibe both at the poet and at his
 enemies. But we know now how mistaken they were. Keats, in a normal
 state of mind and body, was never unduly depressed by harsh or unfair
 criticism. 'Praise or blame,' he wrote, 'has but a momentary effect on
 the man whose love of beauty in the abstract makes him a severe critic
 on his own works,' and this attitude he consistently maintained
 throughout his poetic career. No doubt the sense that his genius was
 unappreciated added something to the torment of mind which he suffered
 in Rome, and on his death-bed he asked that on his tombstone should be
 inscribed the words 'Here lies one whose name was writ in water'. But it
 was apparently not said in bitterness, and the rest of the
 inscription[xxiii:1] expresses rather the natural anger of his friends
 at the treatment he had received than the mental attitude of the poet
 himself.
 
 Fully to understand him we must read his poetry with the commentary of
 his letters which reveal in his character elements of humour,
 clear-sighted wisdom, frankness, strength, sympathy and tolerance. So
 doing we shall enter into the mind and heart of the friend who, speaking
 for many, described Keats as one 'whose genius I did not, and do not,
 more fully admire than I entirely loved the man'.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [xiii:1] Many of the words which the reviewers thought to be coined were
 good Elizabethan.
 
 [xxiii:1] This Grave contains all that was Mortal of a Young English
 Poet, who on his Death Bed, in the Bitterness of his Heart at the
 Malicious Power of his Enemies, desired these Words to be engraven on
 his Tomb Stone 'Here lies One Whose Name was writ in Water' Feb. 24th
 1821.
 
 
 
 
 LAMIA,
 
 ISABELLA,
 
 THE EVE OF ST. AGNES,
 
 AND
 
 OTHER POEMS.
 
 
 BY JOHN KEATS,
 AUTHOR OF ENDYMION.
 
 
 LONDON:
 PRINTED FOR TAYLOR AND HESSEY,
 FLEET-STREET.
 1820.
 
 
 
 
 ADVERTISEMENT.
 
 
 If any apology be thought necessary for the appearance of the unfinished
 poem of HYPERION, the publishers beg to state that they alone are
 responsible, as it was printed at their particular request, and contrary
 to the wish of the author. The poem was intended to have been of equal
 length with ENDYMION, but the reception given to that work discouraged
 the author from proceeding.
 
   _Fleet-Street, June 26, 1820._
 
 
 
 
 LAMIA.
 
 
 PART I.
 
   Upon a time, before the faery broods
   Drove Nymph and Satyr from the prosperous woods,
   Before King Oberon's bright diadem,
   Sceptre, and mantle, clasp'd with dewy gem,
   Frighted away the Dryads and the Fauns
   From rushes green, and brakes, and cowslip'd lawns,
   The ever-smitten Hermes empty left
   His golden throne, bent warm on amorous theft:
   From high Olympus had he stolen light,
   On this side of Jove's clouds, to escape the sight           10
   Of his great summoner, and made retreat
   Into a forest on the shores of Crete.
   For somewhere in that sacred island dwelt
   A nymph, to whom all hoofed Satyrs knelt;
   At whose white feet the languid Tritons poured
   Pearls, while on land they wither'd and adored.
   Fast by the springs where she to bathe was wont,
   And in those meads where sometime she might haunt,
   Were strewn rich gifts, unknown to any Muse,
   Though Fancy's casket were unlock'd to choose.               20
   Ah, what a world of love was at her feet!
   So Hermes thought, and a celestial heat
   Burnt from his winged heels to either ear,
   That from a whiteness, as the lily clear,
   Blush'd into roses 'mid his golden hair,
   Fallen in jealous curls about his shoulders bare.
   From vale to vale, from wood to wood, he flew,
   Breathing upon the flowers his passion new,
   And wound with many a river to its head,
   To find where this sweet nymph prepar'd her secret bed:      30
   In vain; the sweet nymph might nowhere be found,
   And so he rested, on the lonely ground,
   Pensive, and full of painful jealousies
   Of the Wood-Gods, and even the very trees.
   There as he stood, he heard a mournful voice,
   Such as once heard, in gentle heart, destroys
   All pain but pity: thus the lone voice spake:
   "When from this wreathed tomb shall I awake!
   When move in a sweet body fit for life,
   And love, and pleasure, and the ruddy strife                 40
   Of hearts and lips! Ah, miserable me!"
   The God, dove-footed, glided silently
   Round bush and tree, soft-brushing, in his speed,
   The taller grasses and full-flowering weed,
   Until he found a palpitating snake,
   Bright, and cirque-couchant in a dusky brake.
 
     She was a gordian shape of dazzling hue,
   Vermilion-spotted, golden, green, and blue;
   Striped like a zebra, freckled like a pard,
   Eyed like a peacock, and all crimson barr'd;                 50
   And full of silver moons, that, as she breathed,
   Dissolv'd, or brighter shone, or interwreathed
   Their lustres with the gloomier tapestries--
   So rainbow-sided, touch'd with miseries,
   She seem'd, at once, some penanced lady elf,
   Some demon's mistress, or the demon's self.
   Upon her crest she wore a wannish fire
   Sprinkled with stars, like Ariadne's tiar:
   Her head was serpent, but ah, bitter-sweet!
   She had a woman's mouth with all its pearls complete:        60
   And for her eyes: what could such eyes do there
   But weep, and weep, that they were born so fair?
   As Proserpine still weeps for her Sicilian air.
   Her throat was serpent, but the words she spake
   Came, as through bubbling honey, for Love's sake,
   And thus; while Hermes on his pinions lay,
   Like a stoop'd falcon ere he takes his prey.
 
     "Fair Hermes, crown'd with feathers, fluttering light,
   I had a splendid dream of thee last night:
   I saw thee sitting, on a throne of gold,                     70
   Among the Gods, upon Olympus old,
   The only sad one; for thou didst not hear
   The soft, lute-finger'd Muses chaunting clear,
   Nor even Apollo when he sang alone,
   Deaf to his throbbing throat's long, long melodious moan.
   I dreamt I saw thee, robed in purple flakes,
   Break amorous through the clouds, as morning breaks,
   And, swiftly as a bright Phoebean dart,
   Strike for the Cretan isle; and here thou art!
   Too gentle Hermes, hast thou found the maid?"                80
   Whereat the star of Lethe not delay'd
   His rosy eloquence, and thus inquired:
   "Thou smooth-lipp'd serpent, surely high inspired!
   Thou beauteous wreath, with melancholy eyes,
   Possess whatever bliss thou canst devise,
   Telling me only where my nymph is fled,--
   Where she doth breathe!" "Bright planet, thou hast said,"
   Return'd the snake, "but seal with oaths, fair God!"
   "I swear," said Hermes, "by my serpent rod,
   And by thine eyes, and by thy starry crown!"                 90
   Light flew his earnest words, among the blossoms blown.
   Then thus again the brilliance feminine:
   "Too frail of heart! for this lost nymph of thine,
   Free as the air, invisibly, she strays
   About these thornless wilds; her pleasant days
   She tastes unseen; unseen her nimble feet
   Leave traces in the grass and flowers sweet;
   From weary tendrils, and bow'd branches green,
   She plucks the fruit unseen, she bathes unseen:
   And by my power is her beauty veil'd                        100
   To keep it unaffronted, unassail'd
   By the love-glances of unlovely eyes,
   Of Satyrs, Fauns, and blear'd Silenus' sighs.
   Pale grew her immortality, for woe
   Of all these lovers, and she grieved so
   I took compassion on her, bade her steep
   Her hair in weird syrops, that would keep
   Her loveliness invisible, yet free
   To wander as she loves, in liberty.
   Thou shalt behold her, Hermes, thou alone,                  110
   If thou wilt, as thou swearest, grant my boon!"
   Then, once again, the charmed God began
   An oath, and through the serpent's ears it ran
   Warm, tremulous, devout, psalterian.
   Ravish'd, she lifted her Circean head,
   Blush'd a live damask, and swift-lisping said,
   "I was a woman, let me have once more
   A woman's shape, and charming as before.
   I love a youth of Corinth--O the bliss!
   Give me my woman's form, and place me where he is.          120
   Stoop, Hermes, let me breathe upon thy brow,
   And thou shalt see thy sweet nymph even now."
   The God on half-shut feathers sank serene,
   She breath'd upon his eyes, and swift was seen
   Of both the guarded nymph near-smiling on the green.
   It was no dream; or say a dream it was,
   Real are the dreams of Gods, and smoothly pass
   Their pleasures in a long immortal dream.
   One warm, flush'd moment, hovering, it might seem
   Dash'd by the wood-nymph's beauty, so he burn'd;            130
   Then, lighting on the printless verdure, turn'd
   To the swoon'd serpent, and with languid arm,
   Delicate, put to proof the lythe Caducean charm.
   So done, upon the nymph his eyes he bent
   Full of adoring tears and blandishment,
   And towards her stept: she, like a moon in wane,
   Faded before him, cower'd, nor could restrain
   Her fearful sobs, self-folding like a flower
   That faints into itself at evening hour:
   But the God fostering her chilled hand,                     140
   She felt the warmth, her eyelids open'd bland,
   And, like new flowers at morning song of bees,
   Bloom'd, and gave up her honey to the lees.
   Into the green-recessed woods they flew;
   Nor grew they pale, as mortal lovers do.
 
     Left to herself, the serpent now began
   To change; her elfin blood in madness ran,
   Her mouth foam'd, and the grass, therewith besprent,
   Wither'd at dew so sweet and virulent;
   Her eyes in torture fix'd, and anguish drear,               150
   Hot, glaz'd, and wide, with lid-lashes all sear,
   Flash'd phosphor and sharp sparks, without one cooling tear.
   The colours all inflam'd throughout her train,
   She writh'd about, convuls'd with scarlet pain:
   A deep volcanian yellow took the place
   Of all her milder-mooned body's grace;
   And, as the lava ravishes the mead,
   Spoilt all her silver mail, and golden brede;
   Made gloom of all her frecklings, streaks and bars,
   Eclips'd her crescents, and lick'd up her stars:            160
   So that, in moments few, she was undrest
   Of all her sapphires, greens, and amethyst,
   And rubious-argent: of all these bereft,
   Nothing but pain and ugliness were left.
   Still shone her crown; that vanish'd, also she
   Melted and disappear'd as suddenly;
   And in the air, her new voice luting soft,
   Cried, "Lycius! gentle Lycius!"--Borne aloft
   With the bright mists about the mountains hoar
   These words dissolv'd: Crete's forests heard no more.       170
 
     Whither fled Lamia, now a lady bright,
   A full-born beauty new and exquisite?
   She fled into that valley they pass o'er
   Who go to Corinth from Cenchreas' shore;
   And rested at the foot of those wild hills,
   The rugged founts of the Peraean rills,
   And of that other ridge whose barren back
   Stretches, with all its mist and cloudy rack,
   South-westward to Cleone. There she stood
   About a young bird's flutter from a wood,                   180
   Fair, on a sloping green of mossy tread,
   By a clear pool, wherein she passioned
   To see herself escap'd from so sore ills,
   While her robes flaunted with the daffodils.
 
     Ah, happy Lycius!--for she was a maid
   More beautiful than ever twisted braid,
   Or sigh'd, or blush'd, or on spring-flowered lea
   Spread a green kirtle to the minstrelsy:
   A virgin purest lipp'd, yet in the lore
   Of love deep learned to the red heart's core:               190
   Not one hour old, yet of sciential brain
   To unperplex bliss from its neighbour pain;
   Define their pettish limits, and estrange
   Their points of contact, and swift counterchange;
   Intrigue with the specious chaos, and dispart
   Its most ambiguous atoms with sure art;
   As though in Cupid's college she had spent
   Sweet days a lovely graduate, still unshent,
   And kept his rosy terms in idle languishment.
 
     Why this fair creature chose so fairily                   200
   By the wayside to linger, we shall see;
   But first 'tis fit to tell how she could muse
   And dream, when in the serpent prison-house,
   Of all she list, strange or magnificent:
   How, ever, where she will'd, her spirit went;
   Whether to faint Elysium, or where
   Down through tress-lifting waves the Nereids fair
   Wind into Thetis' bower by many a pearly stair;
   Or where God Bacchus drains his cups divine,
   Stretch'd out, at ease, beneath a glutinous pine;           210
   Or where in Pluto's gardens palatine
   Mulciber's columns gleam in far piazzian line.
   And sometimes into cities she would send
   Her dream, with feast and rioting to blend;
   And once, while among mortals dreaming thus,
   She saw the young Corinthian Lycius
   Charioting foremost in the envious race,
   Like a young Jove with calm uneager face,
   And fell into a swooning love of him.
   Now on the moth-time of that evening dim                    220
   He would return that way, as well she knew,
   To Corinth from the shore; for freshly blew
   The eastern soft wind, and his galley now
   Grated the quaystones with her brazen prow
   In port Cenchreas, from Egina isle
   Fresh anchor'd; whither he had been awhile
   To sacrifice to Jove, whose temple there
   Waits with high marble doors for blood and incense rare.
   Jove heard his vows, and better'd his desire;
   For by some freakful chance he made retire                  230
   From his companions, and set forth to walk,
   Perhaps grown wearied of their Corinth talk:
   Over the solitary hills he fared,
   Thoughtless at first, but ere eve's star appeared
   His phantasy was lost, where reason fades,
   In the calm'd twilight of Platonic shades.
   Lamia beheld him coming, near, more near--
   Close to her passing, in indifference drear,
   His silent sandals swept the mossy green;
   So neighbour'd to him, and yet so unseen                    240
   She stood: he pass'd, shut up in mysteries,
   His mind wrapp'd like his mantle, while her eyes
   Follow'd his steps, and her neck regal white
   Turn'd--syllabling thus, "Ah, Lycius bright,
   And will you leave me on the hills alone?
   Lycius, look back! and be some pity shown."
   He did; not with cold wonder fearingly,
   But Orpheus-like at an Eurydice;
   For so delicious were the words she sung,
   It seem'd he had lov'd them a whole summer long:            250
   And soon his eyes had drunk her beauty up,
   Leaving no drop in the bewildering cup,
   And still the cup was full,--while he, afraid
   Lest she should vanish ere his lip had paid
   Due adoration, thus began to adore;
   Her soft look growing coy, she saw his chain so sure:
   "Leave thee alone! Look back! Ah, Goddess, see
   Whether my eyes can ever turn from thee!
   For pity do not this sad heart belie--
   Even as thou vanishest so I shall die.                      260
   Stay! though a Naiad of the rivers, stay!
   To thy far wishes will thy streams obey:
   Stay! though the greenest woods be thy domain,
   Alone they can drink up the morning rain:
   Though a descended Pleiad, will not one
   Of thine harmonious sisters keep in tune
   Thy spheres, and as thy silver proxy shine?
   So sweetly to these ravish'd ears of mine
   Came thy sweet greeting, that if thou shouldst fade
   Thy memory will waste me to a shade:--                      270
   For pity do not melt!"--"If I should stay,"
   Said Lamia, "here, upon this floor of clay,
   And pain my steps upon these flowers too rough,
   What canst thou say or do of charm enough
   To dull the nice remembrance of my home?
   Thou canst not ask me with thee here to roam
   Over these hills and vales, where no joy is,--
   Empty of immortality and bliss!
   Thou art a scholar, Lycius, and must know
   That finer spirits cannot breathe below                     280
   In human climes, and live: Alas! poor youth,
   What taste of purer air hast thou to soothe
   My essence? What serener palaces,
   Where I may all my many senses please,
   And by mysterious sleights a hundred thirsts appease?
   It cannot be--Adieu!" So said, she rose
   Tiptoe with white arms spread. He, sick to lose
   The amorous promise of her lone complain,
   Swoon'd, murmuring of love, and pale with pain.
   The cruel lady, without any show                            290
   Of sorrow for her tender favourite's woe,
   But rather, if her eyes could brighter be,
   With brighter eyes and slow amenity,
   Put her new lips to his, and gave afresh
   The life she had so tangled in her mesh:
   And as he from one trance was wakening
   Into another, she began to sing,
   Happy in beauty, life, and love, and every thing,
   A song of love, too sweet for earthly lyres,
   While, like held breath, the stars drew in their panting
       fires.                                                  300
   And then she whisper'd in such trembling tone,
   As those who, safe together met alone
   For the first time through many anguish'd days,
   Use other speech than looks; bidding him raise
   His drooping head, and clear his soul of doubt,
   For that she was a woman, and without
   Any more subtle fluid in her veins
   Than throbbing blood, and that the self-same pains
   Inhabited her frail-strung heart as his.
   And next she wonder'd how his eyes could miss               310
   Her face so long in Corinth, where, she said,
   She dwelt but half retir'd, and there had led
   Days happy as the gold coin could invent
   Without the aid of love; yet in content
   Till she saw him, as once she pass'd him by,
   Where 'gainst a column he leant thoughtfully
   At Venus' temple porch, 'mid baskets heap'd
   Of amorous herbs and flowers, newly reap'd
   Late on that eve, as 'twas the night before
   The Adonian feast; whereof she saw no more,                 320
   But wept alone those days, for why should she adore?
   Lycius from death awoke into amaze,
   To see her still, and singing so sweet lays;
   Then from amaze into delight he fell
   To hear her whisper woman's lore so well;
   And every word she spake entic'd him on
   To unperplex'd delight and pleasure known.
   Let the mad poets say whate'er they please
   Of the sweets of Fairies, Peris, Goddesses,
   There is not such a treat among them all,                   330
   Haunters of cavern, lake, and waterfall,
   As a real woman, lineal indeed
   From Pyrrha's pebbles or old Adam's seed.
   Thus gentle Lamia judg'd, and judg'd aright,
   That Lycius could not love in half a fright,
   So threw the goddess off, and won his heart
   More pleasantly by playing woman's part,
   With no more awe than what her beauty gave,
   That, while it smote, still guaranteed to save.
   Lycius to all made eloquent reply,                          340
   Marrying to every word a twinborn sigh;
   And last, pointing to Corinth, ask'd her sweet,
   If 'twas too far that night for her soft feet.
   The way was short, for Lamia's eagerness
   Made, by a spell, the triple league decrease
   To a few paces; not at all surmised
   By blinded Lycius, so in her comprized.
   They pass'd the city gates, he knew not how,
   So noiseless, and he never thought to know.
 
     As men talk in a dream, so Corinth all,                   350
   Throughout her palaces imperial,
   And all her populous streets and temples lewd,
   Mutter'd, like tempest in the distance brew'd,
   To the wide-spreaded night above her towers.
   Men, women, rich and poor, in the cool hours,
   Shuffled their sandals o'er the pavement white,
   Companion'd or alone; while many a light
   Flared, here and there, from wealthy festivals,
   And threw their moving shadows on the walls,
   Or found them cluster'd in the corniced shade               360
   Of some arch'd temple door, or dusky colonnade.
 
     Muffling his face, of greeting friends in fear,
   Her fingers he press'd hard, as one came near
   With curl'd gray beard, sharp eyes, and smooth bald crown,
   Slow-stepp'd, and robed in philosophic gown:
   Lycius shrank closer, as they met and past,
   Into his mantle, adding wings to haste,
   While hurried Lamia trembled: "Ah," said he,
   "Why do you shudder, love, so ruefully?
   Why does your tender palm dissolve in dew?"--               370
   "I'm wearied," said fair Lamia: "tell me who
   Is that old man? I cannot bring to mind
   His features:--Lycius! wherefore did you blind
   Yourself from his quick eyes?" Lycius replied,
   "'Tis Apollonius sage, my trusty guide
   And good instructor; but to-night he seems
   The ghost of folly haunting my sweet dreams."
 
     While yet he spake they had arrived before
   A pillar'd porch, with lofty portal door,
   Where hung a silver lamp, whose phosphor glow               380
   Reflected in the slabbed steps below,
   Mild as a star in water; for so new,
   And so unsullied was the marble hue,
   So through the crystal polish, liquid fine,
   Ran the dark veins, that none but feet divine
   Could e'er have touch'd there. Sounds AEolian
   Breath'd from the hinges, as the ample span
   Of the wide doors disclos'd a place unknown
   Some time to any, but those two alone,
   And a few Persian mutes, who that same year                 390
   Were seen about the markets: none knew where
   They could inhabit; the most curious
   Were foil'd, who watch'd to trace them to their house:
   And but the flitter-winged verse must tell,
   For truth's sake, what woe afterwards befel,
   'Twould humour many a heart to leave them thus,
   Shut from the busy world of more incredulous.
 
 
 PART II.
 
   Love in a hut, with water and a crust,
   Is--Love, forgive us!--cinders, ashes, dust;
   Love in a palace is perhaps at last
   More grievous torment than a hermit's fast:--
   That is a doubtful tale from faery land,
   Hard for the non-elect to understand.
   Had Lycius liv'd to hand his story down,
   He might have given the moral a fresh frown,
   Or clench'd it quite: but too short was their bliss
   To breed distrust and hate, that make the soft voice hiss.   10
   Besides, there, nightly, with terrific glare
   Love, jealous grown of so complete a pair,
   Hover'd and buzz'd his wings, with fearful roar,
   Above the lintel of their chamber door,
   And down the passage cast a glow upon the floor.
 
     For all this came a ruin: side by side
   They were enthroned, in the even tide,
   Upon a couch, near to a curtaining
   Whose airy texture, from a golden string,
   Floated into the room, and let appear                        20
   Unveil'd the summer heaven, blue and clear,
   Betwixt two marble shafts:--there they reposed,
   Where use had made it sweet, with eyelids closed,
   Saving a tythe which love still open kept,
   That they might see each other while they almost slept;
   When from the slope side of a suburb hill,
   Deafening the swallow's twitter, came a thrill
   Of trumpets--Lycius started--the sounds fled,
   But left a thought, a buzzing in his head.
   For the first time, since first he harbour'd in              30
   That purple-lined palace of sweet sin,
   His spirit pass'd beyond its golden bourn
   Into the noisy world almost forsworn.
   The lady, ever watchful, penetrant,
   Saw this with pain, so arguing a want
   Of something more, more than her empery
   Of joys; and she began to moan and sigh
   Because he mused beyond her, knowing well
   That but a moment's thought is passion's passing bell.
   "Why do you sigh, fair creature?" whisper'd he:              40
   "Why do you think?" return'd she tenderly:
   "You have deserted me;--where am I now?
   Not in your heart while care weighs on your brow:
   No, no, you have dismiss'd me; and I go
   From your breast houseless: ay, it must be so."
   He answer'd, bending to her open eyes,
   Where he was mirror'd small in paradise,
   "My silver planet, both of eve and morn!
   Why will you plead yourself so sad forlorn,
   While I am striving how to fill my heart                     50
   With deeper crimson, and a double smart?
   How to entangle, trammel up and snare
   Your soul in mine, and labyrinth you there
   Like the hid scent in an unbudded rose?
   Ay, a sweet kiss--you see your mighty woes.
   My thoughts! shall I unveil them? Listen then!
   What mortal hath a prize, that other men
   May be confounded and abash'd withal,
   But lets it sometimes pace abroad majestical,
   And triumph, as in thee I should rejoice                     60
   Amid the hoarse alarm of Corinth's voice.
   Let my foes choke, and my friends shout afar,
   While through the thronged streets your bridal car
   Wheels round its dazzling spokes."--The lady's cheek
   Trembled; she nothing said, but, pale and meek,
   Arose and knelt before him, wept a rain
   Of sorrows at his words; at last with pain
   Beseeching him, the while his hand she wrung,
   To change his purpose. He thereat was stung,
   Perverse, with stronger fancy to reclaim                     70
   Her wild and timid nature to his aim:
   Besides, for all his love, in self despite,
   Against his better self, he took delight
   Luxurious in her sorrows, soft and new.
   His passion, cruel grown, took on a hue
   Fierce and sanguineous as 'twas possible
   In one whose brow had no dark veins to swell.
   Fine was the mitigated fury, like
   Apollo's presence when in act to strike
   The serpent--Ha, the serpent! certes, she                    80
   Was none. She burnt, she lov'd the tyranny,
   And, all subdued, consented to the hour
   When to the bridal he should lead his paramour.
   Whispering in midnight silence, said the youth,
   "Sure some sweet name thou hast, though, by my truth,
   I have not ask'd it, ever thinking thee
   Not mortal, but of heavenly progeny,
   As still I do. Hast any mortal name,
   Fit appellation for this dazzling frame?
   Or friends or kinsfolk on the citied earth,                  90
   To share our marriage feast and nuptial mirth?"
   "I have no friends," said Lamia, "no, not one;
   My presence in wide Corinth hardly known:
   My parents' bones are in their dusty urns
   Sepulchred, where no kindled incense burns,
   Seeing all their luckless race are dead, save me,
   And I neglect the holy rite for thee.
   Even as you list invite your many guests;
   But if, as now it seems, your vision rests
   With any pleasure on me, do not bid                         100
   Old Apollonius--from him keep me hid."
   Lycius, perplex'd at words so blind and blank,
   Made close inquiry; from whose touch she shrank,
   Feigning a sleep; and he to the dull shade
   Of deep sleep in a moment was betray'd.
 
     It was the custom then to bring away
   The bride from home at blushing shut of day,
   Veil'd, in a chariot, heralded along
   By strewn flowers, torches, and a marriage song,
   With other pageants: but this fair unknown                  110
   Had not a friend. So being left alone,
   (Lycius was gone to summon all his kin)
   And knowing surely she could never win
   His foolish heart from its mad pompousness,
   She set herself, high-thoughted, how to dress
   The misery in fit magnificence.
   She did so, but 'tis doubtful how and whence
   Came, and who were her subtle servitors.
   About the halls, and to and from the doors,
   There was a noise of wings, till in short space             120
   The glowing banquet-room shone with wide-arched grace.
   A haunting music, sole perhaps and lone
   Supportress of the faery-roof, made moan
   Throughout, as fearful the whole charm might fade.
   Fresh carved cedar, mimicking a glade
   Of palm and plantain, met from either side,
   High in the midst, in honour of the bride:
   Two palms and then two plantains, and so on,
   From either side their stems branch'd one to one
   All down the aisled place; and beneath all                  130
   There ran a stream of lamps straight on from wall to wall.
   So canopied, lay an untasted feast
   Teeming with odours. Lamia, regal drest,
   Silently paced about, and as she went,
   In pale contented sort of discontent,
   Mission'd her viewless servants to enrich
   The fretted splendour of each nook and niche.
   Between the tree-stems, marbled plain at first,
   Came jasper pannels; then, anon, there burst
   Forth creeping imagery of slighter trees,                   140
   And with the larger wove in small intricacies.
   Approving all, she faded at self-will,
   And shut the chamber up, close, hush'd and still,
   Complete and ready for the revels rude,
   When dreadful guests would come to spoil her solitude.
 
     The day appear'd, and all the gossip rout.
   O senseless Lycius! Madman! wherefore flout
   The silent-blessing fate, warm cloister'd hours,
   And show to common eyes these secret bowers?
   The herd approach'd; each guest, with busy brain,           150
   Arriving at the portal, gaz'd amain,
   And enter'd marveling: for they knew the street,
   Remember'd it from childhood all complete
   Without a gap, yet ne'er before had seen
   That royal porch, that high-built fair demesne;
   So in they hurried all, maz'd, curious and keen:
   Save one, who look'd thereon with eye severe,
   And with calm-planted steps walk'd in austere;
   'Twas Apollonius: something too he laugh'd,
   As though some knotty problem, that had daft                160
   His patient thought, had now begun to thaw,
   And solve and melt:--'twas just as he foresaw.
 
     He met within the murmurous vestibule
   His young disciple. "'Tis no common rule,
   Lycius," said he, "for uninvited guest
   To force himself upon you, and infest
   With an unbidden presence the bright throng
   Of younger friends; yet must I do this wrong,
   And you forgive me." Lycius blush'd, and led
   The old man through the inner doors broad-spread;           170
   With reconciling words and courteous mien
   Turning into sweet milk the sophist's spleen.
 
     Of wealthy lustre was the banquet-room,
   Fill'd with pervading brilliance and perfume:
   Before each lucid pannel fuming stood
   A censer fed with myrrh and spiced wood,
   Each by a sacred tripod held aloft,
   Whose slender feet wide-swerv'd upon the soft
   Wool-woofed carpets: fifty wreaths of smoke
   From fifty censers their light voyage took                  180
   To the high roof, still mimick'd as they rose
   Along the mirror'd walls by twin-clouds odorous.
   Twelve sphered tables, by silk seats insphered,
   High as the level of a man's breast rear'd
   On libbard's paws, upheld the heavy gold
   Of cups and goblets, and the store thrice told
   Of Ceres' horn, and, in huge vessels, wine
   Come from the gloomy tun with merry shine.
   Thus loaded with a feast the tables stood,
   Each shrining in the midst the image of a God.              190
 
     When in an antichamber every guest
   Had felt the cold full sponge to pleasure press'd,
   By minist'ring slaves, upon his hands and feet,
   And fragrant oils with ceremony meet
   Pour'd on his hair, they all mov'd to the feast
   In white robes, and themselves in order placed
   Around the silken couches, wondering
   Whence all this mighty cost and blaze of wealth could spring.
 
     Soft went the music the soft air along,
   While fluent Greek a vowel'd undersong                      200
   Kept up among the guests, discoursing low
   At first, for scarcely was the wine at flow;
   But when the happy vintage touch'd their brains,
   Louder they talk, and louder come the strains
   Of powerful instruments:--the gorgeous dyes,
   The space, the splendour of the draperies,
   The roof of awful richness, nectarous cheer,
   Beautiful slaves, and Lamia's self, appear,
   Now, when the wine has done its rosy deed,
   And every soul from human trammels freed,                   210
   No more so strange; for merry wine, sweet wine,
   Will make Elysian shades not too fair, too divine.
   Soon was God Bacchus at meridian height;
   Flush'd were their cheeks, and bright eyes double bright:
   Garlands of every green, and every scent
   From vales deflower'd, or forest-trees branch-rent,
   In baskets of bright osier'd gold were brought
   High as the handles heap'd, to suit the thought
   Of every guest; that each, as he did please,
   Might fancy-fit his brows, silk-pillow'd at his ease.       220
 
     What wreath for Lamia? What for Lycius?
   What for the sage, old Apollonius?
   Upon her aching forehead be there hung
   The leaves of willow and of adder's tongue;
   And for the youth, quick, let us strip for him
   The thyrsus, that his watching eyes may swim
   Into forgetfulness; and, for the sage,
   Let spear-grass and the spiteful thistle wage
   War on his temples. Do not all charms fly
   At the mere touch of cold philosophy?                       230
   There was an awful rainbow once in heaven:
   We know her woof, her texture; she is given
   In the dull catalogue of common things.
   Philosophy will clip an Angel's wings,
   Conquer all mysteries by rule and line,
   Empty the haunted air, and gnomed mine--
   Unweave a rainbow, as it erewhile made
   The tender-person'd Lamia melt into a shade.
 
     By her glad Lycius sitting, in chief place,
   Scarce saw in all the room another face,                    240
   Till, checking his love trance, a cup he took
   Full brimm'd, and opposite sent forth a look
   'Cross the broad table, to beseech a glance
   From his old teacher's wrinkled countenance,
   And pledge him. The bald-head philosopher
   Had fix'd his eye, without a twinkle or stir
   Full on the alarmed beauty of the bride,
   Brow-beating her fair form, and troubling her sweet pride.
   Lycius then press'd her hand, with devout touch,
   As pale it lay upon the rosy couch:                         250
   'Twas icy, and the cold ran through his veins;
   Then sudden it grew hot, and all the pains
   Of an unnatural heat shot to his heart.
   "Lamia, what means this? Wherefore dost thou start?
   Know'st thou that man?" Poor Lamia answer'd not.
   He gaz'd into her eyes, and not a jot
   Own'd they the lovelorn piteous appeal:
   More, more he gaz'd: his human senses reel:
   Some hungry spell that loveliness absorbs;
   There was no recognition in those orbs.                     260
   "Lamia!" he cried--and no soft-toned reply.
   The many heard, and the loud revelry
   Grew hush; the stately music no more breathes;
   The myrtle sicken'd in a thousand wreaths.
   By faint degrees, voice, lute, and pleasure ceased;
   A deadly silence step by step increased,
   Until it seem'd a horrid presence there,
   And not a man but felt the terror in his hair.
   "Lamia!" he shriek'd; and nothing but the shriek
   With its sad echo did the silence break.                    270
   "Begone, foul dream!" he cried, gazing again
   In the bride's face, where now no azure vein
   Wander'd on fair-spaced temples; no soft bloom
   Misted the cheek; no passion to illume
   The deep-recessed vision:--all was blight;
   Lamia, no longer fair, there sat a deadly white.
   "Shut, shut those juggling eyes, thou ruthless man!
   Turn them aside, wretch! or the righteous ban
   Of all the Gods, whose dreadful images
   Here represent their shadowy presences,                     280
   May pierce them on the sudden with the thorn
   Of painful blindness; leaving thee forlorn,
   In trembling dotage to the feeblest fright
   Of conscience, for their long offended might,
   For all thine impious proud-heart sophistries,
   Unlawful magic, and enticing lies.
   Corinthians! look upon that gray-beard wretch!
   Mark how, possess'd, his lashless eyelids stretch
   Around his demon eyes! Corinthians, see!
   My sweet bride withers at their potency."                   290
   "Fool!" said the sophist, in an under-tone
   Gruff with contempt; which a death-nighing moan
   From Lycius answer'd, as heart-struck and lost,
   He sank supine beside the aching ghost.
   "Fool! Fool!" repeated he, while his eyes still
   Relented not, nor mov'd; "from every ill
   Of life have I preserv'd thee to this day,
   And shall I see thee made a serpent's prey?"
   Then Lamia breath'd death breath; the sophist's eye,
   Like a sharp spear, went through her utterly,               300
   Keen, cruel, perceant, stinging: she, as well
   As her weak hand could any meaning tell,
   Motion'd him to be silent; vainly so,
   He look'd and look'd again a level--No!
   "A Serpent!" echoed he; no sooner said,
   Than with a frightful scream she vanished:
   And Lycius' arms were empty of delight,
   As were his limbs of life, from that same night.
   On the high couch he lay!--his friends came round--
   Supported him--no pulse, or breath they found,              310
   And, in its marriage robe, the heavy body wound.[45:A]
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [45:A] "Philostratus, in his fourth book _de Vita Apollonii_, hath a
 memorable instance in this kind, which I may not omit, of one Menippus
 Lycius, a young man twenty-five years of age, that going betwixt
 Cenchreas and Corinth, met such a phantasm in the habit of a fair
 gentlewoman, which taking him by the hand, carried him home to her
 house, in the suburbs of Corinth, and told him she was a Phoenician by
 birth, and if he would tarry with her, he should hear her sing and play,
 and drink such wine as never any drank, and no man should molest him;
 but she, being fair and lovely, would live and die with him, that was
 fair and lovely to behold. The young man, a philosopher, otherwise staid
 and discreet, able to moderate his passions, though not this of love,
 tarried with her a while to his great content, and at last married her,
 to whose wedding, amongst other guests, came Apollonius; who, by some
 probable conjectures, found her out to be a serpent, a lamia; and that
 all her furniture was, like Tantalus' gold, described by Homer, no
 substance but mere illusions. When she saw herself descried, she wept,
 and desired Apollonius to be silent, but he would not be moved, and
 thereupon she, plate, house, and all that was in it, vanished in an
 instant: many thousands took notice of this fact, for it was done in the
 midst of Greece."
 
             Burton's 'Anatomy of Melancholy.' _Part_ 3. _Sect._ 2
                                             _Memb._ 1. _Subs._ 1.
 
 
 
 
 ISABELLA;
 
 OR,
 
 THE POT OF BASIL.
 
 
 A STORY FROM BOCCACCIO.
 
 
   I.
 
   Fair Isabel, poor simple Isabel!
     Lorenzo, a young palmer in Love's eye!
   They could not in the self-same mansion dwell
     Without some stir of heart, some malady;
   They could not sit at meals but feel how well
     It soothed each to be the other by;
   They could not, sure, beneath the same roof sleep
   But to each other dream, and nightly weep.
 
   II.
 
   With every morn their love grew tenderer,
     With every eve deeper and tenderer still;                  10
   He might not in house, field, or garden stir,
     But her full shape would all his seeing fill;
   And his continual voice was pleasanter
     To her, than noise of trees or hidden rill;
   Her lute-string gave an echo of his name,
   She spoilt her half-done broidery with the same.
 
   III.
 
   He knew whose gentle hand was at the latch,
     Before the door had given her to his eyes;
   And from her chamber-window he would catch
     Her beauty farther than the falcon spies;                  20
   And constant as her vespers would he watch,
     Because her face was turn'd to the same skies;
   And with sick longing all the night outwear,
   To hear her morning-step upon the stair.
 
   IV.
 
   A whole long month of May in this sad plight
     Made their cheeks paler by the break of June:
   "To-morrow will I bow to my delight,
     To-morrow will I ask my lady's boon."--
   "O may I never see another night,
     Lorenzo, if thy lips breathe not love's tune."--           30
   So spake they to their pillows; but, alas,
   Honeyless days and days did he let pass;
 
   V.
 
   Until sweet Isabella's untouch'd cheek
     Fell sick within the rose's just domain,
   Fell thin as a young mother's, who doth seek
     By every lull to cool her infant's pain:
   "How ill she is," said he, "I may not speak,
     And yet I will, and tell my love all plain:
   If looks speak love-laws, I will drink her tears,
   And at the least 'twill startle off her cares."              40
 
   VI.
 
   So said he one fair morning, and all day
     His heart beat awfully against his side;
   And to his heart he inwardly did pray
     For power to speak; but still the ruddy tide
   Stifled his voice, and puls'd resolve away--
     Fever'd his high conceit of such a bride,
   Yet brought him to the meekness of a child:
   Alas! when passion is both meek and wild!
 
   VII.
 
   So once more he had wak'd and anguished
     A dreary night of love and misery,                         50
   If Isabel's quick eye had not been wed
     To every symbol on his forehead high;
   She saw it waxing very pale and dead,
     And straight all flush'd; so, lisped tenderly,
   "Lorenzo!"--here she ceas'd her timid quest,
   But in her tone and look he read the rest.
 
   VIII.
 
   "O Isabella, I can half perceive
     That I may speak my grief into thine ear;
   If thou didst ever any thing believe,
     Believe how I love thee, believe how near                  60
   My soul is to its doom: I would not grieve
     Thy hand by unwelcome pressing, would not fear
   Thine eyes by gazing; but I cannot live
   Another night, and not my passion shrive.
 
   IX.
 
   "Love! thou art leading me from wintry cold,
     Lady! thou leadest me to summer clime,
   And I must taste the blossoms that unfold
     In its ripe warmth this gracious morning time."
   So said, his erewhile timid lips grew bold,
     And poesied with hers in dewy rhyme:                       70
   Great bliss was with them, and great happiness
   Grew, like a lusty flower in June's caress.
 
   X.
 
   Parting they seem'd to tread upon the air,
     Twin roses by the zephyr blown apart
   Only to meet again more close, and share
     The inward fragrance of each other's heart.
   She, to her chamber gone, a ditty fair
     Sang, of delicious love and honey'd dart;
   He with light steps went up a western hill,
   And bade the sun farewell, and joy'd his fill.               80
 
   XI.
 
   All close they met again, before the dusk
     Had taken from the stars its pleasant veil,
   All close they met, all eyes, before the dusk
     Had taken from the stars its pleasant veil,
   Close in a bower of hyacinth and musk,
     Unknown of any, free from whispering tale.
   Ah! better had it been for ever so,
   Than idle ears should pleasure in their woe.
 
   XII.
 
   Were they unhappy then?--It cannot be--
     Too many tears for lovers have been shed,                  90
   Too many sighs give we to them in fee,
     Too much of pity after they are dead,
   Too many doleful stories do we see,
     Whose matter in bright gold were best be read;
   Except in such a page where Theseus' spouse
   Over the pathless waves towards him bows.
 
   XIII.
 
   But, for the general award of love,
     The little sweet doth kill much bitterness;
   Though Dido silent is in under-grove,
     And Isabella's was a great distress,                      100
   Though young Lorenzo in warm Indian clove
     Was not embalm'd, this truth is not the less--
   Even bees, the little almsmen of spring-bowers,
   Know there is richest juice in poison-flowers.
 
   XIV.
 
   With her two brothers this fair lady dwelt,
     Enriched from ancestral merchandize,
   And for them many a weary hand did swelt
     In torched mines and noisy factories,
   And many once proud-quiver'd loins did melt
     In blood from stinging whip;--with hollow eyes            110
   Many all day in dazzling river stood,
   To take the rich-ored driftings of the flood.
 
   XV.
 
   For them the Ceylon diver held his breath,
     And went all naked to the hungry shark;
   For them his ears gush'd blood; for them in death
     The seal on the cold ice with piteous bark
   Lay full of darts; for them alone did seethe
     A thousand men in troubles wide and dark:
   Half-ignorant, they turn'd an easy wheel,
   That set sharp racks at work, to pinch and peel.            120
 
   XVI.
 
   Why were they proud? Because their marble founts
     Gush'd with more pride than do a wretch's tears?--
   Why were they proud? Because fair orange-mounts
     Were of more soft ascent than lazar stairs?--
   Why were they proud? Because red-lin'd accounts
     Were richer than the songs of Grecian years?--
   Why were they proud? again we ask aloud,
   Why in the name of Glory were they proud?
 
   XVII.
 
   Yet were these Florentines as self-retired
     In hungry pride and gainful cowardice,                    130
   As two close Hebrews in that land inspired,
     Paled in and vineyarded from beggar-spies;
   The hawks of ship-mast forests--the untired
     And pannier'd mules for ducats and old lies--
   Quick cat's-paws on the generous stray-away,--
   Great wits in Spanish, Tuscan, and Malay.
 
   XVIII.
 
   How was it these same ledger-men could spy
     Fair Isabella in her downy nest?
   How could they find out in Lorenzo's eye
     A straying from his toil? Hot Egypt's pest                140
   Into their vision covetous and sly!
     How could these money-bags see east and west?--
   Yet so they did--and every dealer fair
   Must see behind, as doth the hunted hare.
 
   XIX.
 
   O eloquent and famed Boccaccio!
     Of thee we now should ask forgiving boon;
   And of thy spicy myrtles as they blow,
     And of thy roses amorous of the moon,
   And of thy lilies, that do paler grow
     Now they can no more hear thy ghittern's tune,            150
   For venturing syllables that ill beseem
   The quiet glooms of such a piteous theme.
 
   XX.
 
   Grant thou a pardon here, and then the tale
     Shall move on soberly, as it is meet;
   There is no other crime, no mad assail
     To make old prose in modern rhyme more sweet:
   But it is done--succeed the verse or fail--
     To honour thee, and thy gone spirit greet;
   To stead thee as a verse in English tongue,
   An echo of thee in the north-wind sung.                     160
 
   XXI.
 
   These brethren having found by many signs
     What love Lorenzo for their sister had,
   And how she lov'd him too, each unconfines
     His bitter thoughts to other, well nigh mad
   That he, the servant of their trade designs,
     Should in their sister's love be blithe and glad,
   When 'twas their plan to coax her by degrees
   To some high noble and his olive-trees.
 
   XXII.
 
   And many a jealous conference had they,
     And many times they bit their lips alone,                 170
   Before they fix'd upon a surest way
     To make the youngster for his crime atone;
   And at the last, these men of cruel clay
     Cut Mercy with a sharp knife to the bone;
   For they resolved in some forest dim
   To kill Lorenzo, and there bury him.
 
   XXIII.
 
   So on a pleasant morning, as he leant
     Into the sun-rise, o'er the balustrade
   Of the garden-terrace, towards him they bent
     Their footing through the dews; and to him said,          180
   "You seem there in the quiet of content,
     Lorenzo, and we are most loth to invade
   Calm speculation; but if you are wise,
   Bestride your steed while cold is in the skies.
 
   XXIV.
 
   "To-day we purpose, ay, this hour we mount
     To spur three leagues towards the Apennine;
   Come down, we pray thee, ere the hot sun count
     His dewy rosary on the eglantine."
   Lorenzo, courteously as he was wont,
     Bow'd a fair greeting to these serpents' whine;           190
   And went in haste, to get in readiness,
   With belt, and spur, and bracing huntsman's dress.
 
   XXV.
 
   And as he to the court-yard pass'd along,
     Each third step did he pause, and listen'd oft
   If he could hear his lady's matin-song,
     Or the light whisper of her footstep soft;
   And as he thus over his passion hung,
     He heard a laugh full musical aloft;
   When, looking up, he saw her features bright
   Smile through an in-door lattice, all delight.              200
 
   XXVI.
 
   "Love, Isabel!" said he, "I was in pain
     Lest I should miss to bid thee a good morrow
   Ah! what if I should lose thee, when so fain
     I am to stifle all the heavy sorrow
   Of a poor three hours' absence? but we'll gain
     Out of the amorous dark what day doth borrow.
   Goodbye! I'll soon be back."--"Goodbye!" said she:--
   And as he went she chanted merrily.
 
   XXVII.
 
   So the two brothers and their murder'd man
     Rode past fair Florence, to where Arno's stream           210
   Gurgles through straiten'd banks, and still doth fan
     Itself with dancing bulrush, and the bream
   Keeps head against the freshets. Sick and wan
     The brothers' faces in the ford did seem,
   Lorenzo's flush with love.--They pass'd the water
   Into a forest quiet for the slaughter.
 
   XXVIII.
 
   There was Lorenzo slain and buried in,
     There in that forest did his great love cease;
   Ah! when a soul doth thus its freedom win,
     It aches in loneliness--is ill at peace                   220
   As the break-covert blood-hounds of such sin:
     They dipp'd their swords in the water, and did tease
   Their horses homeward, with convulsed spur,
   Each richer by his being a murderer.
 
   XXIX.
 
   They told their sister how, with sudden speed,
     Lorenzo had ta'en ship for foreign lands,
   Because of some great urgency and need
     In their affairs, requiring trusty hands.
   Poor Girl! put on thy stifling widow's weed,
     And 'scape at once from Hope's accursed bands;            230
   To-day thou wilt not see him, nor to-morrow,
   And the next day will be a day of sorrow.
 
   XXX.
 
   She weeps alone for pleasures not to be;
     Sorely she wept until the night came on,
   And then, instead of love, O misery!
     She brooded o'er the luxury alone:
   His image in the dusk she seem'd to see,
     And to the silence made a gentle moan,
   Spreading her perfect arms upon the air,
   And on her couch low murmuring "Where? O where?"            240
 
   XXXI.
 
   But Selfishness, Love's cousin, held not long
     Its fiery vigil in her single breast;
   She fretted for the golden hour, and hung
     Upon the time with feverish unrest--
   Not long--for soon into her heart a throng
     Of higher occupants, a richer zest,
   Came tragic; passion not to be subdued,
   And sorrow for her love in travels rude.
 
   XXXII.
 
   In the mid days of autumn, on their eves
     The breath of Winter comes from far away,                 250
   And the sick west continually bereaves
     Of some gold tinge, and plays a roundelay
   Of death among the bushes and the leaves,
     To make all bare before he dares to stray
   From his north cavern. So sweet Isabel
   By gradual decay from beauty fell,
 
   XXXIII.
 
   Because Lorenzo came not. Oftentimes
     She ask'd her brothers, with an eye all pale,
   Striving to be itself, what dungeon climes
     Could keep him off so long? They spake a tale             260
   Time after time, to quiet her. Their crimes
     Came on them, like a smoke from Hinnom's vale;
   And every night in dreams they groan'd aloud,
   To see their sister in her snowy shroud.
 
   XXXIV.
 
   And she had died in drowsy ignorance,
     But for a thing more deadly dark than all;
   It came like a fierce potion, drunk by chance,
     Which saves a sick man from the feather'd pall
   For some few gasping moments; like a lance,
     Waking an Indian from his cloudy hall                     270
   With cruel pierce, and bringing him again
   Sense of the gnawing fire at heart and brain.
 
   XXXV.
 
   It was a vision.--In the drowsy gloom,
     The dull of midnight, at her couch's foot
   Lorenzo stood, and wept: the forest tomb
     Had marr'd his glossy hair which once could shoot
   Lustre into the sun, and put cold doom
     Upon his lips, and taken the soft lute
   From his lorn voice, and past his loamed ears
   Had made a miry channel for his tears.                      280
 
   XXXVI.
 
   Strange sound it was, when the pale shadow spake;
     For there was striving, in its piteous tongue,
   To speak as when on earth it was awake,
     And Isabella on its music hung:
   Languor there was in it, and tremulous shake,
     As in a palsied Druid's harp unstrung;
   And through it moan'd a ghostly under-song,
   Like hoarse night-gusts sepulchral briars among.
 
   XXXVII.
 
   Its eyes, though wild, were still all dewy bright
     With love, and kept all phantom fear aloof                290
   From the poor girl by magic of their light,
     The while it did unthread the horrid woof
   Of the late darken'd time,--the murderous spite
     Of pride and avarice,--the dark pine roof
   In the forest,--and the sodden turfed dell,
   Where, without any word, from stabs he fell.
 
   XXXVIII.
 
   Saying moreover, "Isabel, my sweet!
     Red whortle-berries droop above my head,
   And a large flint-stone weighs upon my feet;
     Around me beeches and high chestnuts shed                 300
   Their leaves and prickly nuts; a sheep-fold bleat
     Comes from beyond the river to my bed:
   Go, shed one tear upon my heather-bloom,
   And it shall comfort me within the tomb.
 
   XXXIX.
 
   "I am a shadow now, alas! alas!
     Upon the skirts of human-nature dwelling
   Alone: I chant alone the holy mass,
     While little sounds of life are round me knelling,
   And glossy bees at noon do fieldward pass,
     And many a chapel bell the hour is telling,               310
   Paining me through: those sounds grow strange to me,
   And thou art distant in Humanity.
 
   XL.
 
   "I know what was, I feel full well what is,
     And I should rage, if spirits could go mad;
   Though I forget the taste of earthly bliss,
     That paleness warms my grave, as though I had
   A Seraph chosen from the bright abyss
     To be my spouse: thy paleness makes me glad;
   Thy beauty grows upon me, and I feel
   A greater love through all my essence steal."               320
 
   XLI.
 
   The Spirit mourn'd "Adieu!"--dissolv'd, and left
     The atom darkness in a slow turmoil;
   As when of healthful midnight sleep bereft,
     Thinking on rugged hours and fruitless toil,
   We put our eyes into a pillowy cleft,
     And see the spangly gloom froth up and boil:
   It made sad Isabella's eyelids ache,
   And in the dawn she started up awake;
 
   XLII.
 
   "Ha! ha!" said she, "I knew not this hard life,
     I thought the worst was simple misery;                    330
   I thought some Fate with pleasure or with strife
     Portion'd us--happy days, or else to die;
   But there is crime--a brother's bloody knife!
     Sweet Spirit, thou hast school'd my infancy:
   I'll visit thee for this, and kiss thine eyes,
   And greet thee morn and even in the skies."
 
   XLIII.
 
   When the full morning came, she had devised
     How she might secret to the forest hie;
   How she might find the clay, so dearly prized,
     And sing to it one latest lullaby;                        340
   How her short absence might be unsurmised,
     While she the inmost of the dream would try.
   Resolv'd, she took with her an aged nurse,
   And went into that dismal forest-hearse.
 
   XLIV.
 
   See, as they creep along the river side,
     How she doth whisper to that aged Dame,
   And, after looking round the champaign wide,
     Shows her a knife.--"What feverous hectic flame
   Burns in thee, child?--What good can thee betide,
     That thou should'st smile again?"--The evening came,      350
   And they had found Lorenzo's earthy bed;
   The flint was there, the berries at his head.
 
   XLV.
 
   Who hath not loiter'd in a green church-yard,
     And let his spirit, like a demon-mole,
   Work through the clayey soil and gravel hard,
     To see scull, coffin'd bones, and funeral stole;
   Pitying each form that hungry Death hath marr'd,
     And filling it once more with human soul?
   Ah! this is holiday to what was felt
   When Isabella by Lorenzo knelt.                             360
 
   XLVI.
 
   She gaz'd into the fresh-thrown mould, as though
     One glance did fully all its secrets tell;
   Clearly she saw, as other eyes would know
     Pale limbs at bottom of a crystal well;
   Upon the murderous spot she seem'd to grow,
     Like to a native lily of the dell:
   Then with her knife, all sudden, she began
   To dig more fervently than misers can.
 
   XLVII.
 
   Soon she turn'd up a soiled glove, whereon
     Her silk had play'd in purple phantasies,                 370
   She kiss'd it with a lip more chill than stone,
     And put it in her bosom, where it dries
   And freezes utterly unto the bone
     Those dainties made to still an infant's cries:
   Then 'gan she work again; nor stay'd her care,
   But to throw back at times her veiling hair.
 
   XLVIII.
 
   That old nurse stood beside her wondering,
     Until her heart felt pity to the core
   At sight of such a dismal labouring,
     And so she kneeled, with her locks all hoar,              380
   And put her lean hands to the horrid thing:
     Three hours they labour'd at this travail sore;
   At last they felt the kernel of the grave,
   And Isabella did not stamp and rave.
 
   XLIX.
 
   Ah! wherefore all this wormy circumstance?
     Why linger at the yawning tomb so long?
   O for the gentleness of old Romance,
     The simple plaining of a minstrel's song!
   Fair reader, at the old tale take a glance,
     For here, in truth, it doth not well belong               390
   To speak:--O turn thee to the very tale,
   And taste the music of that vision pale.
 
   L.
 
   With duller steel than the Persean sword
     They cut away no formless monster's head,
   But one, whose gentleness did well accord
     With death, as life. The ancient harps have said,
   Love never dies, but lives, immortal Lord:
     If Love impersonate was ever dead,
   Pale Isabella kiss'd it, and low moan'd.
   'Twas love; cold,--dead indeed, but not dethroned.          400
 
   LI.
 
   In anxious secrecy they took it home,
     And then the prize was all for Isabel:
   She calm'd its wild hair with a golden comb,
     And all around each eye's sepulchral cell
   Pointed each fringed lash; the smeared loam
     With tears, as chilly as a dripping well,
   She drench'd away:--and still she comb'd, and kept
   Sighing all day--and still she kiss'd, and wept.
 
   LII.
 
   Then in a silken scarf,--sweet with the dews
     Of precious flowers pluck'd in Araby,                     410
   And divine liquids come with odorous ooze
     Through the cold serpent-pipe refreshfully,--
   She wrapp'd it up; and for its tomb did choose
     A garden-pot, wherein she laid it by,
   And cover'd it with mould, and o'er it set
   Sweet Basil, which her tears kept ever wet.
 
   LIII.
 
   And she forgot the stars, the moon, and sun,
     And she forgot the blue above the trees,
   And she forgot the dells where waters run,
     And she forgot the chilly autumn breeze;                  420
   She had no knowledge when the day was done,
     And the new morn she saw not: but in peace
   Hung over her sweet Basil evermore,
   And moisten'd it with tears unto the core.
 
   LIV.
 
   And so she ever fed it with thin tears,
     Whence thick, and green, and beautiful it grew,
   So that it smelt more balmy than its peers
     Of Basil-tufts in Florence; for it drew
   Nurture besides, and life, from human fears,
     From the fast mouldering head there shut from view:       430
   So that the jewel, safely casketed,
   Came forth, and in perfumed leafits spread.
 
   LV.
 
   O Melancholy, linger here awhile!
     O Music, Music, breathe despondingly!
   O Echo, Echo, from some sombre isle,
     Unknown, Lethean, sigh to us--O sigh!
   Spirits in grief, lift up your heads, and smile;
     Lift up your heads, sweet Spirits, heavily,
   And make a pale light in your cypress glooms,
   Tinting with silver wan your marble tombs.                  440
 
   LVI.
 
   Moan hither, all ye syllables of woe,
     From the deep throat of sad Melpomene!
   Through bronzed lyre in tragic order go,
     And touch the strings into a mystery;
   Sound mournfully upon the winds and low;
     For simple Isabel is soon to be
   Among the dead: She withers, like a palm
   Cut by an Indian for its juicy balm.
 
   LVII.
 
   O leave the palm to wither by itself;
     Let not quick Winter chill its dying hour!--              450
   It may not be--those Baaelites of pelf,
     Her brethren, noted the continual shower
   From her dead eyes; and many a curious elf,
     Among her kindred, wonder'd that such dower
   Of youth and beauty should be thrown aside
   By one mark'd out to be a Noble's bride.
 
   LVIII.
 
   And, furthermore, her brethren wonder'd much
     Why she sat drooping by the Basil green,
   And why it flourish'd, as by magic touch;
     Greatly they wonder'd what the thing might mean:          460
   They could not surely give belief, that such
     A very nothing would have power to wean
   Her from her own fair youth, and pleasures gay,
   And even remembrance of her love's delay.
 
   LIX.
 
   Therefore they watch'd a time when they might sift
     This hidden whim; and long they watch'd in vain;
   For seldom did she go to chapel-shrift,
     And seldom felt she any hunger-pain;
   And when she left, she hurried back, as swift
     As bird on wing to breast its eggs again;                 470
   And, patient, as a hen-bird, sat her there
   Beside her Basil, weeping through her hair.
 
   LX.
 
   Yet they contriv'd to steal the Basil-pot,
     And to examine it in secret place:
   The thing was vile with green and livid spot,
     And yet they knew it was Lorenzo's face:
   The guerdon of their murder they had got,
     And so left Florence in a moment's space,
   Never to turn again.--Away they went,
   With blood upon their heads, to banishment.                 480
 
   LXI.
 
   O Melancholy, turn thine eyes away!
     O Music, Music, breathe despondingly!
   O Echo, Echo, on some other day,
     From isles Lethean, sigh to us--O sigh!
   Spirits of grief, sing not your "Well-a-way!"
     For Isabel, sweet Isabel, will die;
   Will die a death too lone and incomplete,
   Now they have ta'en away her Basil sweet.
 
   LXII.
 
   Piteous she look'd on dead and senseless things,
     Asking for her lost Basil amorously;                      490
   And with melodious chuckle in the strings
     Of her lorn voice, she oftentimes would cry
   After the Pilgrim in his wanderings,
     To ask him where her Basil was; and why
   'Twas hid from her: "For cruel 'tis," said she,
   "To steal my Basil-pot away from me."
 
   LXIII.
 
   And so she pined, and so she died forlorn,
     Imploring for her Basil to the last.
   No heart was there in Florence but did mourn
     In pity of her love, so overcast.                         500
   And a sad ditty of this story born
     From mouth to mouth through all the country pass'd:
   Still is the burthen sung--"O cruelty,
   To steal my Basil-pot away from me!"
 
 
 
 
 THE
 
 EVE OF ST. AGNES.
 
 
   I.
 
     St. Agnes' Eve--Ah, bitter chill it was!
     The owl, for all his feathers, was a-cold;
     The hare limp'd trembling through the frozen grass,
     And silent was the flock in woolly fold:
     Numb were the Beadsman's fingers, while he told
     His rosary, and while his frosted breath,
     Like pious incense from a censer old,
     Seem'd taking flight for heaven, without a death,
   Past the sweet Virgin's picture, while his prayer he saith.
 
   II.
 
     His prayer he saith, this patient, holy man;               10
     Then takes his lamp, and riseth from his knees,
     And back returneth, meagre, barefoot, wan,
     Along the chapel aisle by slow degrees:
     The sculptur'd dead, on each side, seem to freeze,
     Emprison'd in black, purgatorial rails:
     Knights, ladies, praying in dumb orat'ries,
     He passeth by; and his weak spirit fails
   To think how they may ache in icy hoods and mails.
 
   III.
 
     Northward he turneth through a little door,
     And scarce three steps, ere Music's golden tongue          20
     Flatter'd to tears this aged man and poor;
     But no--already had his deathbell rung;
     The joys of all his life were said and sung:
     His was harsh penance on St. Agnes' Eve:
     Another way he went, and soon among
     Rough ashes sat he for his soul's reprieve,
   And all night kept awake, for sinners' sake to grieve.
 
   IV.
 
     That ancient Beadsman heard the prelude soft;
     And so it chanc'd, for many a door was wide,
     From hurry to and fro. Soon, up aloft,                     30
     The silver, snarling trumpets 'gan to chide:
     The level chambers, ready with their pride,
     Were glowing to receive a thousand guests:
     The carved angels, ever eager-eyed,
     Star'd, where upon their heads the cornice rests,
   With hair blown back, and wings put cross-wise on their breasts.
 
   V.
 
     At length burst in the argent revelry,
     With plume, tiara, and all rich array,
     Numerous as shadows haunting fairily
     The brain, new stuff'd, in youth, with triumphs gay        40
     Of old romance. These let us wish away,
     And turn, sole-thoughted, to one Lady there,
     Whose heart had brooded, all that wintry day,
     On love, and wing'd St. Agnes' saintly care,
   As she had heard old dames full many times declare.
 
   VI.
 
     They told her how, upon St. Agnes' Eve,
     Young virgins might have visions of delight,
     And soft adorings from their loves receive
     Upon the honey'd middle of the night,
     If ceremonies due they did aright;                         50
     As, supperless to bed they must retire,
     And couch supine their beauties, lily white;
     Nor look behind, nor sideways, but require
   Of Heaven with upward eyes for all that they desire.
 
   VII.
 
     Full of this whim was thoughtful Madeline:
     The music, yearning like a God in pain,
     She scarcely heard: her maiden eyes divine,
     Fix'd on the floor, saw many a sweeping train
     Pass by--she heeded not at all: in vain
     Came many a tiptoe, amorous cavalier,                      60
     And back retir'd; not cool'd by high disdain,
     But she saw not: her heart was otherwhere:
   She sigh'd for Agnes' dreams, the sweetest of the year.
 
   VIII.
 
     She danc'd along with vague, regardless eyes,
     Anxious her lips, her breathing quick and short:
     The hallow'd hour was near at hand: she sighs
     Amid the timbrels, and the throng'd resort
     Of whisperers in anger, or in sport;
     'Mid looks of love, defiance, hate, and scorn,
     Hoodwink'd with faery fancy; all amort,                    70
     Save to St. Agnes and her lambs unshorn,
   And all the bliss to be before to-morrow morn.
 
   IX.
 
     So, purposing each moment to retire,
     She linger'd still. Meantime, across the moors,
     Had come young Porphyro, with heart on fire
     For Madeline. Beside the portal doors,
     Buttress'd from moonlight, stands he, and implores
     All saints to give him sight of Madeline,
     But for one moment in the tedious hours,
     That he might gaze and worship all unseen;                 80
   Perchance speak, kneel, touch, kiss--in sooth such things
       have been.
 
   X.
 
     He ventures in: let no buzz'd whisper tell:
     All eyes be muffled, or a hundred swords
     Will storm his heart, Love's fev'rous citadel:
     For him, those chambers held barbarian hordes,
     Hyena foemen, and hot-blooded lords,
     Whose very dogs would execrations howl
     Against his lineage: not one breast affords
     Him any mercy, in that mansion foul,
   Save one old beldame, weak in body and in soul.              90
 
   XI.
 
     Ah, happy chance! the aged creature came,
     Shuffling along with ivory-headed wand,
     To where he stood, hid from the torch's flame,
     Behind a broad hall-pillar, far beyond
     The sound of merriment and chorus bland:
     He startled her; but soon she knew his face,
     And grasp'd his fingers in her palsied hand,
     Saying, "Mercy, Porphyro! hie thee from this place;
   They are all here to-night, the whole blood-thirsty race!"
 
   XII.
 
     "Get hence! get hence! there's dwarfish Hildebrand;       100
     He had a fever late, and in the fit
     He cursed thee and thine, both house and land:
     Then there's that old Lord Maurice, not a whit
     More tame for his gray hairs--Alas me! flit!
     Flit like a ghost away."--"Ah, Gossip dear,
     We're safe enough; here in this arm-chair sit,
     And tell me how"--"Good Saints! not here, not here;
   Follow me, child, or else these stones will be thy bier."
 
   XIII.
 
     He follow'd through a lowly arched way,
     Brushing the cobwebs with his lofty plume,                110
     And as she mutter'd "Well-a--well-a-day!"
     He found him in a little moonlight room,
     Pale, lattic'd, chill, and silent as a tomb.
     "Now tell me where is Madeline," said he,
     "O tell me, Angela, by the holy loom
     Which none but secret sisterhood may see,
   When they St. Agnes' wool are weaving piously."
 
   XIV.
 
     "St. Agnes! Ah! it is St. Agnes' Eve--
     Yet men will murder upon holy days:
     Thou must hold water in a witch's sieve,                  120
     And be liege-lord of all the Elves and Fays,
     To venture so: it fills me with amaze
     To see thee, Porphyro!--St. Agnes' Eve!
     God's help! my lady fair the conjuror plays
     This very night: good angels her deceive!
   But let me laugh awhile, I've mickle time to grieve."
 
   XV.
 
     Feebly she laugheth in the languid moon,
     While Porphyro upon her face doth look,
     Like puzzled urchin on an aged crone
     Who keepeth clos'd a wond'rous riddle-book,               130
     As spectacled she sits in chimney nook.
     But soon his eyes grew brilliant, when she told
     His lady's purpose; and he scarce could brook
     Tears, at the thought of those enchantments cold
   And Madeline asleep in lap of legends old.
 
   XVI.
 
     Sudden a thought came like a full-blown rose,
     Flushing his brow, and in his pained heart
     Made purple riot: then doth he propose
     A stratagem, that makes the beldame start:
     "A cruel man and impious thou art:                        140
     Sweet lady, let her pray, and sleep, and dream
     Alone with her good angels, far apart
     From wicked men like thee. Go, go!--I deem
   Thou canst not surely be the same that thou didst seem."
 
   XVII.
 
     "I will not harm her, by all saints I swear,"
     Quoth Porphyro: "O may I ne'er find grace
     When my weak voice shall whisper its last prayer,
     If one of her soft ringlets I displace,
     Or look with ruffian passion in her face:
     Good Angela, believe me by these tears;                   150
     Or I will, even in a moment's space,
     Awake, with horrid shout, my foemen's ears,
   And beard them, though they be more fang'd than wolves and
       bears."
 
   XVIII.
 
     "Ah! why wilt thou affright a feeble soul?
     A poor, weak, palsy-stricken, churchyard thing,
     Whose passing-bell may ere the midnight toll;
     Whose prayers for thee, each morn and evening,
     Were never miss'd."--Thus plaining, doth she bring
     A gentler speech from burning Porphyro;
     So woful, and of such deep sorrowing,                     160
     That Angela gives promise she will do
   Whatever he shall wish, betide her weal or woe.
 
   XIX.
 
     Which was, to lead him, in close secrecy,
     Even to Madeline's chamber, and there hide
     Him in a closet, of such privacy
     That he might see her beauty unespied,
     And win perhaps that night a peerless bride,
     While legion'd fairies pac'd the coverlet,
     And pale enchantment held her sleepy-eyed.
     Never on such a night have lovers met,                    170
   Since Merlin paid his Demon all the monstrous debt.
 
   XX.
 
     "It shall be as thou wishest," said the Dame:
     "All cates and dainties shall be stored there
     Quickly on this feast-night: by the tambour frame
     Her own lute thou wilt see: no time to spare,
     For I am slow and feeble, and scarce dare
     On such a catering trust my dizzy head.
     Wait here, my child, with patience; kneel in prayer
     The while: Ah! thou must needs the lady wed,
   Or may I never leave my grave among the dead."              180
 
   XXI.
 
     So saying, she hobbled off with busy fear.
     The lover's endless minutes slowly pass'd;
     The dame return'd, and whisper'd in his ear
     To follow her; with aged eyes aghast
     From fright of dim espial. Safe at last,
     Through many a dusky gallery, they gain
     The maiden's chamber, silken, hush'd, and chaste;
     Where Porphyro took covert, pleas'd amain.
   His poor guide hurried back with agues in her brain.
 
   XXII.
 
     Her falt'ring hand upon the balustrade,                   190
     Old Angela was feeling for the stair,
     When Madeline, St. Agnes' charmed maid,
     Rose, like a mission'd spirit, unaware:
     With silver taper's light, and pious care,
     She turn'd, and down the aged gossip led
     To a safe level matting. Now prepare,
     Young Porphyro, for gazing on that bed;
   She comes, she comes again, like ring-dove fray'd and fled.
 
   XXIII.
 
     Out went the taper as she hurried in;
     Its little smoke, in pallid moonshine, died:              200
     She clos'd the door, she panted, all akin
     To spirits of the air, and visions wide:
     No uttered syllable, or, woe betide!
     But to her heart, her heart was voluble,
     Paining with eloquence her balmy side;
     As though a tongueless nightingale should swell
   Her throat in vain, and die, heart-stifled, in her dell.
 
   XXIV.
 
     A casement high and triple-arch'd there was,
     All garlanded with carven imag'ries
     Of fruits, and flowers, and bunches of knot-grass,        210
     And diamonded with panes of quaint device,
     Innumerable of stains and splendid dyes,
     As are the tiger-moth's deep-damask'd wings;
     And in the midst, 'mong thousand heraldries,
     And twilight saints, and dim emblazonings,
   A shielded scutcheon blush'd with blood of queens and kings.
 
   XXV.
 
     Full on this casement shone the wintry moon,
     And threw warm gules on Madeline's fair breast,
     As down she knelt for heaven's grace and boon;
     Rose-bloom fell on her hands, together prest,             220
     And on her silver cross soft amethyst,
     And on her hair a glory, like a saint:
     She seem'd a splendid angel, newly drest,
     Save wings, for heaven:--Porphyro grew faint:
   She knelt, so pure a thing, so free from mortal taint.
 
   XXVI.
 
     Anon his heart revives: her vespers done,
     Of all its wreathed pearls her hair she frees;
     Unclasps her warmed jewels one by one;
     Loosens her fragrant boddice; by degrees
     Her rich attire creeps rustling to her knees:             230
     Half-hidden, like a mermaid in sea-weed,
     Pensive awhile she dreams awake, and sees,
     In fancy, fair St. Agnes in her bed,
   But dares not look behind, or all the charm is fled.
 
   XXVII.
 
     Soon, trembling in her soft and chilly nest,
     In sort of wakeful swoon, perplex'd she lay,
     Until the poppied warmth of sleep oppress'd
     Her soothed limbs, and soul fatigued away;
     Flown, like a thought, until the morrow-day;
     Blissfully haven'd both from joy and pain;                240
     Clasp'd like a missal where swart Paynims pray;
     Blinded alike from sunshine and from rain,
   As though a rose should shut, and be a bud again.
 
   XXVIII.
 
     Stol'n to this paradise, and so entranced,
     Porphyro gazed upon her empty dress,
     And listen'd to her breathing, if it chanced
     To wake into a slumberous tenderness;
     Which when he heard, that minute did he bless,
     And breath'd himself: then from the closet crept,
     Noiseless as fear in a wide wilderness,                   250
     And over the hush'd carpet, silent, stept,
   And 'tween the curtains peep'd, where, lo!--how fast she
       slept.
 
   XXIX.
 
     Then by the bed-side, where the faded moon
     Made a dim, silver twilight, soft he set
     A table, and, half anguish'd, threw thereon
     A cloth of woven crimson, gold, and jet:--
     O for some drowsy Morphean amulet!
     The boisterous, midnight, festive clarion,
     The kettle-drum, and far-heard clarionet,
     Affray his ears, though but in dying tone:--              260
   The hall door shuts again, and all the noise is gone.
 
   XXX.
 
     And still she slept an azure-lidded sleep,
     In blanched linen, smooth, and lavender'd,
     While he from forth the closet brought a heap
     Of candied apple, quince, and plum, and gourd
     With jellies soother than the creamy curd,
     And lucent syrops, tinct with cinnamon;
     Manna and dates, in argosy transferr'd
     From Fez; and spiced dainties, every one,
   From silken Samarcand to cedar'd Lebanon.                   270
 
   XXXI.
 
     These delicates he heap'd with glowing hand
     On golden dishes and in baskets bright
     Of wreathed silver: sumptuous they stand
     In the retired quiet of the night,
     Filling the chilly room with perfume light.--
     "And now, my love, my seraph fair, awake!
     Thou art my heaven, and I thine eremite:
     Open thine eyes, for meek St. Agnes' sake,
   Or I shall drowse beside thee, so my soul doth ache."
 
   XXXII.
 
     Thus whispering, his warm, unnerved arm                   280
     Sank in her pillow. Shaded was her dream
     By the dusk curtains:--'twas a midnight charm
     Impossible to melt as iced stream:
     The lustrous salvers in the moonlight gleam;
     Broad golden fringe upon the carpet lies:
     It seem'd he never, never could redeem
     From such a stedfast spell his lady's eyes;
   So mus'd awhile, entoil'd in woofed phantasies.
 
   XXXIII.
 
     Awakening up, he took her hollow lute,--
     Tumultuous,--and, in chords that tenderest be,            290
     He play'd an ancient ditty, long since mute,
     In Provence call'd, "La belle dame sans mercy:"
     Close to her ear touching the melody;--
     Wherewith disturb'd, she utter'd a soft moan:
     He ceased--she panted quick--and suddenly
     Her blue affrayed eyes wide open shone:
   Upon his knees he sank, pale as smooth-sculptured stone.
 
   XXXIV.
 
     Her eyes were open, but she still beheld,
     Now wide awake, the vision of her sleep:
     There was a painful change, that nigh expell'd            300
     The blisses of her dream so pure and deep
     At which fair Madeline began to weep,
     And moan forth witless words with many a sigh;
     While still her gaze on Porphyro would keep;
     Who knelt, with joined hands and piteous eye,
   Fearing to move or speak, she look'd so dreamingly.
 
   XXXV.
 
     "Ah, Porphyro!" said she, "but even now
     Thy voice was at sweet tremble in mine ear,
     Made tuneable with every sweetest vow;
     And those sad eyes were spiritual and clear:              310
     How chang'd thou art! how pallid, chill, and drear!
     Give me that voice again, my Porphyro,
     Those looks immortal, those complainings dear!
     Oh leave me not in this eternal woe,
   For if thou diest, my Love, I know not where to go."
 
   XXXVI.
 
     Beyond a mortal man impassion'd far
     At these voluptuous accents, he arose,
     Ethereal, flush'd, and like a throbbing star
     Seen mid the sapphire heaven's deep repose
     Into her dream he melted, as the rose                     320
     Blendeth its odour with the violet,--
     Solution sweet: meantime the frost-wind blows
     Like Love's alarum pattering the sharp sleet
   Against the window-panes; St. Agnes' moon hath set.
 
   XXXVII.
 
     'Tis dark: quick pattereth the flaw-blown sleet:
     "This is no dream, my bride, my Madeline!"
     'Tis dark: the iced gusts still rave and beat:
     "No dream, alas! alas! and woe is mine!
     Porphyro will leave me here to fade and pine.--
     Cruel! what traitor could thee hither bring?              330
     I curse not, for my heart is lost in thine
     Though thou forsakest a deceived thing;--
   A dove forlorn and lost with sick unpruned wing."
 
   XXXVIII.
 
     "My Madeline! sweet dreamer! lovely bride!
     Say, may I be for aye thy vassal blest?
     Thy beauty's shield, heart-shap'd and vermeil dyed?
     Ah, silver shrine, here will I take my rest
     After so many hours of toil and quest,
     A famish'd pilgrim,--saved by miracle.
     Though I have found, I will not rob thy nest              340
     Saving of thy sweet self; if thou think'st well
   To trust, fair Madeline, to no rude infidel."
 
   XXXIX.
 
     "Hark! 'tis an elfin-storm from faery land,
     Of haggard seeming, but a boon indeed:
     Arise--arise! the morning is at hand;--
     The bloated wassaillers will never heed:--
     Let us away, my love, with happy speed;
     There are no ears to hear, or eyes to see,--
     Drown'd all in Rhenish and the sleepy mead:
     Awake! arise! my love, and fearless be,                   350
   For o'er the southern moors I have a home for thee."
 
   XL.
 
     She hurried at his words, beset with fears,
     For there were sleeping dragons all around,
     At glaring watch, perhaps, with ready spears--
     Down the wide stairs a darkling way they found.--
     In all the house was heard no human sound.
     A chain-droop'd lamp was flickering by each door;
     The arras, rich with horseman, hawk, and hound,
     Flutter'd in the besieging wind's uproar;
   And the long carpets rose along the gusty floor.            360
 
   XLI.
 
     They glide, like phantoms, into the wide hall;
     Like phantoms, to the iron porch, they glide;
     Where lay the Porter, in uneasy sprawl,
     With a huge empty flaggon by his side:
     The wakeful bloodhound rose, and shook his hide,
     But his sagacious eye an inmate owns:
     By one, and one, the bolts full easy slide:--
     The chains lie silent on the footworn stones;--
   The key turns, and the door upon its hinges groans.
 
   XLII.
 
     And they are gone: ay, ages long ago                      370
     These lovers fled away into the storm.
     That night the Baron dreamt of many a woe,
     And all his warrior-guests, with shade and form
     Of witch, and demon, and large coffin-worm,
     Were long be-nightmar'd. Angela the old
     Died palsy-twitch'd, with meagre face deform;
     The Beadsman, after thousand aves told,
   For aye unsought for slept among his ashes cold.
 
 
 
 
 POEMS.
 
 
 
 
 ODE TO A NIGHTINGALE.
 
 
   1.
 
   My heart aches, and a drowsy numbness pains
     My sense, as though of hemlock I had drunk,
   Or emptied some dull opiate to the drains
     One minute past, and Lethe-wards had sunk:
   'Tis not through envy of thy happy lot,
     But being too happy in thine happiness,--
       That thou, light-winged Dryad of the trees,
           In some melodious plot
     Of beechen green, and shadows numberless,
       Singest of summer in full-throated ease.                 10
 
   2.
 
   O, for a draught of vintage! that hath been
     Cool'd a long age in the deep-delved earth,
   Tasting of Flora and the country green,
     Dance, and Provencal song, and sunburnt mirth!
   O for a beaker full of the warm South,
     Full of the true, the blushful Hippocrene,
       With beaded bubbles winking at the brim,
           And purple-stained mouth;
     That I might drink, and leave the world unseen,
       And with thee fade away into the forest dim:             20
 
   3.
 
   Fade far away, dissolve, and quite forget
     What thou among the leaves hast never known,
   The weariness, the fever, and the fret
     Here, where men sit and hear each other groan;
   Where palsy shakes a few, sad, last gray hairs,
     Where youth grows pale, and spectre-thin, and dies;
       Where but to think is to be full of sorrow
           And leaden-eyed despairs,
     Where Beauty cannot keep her lustrous eyes,
       Or new Love pine at them beyond to-morrow.               30
 
   4.
 
   Away! away! for I will fly to thee,
     Not charioted by Bacchus and his pards,
   But on the viewless wings of Poesy,
     Though the dull brain perplexes and retards:
   Already with thee! tender is the night,
     And haply the Queen-Moon is on her throne,
       Cluster'd around by all her starry Fays;
           But here there is no light,
     Save what from heaven is with the breezes blown
       Through verdurous glooms and winding mossy ways.         40
 
   5.
 
   I cannot see what flowers are at my feet,
     Nor what soft incense hangs upon the boughs,
   But, in embalmed darkness, guess each sweet
     Wherewith the seasonable month endows
   The grass, the thicket, and the fruit-tree wild;
     White hawthorn, and the pastoral eglantine;
       Fast fading violets cover'd up in leaves;
           And mid-May's eldest child,
     The coming musk-rose, full of dewy wine,
       The murmurous haunt of flies on summer eves.             50
 
   6.
 
   Darkling I listen; and, for many a time
     I have been half in love with easeful Death,
   Call'd him soft names in many a mused rhyme,
     To take into the air my quiet breath;
   Now more than ever seems it rich to die,
     To cease upon the midnight with no pain,
       While thou art pouring forth thy soul abroad
           In such an ecstasy!
     Still wouldst thou sing, and I have ears in vain--
       To thy high requiem become a sod.                        60
 
   7.
 
   Thou wast not born for death, immortal Bird!
     No hungry generations tread thee down;
   The voice I hear this passing night was heard
     In ancient days by emperor and clown:
   Perhaps the self-same song that found a path
     Through the sad heart of Ruth, when, sick for home,
       She stood in tears amid the alien corn;
           The same that oft-times hath
     Charm'd magic casements, opening on the foam
       Of perilous seas, in faery lands forlorn.                70
 
   8.
 
   Forlorn! the very word is like a bell
     To toll me back from thee to my sole self!
   Adieu! the fancy cannot cheat so well
     As she is fam'd to do, deceiving elf.
   Adieu! adieu! thy plaintive anthem fades
     Past the near meadows, over the still stream,
       Up the hill-side; and now 'tis buried deep
           In the next valley-glades:
     Was it a vision, or a waking dream?
       Fled is that music:--Do I wake or sleep?                 80
 
 
 
 
 ODE ON A GRECIAN URN.
 
 
   1.
 
   Thou still unravish'd bride of quietness,
     Thou foster-child of silence and slow time,
   Sylvan historian, who canst thus express
     A flowery tale more sweetly than our rhyme:
   What leaf-fring'd legend haunts about thy shape
     Of deities or mortals, or of both,
       In Tempe or the dales of Arcady?
     What men or gods are these? What maidens loth?
   What mad pursuit? What struggle to escape?
       What pipes and timbrels? What wild ecstasy?              10
 
   2.
 
   Heard melodies are sweet, but those unheard
     Are sweeter; therefore, ye soft pipes, play on;
   Not to the sensual ear, but, more endear'd,
     Pipe to the spirit ditties of no tone:
   Fair youth, beneath the trees, thou canst not leave
     Thy song, nor ever can those trees be bare;
       Bold Lover, never, never canst thou kiss,
   Though winning near the goal--yet, do not grieve;
     She cannot fade, though thou hast not thy bliss,
       For ever wilt thou love, and she be fair!                20
 
   3.
 
   Ah, happy, happy boughs! that cannot shed
     Your leaves, nor ever bid the Spring adieu;
   And, happy melodist, unwearied,
     For ever piping songs for ever new;
   More happy love! more happy, happy love!
     For ever warm and still to be enjoy'd,
       For ever panting, and for ever young;
   All breathing human passion far above,
     That leaves a heart high-sorrowful and cloy'd,
       A burning forehead, and a parching tongue.               30
 
   4.
 
   Who are these coming to the sacrifice?
     To what green altar, O mysterious priest,
   Lead'st thou that heifer lowing at the skies,
     And all her silken flanks with garlands drest?
   What little town by river or sea shore,
     Or mountain-built with peaceful citadel,
       Is emptied of this folk, this pious morn?
   And, little town, thy streets for evermore
     Will silent be; and not a soul to tell
       Why thou art desolate, can e'er return.                 40
 
   5.
 
   O Attic shape! Fair attitude! with brede
     Of marble men and maidens overwrought,
   With forest branches and the trodden weed;
     Thou, silent form, dost tease us out of thought
   As doth eternity: Cold Pastoral!
     When old age shall this generation waste,
       Thou shalt remain, in midst of other woe
   Than ours, a friend to man, to whom thou say'st,
     "Beauty is truth, truth beauty,"--that is all
       Ye know on earth, and all ye need to know.               50
 
 
 
 
 ODE TO PSYCHE.
 
 
   O Goddess! hear these tuneless numbers, wrung
     By sweet enforcement and remembrance dear,
   And pardon that thy secrets should be sung
     Even into thine own soft-conched ear:
   Surely I dreamt to-day, or did I see
     The winged Psyche with awaken'd eyes?
   I wander'd in a forest thoughtlessly,
     And, on the sudden, fainting with surprise,
   Saw two fair creatures, couched side by side
     In deepest grass, beneath the whisp'ring roof              10
     Of leaves and trembled blossoms, where there ran
           A brooklet, scarce espied:
   'Mid hush'd, cool-rooted flowers, fragrant-eyed,
     Blue, silver-white, and budded Tyrian,
   They lay calm-breathing on the bedded grass;
     Their arms embraced, and their pinions too;
     Their lips touch'd not, but had not bade adieu,
   As if disjoined by soft-handed slumber,
   And ready still past kisses to outnumber
     At tender eye-dawn of aurorean love:                       20
         The winged boy I knew;
     But who wast thou, O happy, happy dove?
         His Psyche true!
 
   O latest born and loveliest vision far
     Of all Olympus' faded hierarchy!
   Fairer than Phoebe's sapphire-region'd star,
     Or Vesper, amorous glow-worm of the sky;
   Fairer than these, though temple thou hast none,
       Nor altar heap'd with flowers;
   Nor virgin-choir to make delicious moan                      30
       Upon the midnight hours;
   No voice, no lute, no pipe, no incense sweet
     From chain-swung censer teeming;
   No shrine, no grove, no oracle, no heat
     Of pale-mouth'd prophet dreaming.
 
   O brightest! though too late for antique vows,
     Too, too late for the fond believing lyre,
   When holy were the haunted forest boughs,
     Holy the air, the water, and the fire;
   Yet even in these days so far retir'd                        40
     From happy pieties, thy lucent fans,
     Fluttering among the faint Olympians,
   I see, and sing, by my own eyes inspired.
   So let me be thy choir, and make a moan
       Upon the midnight hours;
   Thy voice, thy lute, thy pipe, thy incense sweet
     From swinged censer teeming;
   Thy shrine, thy grove, thy oracle, thy heat
     Of pale-mouth'd prophet dreaming.
 
   Yes, I will be thy priest, and build a fane                  50
     In some untrodden region of my mind,
   Where branched thoughts, new grown with pleasant pain,
     Instead of pines shall murmur in the wind:
   Far, far around shall those dark-cluster'd trees
     Fledge the wild-ridged mountains steep by steep;
   And there by zephyrs, streams, and birds, and bees,
     The moss-lain Dryads shall be lull'd to sleep;
   And in the midst of this wide quietness
   A rosy sanctuary will I dress
   With the wreath'd trellis of a working brain,                60
     With buds, and bells, and stars without a name,
   With all the gardener Fancy e'er could feign,
     Who breeding flowers, will never breed the same:
   And there shall be for thee all soft delight
     That shadowy thought can win,
   A bright torch, and a casement ope at night,
     To let the warm Love in!
 
 
 
 
 FANCY.
 
 
   Ever let the Fancy roam,
   Pleasure never is at home:
   At a touch sweet Pleasure melteth,
   Like to bubbles when rain pelteth;
   Then let winged Fancy wander
   Through the thought still spread beyond her:
   Open wide the mind's cage-door,
   She'll dart forth, and cloudward soar.
   O sweet Fancy! let her loose;
   Summer's joys are spoilt by use,                             10
   And the enjoying of the Spring
   Fades as does its blossoming;
   Autumn's red-lipp'd fruitage too,
   Blushing through the mist and dew,
   Cloys with tasting: What do then?
   Sit thee by the ingle, when
   The sear faggot blazes bright,
   Spirit of a winter's night;
   When the soundless earth is muffled,
   And the caked snow is shuffled                               20
   From the ploughboy's heavy shoon;
   When the Night doth meet the Noon
   In a dark conspiracy
   To banish Even from her sky.
   Sit thee there, and send abroad,
   With a mind self-overaw'd,
   Fancy, high-commission'd:--send her!
   She has vassals to attend her:
   She will bring, in spite of frost,
   Beauties that the earth hath lost;                           30
   She will bring thee, all together,
   All delights of summer weather;
   All the buds and bells of May,
   From dewy sward or thorny spray
   All the heaped Autumn's wealth,
   With a still, mysterious stealth:
   She will mix these pleasures up
   Like three fit wines in a cup,
   And thou shalt quaff it:--thou shalt hear
   Distant harvest-carols clear;                                40
   Rustle of the reaped corn;
   Sweet birds antheming the morn:
   And, in the same moment--hark!
   'Tis the early April lark,
   Or the rooks, with busy caw,
   Foraging for sticks and straw.
   Thou shalt, at one glance, behold
   The daisy and the marigold;
   White-plum'd lilies, and the first
   Hedge-grown primrose that hath burst;                        50
   Shaded hyacinth, alway
   Sapphire queen of the mid-May;
   And every leaf, and every flower
   Pearled with the self-same shower.
   Thou shalt see the field-mouse peep
   Meagre from its celled sleep;
   And the snake all winter-thin
   Cast on sunny bank its skin;
   Freckled nest-eggs thou shalt see
   Hatching in the hawthorn-tree,                               60
   When the hen-bird's wing doth rest
   Quiet on her mossy nest;
   Then the hurry and alarm
   When the bee-hive casts its swarm;
   Acorns ripe down-pattering,
   While the autumn breezes sing.
 
     Oh, sweet Fancy! let her loose;
   Every thing is spoilt by use:
   Where's the cheek that doth not fade,
   Too much gaz'd at? Where's the maid                          70
   Whose lip mature is ever new?
   Where's the eye, however blue,
   Doth not weary? Where's the face
   One would meet in every place?
   Where's the voice, however soft,
   One would hear so very oft?
   At a touch sweet Pleasure melteth
   Like to bubbles when rain pelteth.
   Let, then, winged Fancy find
   Thee a mistress to thy mind:                                 80
   Dulcet-eyed as Ceres' daughter,
   Ere the God of Torment taught her
   How to frown and how to chide;
   With a waist and with a side
   White as Hebe's, when her zone
   Slipt its golden clasp, and down
   Fell her kirtle to her feet,
   While she held the goblet sweet,
   And Jove grew languid.--Break the mesh
   Of the Fancy's silken leash;                                 90
   Quickly break her prison-string
   And such joys as these she'll bring.--
   Let the winged Fancy roam
   Pleasure never is at home.
 
 
 
 
 ODE.
 
 
   Bards of Passion and of Mirth,
   Ye have left your souls on earth!
   Have ye souls in heaven too,
   Double-lived in regions new?
   Yes, and those of heaven commune
   With the spheres of sun and moon;
   With the noise of fountains wond'rous,
   And the parle of voices thund'rous;
   With the whisper of heaven's trees
   And one another, in soft ease                                10
   Seated on Elysian lawns
   Brows'd by none but Dian's fawns
   Underneath large blue-bells tented,
   Where the daisies are rose-scented,
   And the rose herself has got
   Perfume which on earth is not;
   Where the nightingale doth sing
   Not a senseless, tranced thing,
   But divine melodious truth;
   Philosophic numbers smooth;                                  20
   Tales and golden histories
   Of heaven and its mysteries.
 
     Thus ye live on high, and then
   On the earth ye live again;
   And the souls ye left behind you
   Teach us, here, the way to find you,
   Where your other souls are joying,
   Never slumber'd, never cloying.
   Here, your earth-born souls still speak
   To mortals, of their little week;                            30
   Of their sorrows and delights;
   Of their passions and their spites;
   Of their glory and their shame;
   What doth strengthen and what maim.
   Thus ye teach us, every day,
   Wisdom, though fled far away.
 
     Bards of Passion and of Mirth,
   Ye have left your souls on earth!
   Ye have souls in heaven too,
   Double-lived in regions new!                                 40
 
 
 
 
 LINES
 ON
 THE MERMAID TAVERN.
 
 
   Souls of Poets dead and gone,
   What Elysium have ye known,
   Happy field or mossy cavern,
   Choicer than the Mermaid Tavern?
   Have ye tippled drink more fine
   Than mine host's Canary wine?
   Or are fruits of Paradise
   Sweeter than those dainty pies
   Of venison? O generous food!
   Drest as though bold Robin Hood                              10
   Would, with his maid Marian,
   Sup and bowse from horn and can.
 
     I have heard that on a day
   Mine host's sign-board flew away,
   Nobody knew whither, till
   An astrologer's old quill
   To a sheepskin gave the story,
   Said he saw you in your glory,
   Underneath a new old-sign
   Sipping beverage divine,                                     20
   And pledging with contented smack
   The Mermaid in the Zodiac.
 
     Souls of Poets dead and gone,
   What Elysium have ye known,
   Happy field or mossy cavern,
   Choicer than the Mermaid Tavern?
 
 
 
 
 ROBIN HOOD.
 
 TO A FRIEND.
 
 
   No! those days are gone away,
   And their hours are old and gray,
   And their minutes buried all
   Under the down-trodden pall
   Of the leaves of many years:
   Many times have winter's shears,
   Frozen North, and chilling East,
   Sounded tempests to the feast
   Of the forest's whispering fleeces,
   Since men knew nor rent nor leases.                          10
 
     No, the bugle sounds no more,
   And the twanging bow no more;
   Silent is the ivory shrill
   Past the heath and up the hill;
   There is no mid-forest laugh,
   Where lone Echo gives the half
   To some wight, amaz'd to hear
   Jesting, deep in forest drear.
 
     On the fairest time of June
   You may go, with sun or moon,                                20
   Or the seven stars to light you,
   Or the polar ray to right you;
   But you never may behold
   Little John, or Robin bold;
   Never one, of all the clan,
   Thrumming on an empty can
   Some old hunting ditty, while
   He doth his green way beguile
   To fair hostess Merriment,
   Down beside the pasture Trent;                               30
   For he left the merry tale
   Messenger for spicy ale.
 
     Gone, the merry morris din;
   Gone, the song of Gamelyn;
   Gone, the tough-belted outlaw
   Idling in the "grene shawe;"
   All are gone away and past!
   And if Robin should be cast
   Sudden from his turfed grave,
   And if Marian should have                                    40
   Once again her forest days,
   She would weep, and he would craze:
   He would swear, for all his oaks,
   Fall'n beneath the dockyard strokes,
   Have rotted on the briny seas;
   She would weep that her wild bees
   Sang not to her--strange! that honey
   Can't be got without hard money!
 
     So it is: yet let us sing,
   Honour to the old bow-string!                                50
   Honour to the bugle-horn!
   Honour to the woods unshorn!
   Honour to the Lincoln green!
   Honour to the archer keen!
   Honour to tight little John,
   And the horse he rode upon!
   Honour to bold Robin Hood,
   Sleeping in the underwood!
   Honour to maid Marian,
   And to all the Sherwood-clan!                                60
   Though their days have hurried by
   Let us two a burden try.
 
 
 
 
 TO AUTUMN.
 
 
   1.
 
   Season of mists and mellow fruitfulness,
     Close bosom-friend of the maturing sun;
   Conspiring with him how to load and bless
     With fruit the vines that round the thatch-eves run;
   To bend with apples the moss'd cottage-trees,
     And fill all fruit with ripeness to the core;
       To swell the gourd, and plump the hazel shells
   With a sweet kernel; to set budding more,
     And still more, later flowers for the bees,
     Until they think warm days will never cease,               10
       For Summer has o'er-brimm'd their clammy cells.
 
   2.
 
   Who hath not seen thee oft amid thy store?
     Sometimes whoever seeks abroad may find
   Thee sitting careless on a granary floor,
     Thy hair soft-lifted by the winnowing wind;
   Or on a half-reap'd furrow sound asleep,
     Drows'd with the fume of poppies, while thy hook
       Spares the next swath and all its twined flowers:
   And sometimes like a gleaner thou dost keep
     Steady thy laden head across a brook;                      20
     Or by a cyder-press, with patient look,
       Thou watchest the last oozings hours by hours.
 
   3.
 
   Where are the songs of Spring? Ay, where are they?
     Think not of them, thou hast thy music too,--
   While barred clouds bloom the soft-dying day,
     And touch the stubble-plains with rosy hue;
   Then in a wailful choir the small gnats mourn
     Among the river sallows, borne aloft
       Or sinking as the light wind lives or dies;
   And full-grown lambs loud bleat from hilly bourn;            30
     Hedge-crickets sing; and now with treble soft
     The red-breast whistles from a garden-croft;
       And gathering swallows twitter in the skies.
 
 
 
 
 ODE ON MELANCHOLY.
 
 
   1.
 
   No, no, go not to Lethe, neither twist
     Wolf's-bane, tight-rooted, for its poisonous wine;
   Nor suffer thy pale forehead to be kiss'd
     By nightshade, ruby grape of Proserpine;
   Make not your rosary of yew-berries,
     Nor let the beetle, nor the death-moth be
       Your mournful Psyche, nor the downy owl
   A partner in your sorrow's mysteries;
     For shade to shade will come too drowsily,
       And drown the wakeful anguish of the soul.               10
 
   2.
 
   But when the melancholy fit shall fall
     Sudden from heaven like a weeping cloud,
   That fosters the droop-headed flowers all,
     And hides the green hill in an April shroud;
   Then glut thy sorrow on a morning rose,
     Or on the rainbow of the salt sand-wave,
       Or on the wealth of globed peonies;
   Or if thy mistress some rich anger shows,
     Emprison her soft hand, and let her rave,
       And feed deep, deep upon her peerless eyes.              20
 
   3.
 
   She dwells with Beauty--Beauty that must die;
     And Joy, whose hand is ever at his lips
   Bidding adieu; and aching Pleasure nigh,
     Turning to poison while the bee-mouth sips:
   Ay, in the very temple of Delight
     Veil'd Melancholy has her sovran shrine,
       Though seen of none save him whose strenuous tongue
   Can burst Joy's grape against his palate fine;
     His soul shall taste the sadness of her might,
       And be among her cloudy trophies hung.                   30
 
 
 
 
 HYPERION.
 
 A FRAGMENT.
 
 
 BOOK I.
 
   Deep in the shady sadness of a vale
   Far sunken from the healthy breath of morn,
   Far from the fiery noon, and eve's one star,
   Sat gray-hair'd Saturn, quiet as a stone,
   Still as the silence round about his lair;
   Forest on forest hung about his head
   Like cloud on cloud. No stir of air was there,
   Not so much life as on a summer's day
   Robs not one light seed from the feather'd grass,
   But where the dead leaf fell, there did it rest.             10
   A stream went voiceless by, still deadened more
   By reason of his fallen divinity
   Spreading a shade: the Naiad 'mid her reeds
   Press'd her cold finger closer to her lips.
 
     Along the margin-sand large foot-marks went,
   No further than to where his feet had stray'd,
   And slept there since. Upon the sodden ground
   His old right hand lay nerveless, listless, dead,
   Unsceptred; and his realmless eyes were closed;
   While his bow'd head seem'd list'ning to the Earth,          20
   His ancient mother, for some comfort yet.
 
     It seem'd no force could wake him from his place;
   But there came one, who with a kindred hand
   Touch'd his wide shoulders, after bending low
   With reverence, though to one who knew it not.
   She was a Goddess of the infant world;
   By her in stature the tall Amazon
   Had stood a pigmy's height: she would have ta'en
   Achilles by the hair and bent his neck;
   Or with a finger stay'd Ixion's wheel.                       30
   Her face was large as that of Memphian sphinx,
   Pedestal'd haply in a palace court,
   When sages look'd to Egypt for their lore.
   But oh! how unlike marble was that face:
   How beautiful, if sorrow had not made
   Sorrow more beautiful than Beauty's self.
   There was a listening fear in her regard,
   As if calamity had but begun;
   As if the vanward clouds of evil days
   Had spent their malice, and the sullen rear                  40
   Was with its stored thunder labouring up.
   One hand she press'd upon that aching spot
   Where beats the human heart, as if just there,
   Though an immortal, she felt cruel pain:
   The other upon Saturn's bended neck
   She laid, and to the level of his ear
   Leaning with parted lips, some words she spake
   In solemn tenour and deep organ tone:
   Some mourning words, which in our feeble tongue
   Would come in these like accents; O how frail                50
   To that large utterance of the early Gods!
   "Saturn, look up!--though wherefore, poor old King?
   I have no comfort for thee, no not one:
   I cannot say, 'O wherefore sleepest thou?'
   For heaven is parted from thee, and the earth
   Knows thee not, thus afflicted, for a God;
   And ocean too, with all its solemn noise,
   Has from thy sceptre pass'd; and all the air
   Is emptied of thine hoary majesty.
   Thy thunder, conscious of the new command,                   60
   Rumbles reluctant o'er our fallen house;
   And thy sharp lightning in unpractised hands
   Scorches and burns our once serene domain.
   O aching time! O moments big as years!
   All as ye pass swell out the monstrous truth,
   And press it so upon our weary griefs
   That unbelief has not a space to breathe.
   Saturn, sleep on:--O thoughtless, why did I
   Thus violate thy slumbrous solitude?
   Why should I ope thy melancholy eyes?                        70
   Saturn, sleep on! while at thy feet I weep."
 
     As when, upon a tranced summer-night,
   Those green-rob'd senators of mighty woods,
   Tall oaks, branch-charmed by the earnest stars,
   Dream, and so dream all night without a stir,
   Save from one gradual solitary gust
   Which comes upon the silence, and dies off,
   As if the ebbing air had but one wave;
   So came these words and went; the while in tears
   She touch'd her fair large forehead to the ground,           80
   Just where her falling hair might be outspread
   A soft and silken mat for Saturn's feet.
   One moon, with alteration slow, had shed
   Her silver seasons four upon the night,
   And still these two were postured motionless,
   Like natural sculpture in cathedral cavern;
   The frozen God still couchant on the earth,
   And the sad Goddess weeping at his feet:
   Until at length old Saturn lifted up
   His faded eyes, and saw his kingdom gone,                    90
   And all the gloom and sorrow of the place,
   And that fair kneeling Goddess; and then spake,
   As with a palsied tongue, and while his beard
   Shook horrid with such aspen-malady:
   "O tender spouse of gold Hyperion,
   Thea, I feel thee ere I see thy face;
   Look up, and let me see our doom in it;
   Look up, and tell me if this feeble shape
   Is Saturn's; tell me, if thou hear'st the voice
   Of Saturn; tell me, if this wrinkling brow,                 100
   Naked and bare of its great diadem,
   Peers like the front of Saturn. Who had power
   To make me desolate? whence came the strength?
   How was it nurtur'd to such bursting forth,
   While Fate seem'd strangled in my nervous grasp?
   But it is so; and I am smother'd up,
   And buried from all godlike exercise
   Of influence benign on planets pale,
   Of admonitions to the winds and seas,
   Of peaceful sway above man's harvesting,                    110
   And all those acts which Deity supreme
   Doth ease its heart of love in.--I am gone
   Away from my own bosom: I have left
   My strong identity, my real self,
   Somewhere between the throne, and where I sit
   Here on this spot of earth. Search, Thea, search!
   Open thine eyes eterne, and sphere them round
   Upon all space: space starr'd, and lorn of light;
   Space region'd with life-air; and barren void;
   Spaces of fire, and all the yawn of hell.--                 120
   Search, Thea, search! and tell me, if thou seest
   A certain shape or shadow, making way
   With wings or chariot fierce to repossess
   A heaven he lost erewhile: it must--it must
   Be of ripe progress--Saturn must be King.
   Yes, there must be a golden victory;
   There must be Gods thrown down, and trumpets blown
   Of triumph calm, and hymns of festival
   Upon the gold clouds metropolitan,
   Voices of soft proclaim, and silver stir                    130
   Of strings in hollow shells; and there shall be
   Beautiful things made new, for the surprise
   Of the sky-children; I will give command:
   Thea! Thea! Thea! where is Saturn?"
 
     This passion lifted him upon his feet,
   And made his hands to struggle in the air,
   His Druid locks to shake and ooze with sweat,
   His eyes to fever out, his voice to cease.
   He stood, and heard not Thea's sobbing deep;
   A little time, and then again he snatch'd                   140
   Utterance thus.--"But cannot I create?
   Cannot I form? Cannot I fashion forth
   Another world, another universe,
   To overbear and crumble this to nought?
   Where is another chaos? Where?"--That word
   Found way unto Olympus, and made quake
   The rebel three.--Thea was startled up,
   And in her bearing was a sort of hope,
   As thus she quick-voic'd spake, yet full of awe.
 
     "This cheers our fallen house: come to our friends,       150
   O Saturn! come away, and give them heart;
   I know the covert, for thence came I hither."
   Thus brief; then with beseeching eyes she went
   With backward footing through the shade a space:
   He follow'd, and she turn'd to lead the way
   Through aged boughs, that yielded like the mist
   Which eagles cleave upmounting from their nest.
 
     Meanwhile in other realms big tears were shed,
   More sorrow like to this, and such like woe,
   Too huge for mortal tongue or pen of scribe:                160
   The Titans fierce, self-hid, or prison-bound,
   Groan'd for the old allegiance once more,
   And listen'd in sharp pain for Saturn's voice.
   But one of the whole mammoth-brood still kept
   His sov'reignty, and rule, and majesty;--
   Blazing Hyperion on his orbed fire
   Still sat, still snuff'd the incense, teeming up
   From man to the sun's God; yet unsecure:
   For as among us mortals omens drear
   Fright and perplex, so also shuddered he--                  170
   Not at dog's howl, or gloom-bird's hated screech,
   Or the familiar visiting of one
   Upon the first toll of his passing-bell,
   Or prophesyings of the midnight lamp;
   But horrors, portion'd to a giant nerve,
   Oft made Hyperion ache. His palace bright
   Bastion'd with pyramids of glowing gold,
   And touch'd with shade of bronzed obelisks,
   Glar'd a blood-red through all its thousand courts,
   Arches, and domes, and fiery galleries;                     180
   And all its curtains of Aurorian clouds
   Flush'd angerly: while sometimes eagle's wings,
   Unseen before by Gods or wondering men,
   Darken'd the place; and neighing steeds were heard,
   Not heard before by Gods or wondering men.
   Also, when he would taste the spicy wreaths
   Of incense, breath'd aloft from sacred hills,
   Instead of sweets, his ample palate took
   Savour of poisonous brass and metal sick:
   And so, when harbour'd in the sleepy west,                  190
   After the full completion of fair day,--
   For rest divine upon exalted couch
   And slumber in the arms of melody,
   He pac'd away the pleasant hours of ease
   With stride colossal, on from hall to hall;
   While far within each aisle and deep recess,
   His winged minions in close clusters stood,
   Amaz'd and full of fear; like anxious men
   Who on wide plains gather in panting troops,
   When earthquakes jar their battlements and towers.          200
   Even now, while Saturn, rous'd from icy trance,
   Went step for step with Thea through the woods,
   Hyperion, leaving twilight in the rear,
   Came slope upon the threshold of the west;
   Then, as was wont, his palace-door flew ope
   In smoothest silence, save what solemn tubes,
   Blown by the serious Zephyrs, gave of sweet
   And wandering sounds, slow-breathed melodies;
   And like a rose in vermeil tint and shape,
   In fragrance soft, and coolness to the eye,                 210
   That inlet to severe magnificence
   Stood full blown, for the God to enter in.
 
     He enter'd, but he enter'd full of wrath;
   His flaming robes stream'd out beyond his heels,
   And gave a roar, as if of earthly fire,
   That scar'd away the meek ethereal Hours
   And made their dove-wings tremble. On he flared,
   From stately nave to nave, from vault to vault,
   Through bowers of fragrant and enwreathed light,
   And diamond-paved lustrous long arcades,                    220
   Until he reach'd the great main cupola;
   There standing fierce beneath, he stampt his foot,
   And from the basements deep to the high towers
   Jarr'd his own golden region; and before
   The quavering thunder thereupon had ceas'd,
   His voice leapt out, despite of godlike curb,
   To this result: "O dreams of day and night!
   O monstrous forms! O effigies of pain!
   O spectres busy in a cold, cold gloom!
   O lank-eared Phantoms of black-weeded pools!                230
   Why do I know ye? why have I seen ye? why
   Is my eternal essence thus distraught
   To see and to behold these horrors new?
   Saturn is fallen, am I too to fall?
   Am I to leave this haven of my rest,
   This cradle of my glory, this soft clime,
   This calm luxuriance of blissful light,
   These crystalline pavilions, and pure fanes,
   Of all my lucent empire? It is left
   Deserted, void, nor any haunt of mine.                      240
   The blaze, the splendor, and the symmetry,
   I cannot see--but darkness, death and darkness.
   Even here, into my centre of repose,
   The shady visions come to domineer,
   Insult, and blind, and stifle up my pomp.--
   Fall!--No, by Tellus and her briny robes!
   Over the fiery frontier of my realms
   I will advance a terrible right arm
   Shall scare that infant thunderer, rebel Jove,
   And bid old Saturn take his throne again."--                250
   He spake, and ceas'd, the while a heavier threat
   Held struggle with his throat but came not forth;
   For as in theatres of crowded men
   Hubbub increases more they call out "Hush!"
   So at Hyperion's words the Phantoms pale
   Bestirr'd themselves, thrice horrible and cold;
   And from the mirror'd level where he stood
   A mist arose, as from a scummy marsh.
   At this, through all his bulk an agony
   Crept gradual, from the feet unto the crown,                260
   Like a lithe serpent vast and muscular
   Making slow way, with head and neck convuls'd
   From over-strained might. Releas'd, he fled
   To the eastern gates, and full six dewy hours
   Before the dawn in season due should blush,
   He breath'd fierce breath against the sleepy portals,
   Clear'd them of heavy vapours, burst them wide
   Suddenly on the ocean's chilly streams.
   The planet orb of fire, whereon he rode
   Each day from east to west the heavens through,             270
   Spun round in sable curtaining of clouds;
   Not therefore veiled quite, blindfold, and hid,
   But ever and anon the glancing spheres,
   Circles, and arcs, and broad-belting colure,
   Glow'd through, and wrought upon the muffling dark
   Sweet-shaped lightnings from the nadir deep
   Up to the zenith,--hieroglyphics old,
   Which sages and keen-eyed astrologers
   Then living on the earth, with labouring thought
   Won from the gaze of many centuries:                        280
   Now lost, save what we find on remnants huge
   Of stone, or marble swart; their import gone,
   Their wisdom long since fled.--Two wings this orb
   Possess'd for glory, two fair argent wings,
   Ever exalted at the God's approach:
   And now, from forth the gloom their plumes immense
   Rose, one by one, till all outspreaded were;
   While still the dazzling globe maintain'd eclipse,
   Awaiting for Hyperion's command.
   Fain would he have commanded, fain took throne              290
   And bid the day begin, if but for change.
   He might not:--No, though a primeval God:
   The sacred seasons might not be disturb'd.
   Therefore the operations of the dawn
   Stay'd in their birth, even as here 'tis told.
   Those silver wings expanded sisterly,
   Eager to sail their orb; the porches wide
   Open'd upon the dusk demesnes of night
   And the bright Titan, phrenzied with new woes,
   Unus'd to bend, by hard compulsion bent                     300
   His spirit to the sorrow of the time;
   And all along a dismal rack of clouds,
   Upon the boundaries of day and night,
   He stretch'd himself in grief and radiance faint.
   There as he lay, the Heaven with its stars
   Look'd down on him with pity, and the voice
   Of Coelus, from the universal space,
   Thus whisper'd low and solemn in his ear.
   "O brightest of my children dear, earth-born
   And sky-engendered, Son of Mysteries                        310
   All unrevealed even to the powers
   Which met at thy creating; at whose joys
   And palpitations sweet, and pleasures soft,
   I, Coelus, wonder, how they came and whence;
   And at the fruits thereof what shapes they be,
   Distinct, and visible; symbols divine,
   Manifestations of that beauteous life
   Diffus'd unseen throughout eternal space:
   Of these new-form'd art thou, oh brightest child!
   Of these, thy brethren and the Goddesses!                   320
   There is sad feud among ye, and rebellion
   Of son against his sire. I saw him fall,
   I saw my first-born tumbled from his throne!
   To me his arms were spread, to me his voice
   Found way from forth the thunders round his head!
   Pale wox I, and in vapours hid my face.
   Art thou, too, near such doom? vague fear there is:
   For I have seen my sons most unlike Gods.
   Divine ye were created, and divine
   In sad demeanour, solemn, undisturb'd,                      330
   Unruffled, like high Gods, ye liv'd and ruled:
   Now I behold in you fear, hope, and wrath;
   Actions of rage and passion; even as
   I see them, on the mortal world beneath,
   In men who die.--This is the grief, O Son!
   Sad sign of ruin, sudden dismay, and fall!
   Yet do thou strive; as thou art capable,
   As thou canst move about, an evident God;
   And canst oppose to each malignant hour
   Ethereal presence:--I am but a voice;                       340
   My life is but the life of winds and tides,
   No more than winds and tides can I avail:--
   But thou canst.--Be thou therefore in the van
   Of circumstance; yea, seize the arrow's barb
   Before the tense string murmur.--To the earth!
   For there thou wilt find Saturn, and his woes.
   Meantime I will keep watch on thy bright sun,
   And of thy seasons be a careful nurse."--
   Ere half this region-whisper had come down,
   Hyperion arose, and on the stars                            350
   Lifted his curved lids, and kept them wide
   Until it ceas'd; and still he kept them wide:
   And still they were the same bright, patient stars.
   Then with a slow incline of his broad breast,
   Like to a diver in the pearly seas,
   Forward he stoop'd over the airy shore,
   And plung'd all noiseless into the deep night.
 
 
 BOOK II.
 
   Just at the self-same beat of Time's wide wings
   Hyperion slid into the rustled air,
   And Saturn gain'd with Thea that sad place
   Where Cybele and the bruised Titans mourn'd.
   It was a den where no insulting light
   Could glimmer on their tears; where their own groans
   They felt, but heard not, for the solid roar
   Of thunderous waterfalls and torrents hoarse,
   Pouring a constant bulk, uncertain where.
   Crag jutting forth to crag, and rocks that seem'd            10
   Ever as if just rising from a sleep,
   Forehead to forehead held their monstrous horns;
   And thus in thousand hugest phantasies
   Made a fit roofing to this nest of woe.
   Instead of thrones, hard flint they sat upon,
   Couches of rugged stone, and slaty ridge
   Stubborn'd with iron. All were not assembled:
   Some chain'd in torture, and some wandering.
   Coeus, and Gyges, and Briareues,
   Typhon, and Dolor, and Porphyrion,                           20
   With many more, the brawniest in assault,
   Were pent in regions of laborious breath;
   Dungeon'd in opaque element, to keep
   Their clenched teeth still clench'd, and all their limbs
   Lock'd up like veins of metal, crampt and screw'd;
   Without a motion, save of their big hearts
   Heaving in pain, and horribly convuls'd
   With sanguine feverous boiling gurge of pulse.
   Mnemosyne was straying in the world;
   Far from her moon had Phoebe wandered;                       30
   And many else were free to roam abroad,
   But for the main, here found they covert drear.
   Scarce images of life, one here, one there,
   Lay vast and edgeways; like a dismal cirque
   Of Druid stones, upon a forlorn moor,
   When the chill rain begins at shut of eve,
   In dull November, and their chancel vault,
   The Heaven itself, is blinded throughout night.
   Each one kept shroud, nor to his neighbour gave
   Or word, or look, or action of despair.                      40
   Creues was one; his ponderous iron mace
   Lay by him, and a shatter'd rib of rock
   Told of his rage, ere he thus sank and pined.
   Iaepetus another; in his grasp,
   A serpent's plashy neck; its barbed tongue
   Squeez'd from the gorge, and all its uncurl'd length
   Dead; and because the creature could not spit
   Its poison in the eyes of conquering Jove.
   Next Cottus: prone he lay, chin uppermost,
   As though in pain; for still upon the flint                  50
   He ground severe his skull, with open mouth
   And eyes at horrid working. Nearest him
   Asia, born of most enormous Caf,
   Who cost her mother Tellus keener pangs,
   Though feminine, than any of her sons:
   More thought than woe was in her dusky face,
   For she was prophesying of her glory;
   And in her wide imagination stood
   Palm-shaded temples, and high rival fanes,
   By Oxus or in Ganges' sacred isles.                          60
   Even as Hope upon her anchor leans,
   So leant she, not so fair, upon a tusk
   Shed from the broadest of her elephants.
   Above her, on a crag's uneasy shelve,
   Upon his elbow rais'd, all prostrate else,
   Shadow'd Enceladus; once tame and mild
   As grazing ox unworried in the meads;
   Now tiger-passion'd, lion-thoughted, wroth,
   He meditated, plotted, and even now
   Was hurling mountains in that second war,                    70
   Not long delay'd, that scar'd the younger Gods
   To hide themselves in forms of beast and bird.
   Not far hence Atlas; and beside him prone
   Phorcus, the sire of Gorgons. Neighbour'd close
   Oceanus, and Tethys, in whose lap
   Sobb'd Clymene among her tangled hair.
   In midst of all lay Themis, at the feet
   Of Ops the queen all clouded round from sight;
   No shape distinguishable, more than when
   Thick night confounds the pine-tops with the clouds:         80
   And many else whose names may not be told.
   For when the Muse's wings are air-ward spread,
   Who shall delay her flight? And she must chaunt
   Of Saturn, and his guide, who now had climb'd
   With damp and slippery footing from a depth
   More horrid still. Above a sombre cliff
   Their heads appear'd, and up their stature grew
   Till on the level height their steps found ease:
   Then Thea spread abroad her trembling arms
   Upon the precincts of this nest of pain,                     90
   And sidelong fix'd her eye on Saturn's face:
   There saw she direst strife; the supreme God
   At war with all the frailty of grief,
   Of rage, of fear, anxiety, revenge,
   Remorse, spleen, hope, but most of all despair.
   Against these plagues he strove in vain; for Fate
   Had pour'd a mortal oil upon his head,
   A disanointing poison: so that Thea,
   Affrighted, kept her still, and let him pass
   First onwards in, among the fallen tribe.                   100
 
     As with us mortal men, the laden heart
   Is persecuted more, and fever'd more,
   When it is nighing to the mournful house
   Where other hearts are sick of the same bruise;
   So Saturn, as he walk'd into the midst,
   Felt faint, and would have sunk among the rest,
   But that he met Enceladus's eye,
   Whose mightiness, and awe of him, at once
   Came like an inspiration; and he shouted,
   "Titans, behold your God!" at which some groan'd;           110
   Some started on their feet; some also shouted;
   Some wept, some wail'd, all bow'd with reverence;
   And Ops, uplifting her black folded veil,
   Show'd her pale cheeks, and all her forehead wan,
   Her eye-brows thin and jet, and hollow eyes.
   There is a roaring in the bleak-grown pines
   When Winter lifts his voice; there is a noise
   Among immortals when a God gives sign,
   With hushing finger, how he means to load
   His tongue with the full weight of utterless thought,       120
   With thunder, and with music, and with pomp:
   Such noise is like the roar of bleak-grown pines;
   Which, when it ceases in this mountain'd world,
   No other sound succeeds; but ceasing here,
   Among these fallen, Saturn's voice therefrom
   Grew up like organ, that begins anew
   Its strain, when other harmonies, stopt short,
   Leave the dinn'd air vibrating silverly.
   Thus grew it up--"Not in my own sad breast,
   Which is its own great judge and searcher out,              130
   Can I find reason why ye should be thus:
   Not in the legends of the first of days,
   Studied from that old spirit-leaved book
   Which starry Uranus with finger bright
   Sav'd from the shores of darkness, when the waves
   Low-ebb'd still hid it up in shallow gloom;--
   And the which book ye know I ever kept
   For my firm-based footstool:--Ah, infirm!
   Not there, nor in sign, symbol, or portent
   Of element, earth, water, air, and fire,--                  140
   At war, at peace, or inter-quarreling
   One against one, or two, or three, or all
   Each several one against the other three,
   As fire with air loud warring when rain-floods
   Drown both, and press them both against earth's face,
   Where, finding sulphur, a quadruple wrath
   Unhinges the poor world;--not in that strife,
   Wherefrom I take strange lore, and read it deep,
   Can I find reason why ye should be thus:
   No, no-where can unriddle, though I search,                 150
   And pore on Nature's universal scroll
   Even to swooning, why ye, Divinities,
   The first-born of all shap'd and palpable Gods,
   Should cower beneath what, in comparison,
   Is untremendous might. Yet ye are here,
   O'erwhelm'd, and spurn'd, and batter'd, ye are here!
   O Titans, shall I say 'Arise!'--Ye groan:
   Shall I say 'Crouch!'--Ye groan. What can I then?
   O Heaven wide! O unseen parent dear!
   What can I? Tell me, all ye brethren Gods,                  160
   How we can war, how engine our great wrath!
   O speak your counsel now, for Saturn's ear
   Is all a-hunger'd. Thou, Oceanus,
   Ponderest high and deep; and in thy face
   I see, astonied, that severe content
   Which comes of thought and musing: give us help!"
 
     So ended Saturn; and the God of the Sea,
   Sophist and sage, from no Athenian grove,
   But cogitation in his watery shades,
   Arose, with locks not oozy, and began,                      170
   In murmurs, which his first-endeavouring tongue
   Caught infant-like from the far-foamed sands.
   "O ye, whom wrath consumes! who, passion-stung,
   Writhe at defeat, and nurse your agonies!
   Shut up your senses, stifle up your ears,
   My voice is not a bellows unto ire.
   Yet listen, ye who will, whilst I bring proof
   How ye, perforce, must be content to stoop:
   And in the proof much comfort will I give,
   If ye will take that comfort in its truth.                  180
   We fall by course of Nature's law, not force
   Of thunder, or of Jove. Great Saturn, thou
   Hast sifted well the atom-universe;
   But for this reason, that thou art the King,
   And only blind from sheer supremacy,
   One avenue was shaded from thine eyes,
   Through which I wandered to eternal truth.
   And first, as thou wast not the first of powers,
   So art thou not the last; it cannot be:
   Thou art not the beginning nor the end.                     190
   From chaos and parental darkness came
   Light, the first fruits of that intestine broil,
   That sullen ferment, which for wondrous ends
   Was ripening in itself. The ripe hour came,
   And with it light, and light, engendering
   Upon its own producer, forthwith touch'd
   The whole enormous matter into life.
   Upon that very hour, our parentage,
   The Heavens and the Earth, were manifest:
   Then thou first-born, and we the giant-race,                200
   Found ourselves ruling new and beauteous realms.
   Now comes the pain of truth, to whom 'tis pain;
   O folly! for to bear all naked truths,
   And to envisage circumstance, all calm,
   That is the top of sovereignty. Mark well!
   As Heaven and Earth are fairer, fairer far
   Than Chaos and blank Darkness, though once chiefs;
   And as we show beyond that Heaven and Earth
   In form and shape compact and beautiful,
   In will, in action free, companionship,                     210
   And thousand other signs of purer life;
   So on our heels a fresh perfection treads,
   A power more strong in beauty, born of us
   And fated to excel us, as we pass
   In glory that old Darkness: nor are we
   Thereby more conquer'd, than by us the rule
   Of shapeless Chaos. Say, doth the dull soil
   Quarrel with the proud forests it hath fed,
   And feedeth still, more comely than itself?
   Can it deny the chiefdom of green groves?                   220
   Or shall the tree be envious of the dove
   Because it cooeth, and hath snowy wings
   To wander wherewithal and find its joys?
   We are such forest-trees, and our fair boughs
   Have bred forth, not pale solitary doves,
   But eagles golden-feather'd, who do tower
   Above us in their beauty, and must reign
   In right thereof; for 'tis the eternal law
   That first in beauty should be first in might:
   Yea, by that law, another race may drive                    230
   Our conquerors to mourn as we do now.
   Have ye beheld the young God of the Seas,
   My dispossessor? Have ye seen his face?
   Have ye beheld his chariot, foam'd along
   By noble winged creatures he hath made?
   I saw him on the calmed waters scud,
   With such a glow of beauty in his eyes,
   That it enforc'd me to bid sad farewell
   To all my empire: farewell sad I took,
   And hither came, to see how dolorous fate                   240
   Had wrought upon ye; and how I might best
   Give consolation in this woe extreme.
   Receive the truth, and let it be your balm."
 
     Whether through poz'd conviction, or disdain,
   They guarded silence, when Oceanus
   Left murmuring, what deepest thought can tell?
   But so it was, none answer'd for a space,
   Save one whom none regarded, Clymene;
   And yet she answer'd not, only complain'd,
   With hectic lips, and eyes up-looking mild,                 250
   Thus wording timidly among the fierce:
   "O Father, I am here the simplest voice,
   And all my knowledge is that joy is gone,
   And this thing woe crept in among our hearts,
   There to remain for ever, as I fear:
   I would not bode of evil, if I thought
   So weak a creature could turn off the help
   Which by just right should come of mighty Gods;
   Yet let me tell my sorrow, let me tell
   Of what I heard, and how it made me weep,                   260
   And know that we had parted from all hope.
   I stood upon a shore, a pleasant shore,
   Where a sweet clime was breathed from a land
   Of fragrance, quietness, and trees, and flowers.
   Full of calm joy it was, as I of grief;
   Too full of joy and soft delicious warmth;
   So that I felt a movement in my heart
   To chide, and to reproach that solitude
   With songs of misery, music of our woes;
   And sat me down, and took a mouthed shell                   270
   And murmur'd into it, and made melody--
   O melody no more! for while I sang,
   And with poor skill let pass into the breeze
   The dull shell's echo, from a bowery strand
   Just opposite, an island of the sea,
   There came enchantment with the shifting wind,
   That did both drown and keep alive my ears.
   I threw my shell away upon the sand,
   And a wave fill'd it, as my sense was fill'd
   With that new blissful golden melody.                       280
   A living death was in each gush of sounds,
   Each family of rapturous hurried notes,
   That fell, one after one, yet all at once,
   Like pearl beads dropping sudden from their string:
   And then another, then another strain,
   Each like a dove leaving its olive perch,
   With music wing'd instead of silent plumes,
   To hover round my head, and make me sick
   Of joy and grief at once. Grief overcame,
   And I was stopping up my frantic ears,                      290
   When, past all hindrance of my trembling hands,
   A voice came sweeter, sweeter than all tune,
   And still it cried, 'Apollo! young Apollo!
   The morning-bright Apollo! young Apollo!'
   I fled, it follow'd me, and cried 'Apollo!'
   O Father, and O Brethren, had ye felt
   Those pains of mine; O Saturn, hadst thou felt,
   Ye would not call this too indulged tongue
   Presumptuous, in thus venturing to be heard."
 
     So far her voice flow'd on, like timorous brook           300
   That, lingering along a pebbled coast,
   Doth fear to meet the sea: but sea it met,
   And shudder'd; for the overwhelming voice
   Of huge Enceladus swallow'd it in wrath:
   The ponderous syllables, like sullen waves
   In the half-glutted hollows of reef-rocks,
   Came booming thus, while still upon his arm
   He lean'd; not rising, from supreme contempt.
   "Or shall we listen to the over-wise,
   Or to the over-foolish, Giant-Gods?                         310
   Not thunderbolt on thunderbolt, till all
   That rebel Jove's whole armoury were spent,
   Not world on world upon these shoulders piled,
   Could agonize me more than baby-words
   In midst of this dethronement horrible.
   Speak! roar! shout! yell! ye sleepy Titans all.
   Do ye forget the blows, the buffets vile?
   Are ye not smitten by a youngling arm?
   Dost thou forget, sham Monarch of the Waves,
   Thy scalding in the seas? What, have I rous'd               320
   Your spleens with so few simple words as these?
   O joy! for now I see ye are not lost:
   O joy! for now I see a thousand eyes
   Wide glaring for revenge!"--As this he said,
   He lifted up his stature vast, and stood,
   Still without intermission speaking thus:
   "Now ye are flames, I'll tell you how to burn,
   And purge the ether of our enemies;
   How to feed fierce the crooked stings of fire,
   And singe away the swollen clouds of Jove,                  330
   Stifling that puny essence in its tent.
   O let him feel the evil he hath done;
   For though I scorn Oceanus's lore,
   Much pain have I for more than loss of realms:
   The days of peace and slumberous calm are fled;
   Those days, all innocent of scathing war,
   When all the fair Existences of heaven
   Came open-eyed to guess what we would speak:--
   That was before our brows were taught to frown,
   Before our lips knew else but solemn sounds;                340
   That was before we knew the winged thing,
   Victory, might be lost, or might be won.
   And be ye mindful that Hyperion,
   Our brightest brother, still is undisgraced--
   Hyperion, lo! his radiance is here!"
 
     All eyes were on Enceladus's face,
   And they beheld, while still Hyperion's name
   Flew from his lips up to the vaulted rocks,
   A pallid gleam across his features stern:
   Not savage, for he saw full many a God                      350
   Wroth as himself. He look'd upon them all,
   And in each face he saw a gleam of light,
   But splendider in Saturn's, whose hoar locks
   Shone like the bubbling foam about a keel
   When the prow sweeps into a midnight cove.
   In pale and silver silence they remain'd,
   Till suddenly a splendour, like the morn,
   Pervaded all the beetling gloomy steeps,
   All the sad spaces of oblivion,
   And every gulf, and every chasm old,                        360
   And every height, and every sullen depth,
   Voiceless, or hoarse with loud tormented streams:
   And all the everlasting cataracts,
   And all the headlong torrents far and near,
   Mantled before in darkness and huge shade,
   Now saw the light and made it terrible.
   It was Hyperion:--a granite peak
   His bright feet touch'd, and there he stay'd to view
   The misery his brilliance had betray'd
   To the most hateful seeing of itself.                       370
   Golden his hair of short Numidian curl,
   Regal his shape majestic, a vast shade
   In midst of his own brightness, like the bulk
   Of Memnon's image at the set of sun
   To one who travels from the dusking East:
   Sighs, too, as mournful as that Memnon's harp
   He utter'd, while his hands contemplative
   He press'd together, and in silence stood.
   Despondence seiz'd again the fallen Gods
   At sight of the dejected King of Day,                       380
   And many hid their faces from the light:
   But fierce Enceladus sent forth his eyes
   Among the brotherhood; and, at their glare,
   Uprose Iaepetus, and Creues too,
   And Phorcus, sea-born, and together strode
   To where he towered on his eminence.
   There those four shouted forth old Saturn's name;
   Hyperion from the peak loud answered, "Saturn!"
   Saturn sat near the Mother of the Gods,
   In whose face was no joy, though all the Gods               390
   Gave from their hollow throats the name of "Saturn!"
 
 
 BOOK III.
 
   Thus in alternate uproar and sad peace,
   Amazed were those Titans utterly.
   O leave them, Muse! O leave them to their woes;
   For thou art weak to sing such tumults dire:
   A solitary sorrow best befits
   Thy lips, and antheming a lonely grief.
   Leave them, O Muse! for thou anon wilt find
   Many a fallen old Divinity
   Wandering in vain about bewildered shores.
   Meantime touch piously the Delphic harp,                     10
   And not a wind of heaven but will breathe
   In aid soft warble from the Dorian flute;
   For lo! 'tis for the Father of all verse.
   Flush every thing that hath a vermeil hue,
   Let the rose glow intense and warm the air,
   And let the clouds of even and of morn
   Float in voluptuous fleeces o'er the hills;
   Let the red wine within the goblet boil,
   Cold as a bubbling well; let faint-lipp'd shells,
   On sands, or in great deeps, vermilion turn                  20
   Through all their labyrinths; and let the maid
   Blush keenly, as with some warm kiss surpris'd.
   Chief isle of the embowered Cyclades,
   Rejoice, O Delos, with thine olives green,
   And poplars, and lawn-shading palms, and beech,
   In which the Zephyr breathes the loudest song,
   And hazels thick, dark-stemm'd beneath the shade:
   Apollo is once more the golden theme!
   Where was he, when the Giant of the Sun
   Stood bright, amid the sorrow of his peers?                  30
   Together had he left his mother fair
   And his twin-sister sleeping in their bower,
   And in the morning twilight wandered forth
   Beside the osiers of a rivulet,
   Full ankle-deep in lilies of the vale.
   The nightingale had ceas'd, and a few stars
   Were lingering in the heavens, while the thrush
   Began calm-throated. Throughout all the isle
   There was no covert, no retired cave
   Unhaunted by the murmurous noise of waves,                   40
   Though scarcely heard in many a green recess.
   He listen'd, and he wept, and his bright tears
   Went trickling down the golden bow he held.
   Thus with half-shut suffused eyes he stood,
   While from beneath some cumbrous boughs hard by
   With solemn step an awful Goddess came,
   And there was purport in her looks for him,
   Which he with eager guess began to read
   Perplex'd, the while melodiously he said:
   "How cam'st thou over the unfooted sea?                      50
   Or hath that antique mien and robed form
   Mov'd in these vales invisible till now?
   Sure I have heard those vestments sweeping o'er
   The fallen leaves, when I have sat alone
   In cool mid-forest. Surely I have traced
   The rustle of those ample skirts about
   These grassy solitudes, and seen the flowers
   Lift up their heads, as still the whisper pass'd.
   Goddess! I have beheld those eyes before,
   And their eternal calm, and all that face,                   60
   Or I have dream'd."--"Yes," said the supreme shape,
   "Thou hast dream'd of me; and awaking up
   Didst find a lyre all golden by thy side,
   Whose strings touch'd by thy fingers, all the vast
   Unwearied ear of the whole universe
   Listen'd in pain and pleasure at the birth
   Of such new tuneful wonder. Is't not strange
   That thou shouldst weep, so gifted? Tell me, youth,
   What sorrow thou canst feel; for I am sad
   When thou dost shed a tear: explain thy griefs               70
   To one who in this lonely isle hath been
   The watcher of thy sleep and hours of life,
   From the young day when first thy infant hand
   Pluck'd witless the weak flowers, till thine arm
   Could bend that bow heroic to all times.
   Show thy heart's secret to an ancient Power
   Who hath forsaken old and sacred thrones
   For prophecies of thee, and for the sake
   Of loveliness new born."--Apollo then,
   With sudden scrutiny and gloomless eyes,                     80
   Thus answer'd, while his white melodious throat
   Throbb'd with the syllables.--"Mnemosyne!
   Thy name is on my tongue, I know not how;
   Why should I tell thee what thou so well seest?
   Why should I strive to show what from thy lips
   Would come no mystery? For me, dark, dark,
   And painful vile oblivion seals my eyes:
   I strive to search wherefore I am so sad,
   Until a melancholy numbs my limbs;
   And then upon the grass I sit, and moan,                     90
   Like one who once had wings.--O why should I
   Feel curs'd and thwarted, when the liegeless air
   Yields to my step aspirant? why should I
   Spurn the green turf as hateful to my feet?
   Goddess benign, point forth some unknown thing:
   Are there not other regions than this isle?
   What are the stars? There is the sun, the sun!
   And the most patient brilliance of the moon!
   And stars by thousands! Point me out the way
   To any one particular beauteous star,                       100
   And I will flit into it with my lyre,
   And make its silvery splendour pant with bliss.
   I have heard the cloudy thunder: Where is power?
   Whose hand, whose essence, what divinity
   Makes this alarum in the elements,
   While I here idle listen on the shores
   In fearless yet in aching ignorance?
   O tell me, lonely Goddess, by thy harp,
   That waileth every morn and eventide,
   Tell me why thus I rave, about these groves!                110
   Mute thou remainest--Mute! yet I can read
   A wondrous lesson in thy silent face:
   Knowledge enormous makes a God of me.
   Names, deeds, gray legends, dire events, rebellions,
   Majesties, sovran voices, agonies,
   Creations and destroyings, all at once
   Pour into the wide hollows of my brain,
   And deify me, as if some blithe wine
   Or bright elixir peerless I had drunk,
   And so become immortal."--Thus the God,                     120
   While his enkindled eyes, with level glance
   Beneath his white soft temples, stedfast kept
   Trembling with light upon Mnemosyne.
   Soon wild commotions shook him, and made flush
   All the immortal fairness of his limbs;
   Most like the struggle at the gate of death;
   Or liker still to one who should take leave
   Of pale immortal death, and with a pang
   As hot as death's is chill, with fierce convulse
   Die into life: so young Apollo anguish'd:                   130
   His very hair, his golden tresses famed
   Kept undulation round his eager neck.
   During the pain Mnemosyne upheld
   Her arms as one who prophesied.--At length
   Apollo shriek'd;--and lo! from all his limbs
   Celestial     *      *      *      *      *
   *      *      *      *      *      *      *
 
 THE END.
 
 
 NOTE.
 
 PAGE 184, l. 310. over-foolish, Giant-Gods? _MS._: over-foolish giant,
 Gods? _1820._
 
 
 
 
 NOTES.
 
 
 ADVERTISEMENT.
 
 PAGE 2. See Introduction to _Hyperion_, p. 245.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO LAMIA.
 
 _Lamia_, like _Endymion_, is written in the heroic couplet, but the
 difference in style is very marked. The influence of Dryden's
 narrative-poems (his translations from Boccaccio and Chaucer) is clearly
 traceable in the metre, style, and construction of the later poem. Like
 Dryden, Keats now makes frequent use of the Alexandrine, or 6-foot line,
 and of the triplet. He has also restrained the exuberance of his
 language and gained force, whilst in imaginative power and felicity of
 diction he surpasses anything of which Dryden was capable. The flaws in
 his style are mainly due to carelessness in the rimes and some
 questionable coining of words. He also occasionally lapses into the
 vulgarity and triviality which marred certain of his early poems.
 
 The best he gained from his study of Dryden's _Fables_, a debt perhaps
 to Chaucer rather than to Dryden, was a notable advance in constructive
 power. In _Lamia_ he shows a very much greater sense of proportion and
 power of selection than in his earlier work. There is, as it were, more
 light and shade.
 
 Thus we find that whenever the occasion demands it his style rises to
 supreme force and beauty. The metamorphosis of the serpent, the entry
 of Lamia and Lycius into Corinth, the building by Lamia of the Fairy
 Hall, and her final withering under the eye of Apollonius--these are the
 most important points in the story, and the passages in which they are
 described are also the most striking in the poem.
 
 The allegorical meaning of the story seems to be, that it is fatal to
 attempt to separate the sensuous and emotional life from the life of
 reason. Philosophy alone is cold and destructive, but the pleasures of
 the senses alone are unreal and unsatisfying. The man who attempts such
 a divorce between the two parts of his nature will fail miserably as did
 Lycius, who, unable permanently to exclude reason, was compelled to face
 the death of his illusions, and could not, himself, survive them.
 
 Of the poem Keats himself says, writing to his brother in September,
 1819: 'I have been reading over a part of a short poem I have composed
 lately, called _Lamia_, and I am certain there is that sort of fire in
 it that must take hold of people some way; give them either pleasant or
 unpleasant sensation--what they want is a sensation of some sort.' But
 to the greatest of Keats's critics, Charles Lamb, the poem appealed
 somewhat differently, for he writes, 'More exuberantly rich in imagery
 and painting [than _Isabella_] is the story of _Lamia_. It is of as
 gorgeous stuff as ever romance was composed of,' and, after enumerating
 the most striking pictures in the poem, he adds, '[these] are all that
 fairy-land can do for us.' _Lamia_ struck his imagination, but his heart
 was given to _Isabella_.
 
 
 NOTES ON LAMIA.
 
 PART I.
 
 PAGE 3. ll. 1-6. _before the faery broods . . . lawns_, i.e. before
 mediaeval fairy-lore had superseded classical mythology.
 
 l. 2. _Satyr_, a horned and goat-legged demi-god of the woods.
 
 l. 5. _Dryads_, wood-nymphs, who lived in trees. The life of each
 terminated with that of the tree over which she presided. Cf. Landor's
 'Hamadryad'.
 
 l. 5. _Fauns._ The Roman name corresponding to the Greek Satyr.
 
 l. 7. _Hermes_, or Mercury, the messenger of the Gods. He is always
 represented with winged shoes, a winged helmet, and a winged staff,
 bound about with living serpents.
 
 PAGE 4. l. 15. _Tritons_, sea-gods, half-man, half-fish. Cf. Wordsworth,
 'Or hear old Triton blow his wreathed horn' (Sonnet--'The World is too
 much with us').
 
 l. 19. _unknown to any Muse_, beyond the imagination of any poet.
 
 PAGE 5. l. 28. _passion new._ He has often before been to earth on
 similar errands. Cf. _ever-smitten_, l. 7, also ll. 80-93.
 
 l. 42. _dove-footed._ Cf. note on l. 7.
 
 PAGE 6. l. 46. _cirque-couchant_, lying twisted into a circle. Cf.
 _wreathed tomb_, l. 38.
 
 l. 47. _gordian_, knotted, from the famous knot in the harness of
 Gordius, King of Phrygia, which only the conqueror of the world was to
 be able to untie. Alexander cut it with his sword. Cf. _Henry V_, I. i.
 46.
 
 l. 58. _Ariadne's tiar._ Ariadne was a nymph beloved of Bacchus, the god
 of wine. He gave her a crown of seven stars, which, after her death, was
 made into a constellation. Keats has, no doubt, in his mind Titian's
 picture of Bacchus and Ariadne in the National Gallery. Cf. _Ode to
 Sorrow_, _Endymion_.
 
 PAGE 7. l. 63. _As Proserpine . . . air._ Proserpine, gathering flowers
 in the Vale of Enna, in Sicily, was carried off by Pluto, the king of
 the underworld, to be his queen. Cf. _Winter's Tale_, IV. iii, and
 _Paradise Lost_, iv. 268, known to be a favourite passage with Keats.
 
 l. 75. _his throbbing . . . moan._ Cf. _Hyperion_, iii. 81.
 
 l. 77. _as morning breaks_, the freshness and splendour of the youthful
 god.
 
 PAGE 8. l. 78. _Phoebean dart_, a ray of the sun, Phoebus being the god
 of the sun.
 
 l. 80. _Too gentle Hermes._ Cf. l. 28 and note.
 
 l. 81. _not delay'd_: classical construction. See Introduction to
 Hyperion.
 
 _Star of Lethe._ Hermes is so called because he had to lead the souls of
 the dead to Hades, where was Lethe, the river of forgetfulness. Lamb
 comments: '. . . Hermes, the _Star of Lethe_, as he is called by one of
 those prodigal phrases which Mr. Keats abounds in, which are each a poem
 in a word, and which in this instance lays open to us at once, like a
 picture, all the dim regions and their habitants, and the sudden coming
 of a celestial among them.'
 
 l. 91. The line dances along like a leaf before the wind.
 
 l. 92. Miltonic construction and phraseology.
 
 PAGE 9. l. 98. _weary tendrils_, tired with holding up the boughs, heavy
 with fruit.
 
 l. 103. _Silenus_, the nurse and teacher of Bacchus--a demigod of the
 woods.
 
 PAGE 10. l. 115. _Circean._ Circe was the great enchantress who turned
 the followers of Ulysses into swine. Cf. _Comus_, ll. 46-54, and
 _Odyssey_, x.
 
 PAGE 11. l. 132. _swoon'd serpent._ Evidently, in the exercise of her
 magic, power had gone out of her.
 
 l. 133. _lythe_, quick-acting.
 
 _Caducean charm._ Caduceus was the name of Hermes' staff of wondrous
 powers, the touch of which, evidently, was powerful to give the serpent
 human form.
 
 l. 136. _like a moon in wane._ Cf. the picture of Cynthia, _Endymion_,
 iii. 72 sq.
 
 l. 138. _like a flower . . . hour._ Perhaps a reminiscence of Milton's
 'at shut of evening flowers.' _Paradise Lost_, ix. 278.
 
 PAGE 12. l. 148. _besprent_, sprinkled.
 
 l. 158. _brede_, embroidery. Cf. _Ode on a Grecian Urn_, v. 1.
 
 PAGE 13. l. 178. _rack._ Cf. _The Tempest_, IV. i. 156, 'leave not a
 rack behind.' _Hyperion_, i. 302, note.
 
 l. 180. This gives us a feeling of weakness and weariness as well as
 measuring the distance.
 
 PAGE 14. l. 184. Cf. Wordsworth:
 
      And then my heart with pleasure fills
      And dances with the daffodils.
 
 ll. 191-200. Cf. _Ode on Melancholy_, where Keats tells us that
 melancholy lives with Beauty, joy, pleasure, and delight. Lamia can
 separate the elements and give beauty and pleasure unalloyed.
 
 l. 195. _Intrigue with the specious chaos_, enter on an understanding
 with the fair-looking confusion of joy and pain.
 
 l. 198. _unshent_, unreproached.
 
 PAGE 15. l. 207. _Nereids_, sea-nymphs.
 
 l. 208. _Thetis_, one of the sea deities.
 
 l. 210. _glutinous_, referring to the sticky substance which oozes from
 the pine-trunk. Cf. _Comus_, l. 917, 'smeared with gums of glutinous
 heat.'
 
 l. 211. Cf. l. 63, note.
 
 l. 212. _Mulciber_, Vulcan, the smith of the Gods. His fall from Heaven
 is described by Milton, _Paradise Lost_, i. 739-42.
 
 _piazzian_, forming covered walks supported by pillars, a word coined by
 Keats.
 
 PAGE 16. l. 236. _In the calm'd . . . shades._ In consideration of
 Plato's mystic and imaginative philosophy.
 
 PAGE 17. l. 248. Refers to the story of Orpheus' attempt to rescue his
 wife Eurydice from Hades. With his exquisite music he charmed Cerberus,
 the fierce dog who guarded hell-gates, into submission, and won Pluto's
 consent that he should lead Eurydice back to the upper world on one
 condition--that he would not look back to see that she was following.
 When he was almost at the gates, love and curiosity overpowered him, and
 he looked back--to see Eurydice fall back into Hades whence he now might
 never win her.
 
 PAGE 18. l. 262. _thy far wishes_, your wishes when you are far off.
 
 l. 265. _Pleiad._ The Pleiades are seven stars making a constellation.
 Cf. Walt Whitman, 'On the beach at night.'
 
 ll. 266-7. _keep in tune Thy spheres._ Refers to the music which the
 heavenly bodies were supposed to make as they moved round the earth. Cf.
 _Merchant of Venice_, V. i. 60.
 
 PAGE 20. l. 294. _new lips._ Cf. l. 191.
 
 l. 297. _Into another_, i.e. into the trance of passion from which he
 only wakes to die.
 
 PAGE 21. l. 320. _Adonian feast._ Adonis was a beautiful youth beloved
 of Venus. He was killed by a wild boar when hunting, and Venus then had
 him borne to Elysium, where he sleeps pillowed on flowers. Cf.
 _Endymion_, ii. 387.
 
 PAGE 22. l. 329. _Peris_, in Persian story fairies, descended from the
 fallen angels.
 
 ll. 330-2. The vulgarity of these lines we may attribute partly to the
 influence of Leigh Hunt, who himself wrote of
 
   The two divinest things the world has got--
   A lovely woman and a rural spot.
 
 It was an influence which Keats, with the development of his own
 character and genius, was rapidly outgrowing.
 
 l. 333. _Pyrrha's pebbles._ There is a legend that, after the flood,
 Deucalion and Pyrrha cast stones behind them which became men, thus
 re-peopling the world.
 
 PAGE 23. ll. 350-4. Keats brings the very atmosphere of a dream about us
 in these lines, and makes us hear the murmur of the city as something
 remote from the chief actors.
 
 l. 352. _lewd_, ignorant. The original meaning of the word which came
 later to mean dissolute.
 
 PAGE 24. l. 360. _corniced shade._ Cf. _Eve of St. Agnes_, ix,
 'Buttress'd from moonlight.'
 
 ll. 363-77. Note the feeling of fate in the first appearance of
 Apollonius.
 
 PAGE 25. l. 377. _dreams._ Lycius is conscious that it is an illusion
 even whilst he yields himself up to it.
 
 l. 386. _Aeolian._ Aeolus was the god of the winds.
 
 PAGE 26. l. 394. _flitter-winged._ Imagining the poem winging its way
 along like a bird. _Flitter_, cf. flittermouse = bat.
 
 PART II.
 
 PAGE 27. ll. 1-9. Again a passage unworthy of Keats's genius. Perhaps
 the attempt to be light, like his seventeenth-century model, Dryden, led
 him for the moment to adopt something of the cynicism of that age about
 love.
 
 ll. 7-9. i.e. If Lycius had lived longer his experience might have
 either contradicted or corroborated this saying.
 
 PAGE 28. l. 27. _Deafening_, in the unusual sense of making inaudible.
 
 ll. 27-8. _came a thrill Of trumpets._ From the first moment that the
 outside world makes its claim felt there is no happiness for the man
 who, like Lycius, is living a life of selfish pleasure.
 
 PAGE 29. l. 39. _passing bell._ Either the bell rung for a condemned man
 the night before his execution, or the bell rung when a man was dying
 that men might pray for the departing soul.
 
 PAGE 31. ll. 72-4. _Besides . . . new._ An indication of the selfish
 nature of Lycius's love.
 
 l. 80. _serpent._ See how skilfully this allusion is introduced and our
 attention called to it by his very denial that it applies to Lamia.
 
 PAGE 32. l. 97. _I neglect the holy rite._ It is her duty to burn
 incense and tend the sepulchres of her dead kindred.
 
 PAGE 33. l. 107. _blushing._ We see in the glow of the sunset a
 reflection of the blush of the bride.
 
 PAGE 34. ll. 122-3. _sole perhaps . . . roof._ Notice that Keats only
 says 'perhaps', but it gives a trembling unreality at once to the magic
 palace. Cf. Coleridge's _Kubla Khan_:
 
      With music loud and long
      I would build that dome in air.
 
 PAGE 36. l. 155. _demesne_, dwelling. More commonly a domain.
 _Hyperion_, i. 298. _Sonnet_--'On first looking into Chapman's Homer.'
 
 PAGE 38. l. 187. _Ceres' horn._ Ceres was the goddess of harvest, the
 mother of Proserpine (_Lamia_, i. 63, note). Her horn is filled with the
 fruits of the earth, and is symbolic of plenty.
 
 PAGE 39. l. 200. _vowel'd undersong_, in contrast to the harsh, guttural
 and consonantal sound of Teutonic languages.
 
 PAGE 40. l. 213. _meridian_, mid-day. Bacchus was supreme, as is the sun
 at mid-day.
 
 ll. 215-29. Cf. _The Winter's Tale_, IV. iv. 73, &c., where Perdita
 gives to each guest suitable flowers. Cf. also Ophelia's flowers,
 _Hamlet_, IV. v. 175, etc.
 
 l. 217. _osier'd gold._ The gold was woven into baskets, as though it
 were osiers.
 
 l. 224. _willow_, the weeping willow, so-called because its branches
 with their long leaves droop to the ground, like dropping tears. It has
 always been sacred to deserted or unhappy lovers. Cf. _Othello_, IV.
 iii. 24 seq.
 
 _adder's tongue._ For was she not a serpent?
 
 l. 226. _thyrsus._ A rod wreathed with ivy and crowned with a fir-cone,
 used by Bacchus and his followers.
 
 l. 228. _spear-grass . . . thistle._ Because of what he is about to do.
 
 PAGE 41. ll. 229-38. Not to be taken as a serious expression of Keats's
 view of life. Rather he is looking at it, at this moment, through the
 eyes of the chief actors in his drama, and feeling with them.
 
 PAGE 43. l. 263. Notice the horror of the deadly hush and the sudden
 fading of the flowers.
 
 l. 266. _step by step_, prepares us for the thought of the silence as a
 horrid presence.
 
 ll. 274-5. _to illume the deep-recessed vision._ We at once see her dull
 and sunken eyes.
 
 PAGE 45. l. 301. _perceant_, piercing--a Spenserian word.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO ISABELLA AND THE EVE OF ST. AGNES
 
 In _Lamia_ and _Hyperion_, as in _Endymion_, we find Keats inspired by
 classic story, though the inspiration in each case came to him through
 Elizabethan writers. Here, on the other hand, mediaeval legend is his
 inspiration; the 'faery broods' have driven 'nymph and satyr from the
 prosperous woods'. Akin to the Greeks as he was in spirit, in his
 instinctive personification of the lovely manifestations of nature, his
 style and method were really more naturally suited to the portrayal of
 mediaeval scenes, where he found the richness and warmth of colour in
 which his soul delighted.
 
 The story of _Isabella_ he took from Boccaccio, an Italian writer of the
 fourteenth century, whose _Decameron_, a collection of one hundred
 stories, has been a store-house of plots for English writers. By
 Boccaccio the tale is very shortly and simply told, being evidently
 interesting to him mainly for its plot. Keats was attracted to it not so
 much by the action as by the passion involved, so that his enlargement
 of it means little elaboration of incident, but very much more dwelling
 on the psychological aspect. That is to say, he does not care so much
 what happens, as what the personages of the poem think and feel.
 
 Thus we see that the main incident of the story, the murder of Lorenzo,
 is passed over in a line--'Thus was Lorenzo slain and buried in,' the
 next line, 'There, in that forest, did his great love cease,' bringing
 us back at once from the physical reality of the murder to the thought
 of his love, which is to Keats the central fact of the story.
 
 In the delineation of Isabella, her first tender passion of love, her
 agony of apprehension giving way to dull despair, her sudden wakening to
 a brief period of frenzied action, described in stanzas of incomparable
 dramatic force, and the 'peace' which followed when she
 
      Forgot the stars, the moon, the sun,
      And she forgot the blue above the trees,
      And she forgot the dells where waters run,
      And she forgot the chilly autumn breeze;
      She had no knowledge when the day was done,
      And the new morn she saw not--
 
 culminating in the piteous death 'too lone and incomplete'--in the
 delineation of all this Keats shows supreme power and insight.
 
 In the conception, too, of the tragic loneliness of Lorenzo's ghost we
 feel that nothing could be changed, added, or taken away.
 
 Not quite equally happy are the descriptions of the cruel brothers, and
 of Lorenzo as the young lover. There is a tendency to exaggerate both
 their inhumanity and his gentleness, for purposes of contrast, which
 weakens where it would give strength.
 
 _The Eve of St. Agnes_, founded on a popular mediaeval legend, not being
 a tragedy like _Isabella_, cannot be expected to rival it in depth and
 intensity; but in every other poetic quality it equals, where it does
 not surpass, the former poem.
 
 To be specially noted is the skilful use which Keats here makes of
 contrast--between the cruel cold without and the warm love within; the
 palsied age of the Bedesman and Angela, and the eager youth of Porphyro
 and Madeline; the noise and revel and the hush of Madeline's bedroom,
 and, as Mr. Colvin has pointed out, in the moonlight which, chill and
 sepulchral when it strikes elsewhere, to Madeline is as a halo of glory,
 an angelic light.
 
 A mysterious charm is given to the poem by the way in which Keats endows
 inanimate things with a sort of half-conscious life. The knights and
 ladies of stone arouse the bedesman's shuddering sympathy when he thinks
 of the cold they must be enduring; 'the carven angels' '_star'd_'
 '_eager-eyed_' from the roof of the chapel, and the scutcheon in
 Madeline's window '_blush'd_ with blood of queens and kings'.
 
 Keats's characteristic method of description--the way in which, by his
 masterly choice of significant detail, he gives us the whole feeling of
 the situation, is here seen in its perfection. In stanza 1 each line is
 a picture and each picture contributes to the whole effect of painful
 chill. The silence of the sheep, the old man's breath visible in the
 frosty air,--these are things which many people would not notice, but it
 is such little things that make the whole scene real to us.
 
 There is another method of description, quite as beautiful in its way,
 which Coleridge adopted with magic effect in _Christabel_. This is to
 use the power of suggestion, to say very little, but that little of a
 kind to awaken the reader's imagination and make him complete the
 picture. For example, we are told of Christabel--
 
      Her gentle limbs did she undress
      And lay down in her loveliness.
 
 Compare this with stanza xxvi of _The Eve of St. Agnes_.
 
 That Keats was a master of both ways of obtaining a romantic effect is
 shown by his _La Belle Dame Sans Merci_, considered by some people his
 masterpiece, where the rich detail of _The Eve of St. Agnes_ is replaced
 by reserve and suggestion.
 
 As the poem was not included in the volume published in 1820, it is
 given here.
 
      LA BELLE DAME SANS MERCI.
 
      Oh what can ail thee Knight at arms
        Alone and palely loitering?
      The sedge has withered from the Lake
        And no birds sing.
 
      Oh what can ail thee Knight at arms
        So haggard, and so woe begone?
      The Squirrel's granary is full
        And the harvest's done.
 
      I see a lily on thy brow
        With anguish moist and fever dew,
      And on thy cheeks a fading rose
        Fast withereth too.
 
      I met a Lady in the Meads
        Full beautiful, a faery's child,
      Her hair was long, her foot was light
        And her eyes were wild.
 
      I made a garland for her head,
        And bracelets too, and fragrant zone,
      She look'd at me as she did love
        And made sweet moan.
 
      I set her on my pacing steed,
        And nothing else saw all day long,
      For sidelong would she bend and sing
        A Faery's song.
 
      She found me roots of relish sweet,
        And honey wild and manna dew,
      And sure in language strange she said
        I love thee true.
 
      She took me to her elfin grot,
        And there she wept and sigh'd full sore,
      And there I shut her wild, wild eyes
        With kisses four.
 
      And there she lulled me asleep,
        And there I dream'd, Ah! Woe betide!
      The latest dream I ever dreamt
        On the cold hill side.
 
      I saw pale Kings, and Princes too,
        Pale warriors, death pale were they all;
      They cried, La belle dame sans merci,
        Thee hath in thrall.
 
      I saw their starv'd lips in the gloam
        With horrid warning gaped wide,
      And I awoke, and found me here
        On the cold hill's side.
 
      And this is why I sojourn here
        Alone and palely loitering;
      Though the sedge is withered from the Lake
        And no birds sing. . ..
 
 
 NOTES ON ISABELLA.
 
 _Metre._ The _ottava rima_ of the Italians, the natural outcome of
 Keats's turning to Italy for his story. This stanza had been used by
 Chaucer and the Elizabethans, and recently by Hookham Frere in _The
 Monks and the Giants_ and by Byron in _Don Juan_. Compare Keats's use of
 the form with that of either of his contemporaries, and notice how he
 avoids the epigrammatic close, telling in satire and mock-heroic, but
 inappropriate to a serious and romantic poem.
 
 PAGE 49. l. 2. _palmer_, pilgrim. As the pilgrim seeks for a shrine
 where, through the patron saint, he may worship God, so Lorenzo needs a
 woman to worship, through whom he may worship Love.
 
 PAGE 50. l. 21. _constant as her vespers_, as often as she said her
 evening-prayers.
 
 PAGE 51. l. 34. _within . . . domain_, where it should, naturally, have
 been rosy.
 
 PAGE 52. l. 46. _Fever'd . . . bridge._ Made his sense of her worth more
 passionate.
 
 ll. 51-2. _wed To every symbol._ Able to read every sign.
 
 PAGE 53. l. 62. _fear_, make afraid. So used by Shakespeare: e.g. 'Fear
 boys with bugs,' _Taming of the Shrew_, I. ii. 211.
 
 l. 64. _shrive_, confess. As the pilgrim cannot be at peace till he has
 confessed his sins and received absolution, so Lorenzo feels the
 necessity of confessing his love.
 
 PAGE 54. ll. 81-2. _before the dusk . . . veil._ A vivid picture of the
 twilight time, after sunset, but before it is dark enough for the stars
 to shine brightly.
 
 ll. 83-4. The repetition of the same words helps us to feel the
 unchanging nature of their devotion and joy in one another.
 
 PAGE 55. l. 91. _in fee_, in payment for their trouble.
 
 l. 95. _Theseus' spouse._ Ariadne, who was deserted by Theseus after
 having saved his life and left her home for him. _Odyssey_, xi. 321-5.
 
 l. 99. _Dido._ Queen of Carthage, whom Aeneas, in his wanderings, wooed
 and would have married, but the Gods bade him leave her.
 
 _silent . . . undergrove._ When Aeneas saw Dido in Hades, amongst those
 who had died for love, he spoke to her pityingly. But she answered him
 not a word, turning from him into the grove to Lychaeus, her former
 husband, who comforted her. Vergil, _Aeneid_, Bk. VI, l. 450 ff.
 
 l. 103. _almsmen_, receivers of alms, since they take honey from the
 flowers.
 
 PAGE 56. l. 107. _swelt_, faint. Cf. Chaucer, _Troilus and Cressida_,
 iii. 347.
 
 l. 109. _proud-quiver'd_, proudly girt with quivers of arrows.
 
 l. 112. _rich-ored driftings._ The sand of the river in which gold was
 to be found.
 
 PAGE 57. l. 124. _lazar_, leper, or any wretched beggar; from the
 parable of Dives and Lazarus.
 
 _stairs_, steps on which they sat to beg.
 
 l. 125. _red-lin'd accounts_, vividly picturing their neat
 account-books, and at the same time, perhaps, suggesting the human blood
 for which their accumulation of wealth was responsible.
 
 l. 130. _gainful cowardice._ A telling expression for the dread of loss
 which haunts so many wealthy people.
 
 l. 133. _hawks . . . forests._ As a hawk pounces on its prey, so they
 fell on the trading-vessels which put into port.
 
 ll. 133-4. _the untired . . . lies._ They were always ready for any
 dishonourable transaction by which money might be made.
 
 l. 134. _ducats._ Italian pieces of money worth about 4_s._ 4_d._ Cf.
 Shylock, _Merchant of Venice_, II. vii. 15, 'My ducats.'
 
 l. 135. _Quick . . . away._ They would undertake to fleece unsuspecting
 strangers in their town.
 
 PAGE 58. l. 137. _ledger-men._ As if they only lived in their
 account-books. Cf. l. 142.
 
 l. 140. _Hot Egypt's pest_, the plague of Egypt.
 
 ll. 145-52. As in _Lycidas_ Milton apologizes for the introduction of
 his attack on the Church, so Keats apologizes for the introduction of
 this outburst of indignation against cruel and dishonourable dealers,
 which he feels is unsuited to the tender and pitiful story.
 
 l. 150. _ghittern_, an instrument like a guitar, strung with wire.
 
 PAGE 59. ll. 153-60. Keats wants to make it clear that he is not trying
 to surpass Boccaccio, but to give him currency amongst English-speaking
 people.
 
 l. 159. _stead thee_, do thee service.
 
 l. 168. _olive-trees._ In which (through the oil they yield) a great
 part of the wealth of the Italians lies.
 
 PAGE 60. l. 174. _Cut . . . bone._ This is not only a vivid way of
 describing the banishment of all their natural pity. It also, by the
 metaphor used, gives us a sort of premonitory shudder as at Lorenzo's
 death. Indeed, in that moment the murder is, to all intents and
 purposes, done. In stanza xxvii they are described as riding 'with their
 murder'd man'.
 
 PAGE 61. ll. 187-8. _ere . . . eglantine._ The sun, drying up the dew
 drop by drop from the sweet-briar is pictured as passing beads along a
 string, as the Roman Catholics do when they say their prayers.
 
 PAGE 62. l. 209. _their . . . man._ Cf. l. 174, note. Notice the
 extraordinary vividness of the picture here--the quiet rural scene and
 the intrusion of human passion with the reflection in the clear water of
 the pale murderers, sick with suspense, and the unsuspecting victim,
 full of glowing life.
 
 l. 212. _bream_, a kind of fish found in lakes and deep water. Obviously
 Keats was not an angler.
 
 _freshets_, little streams of fresh water.
 
 PAGE 63. l. 217. Notice the reticence with which the mere fact of the
 murder is stated--no details given. Keats wants the prevailing feeling
 to be one of pity rather than of horror.
 
 ll. 219-20. _Ah . . . loneliness._ We perpetually come upon this old
 belief--that the souls of the murdered cannot rest in peace. Cf.
 _Hamlet_, I. v. 8, &c.
 
 l. 221. _break-covert . . . sin._ The blood-hounds employed for tracking
 down a murderer will find him under any concealment, and never rest till
 he is found. So restless is the soul of the victim.
 
 l. 222. _They . . . water._ That water which had reflected the three
 faces as they went across.
 
 _tease_, torment.
 
 l. 223. _convulsed spur_, they spurred their horses violently and
 uncertainly, scarce knowing what they did.
 
 l. 224. _Each richer . . . murderer._ This is what they have gained by
 their deed--the guilt of murder--that is all.
 
 l. 229. _stifling_: partly literal, since the widow's weed is
 close-wrapping and voluminous--partly metaphorical, since the acceptance
 of fate stifles complaint.
 
 l. 230. _accursed bands._ So long as a man hopes he is not free, but at
 the mercy of continual imaginings and fresh disappointments. When hope
 is laid aside, fear and disappointment go with it.
 
 PAGE 64. l. 241. _Selfishness, Love's cousin._ For the two aspects of
 love, as a selfish and unselfish passion, see Blake's two poems, _Love
 seeketh only self to please_, and, _Love seeketh not itself to please_.
 
 l. 242. _single breast_, one-thoughted, being full of love for Lorenzo.
 
 PAGE 65. ll. 249 seq. Cf. Shelley's _Ode to the West Wind_.
 
 l. 252. _roundelay_, a dance in a circle.
 
 l. 259. _Striving . . . itself._ Her distrust of her brothers is shown
 in her effort not to betray her fears to them.
 
 _dungeon climes._ Wherever it is, it is a prison which keeps him from
 her. Cf. _Hamlet_, II. ii. 250-4.
 
 l. 262. _Hinnom's Vale_, the valley of Moloch's sacrifices, _Paradise
 Lost_, i. 392-405.
 
 l. 264. _snowy shroud_, a truly prophetic dream.
 
 PAGE 66. ll. 267 seq. These comparisons help us to realize her
 experience as sharp anguish, rousing her from the lethargy of despair,
 and endowing her for a brief space with almost supernatural energy and
 willpower.
 
 PAGE 67. l. 286. _palsied Druid._ The Druids, or priests of ancient
 Britain, are always pictured as old men with long beards. The conception
 of such an old man, tremblingly trying to get music from a broken harp,
 adds to the pathos and mystery of the vision.
 
 l. 288. _Like . . . among._ Take this line word by word, and see how
 many different ideas go to create the incomparably ghostly effect.
 
 ll. 289 seq. Horror is skilfully kept from this picture and only tragedy
 left. The horror is for the eyes of his murderers, not for his love.
 
 l. 292. _unthread . . . woof._ His narration and explanation of what has
 gone before is pictured as the disentangling of woven threads.
 
 l. 293. _darken'd._ In many senses, since their crime was (1) concealed
 from Isabella, (2) darkly evil, (3) done in the darkness of the wood.
 
 PAGE 68. ll. 305 seq. The whole sound of this stanza is that of a faint
 and far-away echo.
 
 l. 308. _knelling._ Every sound is like a death-bell to him.
 
 PAGE 69. l. 316. _That paleness._ Her paleness showing her great love
 for him; and, moreover, indicating that they will soon be reunited.
 
 l. 317. _bright abyss_, the bright hollow of heaven.
 
 l. 322. _The atom . . . turmoil._ Every one must know the sensation of
 looking into the darkness, straining one's eyes, until the darkness
 itself seems to be composed of moving atoms. The experience with which
 Keats, in the next lines, compares it, is, we are told, a common
 experience in the early stages of consumption.
 
 PAGE 70. l. 334. _school'd my infancy._ She was as a child in her
 ignorance of evil, and he has taught her the hard lesson that our misery
 is not always due to the dealings of a blind fate, but sometimes to the
 deliberate crime and cruelty of those whom we have trusted.
 
 l. 344. _forest-hearse._ To Isabella the whole forest is but the
 receptacle of her lover's corpse.
 
 PAGE 71. l. 347. _champaign_, country. We can picture Isabel, as they
 'creep' along, furtively glancing round, and then producing her knife
 with a smile so terrible that the old nurse can only fear that she is
 delirious, as her sudden vigour would also suggest.
 
 PAGE 72. st. xlvi-xlviii. These are the stanzas of which Lamb says,
 'there is nothing more awfully simple in diction, more nakedly grand and
 moving in sentiment, in Dante, in Chaucer, or in Spenser'--and again,
 after an appreciation of _Lamia_, whose fairy splendours are 'for
 younger impressibilities', he reverts to them, saying: 'To _us_ an
 ounce of feeling is worth a pound of fancy; and therefore we recur
 again, with a warmer gratitude, to the story of Isabella and the pot of
 basil, and those never-cloying stanzas which we have cited, and which we
 think should disarm criticism, if it be not in its nature cruel; if it
 would not deny to honey its sweetness, nor to roses redness, nor light
 to the stars in Heaven; if it would not bay the moon out of the skies,
 rather than acknowledge she is fair.'--_The New Times_, July 19, 1820.
 
 l. 361. _fresh-thrown mould_, a corroboration of her fears. Mr. Colvin
 has pointed out how the horror is throughout relieved by the beauty of
 the images called up by the similes, e.g. 'a crystal well,' 'a native
 lily of the dell.'
 
 l. 370. _Her silk . . . phantasies_, i.e. which she had embroidered
 fancifully for him.
 
 PAGE 73. l. 385. _wormy circumstance_, ghastly detail. Keats envies the
 un-self-conscious simplicity of the old ballad-writers in treating such
 a theme as this, and bids the reader turn to Boccaccio, whose
 description of the scene he cannot hope to rival. Boccaccio writes: 'Nor
 had she dug long before she found the body of her hapless lover, whereon
 as yet there was no trace of corruption or decay; and thus she saw
 without any manner of doubt that her vision was true. And so, saddest of
 women, knowing that she might not bewail him there, she would gladly, if
 she could, have carried away the body and given it more honourable
 sepulture elsewhere; but as she might not do so, she took a knife, and,
 as best she could, severed the head from the trunk, and wrapped it in a
 napkin and laid it in the lap of the maid; and having covered the rest
 of the corpse with earth, she left the spot, having been seen by none,
 and went home.'
 
 PAGE 74. l. 393. _Persean sword._ The sword of sharpness given to
 Perseus by Hermes, with which he cut off the head of the Gorgon Medusa,
 a monster with the head of a woman, and snaky locks, the sight of whom
 turned those who looked on her into stone. Perseus escaped by looking
 only at her reflection in his shield.
 
 l. 406. _chilly_: tears, not passionate, but of cold despair.
 
 PAGE 75. l. 410. _pluck'd in Araby._ Cf. Lady Macbeth, 'All the perfumes
 of Arabia will not sweeten this little hand,' _Macbeth_, V. ii. 55.
 
 l. 412. _serpent-pipe_, twisted pipe.
 
 l. 416. _Sweet Basil_, a fragrant aromatic plant.
 
 ll. 417-20. The repetition makes us feel the monotony of her days and
 nights of grief.
 
 PAGE 76. l. 432. _leafits_, leaflets, little leaves. An old botanical
 term, but obsolete in Keats's time. Coleridge uses it in l. 65 of 'The
 Nightingale' in _Lyrical Ballads_. In later editions he altered it to
 'leaflets'.
 
 l. 436. _Lethean_, in Hades, the dark underworld of the dead. Compare
 the conception of melancholy in the _Ode on Melancholy_, where it is
 said to neighbour joy. Contrast Stanza lxi.
 
 l. 439. _cypress_, dark trees which in Italy are always planted in
 cemeteries. They stand by Keats's own grave.
 
 PAGE 77. l. 442. _Melpomene_, the Muse of tragedy.
 
 l. 451. _Baaelites of pelf_, worshippers of ill-gotten gains.
 
 l. 453. _elf_, man. The word is used in this sense by Spenser in _The
 Faerie Queene_.
 
 PAGE 78. l. 467. _chapel-shrift_, confession. Cf. l. 64.
 
 ll. 469-72. _And when . . . hair._ The pathos of this picture is
 intensified by its suggestions of the wife- and mother-hood which Isabel
 can now never know. Cf. st. xlvii, where the idea is still more
 beautifully suggested.
 
 PAGE 79. l. 475. _vile . . . spot._ The one touch of descriptive
 horror--powerful in its reticence.
 
 PAGE 80. l. 489. _on . . . things._ Her love and her hope is with the
 dead rather than with the living.
 
 l. 492. _lorn voice._ Cf. st. xxxv. She is approaching her lover. Note
 that in each case the metaphor is of a stringed instrument.
 
 l. 493. _Pilgrim in his wanderings._ Cf. st. i, 'a young palmer in
 Love's eye.'
 
 l. 503. _burthen_, refrain. Cf. _Tempest_, I. ii. Ariel's songs.
 
 
 NOTES ON THE EVE OF ST. AGNES.
 
 See Introduction to _Isabella_ and _The Eve of St. Agnes_, p. 212.
 
 St. Agnes was a martyr of the Christian Church who was beheaded just
 outside Rome in 304 because she refused to marry a Pagan, holding
 herself to be a bride of Christ. She was only 13--so small and slender
 that the smallest fetters they could find slipped over her little wrists
 and fell to the ground. But they stripped, tortured, and killed her. A
 week after her death her parents dreamed that they saw her in glory with
 a white lamb, the sign of purity, beside her. Hence she is always
 pictured with lambs (as her name signifies), and to the place of her
 martyrdom two lambs are yearly taken on the anniversary and blessed.
 Then their wool is cut off and woven by the nuns into the archbishop's
 cloak, or pallium (see l. 70).
 
 For the legend connected with the Eve of the Saint's anniversary, to
 which Keats refers, see st. vi.
 
 _Metre._ That of the _Faerie Queene_.
 
 PAGE 83. ll. 5-6. _told His rosary._ Cf. _Isabella_, ll. 87-8.
 
 l. 8. _without a death._ The 'flight to heaven' obscures the simile of
 the incense, and his breath is thought of as a departing soul.
 
 PAGE 84. l. 12. _meagre, barefoot, wan._ Such a compression of a
 description into three bare epithets is frequent in Keats's poetry. He
 shows his marvellous power in the unerring choice of adjective; and
 their enumeration in this way has, from its very simplicity, an
 extraordinary force.
 
 l. 15. _purgatorial rails_, rails which enclose them in a place of
 torture.
 
 l. 16. _dumb orat'ries._ The transference of the adjective from person
 to place helps to give us the mysterious sense of life in inanimate
 things. Cf. _Hyperion_, iii. 8; _Ode to a Nightingale_, l. 66.
 
 l. 22. _already . . . rung._ He was dead to the world. But this hint
 should also prepare us for the conclusion of the poem.
 
 PAGE 85. l. 31. _'gan to chide._ l. 32. _ready with their pride._ l. 34.
 _ever eager-eyed._ l. 36. _with hair . . . breasts._ As if trumpets,
 rooms, and carved angels were all alive. See Introduction, p. 212.
 
 l. 37. _argent_, silver. They were all glittering with rich robes and
 arms.
 
 PAGE 86. l. 56. _yearning . . . pain_, expressing all the exquisite
 beauty and pathos of the music; and moreover seeming to give it
 conscious life.
 
 PAGE 87. l. 64. _danc'd_, conveying all her restlessness and impatience
 as well as the lightness of her step.
 
 l. 70. _amort_, deadened, dull. Cf. _Taming of the Shrew_, IV. iii. 36,
 'What sweeting! all amort.'
 
 l. 71. See note on St. Agnes, p. 224.
 
 l. 77. _Buttress'd from moonlight._ A picture of the castle and of the
 night, as well as of Porphyro's position.
 
 PAGE 88. ll. 82 seq. Compare the situation of these lovers with that of
 Romeo and Juliet.
 
 l. 90. _beldame_, old woman. Shakespeare generally uses the word in an
 uncomplimentary sense--'hag'--but it is not so used here. The word is
 used by Spenser in its derivative sense, 'Fair lady,' _Faerie Queene_,
 ii. 43.
 
 PAGE 89. l. 110. _Brushing . . . plume._ This line both adds to our
 picture of Porphyro and vividly brings before us the character of the
 place he was entering--unsuited to the splendid cavalier.
 
 l. 113. _Pale, lattic'd, chill._ Cf. l. 12, note.
 
 l. 115. _by the holy loom_, on which the nuns spin. See l. 71 and note
 on St. Agnes, p. 224.
 
 PAGE 90. l. 120. _Thou must . . . sieve._ Supposed to be one of the
 commonest signs of supernatural power. Cf. _Macbeth_, I. iii. 8.
 
 l. 133. _brook_, check. An incorrect use of the word, which really means
 _bear_ or _permit_.
 
 PAGE 92. ll. 155-6. _churchyard . . . toll._ Unconscious prophecy. Cf.
 _The Bedesman_, l. 22.
 
 l. 168. _While . . . coverlet._ All the wonders of Madeline's
 imagination.
 
 l. 171. _Since Merlin . . . debt._ Referring to the old legend that
 Merlin had for father an incubus or demon, and was himself a demon of
 evil, though his innate wickedness was driven out by baptism. Thus his
 'debt' to the demon was his existence, which he paid when Vivien
 compassed his destruction by means of a spell which he had taught her.
 Keats refers to the storm which is said to have raged that night, which
 Tennyson also describes in _Merlin and Vivien_. The source whence the
 story came to Keats has not been ascertained.
 
 PAGE 93. l. 173. _cates_, provisions. Cf. _Taming of the Shrew_, II. i.
 187:--
 
      Kate of Kate Hall--my super-dainty Kate,
      For dainties are all cates.
 
 We still use the verb 'to cater' as in l. 177.
 
 l. 174. _tambour frame_, embroidery-frame.
 
 l. 185. _espied_, spying. _Dim_, because it would be from a dark corner;
 also the spy would be but dimly visible to her old eyes.
 
 l. 187. _silken . . . chaste._ Cf. ll. 12, 113.
 
 l. 188. _covert_, hiding. Cf. _Isabella_, l. 221.
 
 PAGE 94. l. 198. _fray'd_, frightened.
 
 l. 203. _No uttered . . . betide._ Another of the conditions of the
 vision was evidently silence.
 
 PAGE 95. ll. 208 seq. Compare Coleridge's description of Christabel's
 room: _Christabel_, i. 175-83.
 
 l. 218. _gules_, blood-red.
 
 PAGE 96. l. 226. _Vespers._ Cf. _Isabella_, l. 21, ll. 226-34. See
 Introduction, p. 213.
 
 l. 237. _poppied_, because of the sleep-giving property of the
 poppy-heads.
 
 l. 241. _Clasp'd . . . pray._ The sacredness of her beauty is felt here.
 
 _missal_, prayer-book.
 
 PAGE 97. l. 247. _To wake . . . tenderness._ He waited to hear, by the
 sound of her breathing, that she was asleep.
 
 l. 250. _Noiseless . . . wilderness._ We picture a man creeping over a
 wide plain, fearing that any sound he makes will arouse some wild beast
 or other frightful thing.
 
 l. 257. _Morphean._ Morpheus was the god of sleep.
 
 _amulet_, charm.
 
 l. 258. _boisterous . . . festive._ Cf. ll. 12, 112, 187.
 
 l. 261. _and . . . gone._ The cadence of this line is peculiarly adapted
 to express a dying-away of sound.
 
 PAGE 98. l. 266. _soother_, sweeter, more delightful. An incorrect use
 of the word. Sooth really means truth.
 
 l. 267. _tinct_, flavoured; usually applied to colour, not to taste.
 
 l. 268. _argosy_, merchant-ship. Cf. _Merchant of Venice_, I. i. 9,
 'Your argosies with portly sail.'
 
 PAGE 99. l. 287. Before he desired a 'Morphean amulet'; now he wishes to
 release his lady's eyes from the charm of sleep.
 
 l. 288. _woofed phantasies._ Fancies confused as woven threads. Cf.
 _Isabella_, l. 292.
 
 l. 292. '_La belle . . . mercy._' This stirred Keats's imagination, and
 he produced the wonderful, mystic ballad of this title (see p. 213).
 
 l. 296. _affrayed_, frightened. Cf. l. 198.
 
 PAGE 100. ll. 298-9. Cf. Donne's poem, _The Dream_:--
 
      My dream thou brokest not, but continued'st it.
 
 l. 300. _painful change_, his paleness.
 
 l. 311. _pallid, chill, and drear._ Cf. ll. 12, 112, 187, 258.
 
 PAGE 101. l. 323. _Love's alarum_, warning them to speed away.
 
 l. 325. _flaw_, gust of wind. Cf. _Coriolanus_, V. iii. 74; _Hamlet_,
 V. i. 239.
 
 l. 333. _unpruned_, not trimmed.
 
 PAGE 102. l. 343. _elfin-storm._ The beldame has suggested that he must
 be 'liege-lord of all the elves and fays'.
 
 l. 351. _o'er . . . moors._ A happy suggestion of a warmer clime.
 
 PAGE 103. l. 355. _darkling._ Cf. _King Lear_, I. iv. 237: 'So out went
 the candle and we were left darkling.' Cf. _Ode to a Nightingale_, l.
 51.
 
 l. 360. _And . . . floor._ There is the very sound of the wind in this
 line.
 
 PAGE 104. ll. 375-8. _Angela . . . cold._ The death of these two leaves
 us with the thought of a young, bright world for the lovers to enjoy;
 whilst at the same time it completes the contrast, which the first
 introduction of the old bedesman suggested, between the old, the poor,
 and the joyless, and the young, the rich, and the happy.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO THE ODE TO A NIGHTINGALE, ODE ON A GRECIAN URN, ODE ON
 MELANCHOLY, AND TO AUTUMN.
 
 These four odes, which were all written in 1819, the first three in the
 early months of that year, ought to be considered together, since the
 same strain of thought runs through them all and, taken all together,
 they seem to sum up Keats's philosophy.
 
 In all of them the poet looks upon life as it is, and the eternal
 principle of beauty, in the first three seeing them in sharp contrast;
 in the last reconciling them, and leaving us content.
 
 The first-written of the four, the _Ode to a Nightingale_, is the most
 passionately human and personal of them all. For Keats wrote it soon
 after the death of his brother Tom, whom he had loved devotedly and
 himself nursed to the end. He was feeling keenly the tragedy of a world
 'where youth grows pale, and spectre-thin, and dies', and the song of
 the nightingale, heard in a friend's garden at Hampstead, made him long
 to escape with it from this world of realities and sorrows to the world
 of ideal beauty, which it seemed to him somehow to stand for and
 suggest. He did not think of the nightingale as an individual bird, but
 of its song, which had been beautiful for centuries and would continue
 to be beautiful long after his generation had passed away; and the
 thought of this undying loveliness he contrasted bitterly with our
 feverishly sad and short life. When, by the power of imagination, he had
 left the world behind him and was absorbed in the vision of beauty
 roused by the bird's song, he longed for death rather than a return to
 disillusionment.
 
 So in the _Grecian Urn_ he contrasts unsatisfying human life with art,
 which is everlastingly beautiful. The figures on the vase lack one thing
 only--reality,--whilst on the other hand they are happy in not being
 subject to trouble, change, or death. The thought is sad, yet Keats
 closes this ode triumphantly, not, as in _The Nightingale_, on a note of
 disappointment. The beauty of this Greek sculpture, truly felt, teaches
 us that beauty at any rate is real and lasting, and that utter belief in
 beauty is the one thing needful in life.
 
 In the _Ode on Melancholy_ Keats, in a more bitter mood, finds the
 presence, in a fleeting world, of eternal beauty the source of the
 deepest melancholy. To encourage your melancholy mood, he tells us, do
 not look on the things counted sad, but on the most beautiful, which are
 only quickly-fading manifestations of the everlasting principle of
 beauty. It is then, when a man most deeply loves the beautiful, when he
 uses his capacities of joy to the utmost, that the full bitterness of
 the contrast between the real and the ideal comes home to him and
 crushes him. If he did not feel so much he would not suffer so much; if
 he loved beauty less he would care less that he could not hold it long.
 
 But in the ode _To Autumn_ Keats attains to the serenity he has been
 seeking. In this unparalleled description of a richly beautiful autumn
 day he conveys to us all the peace and comfort which his spirit
 receives. He does not philosophize upon the spectacle or draw a moral
 from it, but he shows us how in nature beauty is ever present. To the
 momentary regret for spring he replies with praise of the present hour,
 concluding with an exquisite description of the sounds of autumn--its
 music, as beautiful as that of spring. Hitherto he has lamented the
 insecurity of a man's hold upon the beautiful, though he has never
 doubted the reality of beauty and the worth of its worship to man. Now,
 under the influence of nature, he intuitively knows that beauty once
 seen and grasped is man's possession for ever. He is in much the same
 position that Wordsworth was when he declared that
 
                     Nature never did betray
      The heart that loved her; 'tis her privilege,
      Through all the years of this our life, to lead
      From joy to joy: for she can so inform
      The mind that is within us, so impress
      With quietness and beauty, and so feed
      With lofty thoughts, that neither evil tongues,
      Rash judgments, nor the sneers of selfish men,
      Nor greetings where no kindness is, nor all
      The dreary intercourse of daily life,
      Shall e'er prevail against us, or disturb
      Our cheerful faith, that all which we behold
      Is full of blessings.
 
 This was not the last poem that Keats wrote, but it was the last which
 he wrote in the fulness of his powers. We can scarcely help wishing
 that, beautiful as were some of the productions of his last feverish
 year of life, this perfect ode, expressing so serene and untroubled a
 mood, might have been his last word to the world.
 
 
 NOTES ON THE ODE TO A NIGHTINGALE.
 
 In the early months of 1819 Keats was living with his friend Brown at
 Hampstead (Wentworth Place). In April a nightingale built her nest in
 the garden, and Brown writes: 'Keats felt a tranquil and continual joy
 in her song; and one morning he took his chair from the breakfast table
 to the grass-plot under a plum, where he sat for two or three hours.
 When he came into the house I perceived he had some scraps of paper in
 his hand, and these he was quietly thrusting behind the books. On
 inquiry, I found those scraps, four or five in number, contained his
 poetic feeling on the song of our nightingale. The writing was not well
 legible, and it was difficult to arrange the stanza on so many scraps.
 With his assistance I succeeded, and this was his _Ode to a
 Nightingale_.'
 
 PAGE 107. l. 4. _Lethe._ Cf. _Lamia_, i. 81, note.
 
 l. 7. _Dryad._ Cf. _Lamia_, i. 5, note.
 
 PAGE 108. l. 13. _Flora_, the goddess of flowers.
 
 l. 14. _sunburnt mirth._ An instance of Keats's power of concentration.
 The _people_ are not mentioned at all, yet this phrase conjures up a
 picture of merry, laughing, sunburnt peasants, as surely as could a long
 and elaborate description.
 
 l. 15. _the warm South._ As if the wine brought all this with it.
 
 l. 16. _Hippocrene_, the spring of the Muses on Mount Helicon.
 
 l. 23. _The weariness . . . fret._ Cf. 'The fretful stir unprofitable
 and the fever of the world' in Wordsworth's _Tintern Abbey_, which Keats
 well knew.
 
 PAGE 109. l. 26. _Where youth . . . dies._ See Introduction to the Odes,
 p. 230.
 
 l. 29. _Beauty . . . eyes._ Cf. _Ode on Melancholy_, 'Beauty that must
 die.'
 
 l. 32. _Not . . . pards._ Not wine, but poetry, shall give him release
 from the cares of this world. Keats is again obviously thinking of
 Titian's picture (Cf. _Lamia_, i. 58, note).
 
 l. 40. Notice the balmy softness which is given to this line by the use
 of long vowels and liquid consonants.
 
 PAGE 110. ll. 41 seq. The dark, warm, sweet atmosphere seems to enfold
 us. It would be hard to find a more fragrant passage.
 
 l. 50. _The murmurous . . . eves._ We seem to hear them. Tennyson,
 inspired by Keats, with more self-conscious art, uses somewhat similar
 effects, e.g.:
 
      The moan of doves in immemorial elms,
      And murmuring of innumerable bees.
 
                            _The Princess_, vii.
 
 l. 51. _Darkling._ Cf. _The Eve of St. Agnes_, l. 355, note.
 
 l. 61. _Thou . . . Bird._ Because, so far as we are concerned, the
 nightingale we heard years ago is the same as the one we hear to-night.
 The next lines make it clear that this is what Keats means.
 
 l. 64. _clown_, peasant.
 
 l. 67. _alien corn._ Transference of the adjective from person to
 surroundings. Cf. _Eve of St. Agnes_, l. 16; _Hyperion_, iii. 9.
 
 ll. 69-70. _magic . . . forlorn._ Perhaps inspired by a picture of
 Claude's, 'The Enchanted Castle,' of which Keats had written before in a
 poetical epistle to his friend Reynolds--'The windows [look] as if
 latch'd by Fays and Elves.'
 
 PAGE 112. l. 72. _Toll._ To him it has a deeply melancholy sound, and it
 strikes the death-blow to his illusion.
 
 l. 75. _plaintive._ It did not sound sad to Keats at first, but as it
 dies away it takes colour from his own melancholy and sounds pathetic to
 him. Cf. _Ode on Melancholy_: he finds both bliss and pain in the
 contemplation of beauty.
 
 ll. 76-8. _Past . . . glades._ The whole country speeds past our eyes in
 these three lines.
 
 
 NOTES ON THE ODE ON A GRECIAN URN.
 
 This poem is not, apparently, inspired by any one actual vase, but by
 many Greek sculptures, some seen in the British Museum, some known only
 from engravings. Keats, in his imagination, combines them all into one
 work of supreme beauty.
 
 Perhaps Keats had some recollection of Wordsworth's sonnet 'Upon the
 sight of a beautiful picture,' beginning 'Praised be the art.'
 
 PAGE 113. l. 2. _foster-child._ The child of its maker, but preserved
 and cared for by these foster-parents.
 
 l. 7. _Tempe_ was a famous glen in Thessaly.
 
 _Arcady._ Arcadia, a very mountainous country, the centre of the
 Peloponnese, was the last stronghold of the aboriginal Greeks. The
 people were largely shepherds and goatherds, and Pan was a local
 Arcadian god till the Persian wars (c. 400 B.C.). In late Greek and in
 Roman pastoral poetry, as in modern literature, Arcadia is a sort of
 ideal land of poetic shepherds.
 
 PAGE 114. ll. 17-18. _Bold . . . goal._ The one thing denied to the
 figures--actual life. But Keats quickly turns to their rich
 compensations.
 
 PAGE 115. ll. 28-30. _All . . . tongue._ Cf. Shelley's _To a Skylark_:
 
      Thou lovest--but ne'er knew love's sad satiety.
 
 ll. 31 seq. Keats is now looking at the other side of the urn. This
 verse strongly recalls certain parts of the frieze of the Parthenon
 (British Museum).
 
 PAGE 116. l. 41. _Attic_, Greek.
 
 _brede_, embroidery. Cf. _Lamia_, i. 159. Here used of carving.
 
 l. 44. _tease us out of thought._ Make us think till thought is lost in
 mystery.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO THE ODE TO PSYCHE.
 
 In one of his long journal-letters to his brother George, Keats writes,
 at the beginning of May, 1819: 'The following poem--the last I have
 written--is the first and the only one with which I have taken even
 moderate pains. I have for the most part dashed off my lines in a hurry.
 This I have done leisurely--I think it reads the more richly for it, and
 will I hope encourage me to write other things in even a more peaceable
 and healthy spirit. You must recollect that Psyche was not embodied as a
 goddess before the time of Apuleius the Platonist, who lived after the
 Augustan age, and consequently the goddess was never worshipped or
 sacrificed to with any of the ancient fervour, and perhaps never thought
 of in the old religion--I am more orthodox than to let a heathen goddess
 be so neglected.' _The Ode to Psyche_ follows.
 
 The story of Psyche may be best told in the words of William Morris in
 the 'argument' to 'the story of Cupid and Psyche' in his _Earthly
 Paradise_:
 
      'Psyche, a king's daughter, by her exceeding beauty caused the
      people to forget Venus; therefore the goddess would fain have
      destroyed her: nevertheless she became the bride of Love, yet
      in an unhappy moment lost him by her own fault, and wandering
      through the world suffered many evils at the hands of Venus,
      for whom she must accomplish fearful tasks. But the gods and
      all nature helped her, and in process of time she was
      re-united to Love, forgiven by Venus, and made immortal by the
      Father of gods and men.'
 
 Psyche is supposed to symbolize the human soul made immortal through
 love.
 
 
 NOTES ON THE ODE TO PSYCHE.
 
 PAGE 117. l. 2. _sweet . . . dear._ Cf. _Lycidas_, 'Bitter constraint
 and sad occasion dear.'
 
 l. 4. _soft-conched._ Metaphor of a sea-shell giving an impression of
 exquisite colour and delicate form.
 
 PAGE 118. l. 13. _'Mid . . . eyed._ Nature in its appeal to every sense.
 In this line we have the essence of all that makes the beauty of flowers
 satisfying and comforting.
 
 l. 14. _Tyrian_, purple, from a certain dye made at Tyre.
 
 l. 20. _aurorean._ Aurora is the goddess of dawn. Cf. _Hyperion_, i.
 181.
 
 l. 25. _Olympus._ Cf. _Lamia_, i. 9, note.
 
 _hierarchy._ The orders of gods, with Jupiter as head.
 
 l. 26. _Phoebe_, or Diana, goddess of the moon.
 
 l. 27. _Vesper_, the evening star.
 
 PAGE 119. l. 34. _oracle_, a sacred place where the god was supposed to
 answer questions of vital import asked him by his worshippers.
 
 l. 37. _fond believing_, foolishly credulous.
 
 l. 41. _lucent fans_, luminous wings.
 
 PAGE 120. l. 55. _fledge . . . steep._ Probably a recollection of what
 he had seen in the Lakes, for on June 29, 1818, he writes to Tom from
 Keswick of a waterfall which 'oozes out from a cleft in perpendicular
 Rocks, all fledged with Ash and other beautiful trees'.
 
 l. 57. _Dryads._ Cf. _Lamia_, l. 5, note.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO FANCY.
 
 This poem, although so much lighter in spirit, bears a certain relation
 in thought to Keats's other odes. In the _Nightingale_ the tragedy of
 this life made him long to escape, on the wings of imagination, to the
 ideal world of beauty symbolized by the song of the bird. Here finding
 all real things, even the most beautiful, pall upon him, he extols the
 fancy, which can escape from reality and is not tied by place or season
 in its search for new joys. This is, of course, only a passing mood, as
 the extempore character of the poetry indicates. We see more of settled
 conviction in the deeply-meditative _Ode to Autumn_, where he finds the
 ideal in the rich and ever-changing real.
 
 This poem is written in the four-accent metre employed by Milton in
 _L'Allegro_ and _Il Penseroso_, and we can often detect a similarity of
 cadence, and a resemblance in the scenes imagined.
 
 
 NOTES ON FANCY.
 
 PAGE 123. l. 16. _ingle_, chimney-nook.
 
 PAGE 126. l. 81. _Ceres' daughter_, Proserpina. Cf. _Lamia_, i. 63,
 note.
 
 l. 82. _God of torment._ Pluto, who presides over the torments of the
 souls in Hades.
 
 PAGE 127. l. 85. _Hebe_, the cup-bearer of Jove.
 
 l. 89. _And Jove grew languid._ Observe the fitting slowness of the
 first half of the line, and the sudden leap forward of the second.
 
 
 NOTES ON ODE
 
 ['BARDS OF PASSION AND OF MIRTH'].
 
 PAGE 128. l. 1. _Bards_, poets and singers.
 
 l. 8. _parle_, French _parler_. Cf. _Hamlet_, I. i. 62.
 
 l. 12. _Dian's fawns._ Diana was the goddess of hunting.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO LINES ON THE MERMAID TAVERN.
 
 The Mermaid Tavern was an old inn in Bread Street, Cheapside. Tradition
 says that the literary club there was established by Sir Walter Raleigh
 in 1603. In any case it was, in Shakespeare's time, frequented by the
 chief writers of the day, amongst them Ben Jonson, Beaumont, Fletcher,
 Selden, Carew, Donne, and Shakespeare himself. Beaumont, in a poetical
 epistle to Ben Jonson, writes:
 
      What things have we seen
      Done at the Mermaid! heard words that have been
      So nimble and so full of subtle flame,
      As if that any one from whence they came
      Had meant to put his whole wit in a jest,
      And has resolved to live a fool the rest
      Of his dull life.
 
 
 NOTES ON LINES ON THE MERMAID TAVERN.
 
 PAGE 131. l. 10. _bold Robin Hood._ Cf. _Robin Hood_, p. 133.
 
 l. 12. _bowse_, drink.
 
 PAGE 132. ll. 16-17. _an astrologer's . . . story._ The astrologer would
 record, on parchment, what he had seen in the heavens.
 
 l. 22. _The Mermaid . . . Zodiac._ The zodiac was an imaginary belt
 across the heavens within which the sun and planets were supposed to
 move. It was divided into twelve parts corresponding to the twelve
 months of the year, according to the position of the moon when full.
 Each of these parts had a sign by which it was known, and the sign of
 the tenth was a fish-tailed goat, to which Keats refers as the Mermaid.
 The word _zodiac_ comes from the Greek +zodion+, meaning
 a little animal, since originally all the signs were animals.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO ROBIN HOOD.
 
 Early in 1818 John Hamilton Reynolds, a friend of Keats, sent him two
 sonnets which he had written 'On Robin Hood'. Keats, in his letter of
 thanks, after giving an appreciation of Reynolds's production, says: 'In
 return for your Dish of Filberts, I have gathered a few Catkins, I hope
 they'll look pretty.' Then follow these lines, entitled, 'To J. H. R. in
 answer to his Robin Hood sonnets.' At the end he writes: 'I hope you
 will like them--they are at least written in the spirit of outlawry.'
 
 Robin Hood, the outlaw, was a popular hero of the Middle Ages. He was a
 great poacher of deer, brave, chivalrous, generous, full of fun, and
 absolutely without respect for law and order. He robbed the rich to give
 to the poor, and waged ceaseless war against the wealthy prelates of the
 church. Indeed, of his endless practical jokes, the majority were played
 upon sheriffs and bishops. He lived, with his 'merry men', in Sherwood
 Forest, where a hollow tree, said to be his 'larder', is still shown.
 
 Innumerable ballads telling of his exploits were composed, the first
 reference to which is in the second edition of Langland's _Piers
 Plowman_, c. 1377. Many of these ballads still survive, but in all these
 traditions it is quite impossible to disentangle fact from fiction.
 
 
 NOTES ON ROBIN HOOD.
 
 PAGE 133. l. 4. _pall._ Cf. _Isabella_, l. 268.
 
 l. 9. _fleeces_, the leaves of the forest, cut from them by the wind as
 the wool is shorn from the sheep's back.
 
 PAGE 134. l. 13. _ivory shrill_, the shrill sound of the ivory horn.
 
 ll. 15-18. Keats imagines some man who has not heard the laugh hearing
 with bewilderment its echo in the depths of the forest.
 
 l. 21. _seven stars_, Charles's Wain or the Big Bear.
 
 l. 22. _polar ray_, the light of the Pole, or North, star.
 
 l. 30. _pasture Trent_, the fields about the Trent, the river of
 Nottingham, which runs by Sherwood forest.
 
 PAGE 135. l. 33. _morris._ A dance in costume which, in the Tudor
 period, formed a part of every village festivity. It was generally
 danced by five men and a boy in girl's dress, who represented Maid
 Marian. Later it came to be associated with the May games, and other
 characters of the Robin Hood epic were introduced. It was abolished,
 with other village gaieties, by the Puritans, and though at the
 Restoration it was revived it never regained its former importance.
 
 l. 34. _Gamelyn._ The hero of a tale (_The Tale of Gamelyn_) attributed
 to Chaucer, and given in some MSS. as _The Cook's Tale_ in _The
 Canterbury Tales_. The story of Orlando's ill-usage, prowess, and
 banishment, in _As You Like It_, Shakespeare derived from this source,
 and Keats is thinking of the merry life of the hero amongst the outlaws.
 
 l. 36. '_grene shawe_,' green wood.
 
 PAGE 136. l. 53. _Lincoln green._ In the Middle Ages Lincoln was very
 famous for dyeing green cloth, and this green cloth was the
 characteristic garb of the forester and outlaw.
 
 l. 62. _burden._ Cf. _Isabella_, l. 503.
 
 
 NOTES ON 'TO AUTUMN'.
 
 In a letter written to Reynolds from Winchester, in September, 1819,
 Keats says: 'How beautiful the season is now--How fine the air. A
 temperate sharpness about it. Really, without joking, chaste
 weather--Dian skies--I never liked stubble-fields so much as now--Aye
 better than the chilly green of the spring. Somehow, a stubble-field
 looks warm--in the same way that some pictures look warm. This struck me
 so much in my Sunday's walk that I composed upon it.' What he composed
 was the Ode _To Autumn_.
 
 PAGE 137. ll. 1 seq. The extraordinary concentration and richness of
 this description reminds us of Keats's advice to Shelley--'Load every
 rift of your subject with ore.' The whole poem seems to be painted in
 tints of red, brown, and gold.
 
 PAGE 138. ll. 12 seq. From the picture of an autumn day we proceed to
 the characteristic sights and occupations of autumn, personified in the
 spirit of the season.
 
 l. 18. _swath_, the width of the sweep of the scythe.
 
 ll. 23 seq. Now the sounds of autumn are added to complete the
 impression.
 
 ll. 25-6. Compare letter quoted above.
 
 PAGE 139. l. 28. _sallows_, trees or low shrubs of the willowy kind.
 
 ll. 28-9. _borne . . . dies._ Notice how the cadence of the line fits
 the sense. It seems to rise and fall and rise and fall again.
 
 
 NOTES ON ODE ON MELANCHOLY.
 
 PAGE 140. l. 1. _Lethe._ See _Lamia_, i. 81, note.
 
 l. 2. _Wolf's-bane_, aconite or hellebore--a poisonous plant.
 
 l. 4. _nightshade_, a deadly poison.
 
 _ruby . . . Proserpine._ Cf. Swinburne's _Garden of Proserpine_.
 
 _Proserpine._ Cf. _Lamia_, i. 63, note.
 
 l. 5. _yew-berries._ The yew, a dark funereal-looking tree, is
 constantly planted in churchyards.
 
 l. 7. _your mournful Psyche._ See Introduction to the _Ode to Psyche_,
 p. 236.
 
 PAGE 141. l. 12. _weeping cloud._ l. 14. _shroud._ Giving a touch of
 mystery and sadness to the otherwise light and tender picture.
 
 l. 16. _on . . . sand-wave_, the iridescence sometimes seen on the
 ribbed sand left by the tide.
 
 l. 21. _She_, i.e. Melancholy--now personified as a goddess. Compare
 this conception of melancholy with the passage in _Lamia_, i. 190-200.
 Cf. also Milton's personifications of Melancholy in _L'Allegro_ and _Il
 Penseroso_.
 
 PAGE 142. l. 30. _cloudy_, mysteriously concealed, seen of few.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO HYPERION.
 
 This poem deals with the overthrow of the primaeval order of Gods by
 Jupiter, son of Saturn the old king. There are many versions of the
 fable in Greek mythology, and there are many sources from which it may
 have come to Keats. At school he is said to have known the classical
 dictionary by heart, but his inspiration is more likely to have been due
 to his later reading of the Elizabethan poets, and their translations of
 classic story. One thing is certain, that he did not confine himself to
 any one authority, nor did he consider it necessary to be circumscribed
 by authorities at all. He used, rather than followed, the Greek fable,
 dealing freely with it and giving it his own interpretation.
 
 The situation when the poem opens is as follows:--Saturn, king of the
 gods, has been driven from Olympus down into a deep dell, by his son
 Jupiter, who has seized and used his father's weapon, the thunderbolt. A
 similar fate has overtaken nearly all his brethren, who are called by
 Keats Titans and Giants indiscriminately, though in Greek mythology the
 two races are quite distinct. These Titans are the children of Tellus
 and Coelus, the earth and sky, thus representing, as it were, the first
 birth of form and personality from formless nature. Before the
 separation of earth and sky, Chaos, a confusion of the elements of all
 things, had reigned supreme. One only of the Titans, Hyperion the
 sun-god, still keeps his kingdom, and he is about to be superseded by
 young Apollo, the god of light and song.
 
 In the second book we hear Oceanus and Clymene his daughter tell how
 both were defeated not by battle or violence, but by the irresistible
 beauty of their dispossessors; and from this Oceanus deduces 'the
 eternal law, that first in beauty should be first in might'. He recalls
 the fact that Saturn himself was not the first ruler, but received his
 kingdom from his parents, the earth and sky, and he prophesies that
 progress will continue in the overthrow of Jove by a yet brighter and
 better order. Enceladus is, however, furious at what he considers a
 cowardly acceptance of their fate, and urges his brethren to resist.
 
 In Book I we saw Hyperion, though still a god, distressed by portents,
 and now in Book III we see the rise to divinity of his successor, the
 young Apollo. The poem breaks off short at the moment of Apollo's
 metamorphosis, and how Keats intended to complete it we can never know.
 
 It is certain that he originally meant to write an epic in ten books,
 and the publisher's remark[245:1] at the beginning of the 1820 volume
 would lead us to think that he was in the same mind when he wrote the
 poem. This statement, however, must be altogether discounted, as Keats,
 in his copy of the poems, crossed it right out and wrote above, 'I had
 no part in this; I was ill at the time.'
 
 Moreover, the last sentence (from 'but' to 'proceeding') he bracketed,
 writing below, 'This is a lie.'
 
 This, together with other evidence external and internal, has led Dr. de
 Selincourt to the conclusion that Keats had modified his plan and, when
 he was writing the poem, intended to conclude it in four books. Of the
 probable contents of the one-and-half unwritten books Mr. de Selincourt
 writes: 'I conceive that Apollo, now conscious of his divinity, would
 have gone to Olympus, heard from the lips of Jove of his newly-acquired
 supremacy, and been called upon by the rebel three to secure the kingdom
 that awaited him. He would have gone forth to meet Hyperion, who, struck
 by the power of supreme beauty, would have found resistance impossible.
 Critics have inclined to take for granted the supposition that an actual
 battle was contemplated by Keats, but I do not believe that such was, at
 least, his final intention. In the first place, he had the example of
 Milton, whom he was studying very closely, to warn him of its dangers;
 in the second, if Hyperion had been meant to fight he would hardly be
 represented as already, before the battle, shorn of much of his
 strength; thus making the victory of Apollo depend upon his enemy's
 unnatural weakness and not upon his own strength. One may add that a
 combat would have been completely alien to the whole idea of the poem as
 Keats conceived it, and as, in fact, it is universally interpreted from
 the speech of Oceanus in the second book. The resistance of Enceladus
 and the Giants, themselves rebels against an order already established,
 would have been dealt with summarily, and the poem would have closed
 with a description of the new age which had been inaugurated by the
 triumph of the Olympians, and, in particular, of Apollo the god of light
 and song.'
 
 The central idea, then, of the poem is that the new age triumphs over
 the old by virtue of its acknowledged superiority--that intellectual
 supremacy makes physical force feel its power and yield. Dignity and
 moral conquest lies, for the conquered, in the capacity to recognize the
 truth and look upon the inevitable undismayed.
 
 Keats broke the poem off because it was too 'Miltonic', and it is easy
 to see what he meant. Not only does the treatment of the subject recall
 that of _Paradise Lost_, the council of the fallen gods bearing special
 resemblance to that of the fallen angels in Book II of Milton's epic,
 but in its style and syntax the influence of Milton is everywhere
 apparent. It is to be seen in the restraint and concentration of the
 language, which is in marked contrast to the wordiness of Keats's early
 work, as well as in the constant use of classical constructions,[247:1]
 Miltonic inversions[247:2] and repetitions,[247:3] and in occasional
 reminiscences of actual lines and phrases in _Paradise Lost_.[247:4]
 
 In _Hyperion_ we see, too, the influence of the study of Greek
 sculpture upon Keats's mind and art. This study had taught him that the
 highest beauty is not incompatible with definiteness of form and
 clearness of detail. To his romantic appreciation of mystery was now
 added an equal sense of the importance of simplicity, form, and
 proportion, these being, from its nature, inevitable characteristics of
 the art of sculpture. So we see that again and again the figures
 described in _Hyperion_ are like great statues--clear-cut, massive, and
 motionless. Such are the pictures of Saturn and Thea in Book I, and of
 each of the group of Titans at the opening of Book II.
 
 Striking too is Keats's very Greek identification of the gods with the
 powers of Nature which they represent. It is this attitude of mind which
 has led some people--Shelley and Landor among them--to declare Keats, in
 spite of his ignorance of the language, the most truly Greek of all
 English poets. Very beautiful instances of this are the sunset and
 sunrise in Book I, when the departure of the sun-god and his return to
 earth are so described that the pictures we see are of an evening and
 morning sky, an angry sunset, and a grey and misty dawn.
 
 But neither Miltonic nor Greek is Keats's marvellous treatment of nature
 as he feels, and makes us feel, the magic of its mystery in such a
 picture as that of the
 
                                tall oaks
      Branch-charmed by the earnest stars,
 
 or of the
 
                             dismal cirque
      Of Druid stones, upon a forlorn moor,
      When the chill rain begins at shut of eve,
      In dull November, and their chancel vault,
      The heaven itself, is blinded throughout night.
 
 This Keats, and Keats alone, could do; and his achievement is unique in
 throwing all the glamour of romance over a fragment 'sublime as
 Aeschylus'.
 
 
 NOTES ON HYPERION.
 
 BOOK I.
 
 PAGE 145. ll. 2-3. By thus giving us a vivid picture of the changing
 day--at morning, noon, and night--Keats makes us realize the terrible
 loneliness and gloom of a place too deep to feel these changes.
 
 l. 10. See how the sense is expressed in the cadence of the line.
 
 PAGE 146. l. 11. _voiceless._ As if it felt and knew, and were
 deliberately silent.
 
 ll. 13, 14. Influence of Greek sculpture. See Introduction, p. 248.
 
 l. 18. _nerveless . . . dead._ Cf. _Eve of St. Agnes_, l. 12, note.
 
 l. 19. _realmless eyes._ The tragedy of his fall is felt in every
 feature.
 
 ll. 20, 21. _Earth, His ancient mother._ Tellus. See Introduction, p.
 244.
 
 PAGE 147. l. 27. _Amazon._ The Amazons were a warlike race of women of
 whom many traditions exist. On the frieze of the Mausoleum (British
 Museum) they are seen warring with the Centaurs.
 
 l. 30. _Ixion's wheel._ For insolence to Jove, Ixion was tied to an
 ever-revolving wheel in Hell.
 
 l. 31. _Memphian sphinx._ Memphis was a town in Egypt near to which the
 pyramids were built. A sphinx is a great stone image with human head and
 breast and the body of a lion.
 
 PAGE 148. ll. 60-3. The thunderbolts, being Jove's own weapons, are
 unwilling to be used against their former master.
 
 PAGE 149. l. 74. _branch-charmed . . . stars._ All the magic of the
 still night is here.
 
 ll. 76-8. _Save . . . wave._ See how the gust of wind comes and goes in
 the rise and fall of these lines, which begin and end on the same sound.
 
 PAGE 150. l. 86. See Introduction, p. 248.
 
 l. 94. _aspen-malady_, trembling like the leaves of the aspen-poplar.
 
 PAGE 151. ll. 98 seq. Cf. _King Lear_. Throughout the figure of
 Saturn--the old man robbed of his kingdom--reminds us of Lear, and
 sometimes we seem to detect actual reminiscences of Shakespeare's
 treatment. Cf. _Hyperion_, i. 98; and _King Lear_, I. iv. 248-52.
 
 l. 102. _front_, forehead.
 
 l. 105. _nervous_, used in its original sense of powerful, sinewy.
 
 ll. 107 seq. In Saturn's reign was the Golden Age.
 
 PAGE 152. l. 125. _of ripe progress_, near at hand.
 
 l. 129. _metropolitan_, around the chief city.
 
 l. 131. _strings in hollow shells._ The first stringed instruments were
 said to be made of tortoise-shells with strings stretched across.
 
 PAGE 153. l. 145. _chaos._ The confusion of elements from which the
 world was created. See _Paradise Lost_, i. 891-919.
 
 l. 147. _rebel three._ Jove, Neptune, and Pluto.
 
 PAGE 154. l. 152. _covert._ Cf. _Isabella_, l. 221; _Eve of St. Agnes_,
 l. 188.
 
 ll. 156-7. All the dignity and majesty of the goddess is in this
 comparison.
 
 PAGE 155. l. 171. _gloom-bird_, the owl, whose cry is supposed to
 portend death. Cf. Milton's method of description, 'Not that fair
 field,' etc. _Paradise Lost_, iv. 268.
 
 l. 172. _familiar visiting_, ghostly apparition.
 
 PAGE 157. ll. 205-8. Cf. the opening of the gates of heaven. _Paradise
 Lost_, vii. 205-7.
 
 ll. 213 seq. See Introduction, p. 248.
 
 PAGE 158. l. 228. _effigies_, visions.
 
 l. 230. _O . . . pools._ A picture of inimitable chilly horror.
 
 l. 238. _fanes._ Cf. _Psyche_, l. 50.
 
 PAGE 159. l. 246. _Tellus . . . robes_, the earth mantled by the salt
 sea.
 
 PAGE 160. ll. 274-7. _colure._ One of two great circles supposed to
 intersect at right angles at the poles. The nadir is the lowest point in
 the heavens and the zenith is the highest.
 
 PAGE 161. ll. 279-80. _with labouring . . . centuries._ By studying the
 sky for many hundreds of years wise men found there signs and symbols
 which they read and interpreted.
 
 PAGE 162. l. 298. _demesnes._ Cf. _Lamia_, ii. 155, note.
 
 ll. 302-4. _all along . . . faint._ As in l. 286, the god and the
 sunrise are indistinguishable to Keats. We see them both, and both in
 one. See Introduction, p. 248.
 
 l. 302. _rack_, a drifting mass of distant clouds. Cf. _Lamia_, i. 178,
 and _Tempest_, IV. i. 156.
 
 PAGE 163. ll. 311-12. _the powers . . . creating._ Coelus and Terra (or
 Tellus), the sky and earth.
 
 PAGE 164. l. 345. _Before . . . murmur._ Before the string is drawn
 tight to let the arrow fly.
 
 PAGE 165. l. 349. _region-whisper_, whisper from the wide air.
 
 BOOK II.
 
 PAGE 167. l. 4. _Cybele_, the wife of Saturn.
 
 PAGE 168. l. 17. _stubborn'd_, made strong, a characteristic coinage of
 Keats, after the Elizabethan manner; cf. _Romeo and Juliet_, IV. i. 16.
 
 ll. 22 seq. Cf. i. 161.
 
 l. 28. _gurge_, whirlpool.
 
 PAGE 169. l. 35. _Of . . . moor_, suggested by Druid stones near
 Keswick.
 
 l. 37. _chancel vault._ As if they stood in a great temple domed by the
 sky.
 
 PAGE 171. l. 66. _Shadow'd_, literally and also metaphorically, in the
 darkness of his wrath.
 
 l. 70. _that second war._ An indication that Keats did not intend to
 recount this 'second war'; it is not likely that he would have
 forestalled its chief incident.
 
 l. 78. _Ops_, the same as Cybele.
 
 l. 79. _No shape distinguishable._ Cf. _Paradise Lost_, ii. 666-8.
 
 PAGE 172. l. 97. _mortal_, making him mortal.
 
 l. 98. _A disanointing poison_, taking away his kingship and his
 godhead.
 
 PAGE 173. ll. 116-17. _There is . . . voice._ Cf. i. 72-8. The
 mysterious grandeur of the wind in the trees, whether in calm or storm.
 
 PAGE 174. ll. 133-5. _that old . . . darkness._ Uranus was the same as
 Coelus, the god of the sky. The 'book' is the sky, from which ancient
 sages drew their lore. Cf. i. 277-80.
 
 PAGE 175. l. 153. _palpable_, having material existence; literally,
 touchable.
 
 PAGE 176. l. 159. _unseen parent dear._ Coelus, since the air is
 invisible.
 
 l. 168. _no . . . grove._ 'Sophist and sage' suggests the philosophers
 of ancient Greece.
 
 l. 170. _locks not oozy._ Cf. _Lycidas_, l. 175, 'oozy locks'. This use
 of the negative is a reminiscence of Milton.
 
 ll. 171-2. _murmurs . . . sands._ In this description of the god's
 utterance is the whole spirit of the element which he personifies.
 
 PAGE 177. ll. 182-7. Wise as Saturn was, the greatness of his power had
 prevented him from realizing that he was neither the beginning nor the
 end, but a link in the chain of progress.
 
 PAGE 178. ll. 203-5. In their hour of downfall a new dominion is
 revealed to them--a dominion of the soul which rules so long as it is
 not afraid to see and know.
 
 l. 207. _though once chiefs._ Though Chaos and Darkness once had the
 sovereignty. From Chaos and Darkness developed Heaven and Earth, and
 from them the Titans in all their glory and power. Now from them
 develops the new order of Gods, surpassing them in beauty as they
 surpassed their parents.
 
 PAGE 180. ll. 228-9. The key of the whole situation.
 
 ll. 237-41. No fight has taken place. The god has seen his doom and
 accepted the inevitable.
 
 PAGE 181. l. 244. _poz'd_, settled, firm.
 
 PAGE 183. l. 284. _Like . . . string._ In this expressive line we hear
 the quick patter of the beads. Clymene has had much the same experience
 as Oceanus, though she does not philosophize upon it. She has succumbed
 to the beauty of her successor.
 
 PAGE 184. ll. 300-7. We feel the great elemental nature of the Titans in
 these powerful similes.
 
 l. 310. _Giant-Gods?_ In the edition of 1820 printed 'giant, Gods?' Mr.
 Forman suggested the above emendation, which has since been discovered
 to be the true MS. reading.
 
 PAGE 185. l. 328. _purge the ether_, clear the air.
 
 l. 331. As if Jove's appearance of strength were a deception, masking
 his real weakness.
 
 PAGE 186. l. 339. Cf. i. 328-35, ii. 96.
 
 ll. 346-56. As the silver wings of dawn preceded Hyperion's rising so
 now a silver light heralds his approach.
 
 PAGE 187. l. 357. See how the light breaks in with this line.
 
 l. 366. _and made it terrible._ There is no joy in the light which
 reveals such terrors.
 
 PAGE 188. l. 374. _Memnon's image._ Memnon was a famous king of Egypt
 who was killed in the Trojan war. His people erected a wonderful statue
 to his memory, which uttered a melodious sound at dawn, when the sun
 fell on it. At sunset it uttered a sad sound.
 
 l. 375. _dusking East._ Since the light fades first from the eastern
 sky.
 
 BOOK III.
 
 PAGE 191. l. 9. _bewildered shores._ The attribute of the wanderer
 transferred to the shore. Cf. _Nightingale_, ll. 14, 67.
 
 l. 10. _Delphic._ At Delphi worship was given to Apollo, the inventor
 and god of music.
 
 PAGE 192. l. 12. _Dorian._ There were several 'modes' in Greek music, of
 which the chief were Dorian, Phrygian, and Lydian. Each was supposed to
 possess certain definite ethical characteristics. Dorian music was
 martial and manly. Cf. _Paradise Lost_, i. 549-53.
 
 l. 13. _Father of all verse._ Apollo, the god of light and song.
 
 ll. 18-19. _Let the red . . . well._ Cf. _Nightingale_, st. 2.
 
 l. 19. _faint-lipp'd._ Cf. ii. 270, 'mouthed shell.'
 
 l. 23. _Cyclades._ Islands in the Aegean sea, so called because they
 surrounded Delos in a circle.
 
 l. 24. _Delos_, the island where Apollo was born.
 
 PAGE 193. l. 31. _mother fair_, Leto (Latona).
 
 l. 32. _twin-sister_, Artemis (Diana).
 
 l. 40. _murmurous . . . waves._ We hear their soft breaking.
 
 PAGE 196. ll. 81-2. Cf. _Lamia_, i. 75.
 
 l. 82. _Mnemosyne_, daughter of Coelus and Terra, and mother of the
 Muses. Her name signifies Memory.
 
 l. 86. Cf. _Samson Agonistes_, ll. 80-2.
 
 l. 87. Cf. _Merchant of Venice_, I. i. 1-7.
 
 l. 92. _liegeless_, independent--acknowledging no allegiance.
 
 l. 93. _aspirant_, ascending. The air will not bear him up.
 
 PAGE 197. l. 98. _patient . . . moon._ Cf. i. 353, 'patient stars.'
 Their still, steady light.
 
 l. 113. So Apollo reaches his divinity--by knowledge which includes
 experience of human suffering--feeling 'the giant-agony of the world'.
 
 PAGE 198. l. 114. _gray_, hoary with antiquity.
 
 l. 128. _immortal death._ Cf. Swinburne's _Garden of Proserpine_, st. 7.
 
      Who gathers all things mortal
      With cold immortal hands.
 
 PAGE 199. l. 136. Filled in, in pencil, in a transcript of _Hyperion_ by
 Keats's friend Richard Woodhouse--
 
      Glory dawn'd, he was a god.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [245:1] 'If any apology be thought necessary for the appearance of the
 unfinished poem of Hyperion, the publishers beg to state that they alone
 are responsible, as it was printed at their particular request, and
 contrary to the wish of the author. The poem was intended to have been
 of equal length with Endymion, but the reception given to that work
 discouraged the author from proceeding.'
 
 [247:1]
 
      e.g.  i.  56 Knows thee not, thus afflicted, for a god
            i. 206 save what solemn tubes . . . gave
           ii.  70             that second war
                   Not long delayed.
 
 [247:2]
 
      e.g. ii.   8 torrents hoarse
                32 covert drear
            i. 265 season due
               286 plumes immense
 
 [247:3]
 
      e.g.  i.       35 How beautiful . . . self
                    182 While sometimes . . . wondering men
           ii. 116, 122 Such noise . . . pines.
 
 [247:4] e.g. ii. 79 No shape distinguishable. Cf. _Paradise Lost_, ii.
 667.
 
 i. 2 breath of morn. Cf. _Paradise Lost_, iv. 641.
 
 
 HENRY FROWDE, M.A.
 PUBLISHER TO THE UNIVERSITY OF OXFORD
 LONDON, EDINBURGH, NEW YORK, TORONTO AND MELBOURNE
 
 
 
   *      *      *      *      *      *      *
 
 
 
 TRANSCRIBER'S NOTES:
 
 
 Line numbers are placed every ten lines. In the original, due to space
 constraints, this is not always the case.
 
 On page 237, the note for l. 25 refers to "_Lamia_, i. 9, note". There
 is no such note.
 
 The following words appear with and without hyphens. They have been left
 as in the original.
 
      bed-side           bedside
      church-yard        churchyard
      death-bell         deathbell
      demi-god           demigod
      no-where           nowhere
      re-united          reunited
      sun-rise           sunrise
      under-grove        undergrove
      under-song         undersong
 
 The following words have variations in spelling. They have been left as
 in the original.
 
      AEolian             Aeolian
      Amaz'd             Amazed
      branch-charmed     Branch-charmed
      faery              fairy
      should'st          shouldst
      splendor           splendour
 
 The following words use an oe ligature in the poems but not in the notes
 section.
 
      Coeus
      Coelus
      Phoebe             Phoebe's           Phoebean
      Phoenician
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Michael Roe and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ENDYMION:
 
 A Poetic Romance.
 
 
 BY JOHN KEATS.
 
 "THE STRETCHED METRE OF AN ANTIQUE SONG."
 
 LONDON:
 PRINTED FOR TAYLOR AND HESSEY,
 93, FLEET STREET.
 1818.
 
 INSCRIBED TO THE MEMORY OF THOMAS CHATTERTON.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 Knowing within myself the manner in which this Poem has been
 produced, it is not without a feeling of regret that I make it
 public.
 
 What manner I mean, will be quite clear to the reader, who must soon
 perceive great inexperience, immaturity, and every error denoting a
 feverish attempt, rather than a deed accomplished. The two first
 books, and indeed the two last, I feel sensible are not of such
 completion as to warrant their passing the press; nor should they if
 I thought a year's castigation would do them any good;--it will not:
 the foundations are too sandy. It is just that this youngster should
 die away: a sad thought for me, if I had not some hope that while it
 is dwindling I may be plotting, and fitting myself for verses fit to
 live.
 
 This may be speaking too presumptuously, and may deserve a
 punishment: but no feeling man will be forward to inflict it: he will
 leave me alone, with the conviction that there is not a fiercer hell
 than the failure in a great object. This is not written with the
 least atom of purpose to forestall criticisms of course, but from the
 desire I have to conciliate men who are competent to look, and who do
 look with a zealous eye, to the honour of English literature.
 
 The imagination of a boy is healthy, and the mature imagination of a
 man is healthy; but there is a space of life between, in which the
 soul is in a ferment, the character undecided, the way of life
 uncertain, the ambition thick-sighted: thence proceeds mawkishness,
 and all the thousand bitters which those men I speak of must
 necessarily taste in going over the following pages.
 
 I hope I have not in too late a day touched the beautiful mythology
 of Greece, and dulled its brightness: for I wish to try once more,
 before I bid it farewel.
 
   _Teignmouth,
   April 10, 1818._
 
 
 
 
 ERRATUM.
 
 
 Page 108, line 4 from the bottom, for "her" read "his."
 
 
 
 
 ENDYMION.
 
 BOOK I.
 
 
   A thing of beauty is a joy for ever:
   Its loveliness increases; it will never
   Pass into nothingness; but still will keep
   A bower quiet for us, and a sleep
   Full of sweet dreams, and health, and quiet breathing.
   Therefore, on every morrow, are we wreathing
   A flowery band to bind us to the earth,
   Spite of despondence, of the inhuman dearth
   Of noble natures, of the gloomy days,
   Of all the unhealthy and o'er-darkened ways                    10
   Made for our searching: yes, in spite of all,
   Some shape of beauty moves away the pall
   From our dark spirits. Such the sun, the moon,
   Trees old and young, sprouting a shady boon
   For simple sheep; and such are daffodils
   With the green world they live in; and clear rills
   That for themselves a cooling covert make
   'Gainst the hot season; the mid forest brake,
   Rich with a sprinkling of fair musk-rose blooms:
   And such too is the grandeur of the dooms                      20
   We have imagined for the mighty dead;
   All lovely tales that we have heard or read:
   An endless fountain of immortal drink,
   Pouring unto us from the heaven's brink.
 
     Nor do we merely feel these essences
   For one short hour; no, even as the trees
   That whisper round a temple become soon
   Dear as the temple's self, so does the moon,
   The passion poesy, glories infinite,
   Haunt us till they become a cheering light                     30
   Unto our souls, and bound to us so fast,
   That, whether there be shine, or gloom o'ercast,
   They alway must be with us, or we die.
 
     Therefore, 'tis with full happiness that I
   Will trace the story of Endymion.
   The very music of the name has gone
   Into my being, and each pleasant scene
   Is growing fresh before me as the green
   Of our own vallies: so I will begin
   Now while I cannot hear the city's din;                        40
   Now while the early budders are just new,
   And run in mazes of the youngest hue
   About old forests; while the willow trails
   Its delicate amber; and the dairy pails
   Bring home increase of milk. And, as the year
   Grows lush in juicy stalks, I'll smoothly steer
   My little boat, for many quiet hours,
   With streams that deepen freshly into bowers.
   Many and many a verse I hope to write,
   Before the daisies, vermeil rimm'd and white,                  50
   Hide in deep herbage; and ere yet the bees
   Hum about globes of clover and sweet peas,
   I must be near the middle of my story.
   O may no wintry season, bare and hoary,
   See it half finished: but let Autumn bold,
   With universal tinge of sober gold,
   Be all about me when I make an end.
   And now at once, adventuresome, I send
   My herald thought into a wilderness:
   There let its trumpet blow, and quickly dress                  60
   My uncertain path with green, that I may speed
   Easily onward, thorough flowers and weed.
 
     Upon the sides of Latmos was outspread
   A mighty forest; for the moist earth fed
   So plenteously all weed-hidden roots
   Into o'er-hanging boughs, and precious fruits.
   And it had gloomy shades, sequestered deep,
   Where no man went; and if from shepherd's keep
   A lamb strayed far a-down those inmost glens,
   Never again saw he the happy pens                              70
   Whither his brethren, bleating with content,
   Over the hills at every nightfall went.
   Among the shepherds, 'twas believed ever,
   That not one fleecy lamb which thus did sever
   From the white flock, but pass'd unworried
   By angry wolf, or pard with prying head,
   Until it came to some unfooted plains
   Where fed the herds of Pan: ay great his gains
   Who thus one lamb did lose. Paths there were many,
   Winding through palmy fern, and rushes fenny,                  80
   And ivy banks; all leading pleasantly
   To a wide lawn, whence one could only see
   Stems thronging all around between the swell
   Of turf and slanting branches: who could tell
   The freshness of the space of heaven above,
   Edg'd round with dark tree tops? through which a dove
   Would often beat its wings, and often too
   A little cloud would move across the blue.
 
     Full in the middle of this pleasantness
   There stood a marble altar, with a tress                       90
   Of flowers budded newly; and the dew
   Had taken fairy phantasies to strew
   Daisies upon the sacred sward last eve,
   And so the dawned light in pomp receive.
   For 'twas the morn: Apollo's upward fire
   Made every eastern cloud a silvery pyre
   Of brightness so unsullied, that therein
   A melancholy spirit well might win
   Oblivion, and melt out his essence fine
   Into the winds: rain-scented eglantine                        100
   Gave temperate sweets to that well-wooing sun;
   The lark was lost in him; cold springs had run
   To warm their chilliest bubbles in the grass;
   Man's voice was on the mountains; and the mass
   Of nature's lives and wonders puls'd tenfold,
   To feel this sun-rise and its glories old.
 
     Now while the silent workings of the dawn
   Were busiest, into that self-same lawn
   All suddenly, with joyful cries, there sped
   A troop of little children garlanded;                         110
   Who gathering round the altar, seemed to pry
   Earnestly round as wishing to espy
   Some folk of holiday: nor had they waited
   For many moments, ere their ears were sated
   With a faint breath of music, which ev'n then
   Fill'd out its voice, and died away again.
   Within a little space again it gave
   Its airy swellings, with a gentle wave,
   To light-hung leaves, in smoothest echoes breaking
   Through copse-clad vallies,--ere their death, o'ertaking
   The surgy murmurs of the lonely sea.                          121
 
     And now, as deep into the wood as we
   Might mark a lynx's eye, there glimmered light
   Fair faces and a rush of garments white,
   Plainer and plainer shewing, till at last
   Into the widest alley they all past,
   Making directly for the woodland altar.
   O kindly muse! let not my weak tongue faulter
   In telling of this goodly company,
   Of their old piety, and of their glee:                        130
   But let a portion of ethereal dew
   Fall on my head, and presently unmew
   My soul; that I may dare, in wayfaring,
   To stammer where old Chaucer used to sing.
 
     Leading the way, young damsels danced along,
   Bearing the burden of a shepherd song;
   Each having a white wicker over brimm'd
   With April's tender younglings: next, well trimm'd,
   A crowd of shepherds with as sunburnt looks
   As may be read of in Arcadian books;                          140
   Such as sat listening round Apollo's pipe,
   When the great deity, for earth too ripe,
   Let his divinity o'er-flowing die
   In music, through the vales of Thessaly:
   Some idly trailed their sheep-hooks on the ground,
   And some kept up a shrilly mellow sound
   With ebon-tipped flutes: close after these,
   Now coming from beneath the forest trees,
   A venerable priest full soberly,
   Begirt with ministring looks: alway his eye                   150
   Stedfast upon the matted turf he kept,
   And after him his sacred vestments swept.
   From his right hand there swung a vase, milk-white,
   Of mingled wine, out-sparkling generous light;
   And in his left he held a basket full
   Of all sweet herbs that searching eye could cull:
   Wild thyme, and valley-lilies whiter still
   Than Leda's love, and cresses from the rill.
   His aged head, crowned with beechen wreath,
   Seem'd like a poll of ivy in the teeth                        160
   Of winter hoar. Then came another crowd
   Of shepherds, lifting in due time aloud
   Their share of the ditty. After them appear'd,
   Up-followed by a multitude that rear'd
   Their voices to the clouds, a fair wrought car,
   Easily rolling so as scarce to mar
   The freedom of three steeds of dapple brown:
   Who stood therein did seem of great renown
   Among the throng. His youth was fully blown,
   Shewing like Ganymede to manhood grown;                       170
   And, for those simple times, his garments were
   A chieftain king's: beneath his breast, half bare,
   Was hung a silver bugle, and between
   His nervy knees there lay a boar-spear keen.
   A smile was on his countenance; he seem'd,
   To common lookers on, like one who dream'd
   Of idleness in groves Elysian:
   But there were some who feelingly could scan
   A lurking trouble in his nether lip,
   And see that oftentimes the reins would slip                  180
   Through his forgotten hands: then would they sigh,
   And think of yellow leaves, of owlets cry,
   Of logs piled solemnly.--Ah, well-a-day,
   Why should our young Endymion pine away!
 
     Soon the assembly, in a circle rang'd,
   Stood silent round the shrine: each look was chang'd
   To sudden veneration: women meek
   Beckon'd their sons to silence; while each cheek
   Of virgin bloom paled gently for slight fear.
   Endymion too, without a forest peer,                          190
   Stood, wan, and pale, and with an awed face,
   Among his brothers of the mountain chase.
   In midst of all, the venerable priest
   Eyed them with joy from greatest to the least,
   And, after lifting up his aged hands,
   Thus spake he: "Men of Latmos! shepherd bands!
   Whose care it is to guard a thousand flocks:
   Whether descended from beneath the rocks
   That overtop your mountains; whether come
   From vallies where the pipe is never dumb;                    200
   Or from your swelling downs, where sweet air stirs
   Blue hare-bells lightly, and where prickly furze
   Buds lavish gold; or ye, whose precious charge
   Nibble their fill at ocean's very marge,
   Whose mellow reeds are touch'd with sounds forlorn
   By the dim echoes of old Triton's horn:
   Mothers and wives! who day by day prepare
   The scrip, with needments, for the mountain air;
   And all ye gentle girls who foster up
   Udderless lambs, and in a little cup                          210
   Will put choice honey for a favoured youth:
   Yea, every one attend! for in good truth
   Our vows are wanting to our great god Pan.
   Are not our lowing heifers sleeker than
   Night-swollen mushrooms? Are not our wide plains
   Speckled with countless fleeces? Have not rains
   Green'd over April's lap? No howling sad
   Sickens our fearful ewes; and we have had
   Great bounty from Endymion our lord.
   The earth is glad: the merry lark has pour'd                  220
   His early song against yon breezy sky,
   That spreads so clear o'er our solemnity."
 
     Thus ending, on the shrine he heap'd a spire
   Of teeming sweets, enkindling sacred fire;
   Anon he stain'd the thick and spongy sod
   With wine, in honour of the shepherd-god.
   Now while the earth was drinking it, and while
   Bay leaves were crackling in the fragrant pile,
   And gummy frankincense was sparkling bright
   'Neath smothering parsley, and a hazy light                   230
   Spread greyly eastward, thus a chorus sang:
 
     "O THOU, whose mighty palace roof doth hang
   From jagged trunks, and overshadoweth
   Eternal whispers, glooms, the birth, life, death
   Of unseen flowers in heavy peacefulness;
   Who lov'st to see the hamadryads dress
   Their ruffled locks where meeting hazels darken;
   And through whole solemn hours dost sit, and hearken
   The dreary melody of bedded reeds--
   In desolate places, where dank moisture breeds                240
   The pipy hemlock to strange overgrowth;
   Bethinking thee, how melancholy loth
   Thou wast to lose fair Syrinx--do thou now,
   By thy love's milky brow!
   By all the trembling mazes that she ran,
   Hear us, great Pan!
 
     "O thou, for whose soul-soothing quiet, turtles
   Passion their voices cooingly 'mong myrtles,
   What time thou wanderest at eventide
   Through sunny meadows, that outskirt the side                 250
   Of thine enmossed realms: O thou, to whom
   Broad leaved fig trees even now foredoom
   Their ripen'd fruitage; yellow girted bees
   Their golden honeycombs; our village leas
   Their fairest blossom'd beans and poppied corn;
   The chuckling linnet its five young unborn,
   To sing for thee; low creeping strawberries
   Their summer coolness; pent up butterflies
   Their freckled wings; yea, the fresh budding year
   All its completions--be quickly near,                         260
   By every wind that nods the mountain pine,
   O forester divine!
 
     "Thou, to whom every fawn and satyr flies
   For willing service; whether to surprise
   The squatted hare while in half sleeping fit;
   Or upward ragged precipices flit
   To save poor lambkins from the eagle's maw;
   Or by mysterious enticement draw
   Bewildered shepherds to their path again;
   Or to tread breathless round the frothy main,                 270
   And gather up all fancifullest shells
   For thee to tumble into Naiads' cells,
   And, being hidden, laugh at their out-peeping;
   Or to delight thee with fantastic leaping,
   The while they pelt each other on the crown
   With silvery oak apples, and fir cones brown--
   By all the echoes that about thee ring,
   Hear us, O satyr king!
 
     "O Hearkener to the loud clapping shears,
   While ever and anon to his shorn peers                        280
   A ram goes bleating: Winder of the horn,
   When snouted wild-boars routing tender corn
   Anger our huntsman: Breather round our farms,
   To keep off mildews, and all weather harms:
   Strange ministrant of undescribed sounds,
   That come a swooning over hollow grounds,
   And wither drearily on barren moors:
   Dread opener of the mysterious doors
   Leading to universal knowledge--see,
   Great son of Dryope,                                          290
   The many that are come to pay their vows
   With leaves about their brows!
 
     Be still the unimaginable lodge
   For solitary thinkings; such as dodge
   Conception to the very bourne of heaven,
   Then leave the naked brain: be still the leaven,
   That spreading in this dull and clodded earth
   Gives it a touch ethereal--a new birth:
   Be still a symbol of immensity;
   A firmament reflected in a sea;                               300
   An element filling the space between;
   An unknown--but no more: we humbly screen
   With uplift hands our foreheads, lowly bending,
   And giving out a shout most heaven rending,
   Conjure thee to receive our humble Paean,
   Upon thy Mount Lycean!
 
     Even while they brought the burden to a close,
   A shout from the whole multitude arose,
   That lingered in the air like dying rolls
   Of abrupt thunder, when Ionian shoals                         310
   Of dolphins bob their noses through the brine.
   Meantime, on shady levels, mossy fine,
   Young companies nimbly began dancing
   To the swift treble pipe, and humming string.
   Aye, those fair living forms swam heavenly
   To tunes forgotten--out of memory:
   Fair creatures! whose young childrens' children bred
   Thermopylae its heroes--not yet dead,
   But in old marbles ever beautiful.
   High genitors, unconscious did they cull                      320
   Time's sweet first-fruits--they danc'd to weariness,
   And then in quiet circles did they press
   The hillock turf, and caught the latter end
   Of some strange history, potent to send
   A young mind from its bodily tenement.
   Or they might watch the quoit-pitchers, intent
   On either side; pitying the sad death
   Of Hyacinthus, when the cruel breath
   Of Zephyr slew him,--Zephyr penitent,
   Who now, ere Phoebus mounts the firmament,                     330
   Fondles the flower amid the sobbing rain.
   The archers too, upon a wider plain,
   Beside the feathery whizzing of the shaft,
   And the dull twanging bowstring, and the raft
   Branch down sweeping from a tall ash top,
   Call'd up a thousand thoughts to envelope
   Those who would watch. Perhaps, the trembling knee
   And frantic gape of lonely Niobe,
   Poor, lonely Niobe! when her lovely young
   Were dead and gone, and her caressing tongue                  340
   Lay a lost thing upon her paly lip,
   And very, very deadliness did nip
   Her motherly cheeks. Arous'd from this sad mood
   By one, who at a distance loud halloo'd,
   Uplifting his strong bow into the air,
   Many might after brighter visions stare:
   After the Argonauts, in blind amaze
   Tossing about on Neptune's restless ways,
   Until, from the horizon's vaulted side,
   There shot a golden splendour far and wide,                   350
   Spangling those million poutings of the brine
   With quivering ore: 'twas even an awful shine
   From the exaltation of Apollo's bow;
   A heavenly beacon in their dreary woe.
   Who thus were ripe for high contemplating,
   Might turn their steps towards the sober ring
   Where sat Endymion and the aged priest
   'Mong shepherds gone in eld, whose looks increas'd
   The silvery setting of their mortal star.
   There they discours'd upon the fragile bar                    360
   That keeps us from our homes ethereal;
   And what our duties there: to nightly call
   Vesper, the beauty-crest of summer weather;
   To summon all the downiest clouds together
   For the sun's purple couch; to emulate
   In ministring the potent rule of fate
   With speed of fire-tailed exhalations;
   To tint her pallid cheek with bloom, who cons
   Sweet poesy by moonlight: besides these,
   A world of other unguess'd offices.                           370
   Anon they wander'd, by divine converse,
   Into Elysium; vieing to rehearse
   Each one his own anticipated bliss.
   One felt heart-certain that he could not miss
   His quick gone love, among fair blossom'd boughs,
   Where every zephyr-sigh pouts, and endows
   Her lips with music for the welcoming.
   Another wish'd, mid that eternal spring,
   To meet his rosy child, with feathery sails,
   Sweeping, eye-earnestly, through almond vales:                380
   Who, suddenly, should stoop through the smooth wind,
   And with the balmiest leaves his temples bind;
   And, ever after, through those regions be
   His messenger, his little Mercury,
   Some were athirst in soul to see again
   Their fellow huntsmen o'er the wide champaign
   In times long past; to sit with them, and talk
   Of all the chances in their earthly walk;
   Comparing, joyfully, their plenteous stores
   Of happiness, to when upon the moors,                         390
   Benighted, close they huddled from the cold,
   And shar'd their famish'd scrips. Thus all out-told
   Their fond imaginations,--saving him
   Whose eyelids curtain'd up their jewels dim,
   Endymion: yet hourly had he striven
   To hide the cankering venom, that had riven
   His fainting recollections. Now indeed
   His senses had swoon'd off: he did not heed
   The sudden silence, or the whispers low,
   Or the old eyes dissolving at his woe,                        400
   Or anxious calls, or close of trembling palms,
   Or maiden's sigh, that grief itself embalms:
   But in the self-same fixed trance he kept,
   Like one who on the earth had never slept.
   Aye, even as dead-still as a marble man,
   Frozen in that old tale Arabian.
 
     Who whispers him so pantingly and close?
   Peona, his sweet sister: of all those,
   His friends, the dearest. Hushing signs she made,
   And breath'd a sister's sorrow to persuade                    410
   A yielding up, a cradling on her care.
   Her eloquence did breathe away the curse:
   She led him, like some midnight spirit nurse
   Of happy changes in emphatic dreams,
   Along a path between two little streams,--
   Guarding his forehead, with her round elbow,
   From low-grown branches, and his footsteps slow
   From stumbling over stumps and hillocks small;
   Until they came to where these streamlets fall,
   With mingled bubblings and a gentle rush,                     420
   Into a river, clear, brimful, and flush
   With crystal mocking of the trees and sky.
   A little shallop, floating there hard by,
   Pointed its beak over the fringed bank;
   And soon it lightly dipt, and rose, and sank,
   And dipt again, with the young couple's weight,--
   Peona guiding, through the water straight,
   Towards a bowery island opposite;
   Which gaining presently, she steered light
   Into a shady, fresh, and ripply cove,                         430
   Where nested was an arbour, overwove
   By many a summer's silent fingering;
   To whose cool bosom she was used to bring
   Her playmates, with their needle broidery,
   And minstrel memories of times gone by.
 
     So she was gently glad to see him laid
   Under her favourite bower's quiet shade,
   On her own couch, new made of flower leaves,
   Dried carefully on the cooler side of sheaves
   When last the sun his autumn tresses shook,                   440
   And the tann'd harvesters rich armfuls took.
   Soon was he quieted to slumbrous rest:
   But, ere it crept upon him, he had prest
   Peona's busy hand against his lips,
   And still, a sleeping, held her finger-tips
   In tender pressure. And as a willow keeps
   A patient watch over the stream that creeps
   Windingly by it, so the quiet maid
   Held her in peace: so that a whispering blade
   Of grass, a wailful gnat, a bee bustling                      450
   Down in the blue-bells, or a wren light rustling
   Among sere leaves and twigs, might all be heard.
 
     O magic sleep! O comfortable bird,
   That broodest o'er the troubled sea of the mind
   Till it is hush'd and smooth! O unconfin'd
   Restraint! imprisoned liberty! great key
   To golden palaces, strange minstrelsy,
   Fountains grotesque, new trees, bespangled caves,
   Echoing grottos, full of tumbling waves
   And moonlight; aye, to all the mazy world                     460
   Of silvery enchantment!--who, upfurl'd
   Beneath thy drowsy wing a triple hour,
   But renovates and lives?--Thus, in the bower,
   Endymion was calm'd to life again.
   Opening his eyelids with a healthier brain,
   He said: "I feel this thine endearing love
   All through my bosom: thou art as a dove
   Trembling its closed eyes and sleeked wings
   About me; and the pearliest dew not brings
   Such morning incense from the fields of May,                  470
   As do those brighter drops that twinkling stray
   From those kind eyes,--the very home and haunt
   Of sisterly affection. Can I want
   Aught else, aught nearer heaven, than such tears?
   Yet dry them up, in bidding hence all fears
   That, any longer, I will pass my days
   Alone and sad. No, I will once more raise
   My voice upon the mountain-heights; once more
   Make my horn parley from their foreheads hoar:
   Again my trooping hounds their tongues shall loll             480
   Around the breathed boar: again I'll poll
   The fair-grown yew tree, for a chosen bow:
   And, when the pleasant sun is getting low,
   Again I'll linger in a sloping mead
   To hear the speckled thrushes, and see feed
   Our idle sheep. So be thou cheered sweet,
   And, if thy lute is here, softly intreat
   My soul to keep in its resolved course."
 
     Hereat Peona, in their silver source,
   Shut her pure sorrow drops with glad exclaim,                 490
   And took a lute, from which there pulsing came
   A lively prelude, fashioning the way
   In which her voice should wander. 'Twas a lay
   More subtle cadenced, more forest wild
   Than Dryope's lone lulling of her child;
   And nothing since has floated in the air
   So mournful strange. Surely some influence rare
   Went, spiritual, through the damsel's hand;
   For still, with Delphic emphasis, she spann'd
   The quick invisible strings, even though she saw              500
   Endymion's spirit melt away and thaw
   Before the deep intoxication.
   But soon she came, with sudden burst, upon
   Her self-possession--swung the lute aside,
   And earnestly said: "Brother, 'tis vain to hide
   That thou dost know of things mysterious,
   Immortal, starry; such alone could thus
   Weigh down thy nature. Hast thou sinn'd in aught
   Offensive to the heavenly powers? Caught
   A Paphian dove upon a message sent?                           510
   Thy deathful bow against some deer-herd bent,
   Sacred to Dian? Haply, thou hast seen
   Her naked limbs among the alders green;
   And that, alas! is death. No, I can trace
   Something more high perplexing in thy face!"
 
     Endymion look'd at her, and press'd her hand,
   And said, "Art thou so pale, who wast so bland
   And merry in our meadows? How is this?
   Tell me thine ailment: tell me all amiss!--
   Ah! thou hast been unhappy at the change                      520
   Wrought suddenly in me. What indeed more strange?
   Or more complete to overwhelm surmise?
   Ambition is no sluggard: 'tis no prize,
   That toiling years would put within my grasp,
   That I have sigh'd for: with so deadly gasp
   No man e'er panted for a mortal love.
   So all have set my heavier grief above
   These things which happen. Rightly have they done:
   I, who still saw the horizontal sun
   Heave his broad shoulder o'er the edge of the world,          530
   Out-facing Lucifer, and then had hurl'd
   My spear aloft, as signal for the chace--
   I, who, for very sport of heart, would race
   With my own steed from Araby; pluck down
   A vulture from his towery perching; frown
   A lion into growling, loth retire--
   To lose, at once, all my toil breeding fire,
   And sink thus low! but I will ease my breast
   Of secret grief, here in this bowery nest.
 
     "This river does not see the naked sky,                     540
   Till it begins to progress silverly
   Around the western border of the wood,
   Whence, from a certain spot, its winding flood
   Seems at the distance like a crescent moon:
   And in that nook, the very pride of June,
   Had I been used to pass my weary eves;
   The rather for the sun unwilling leaves
   So dear a picture of his sovereign power,
   And I could witness his most kingly hour,
   When he doth lighten up the golden reins,                     550
   And paces leisurely down amber plains
   His snorting four. Now when his chariot last
   Its beams against the zodiac-lion cast,
   There blossom'd suddenly a magic bed
   Of sacred ditamy, and poppies red:
   At which I wondered greatly, knowing well
   That but one night had wrought this flowery spell;
   And, sitting down close by, began to muse
   What it might mean. Perhaps, thought I, Morpheus,
   In passing here, his owlet pinions shook;                     560
   Or, it may be, ere matron Night uptook
   Her ebon urn, young Mercury, by stealth,
   Had dipt his rod in it: such garland wealth
   Came not by common growth. Thus on I thought,
   Until my head was dizzy and distraught.
   Moreover, through the dancing poppies stole
   A breeze, most softly lulling to my soul;
   And shaping visions all about my sight
   Of colours, wings, and bursts of spangly light;
   The which became more strange, and strange, and dim,
   And then were gulph'd in a tumultuous swim:                   571
   And then I fell asleep. Ah, can I tell
   The enchantment that afterwards befel?
   Yet it was but a dream: yet such a dream
   That never tongue, although it overteem
   With mellow utterance, like a cavern spring,
   Could figure out and to conception bring
   All I beheld and felt. Methought I lay
   Watching the zenith, where the milky way
   Among the stars in virgin splendour pours;                    580
   And travelling my eye, until the doors
   Of heaven appear'd to open for my flight,
   I became loth and fearful to alight
   From such high soaring by a downward glance:
   So kept me stedfast in that airy trance,
   Spreading imaginary pinions wide.
   When, presently, the stars began to glide,
   And faint away, before my eager view:
   At which I sigh'd that I could not pursue,
   And dropt my vision to the horizon's verge;                   590
   And lo! from opening clouds, I saw emerge
   The loveliest moon, that ever silver'd o'er
   A shell for Neptune's goblet: she did soar
   So passionately bright, my dazzled soul
   Commingling with her argent spheres did roll
   Through clear and cloudy, even when she went
   At last into a dark and vapoury tent--
   Whereat, methought, the lidless-eyed train
   Of planets all were in the blue again.
   To commune with those orbs, once more I rais'd                600
   My sight right upward: but it was quite dazed
   By a bright something, sailing down apace,
   Making me quickly veil my eyes and face:
   Again I look'd, and, O ye deities,
   Who from Olympus watch our destinies!
   Whence that completed form of all completeness?
   Whence came that high perfection of all sweetness?
   Speak, stubborn earth, and tell me where, O where
   Hast thou a symbol of her golden hair?
   Not oat-sheaves drooping in the western sun;                  610
   Not--thy soft hand, fair sister! let me shun
   Such follying before thee--yet she had,
   Indeed, locks bright enough to make me mad;
   And they were simply gordian'd up and braided,
   Leaving, in naked comeliness, unshaded,
   Her pearl round ears, white neck, and orbed brow;
   The which were blended in, I know not how,
   With such a paradise of lips and eyes,
   Blush-tinted cheeks, half smiles, and faintest sighs,
   That, when I think thereon, my spirit clings                  620
   And plays about its fancy, till the stings
   Of human neighbourhood envenom all.
   Unto what awful power shall I call?
   To what high fane?--Ah! see her hovering feet,
   More bluely vein'd, more soft, more whitely sweet
   Than those of sea-born Venus, when she rose
   From out her cradle shell. The wind out-blows
   Her scarf into a fluttering pavilion;
   'Tis blue, and over-spangled with a million
   Of little eyes, as though thou wert to shed,                  630
   Over the darkest, lushest blue-bell bed,
   Handfuls of daisies."--"Endymion, how strange!
   Dream within dream!"--"She took an airy range,
   And then, towards me, like a very maid,
   Came blushing, waning, willing, and afraid,
   And press'd me by the hand: Ah! 'twas too much;
   Methought I fainted at the charmed touch,
   Yet held my recollection, even as one
   Who dives three fathoms where the waters run
   Gurgling in beds of coral: for anon,                          640
   I felt upmounted in that region
   Where falling stars dart their artillery forth,
   And eagles struggle with the buffeting north
   That balances the heavy meteor-stone;--
   Felt too, I was not fearful, nor alone,
   But lapp'd and lull'd along the dangerous sky.
   Soon, as it seem'd, we left our journeying high,
   And straightway into frightful eddies swoop'd;
   Such as ay muster where grey time has scoop'd
   Huge dens and caverns in a mountain's side:                   650
   There hollow sounds arous'd me, and I sigh'd
   To faint once more by looking on my bliss--
   I was distracted; madly did I kiss
   The wooing arms which held me, and did give
   My eyes at once to death: but 'twas to live,
   To take in draughts of life from the gold fount
   Of kind and passionate looks; to count, and count
   The moments, by some greedy help that seem'd
   A second self, that each might be redeem'd
   And plunder'd of its load of blessedness.                     660
   Ah, desperate mortal! I ev'n dar'd to press
   Her very cheek against my crowned lip,
   And, at that moment, felt my body dip
   Into a warmer air: a moment more,
   Our feet were soft in flowers. There was store
   Of newest joys upon that alp. Sometimes
   A scent of violets, and blossoming limes,
   Loiter'd around us; then of honey cells,
   Made delicate from all white-flower bells;
   And once, above the edges of our nest,                        670
   An arch face peep'd,--an Oread as I guess'd.
 
     "Why did I dream that sleep o'er-power'd me
   In midst of all this heaven? Why not see,
   Far off, the shadows of his pinions dark,
   And stare them from me? But no, like a spark
   That needs must die, although its little beam
   Reflects upon a diamond, my sweet dream
   Fell into nothing--into stupid sleep.
   And so it was, until a gentle creep,
   A careful moving caught my waking ears,                       680
   And up I started: Ah! my sighs, my tears,
   My clenched hands;--for lo! the poppies hung
   Dew-dabbled on their stalks, the ouzel sung
   A heavy ditty, and the sullen day
   Had chidden herald Hesperus away,
   With leaden looks: the solitary breeze
   Bluster'd, and slept, and its wild self did teaze
   With wayward melancholy; and I thought,
   Mark me, Peona! that sometimes it brought
   Faint fare-thee-wells, and sigh-shrilled adieus!--            690
   Away I wander'd--all the pleasant hues
   Of heaven and earth had faded: deepest shades
   Were deepest dungeons; heaths and sunny glades
   Were full of pestilent light; our taintless rills
   Seem'd sooty, and o'er-spread with upturn'd gills
   Of dying fish; the vermeil rose had blown
   In frightful scarlet, and its thorns out-grown
   Like spiked aloe. If an innocent bird
   Before my heedless footsteps stirr'd, and stirr'd
   In little journeys, I beheld in it                            700
   A disguis'd demon, missioned to knit
   My soul with under darkness; to entice
   My stumblings down some monstrous precipice:
   Therefore I eager followed, and did curse
   The disappointment. Time, that aged nurse,
   Rock'd me to patience. Now, thank gentle heaven!
   These things, with all their comfortings, are given
   To my down-sunken hours, and with thee,
   Sweet sister, help to stem the ebbing sea
   Of weary life."                                               710
 
                    Thus ended he, and both
   Sat silent: for the maid was very loth
   To answer; feeling well that breathed words
   Would all be lost, unheard, and vain as swords
   Against the enchased crocodile, or leaps
   Of grasshoppers against the sun. She weeps,
   And wonders; struggles to devise some blame;
   To put on such a look as would say, _Shame
   On this poor weakness!_ but, for all her strife,
   She could as soon have crush'd away the life                  720
   From a sick dove. At length, to break the pause,
   She said with trembling chance: "Is this the cause?
   This all? Yet it is strange, and sad, alas!
   That one who through this middle earth should pass
   Most like a sojourning demi-god, and leave
   His name upon the harp-string, should achieve
   No higher bard than simple maidenhood,
   Singing alone, and fearfully,--how the blood
   Left his young cheek; and how he used to stray
   He knew not where; and how he would say, _nay_,               730
   If any said 'twas love: and yet 'twas love;
   What could it be but love? How a ring-dove
   Let fall a sprig of yew tree in his path;
   And how he died: and then, that love doth scathe,
   The gentle heart, as northern blasts do roses;
   And then the ballad of his sad life closes
   With sighs, and an alas!--Endymion!
   Be rather in the trumpet's mouth,--anon
   Among the winds at large--that all may hearken!
   Although, before the crystal heavens darken,                  740
   I watch and dote upon the silver lakes
   Pictur'd in western cloudiness, that takes
   The semblance of gold rocks and bright gold sands,
   Islands, and creeks, and amber-fretted strands
   With horses prancing o'er them, palaces
   And towers of amethyst,--would I so tease
   My pleasant days, because I could not mount
   Into those regions? The Morphean fount
   Of that fine element that visions, dreams,
   And fitful whims of sleep are made of, streams                750
   Into its airy channels with so subtle,
   So thin a breathing, not the spider's shuttle,
   Circled a million times within the space
   Of a swallow's nest-door, could delay a trace,
   A tinting of its quality: how light
   Must dreams themselves be; seeing they're more slight
   Than the mere nothing that engenders them!
   Then wherefore sully the entrusted gem
   Of high and noble life with thoughts so sick?
   Why pierce high-fronted honour to the quick                   760
   For nothing but a dream?" Hereat the youth
   Look'd up: a conflicting of shame and ruth
   Was in his plaited brow: yet, his eyelids
   Widened a little, as when Zephyr bids
   A little breeze to creep between the fans
   Of careless butterflies: amid his pains
   He seem'd to taste a drop of manna-dew,
   Full palatable; and a colour grew
   Upon his cheek, while thus he lifeful spake.
 
     "Peona! ever have I long'd to slake                         770
   My thirst for the world's praises: nothing base,
   No merely slumberous phantasm, could unlace
   The stubborn canvas for my voyage prepar'd--
   Though now 'tis tatter'd; leaving my bark bar'd
   And sullenly drifting: yet my higher hope
   Is of too wide, too rainbow-large a scope,
   To fret at myriads of earthly wrecks.
   Wherein lies happiness? In that which becks
   Our ready minds to fellowship divine,
   A fellowship with essence; till we shine,                     780
   Full alchemiz'd, and free of space. Behold
   The clear religion of heaven! Fold
   A rose leaf round thy finger's taperness,
   And soothe thy lips: hist, when the airy stress
   Of music's kiss impregnates the free winds,
   And with a sympathetic touch unbinds
   Eolian magic from their lucid wombs:
   Then old songs waken from enclouded tombs;
   Old ditties sigh above their father's grave;
   Ghosts of melodious prophecyings rave                         790
   Round every spot were trod Apollo's foot;
   Bronze clarions awake, and faintly bruit,
   Where long ago a giant battle was;
   And, from the turf, a lullaby doth pass
   In every place where infant Orpheus slept.
   Feel we these things?--that moment have we stept
   Into a sort of oneness, and our state
   Is like a floating spirit's. But there are
   Richer entanglements, enthralments far
   More self-destroying, leading, by degrees,                    800
   To the chief intensity: the crown of these
   Is made of love and friendship, and sits high
   Upon the forehead of humanity.
   All its more ponderous and bulky worth
   Is friendship, whence there ever issues forth
   A steady splendour; but at the tip-top,
   There hangs by unseen film, an orbed drop
   Of light, and that is love: its influence,
   Thrown in our eyes, genders a novel sense,
   At which we start and fret; till in the end,                  810
   Melting into its radiance, we blend,
   Mingle, and so become a part of it,--
   Nor with aught else can our souls interknit
   So wingedly: when we combine therewith,
   Life's self is nourish'd by its proper pith,
   And we are nurtured like a pelican brood.
   Aye, so delicious is the unsating food,
   That men, who might have tower'd in the van
   Of all the congregated world, to fan
   And winnow from the coming step of time                       820
   All chaff of custom, wipe away all slime
   Left by men-slugs and human serpentry,
   Have been content to let occasion die,
   Whilst they did sleep in love's elysium.
   And, truly, I would rather be struck dumb,
   Than speak against this ardent listlessness:
   For I have ever thought that it might bless
   The world with benefits unknowingly;
   As does the nightingale, upperched high,
   And cloister'd among cool and bunched leaves--                830
   She sings but to her love, nor e'er conceives
   How tiptoe Night holds back her dark-grey hood.
   Just so may love, although 'tis understood
   The mere commingling of passionate breath,
   Produce more than our searching witnesseth:
   What I know not: but who, of men, can tell
   That flowers would bloom, or that green fruit would swell
   To melting pulp, that fish would have bright mail,
   The earth its dower of river, wood, and vale,
   The meadows runnels, runnels pebble-stones,                   840
   The seed its harvest, or the lute its tones,
   Tones ravishment, or ravishment its sweet,
   If human souls did never kiss and greet?
 
     "Now, if this earthly love has power to make
   Men's being mortal, immortal; to shake
   Ambition from their memories, and brim
   Their measure of content; what merest whim,
   Seems all this poor endeavour after fame,
   To one, who keeps within his stedfast aim
   A love immortal, an immortal too.                             850
   Look not so wilder'd; for these things are true,
   And never can be born of atomies
   That buzz about our slumbers, like brain-flies,
   Leaving us fancy-sick. No, no, I'm sure,
   My restless spirit never could endure
   To brood so long upon one luxury,
   Unless it did, though fearfully, espy
   A hope beyond the shadow of a dream.
   My sayings will the less obscured seem,
   When I have told thee how my waking sight                     860
   Has made me scruple whether that same night
   Was pass'd in dreaming. Hearken, sweet Peona!
   Beyond the matron-temple of Latona,
   Which we should see but for these darkening boughs,
   Lies a deep hollow, from whose ragged brows
   Bushes and trees do lean all round athwart,
   And meet so nearly, that with wings outraught,
   And spreaded tail, a vulture could not glide
   Past them, but he must brush on every side.
   Some moulder'd steps lead into this cool cell,                870
   Far as the slabbed margin of a well,
   Whose patient level peeps its crystal eye
   Right upward, through the bushes, to the sky.
   Oft have I brought thee flowers, on their stalks set
   Like vestal primroses, but dark velvet
   Edges them round, and they have golden pits:
   'Twas there I got them, from the gaps and slits
   In a mossy stone, that sometimes was my seat,
   When all above was faint with mid-day heat.
   And there in strife no burning thoughts to heed,              880
   I'd bubble up the water through a reed;
   So reaching back to boy-hood: make me ships
   Of moulted feathers, touchwood, alder chips,
   With leaves stuck in them; and the Neptune be
   Of their petty ocean. Oftener, heavily,
   When love-lorn hours had left me less a child,
   I sat contemplating the figures wild
   Of o'er-head clouds melting the mirror through.
   Upon a day, while thus I watch'd, by flew
   A cloudy Cupid, with his bow and quiver;                      890
   So plainly character'd, no breeze would shiver
   The happy chance: so happy, I was fain
   To follow it upon the open plain,
   And, therefore, was just going; when, behold!
   A wonder, fair as any I have told--
   The same bright face I tasted in my sleep,
   Smiling in the clear well. My heart did leap
   Through the cool depth.--It moved as if to flee--
   I started up, when lo! refreshfully,
   There came upon my face, in plenteous showers,                900
   Dew-drops, and dewy buds, and leaves, and flowers,
   Wrapping all objects from my smothered sight,
   Bathing my spirit in a new delight.
   Aye, such a breathless honey-feel of bliss
   Alone preserved me from the drear abyss
   Of death, for the fair form had gone again.
   Pleasure is oft a visitant; but pain
   Clings cruelly to us, like the gnawing sloth
   On the deer's tender haunches: late, and loth,
   'Tis scar'd away by slow returning pleasure.                  910
   How sickening, how dark the dreadful leisure
   Of weary days, made deeper exquisite,
   By a fore-knowledge of unslumbrous night!
   Like sorrow came upon me, heavier still,
   Than when I wander'd from the poppy hill:
   And a whole age of lingering moments crept
   Sluggishly by, ere more contentment swept
   Away at once the deadly yellow spleen.
   Yes, thrice have I this fair enchantment seen;
   Once more been tortured with renewed life.                    920
   When last the wintry gusts gave over strife
   With the conquering sun of spring, and left the skies
   Warm and serene, but yet with moistened eyes
   In pity of the shatter'd infant buds,--
   That time thou didst adorn, with amber studs,
   My hunting cap, because I laugh'd and smil'd,
   Chatted with thee, and many days exil'd
   All torment from my breast;--'twas even then,
   Straying about, yet, coop'd up in the den
   Of helpless discontent,--hurling my lance                     930
   From place to place, and following at chance,
   At last, by hap, through some young trees it struck,
   And, plashing among bedded pebbles, stuck
   In the middle of a brook,--whose silver ramble
   Down twenty little falls, through reeds and bramble,
   Tracing along, it brought me to a cave,
   Whence it ran brightly forth, and white did lave
   The nether sides of mossy stones and rock,--
   'Mong which it gurgled blythe adieus, to mock
   Its own sweet grief at parting. Overhead,                     940
   Hung a lush scene of drooping weeds, and spread
   Thick, as to curtain up some wood-nymph's home.
   "Ah! impious mortal, whither do I roam?"
   Said I, low voic'd: "Ah, whither! 'Tis the grot
   Of Proserpine, when Hell, obscure and hot,
   Doth her resign; and where her tender hands
   She dabbles, on the cool and sluicy sands:
   Or 'tis the cell of Echo, where she sits,
   And babbles thorough silence, till her wits
   Are gone in tender madness, and anon,                         950
   Faints into sleep, with many a dying tone
   Of sadness. O that she would take my vows,
   And breathe them sighingly among the boughs,
   To sue her gentle ears for whose fair head,
   Daily, I pluck sweet flowerets from their bed,
   And weave them dyingly--send honey-whispers
   Round every leaf, that all those gentle lispers
   May sigh my love unto her pitying!
   O charitable echo! hear, and sing
   This ditty to her!--tell her"--so I stay'd                    960
   My foolish tongue, and listening, half afraid,
   Stood stupefied with my own empty folly,
   And blushing for the freaks of melancholy.
   Salt tears were coming, when I heard my name
   Most fondly lipp'd, and then these accents came:
   "Endymion! the cave is secreter
   Than the isle of Delos. Echo hence shall stir
   No sighs but sigh-warm kisses, or light noise
   Of thy combing hand, the while it travelling cloys
   And trembles through my labyrinthine hair."                   970
   At that oppress'd I hurried in.--Ah! where
   Are those swift moments? Whither are they fled?
   I'll smile no more, Peona; nor will wed
   Sorrow the way to death; but patiently
   Bear up against it: so farewel, sad sigh;
   And come instead demurest meditation,
   To occupy me wholly, and to fashion
   My pilgrimage for the world's dusky brink.
   No more will I count over, link by link,
   My chain of grief: no longer strive to find                   980
   A half-forgetfulness in mountain wind
   Blustering about my ears: aye, thou shalt see,
   Dearest of sisters, what my life shall be;
   What a calm round of hours shall make my days.
   There is a paly flame of hope that plays
   Where'er I look: but yet, I'll say 'tis naught--
   And here I bid it die. Have not I caught,
   Already, a more healthy countenance?
   By this the sun is setting; we may chance
   Meet some of our near-dwellers with my car."                  990
 
     This said, he rose, faint-smiling like a star
   Through autumn mists, and took Peona's hand:
   They stept into the boat, and launch'd from land.
 
 
 
 
 ENDYMION.
 
 BOOK II.
 
 
   O sovereign power of love! O grief! O balm!
   All records, saving thine, come cool, and calm,
   And shadowy, through the mist of passed years:
   For others, good or bad, hatred and tears
   Have become indolent; but touching thine,
   One sigh doth echo, one poor sob doth pine,
   One kiss brings honey-dew from buried days.
   The woes of Troy, towers smothering o'er their blaze,
   Stiff-holden shields, far-piercing spears, keen blades,
   Struggling, and blood, and shrieks--all dimly fades            10
   Into some backward corner of the brain;
   Yet, in our very souls, we feel amain
   The close of Troilus and Cressid sweet.
   Hence, pageant history! hence, gilded cheat!
   Swart planet in the universe of deeds!
   Wide sea, that one continuous murmur breeds
   Along the pebbled shore of memory!
   Many old rotten-timber'd boats there be
   Upon thy vaporous bosom, magnified
   To goodly vessels; many a sail of pride,                       20
   And golden keel'd, is left unlaunch'd and dry.
   But wherefore this? What care, though owl did fly
   About the great Athenian admiral's mast?
   What care, though striding Alexander past
   The Indus with his Macedonian numbers?
   Though old Ulysses tortured from his slumbers
   The glutted Cyclops, what care?--Juliet leaning
   Amid her window-flowers,--sighing,--weaning
   Tenderly her fancy from its maiden snow,
   Doth more avail than these: the silver flow                    30
   Of Hero's tears, the swoon of Imogen,
   Fair Pastorella in the bandit's den,
   Are things to brood on with more ardency
   Than the death-day of empires. Fearfully
   Must such conviction come upon his head,
   Who, thus far, discontent, has dared to tread,
   Without one muse's smile, or kind behest,
   The path of love and poesy. But rest,
   In chaffing restlessness, is yet more drear
   Than to be crush'd, in striving to uprear                      40
   Love's standard on the battlements of song.
   So once more days and nights aid me along,
   Like legion'd soldiers.
 
                           Brain-sick shepherd prince,
   What promise hast thou faithful guarded since
   The day of sacrifice? Or, have new sorrows
   Come with the constant dawn upon thy morrows?
   Alas! 'tis his old grief. For many days,
   Has he been wandering in uncertain ways:
   Through wilderness, and woods of mossed oaks;                  50
   Counting his woe-worn minutes, by the strokes
   Of the lone woodcutter; and listening still,
   Hour after hour, to each lush-leav'd rill.
   Now he is sitting by a shady spring,
   And elbow-deep with feverous fingering
   Stems the upbursting cold: a wild rose tree
   Pavilions him in bloom, and he doth see
   A bud which snares his fancy: lo! but now
   He plucks it, dips its stalk in the water: how!
   It swells, it buds, it flowers beneath his sight;              60
   And, in the middle, there is softly pight
   A golden butterfly; upon whose wings
   There must be surely character'd strange things,
   For with wide eye he wonders, and smiles oft.
 
     Lightly this little herald flew aloft,
   Follow'd by glad Endymion's clasped hands:
   Onward it flies. From languor's sullen bands
   His limbs are loos'd, and eager, on he hies
   Dazzled to trace it in the sunny skies.
   It seem'd he flew, the way so easy was;                        70
   And like a new-born spirit did he pass
   Through the green evening quiet in the sun,
   O'er many a heath, through many a woodland dun,
   Through buried paths, where sleepy twilight dreams
   The summer time away. One track unseams
   A wooded cleft, and, far away, the blue
   Of ocean fades upon him; then, anew,
   He sinks adown a solitary glen,
   Where there was never sound of mortal men,
   Saving, perhaps, some snow-light cadences                      80
   Melting to silence, when upon the breeze
   Some holy bark let forth an anthem sweet,
   To cheer itself to Delphi. Still his feet
   Went swift beneath the merry-winged guide,
   Until it reached a splashing fountain's side
   That, near a cavern's mouth, for ever pour'd
   Unto the temperate air: then high it soar'd,
   And, downward, suddenly began to dip,
   As if, athirst with so much toil, 'twould sip
   The crystal spout-head: so it did, with touch                  90
   Most delicate, as though afraid to smutch
   Even with mealy gold the waters clear.
   But, at that very touch, to disappear
   So fairy-quick, was strange! Bewildered,
   Endymion sought around, and shook each bed
   Of covert flowers in vain; and then he flung
   Himself along the grass. What gentle tongue,
   What whisperer disturb'd his gloomy rest?
   It was a nymph uprisen to the breast
   In the fountain's pebbly margin, and she stood                100
   'Mong lilies, like the youngest of the brood.
   To him her dripping hand she softly kist,
   And anxiously began to plait and twist
   Her ringlets round her fingers, saying: "Youth!
   Too long, alas, hast thou starv'd on the ruth,
   The bitterness of love: too long indeed,
   Seeing thou art so gentle. Could I weed
   Thy soul of care, by heavens, I would offer
   All the bright riches of my crystal coffer
   To Amphitrite; all my clear-eyed fish,                        110
   Golden, or rainbow-sided, or purplish,
   Vermilion-tail'd, or finn'd with silvery gauze;
   Yea, or my veined pebble-floor, that draws
   A virgin light to the deep; my grotto-sands
   Tawny and gold, ooz'd slowly from far lands
   By my diligent springs; my level lilies, shells,
   My charming rod, my potent river spells;
   Yes, every thing, even to the pearly cup
   Meander gave me,--for I bubbled up
   To fainting creatures in a desert wild.                       120
   But woe is me, I am but as a child
   To gladden thee; and all I dare to say,
   Is, that I pity thee; that on this day
   I've been thy guide; that thou must wander far
   In other regions, past the scanty bar
   To mortal steps, before thou cans't be ta'en
   From every wasting sigh, from every pain,
   Into the gentle bosom of thy love.
   Why it is thus, one knows in heaven above:
   But, a poor Naiad, I guess not. Farewel!                      130
   I have a ditty for my hollow cell."
 
     Hereat, she vanished from Endymion's gaze,
   Who brooded o'er the water in amaze:
   The dashing fount pour'd on, and where its pool
   Lay, half asleep, in grass and rushes cool,
   Quick waterflies and gnats were sporting still,
   And fish were dimpling, as if good nor ill
   Had fallen out that hour. The wanderer,
   Holding his forehead, to keep off the burr
   Of smothering fancies, patiently sat down;                    140
   And, while beneath the evening's sleepy frown
   Glow-worms began to trim their starry lamps,
   Thus breath'd he to himself: "Whoso encamps
   To take a fancied city of delight,
   O what a wretch is he! and when 'tis his,
   After long toil and travelling, to miss
   The kernel of his hopes, how more than vile:
   Yet, for him there's refreshment even in toil;
   Another city doth he set about,
   Free from the smallest pebble-head of doubt                   150
   That he will seize on trickling honey-combs:
   Alas, he finds them dry; and then he foams,
   And onward to another city speeds.
   But this is human life: the war, the deeds,
   The disappointment, the anxiety,
   Imagination's struggles, far and nigh,
   All human; bearing in themselves this good,
   That they are still the air, the subtle food,
   To make us feel existence, and to shew
   How quiet death is. Where soil is men grow,                   160
   Whether to weeds or flowers; but for me,
   There is no depth to strike in: I can see
   Nought earthly worth my compassing; so stand
   Upon a misty, jutting head of land--
   Alone? No, no; and by the Orphean lute,
   When mad Eurydice is listening to't;
   I'd rather stand upon this misty peak,
   With not a thing to sigh for, or to seek,
   But the soft shadow of my thrice-seen love,
   Than be--I care not what. O meekest dove                      170
   Of heaven! O Cynthia, ten-times bright and fair!
   From thy blue throne, now filling all the air,
   Glance but one little beam of temper'd light
   Into my bosom, that the dreadful might
   And tyranny of love be somewhat scar'd!
   Yet do not so, sweet queen; one torment spar'd,
   Would give a pang to jealous misery,
   Worse than the torment's self: but rather tie
   Large wings upon my shoulders, and point out
   My love's far dwelling. Though the playful rout               180
   Of Cupids shun thee, too divine art thou,
   Too keen in beauty, for thy silver prow
   Not to have dipp'd in love's most gentle stream.
   O be propitious, nor severely deem
   My madness impious; for, by all the stars
   That tend thy bidding, I do think the bars
   That kept my spirit in are burst--that I
   Am sailing with thee through the dizzy sky!
   How beautiful thou art! The world how deep!
   How tremulous-dazzlingly the wheels sweep                     190
   Around their axle! Then these gleaming reins,
   How lithe! When this thy chariot attains
   Its airy goal, haply some bower veils
   Those twilight eyes?--Those eyes!--my spirit fails--
   Dear goddess, help! or the wide-gaping air
   Will gulph me--help!"--At this with madden'd stare,
   And lifted hands, and trembling lips he stood;
   Like old Deucalion mountain'd o'er the flood,
   Or blind Orion hungry for the morn.
   And, but from the deep cavern there was borne                 200
   A voice, he had been froze to senseless stone;
   Nor sigh of his, nor plaint, nor passion'd moan
   Had more been heard. Thus swell'd it forth: "Descend,
   Young mountaineer! descend where alleys bend
   Into the sparry hollows of the world!
   Oft hast thou seen bolts of the thunder hurl'd
   As from thy threshold; day by day hast been
   A little lower than the chilly sheen
   Of icy pinnacles, and dipp'dst thine arms
   Into the deadening ether that still charms                    210
   Their marble being: now, as deep profound
   As those are high, descend! He ne'er is crown'd
   With immortality, who fears to follow
   Where airy voices lead: so through the hollow,
   The silent mysteries of earth, descend!"
 
     He heard but the last words, nor could contend
   One moment in reflection: for he fled
   Into the fearful deep, to hide his head
   From the clear moon, the trees, and coming madness.
 
     'Twas far too strange, and wonderful for sadness;
   Sharpening, by degrees, his appetite                          221
   To dive into the deepest. Dark, nor light,
   The region; nor bright, nor sombre wholly,
   But mingled up; a gleaming melancholy;
   A dusky empire and its diadems;
   One faint eternal eventide of gems.
   Aye, millions sparkled on a vein of gold,
   Along whose track the prince quick footsteps told,
   With all its lines abrupt and angular:
   Out-shooting sometimes, like a meteor-star,                   230
   Through a vast antre; then the metal woof,
   Like Vulcan's rainbow, with some monstrous roof
   Curves hugely: now, far in the deep abyss,
   It seems an angry lightning, and doth hiss
   Fancy into belief: anon it leads
   Through winding passages, where sameness breeds
   Vexing conceptions of some sudden change;
   Whether to silver grots, or giant range
   Of sapphire columns, or fantastic bridge
   Athwart a flood of crystal. On a ridge                        240
   Now fareth he, that o'er the vast beneath
   Towers like an ocean-cliff, and whence he seeth
   A hundred waterfalls, whose voices come
   But as the murmuring surge. Chilly and numb
   His bosom grew, when first he, far away,
   Descried an orbed diamond, set to fray
   Old darkness from his throne: 'twas like the sun
   Uprisen o'er chaos: and with such a stun
   Came the amazement, that, absorb'd in it,
   He saw not fiercer wonders--past the wit                      250
   Of any spirit to tell, but one of those
   Who, when this planet's sphering time doth close,
   Will be its high remembrancers: who they?
   The mighty ones who have made eternal day
   For Greece and England. While astonishment
   With deep-drawn sighs was quieting, he went
   Into a marble gallery, passing through
   A mimic temple, so complete and true
   In sacred custom, that he well nigh fear'd
   To search it inwards; whence far off appear'd,                260
   Through a long pillar'd vista, a fair shrine,
   And, just beyond, on light tiptoe divine,
   A quiver'd Dian. Stepping awfully,
   The youth approach'd; oft turning his veil'd eye
   Down sidelong aisles, and into niches old.
   And when, more near against the marble cold
   He had touch'd his forehead, he began to thread
   All courts and passages, where silence dead
   Rous'd by his whispering footsteps murmured faint:
   And long he travers'd to and fro, to acquaint                 270
   Himself with every mystery, and awe;
   Till, weary, he sat down before the maw
   Of a wide outlet, fathomless and dim
   To wild uncertainty and shadows grim.
   There, when new wonders ceas'd to float before,
   And thoughts of self came on, how crude and sore
   The journey homeward to habitual self!
   A mad-pursuing of the fog-born elf,
   Whose flitting lantern, through rude nettle-briar,
   Cheats us into a swamp, into a fire,                          280
   Into the bosom of a hated thing.
 
     What misery most drowningly doth sing
   In lone Endymion's ear, now he has caught
   The goal of consciousness? Ah, 'tis the thought,
   The deadly feel of solitude: for lo!
   He cannot see the heavens, nor the flow
   Of rivers, nor hill-flowers running wild
   In pink and purple chequer, nor, up-pil'd,
   The cloudy rack slow journeying in the west,
   Like herded elephants; nor felt, nor prest                    290
   Cool grass, nor tasted the fresh slumberous air;
   But far from such companionship to wear
   An unknown time, surcharg'd with grief, away,
   Was now his lot. And must he patient stay,
   Tracing fantastic figures with his spear?
   "No!" exclaimed he, "why should I tarry here?"
   No! loudly echoed times innumerable.
   At which he straightway started, and 'gan tell
   His paces back into the temple's chief;
   Warming and growing strong in the belief                      300
   Of help from Dian: so that when again
   He caught her airy form, thus did he plain,
   Moving more near the while. "O Haunter chaste
   Of river sides, and woods, and heathy waste,
   Where with thy silver bow and arrows keen
   Art thou now forested? O woodland Queen,
   What smoothest air thy smoother forehead woos?
   Where dost thou listen to the wide halloos
   Of thy disparted nymphs? Through what dark tree
   Glimmers thy crescent? Wheresoe'er it be,                     310
   'Tis in the breath of heaven: thou dost taste
   Freedom as none can taste it, nor dost waste
   Thy loveliness in dismal elements;
   But, finding in our green earth sweet contents,
   There livest blissfully. Ah, if to thee
   It feels Elysian, how rich to me,
   An exil'd mortal, sounds its pleasant name!
   Within my breast there lives a choking flame--
   O let me cool it among the zephyr-boughs!
   A homeward fever parches up my tongue--                       320
   O let me slake it at the running springs!
   Upon my car a noisy nothing rings--
   O let me once more hear the linnet's note!
   Before mine eyes thick films and shadows float--
   O let me 'noint them with the heaven's light!
   Dost thou now lave thy feet and ankles white?
   O think how sweet to me the freshening sluice!
   Dost thou now please thy thirst with berry-juice?
   O think how this dry palate would rejoice!
   If in soft slumber thou dost hear my voice,                   330
   O think how I should love a bed of flowers!--
   Young goddess! let me see my native bowers!
   Deliver me from this rapacious deep!"
 
     Thus ending loudly, as he would o'erleap
   His destiny, alert he stood: but when
   Obstinate silence came heavily again,
   Feeling about for its old couch of space
   And airy cradle, lowly bow'd his face
   Desponding, o'er the marble floor's cold thrill.
   But 'twas not long; for, sweeter than the rill                340
   To its old channel, or a swollen tide
   To margin sallows, were the leaves he spied,
   And flowers, and wreaths, and ready myrtle crowns
   Up heaping through the slab: refreshment drowns
   Itself, and strives its own delights to hide--
   Nor in one spot alone; the floral pride
   In a long whispering birth enchanted grew
   Before his footsteps; as when heav'd anew
   Old ocean rolls a lengthened wave to the shore,
   Down whose green back the short-liv'd foam, all hoar,
   Bursts gradual, with a wayward indolence.                     351
 
     Increasing still in heart, and pleasant sense,
   Upon his fairy journey on he hastes;
   So anxious for the end, he scarcely wastes
   One moment with his hand among the sweets:
   Onward he goes--he stops--his bosom beats
   As plainly in his ear, as the faint charm
   Of which the throbs were born. This still alarm,
   This sleepy music, forc'd him walk tiptoe:
   For it came more softly than the east could blow              360
   Arion's magic to the Atlantic isles;
   Or than the west, made jealous by the smiles
   Of thron'd Apollo, could breathe back the lyre
   To seas Ionian and Tyrian.
 
     O did he ever live, that lonely man,
   Who lov'd--and music slew not? 'Tis the pest
   Of love, that fairest joys give most unrest;
   That things of delicate and tenderest worth
   Are swallow'd all, and made a seared dearth,
   By one consuming flame: it doth immerse                       370
   And suffocate true blessings in a curse.
   Half-happy, by comparison of bliss,
   Is miserable. 'Twas even so with this
   Dew-dropping melody, in the Carian's ear;
   First heaven, then hell, and then forgotten clear,
   Vanish'd in elemental passion.
 
     And down some swart abysm he had gone,
   Had not a heavenly guide benignant led
   To where thick myrtle branches, 'gainst his head
   Brushing, awakened: then the sounds again                     380
   Went noiseless as a passing noontide rain
   Over a bower, where little space he stood;
   For as the sunset peeps into a wood
   So saw he panting light, and towards it went
   Through winding alleys; and lo, wonderment!
   Upon soft verdure saw, one here, one there,
   Cupids a slumbering on their pinions fair.
 
     After a thousand mazes overgone,
   At last, with sudden step, he came upon
   A chamber, myrtle wall'd, embowered high,                     390
   Full of light, incense, tender minstrelsy,
   And more of beautiful and strange beside:
   For on a silken couch of rosy pride,
   In midst of all, there lay a sleeping youth
   Of fondest beauty; fonder, in fair sooth,
   Than sighs could fathom, or contentment reach:
   And coverlids gold-tinted like the peach,
   Or ripe October's faded marigolds,
   Fell sleek about him in a thousand folds--
   Not hiding up an Apollonian curve                             400
   Of neck and shoulder, nor the tenting swerve
   Of knee from knee, nor ankles pointing light;
   But rather, giving them to the filled sight
   Officiously. Sideway his face repos'd
   On one white arm, and tenderly unclos'd,
   By tenderest pressure, a faint damask mouth
   To slumbery pout; just as the morning south
   Disparts a dew-lipp'd rose. Above his head,
   Four lily stalks did their white honours wed
   To make a coronal; and round him grew                         410
   All tendrils green, of every bloom and hue,
   Together intertwin'd and trammel'd fresh:
   The vine of glossy sprout; the ivy mesh,
   Shading its Ethiop berries; and woodbine,
   Of velvet leaves and bugle-blooms divine;
   Convolvulus in streaked vases flush;
   The creeper, mellowing for an autumn blush;
   And virgin's bower, trailing airily;
   With others of the sisterhood. Hard by,
   Stood serene Cupids watching silently.                        420
   One, kneeling to a lyre, touch'd the strings,
   Muffling to death the pathos with his wings;
   And, ever and anon, uprose to look
   At the youth's slumber; while another took
   A willow-bough, distilling odorous dew,
   And shook it on his hair; another flew
   In through the woven roof, and fluttering-wise
   Rain'd violets upon his sleeping eyes.
 
     At these enchantments, and yet many more,
   The breathless Latmian wonder'd o'er and o'er;                430
   Until, impatient in embarrassment,
   He forthright pass'd, and lightly treading went
   To that same feather'd lyrist, who straightway,
   Smiling, thus whisper'd: "Though from upper day
   Thou art a wanderer, and thy presence here
   Might seem unholy, be of happy cheer!
   For 'tis the nicest touch of human honour,
   When some ethereal and high-favouring donor
   Presents immortal bowers to mortal sense;
   As now 'tis done to thee, Endymion. Hence                     440
   Was I in no wise startled. So recline
   Upon these living flowers. Here is wine,
   Alive with sparkles--never, I aver,
   Since Ariadne was a vintager,
   So cool a purple: taste these juicy pears,
   Sent me by sad Vertumnus, when his fears
   Were high about Pomona: here is cream,
   Deepening to richness from a snowy gleam;
   Sweeter than that nurse Amalthea skimm'd
   For the boy Jupiter: and here, undimm'd                       450
   By any touch, a bunch of blooming plums
   Ready to melt between an infant's gums:
   And here is manna pick'd from Syrian trees,
   In starlight, by the three Hesperides.
   Feast on, and meanwhile I will let thee know
   Of all these things around us." He did so,
   Still brooding o'er the cadence of his lyre;
   And thus: "I need not any hearing tire
   By telling how the sea-born goddess pin'd
   For a mortal youth, and how she strove to bind                460
   Him all in all unto her doting self.
   Who would not be so prison'd? but, fond elf,
   He was content to let her amorous plea
   Faint through his careless arms; content to see
   An unseiz'd heaven dying at his feet;
   Content, O fool! to make a cold retreat,
   When on the pleasant grass such love, lovelorn,
   Lay sorrowing; when every tear was born
   Of diverse passion; when her lips and eyes
   Were clos'd in sullen moisture, and quick sighs               470
   Came vex'd and pettish through her nostrils small.
   Hush! no exclaim--yet, justly mightst thou call
   Curses upon his head.--I was half glad,
   But my poor mistress went distract and mad,
   When the boar tusk'd him: so away she flew
   To Jove's high throne, and by her plainings drew
   Immortal tear-drops down the thunderer's beard;
   Whereon, it was decreed he should be rear'd
   Each summer time to life. Lo! this is he,
   That same Adonis, safe in the privacy                         480
   Of this still region all his winter-sleep.
   Aye, sleep; for when our love-sick queen did weep
   Over his waned corse, the tremulous shower
   Heal'd up the wound, and, with a balmy power,
   Medicined death to a lengthened drowsiness:
   The which she fills with visions, and doth dress
   In all this quiet luxury; and hath set
   Us young immortals, without any let,
   To watch his slumber through. 'Tis well nigh pass'd,
   Even to a moment's filling up, and fast                       490
   She scuds with summer breezes, to pant through
   The first long kiss, warm firstling, to renew
   Embower'd sports in Cytherea's isle.
   Look! how those winged listeners all this while
   Stand anxious: see! behold!"--This clamant word
   Broke through the careful silence; for they heard
   A rustling noise of leaves, and out there flutter'd
   Pigeons and doves: Adonis something mutter'd,
   The while one hand, that erst upon his thigh
   Lay dormant, mov'd convuls'd and gradually                    500
   Up to his forehead. Then there was a hum
   Of sudden voices, echoing, "Come! come!
   Arise! awake! Clear summer has forth walk'd
   Unto the clover-sward, and she has talk'd
   Full soothingly to every nested finch:
   Rise, Cupids! or we'll give the blue-bell pinch
   To your dimpled arms. Once more sweet life begin!"
   At this, from every side they hurried in,
   Rubbing their sleepy eyes with lazy wrists,
   And doubling over head their little fists                     510
   In backward yawns. But all were soon alive:
   For as delicious wine doth, sparkling, dive
   In nectar'd clouds and curls through water fair,
   So from the arbour roof down swell'd an air
   Odorous and enlivening; making all
   To laugh, and play, and sing, and loudly call
   For their sweet queen: when lo! the wreathed green
   Disparted, and far upward could be seen
   Blue heaven, and a silver car, air-borne,
   Whose silent wheels, fresh wet from clouds of morn,
   Spun off a drizzling dew,--which falling chill                521
   On soft Adonis' shoulders, made him still
   Nestle and turn uneasily about.
   Soon were the white doves plain, with necks stretch'd out,
   And silken traces lighten'd in descent;
   And soon, returning from love's banishment,
   Queen Venus leaning downward open arm'd:
   Her shadow fell upon his breast, and charm'd
   A tumult to his heart, and a new life
   Into his eyes. Ah, miserable strife,                          530
   But for her comforting! unhappy sight,
   But meeting her blue orbs! Who, who can write
   Of these first minutes? The unchariest muse
   To embracements warm as theirs makes coy excuse.
 
     O it has ruffled every spirit there,
   Saving love's self, who stands superb to share
   The general gladness: awfully he stands;
   A sovereign quell is in his waving hands;
   No sight can bear the lightning of his bow;
   His quiver is mysterious, none can know                       540
   What themselves think of it; from forth his eyes
   There darts strange light of varied hues and dyes:
   A scowl is sometimes on his brow, but who
   Look full upon it feel anon the blue
   Of his fair eyes run liquid through their souls.
   Endymion feels it, and no more controls
   The burning prayer within him; so, bent low,
   He had begun a plaining of his woe.
   But Venus, bending forward, said: "My child,
   Favour this gentle youth; his days are wild                   550
   With love--he--but alas! too well I see
   Thou know'st the deepness of his misery.
   Ah, smile not so, my son: I tell thee true,
   That when through heavy hours I used to rue
   The endless sleep of this new-born Adon',
   This stranger ay I pitied. For upon
   A dreary morning once I fled away
   Into the breezy clouds, to weep and pray
   For this my love: for vexing Mars had teaz'd
   Me even to tears: thence, when a little eas'd,                560
   Down-looking, vacant, through a hazy wood,
   I saw this youth as he despairing stood:
   Those same dark curls blown vagrant in the wind;
   Those same full fringed lids a constant blind
   Over his sullen eyes: I saw him throw
   Himself on wither'd leaves, even as though
   Death had come sudden; for no jot he mov'd,
   Yet mutter'd wildly. I could hear he lov'd
   Some fair immortal, and that his embrace
   Had zoned her through the night. There is no trace            570
   Of this in heaven: I have mark'd each cheek,
   And find it is the vainest thing to seek;
   And that of all things 'tis kept secretest.
   Endymion! one day thou wilt be blest:
   So still obey the guiding hand that fends
   Thee safely through these wonders for sweet ends.
   'Tis a concealment needful in extreme;
   And if I guess'd not so, the sunny beam
   Thou shouldst mount up to with me. Now adieu!
   Here must we leave thee."--At these words up flew             580
   The impatient doves, up rose the floating car,
   Up went the hum celestial. High afar
   The Latmian saw them minish into nought;
   And, when all were clear vanish'd, still he caught
   A vivid lightning from that dreadful bow.
   When all was darkened, with Etnean throe
   The earth clos'd--gave a solitary moan--
   And left him once again in twilight lone.
 
     He did not rave, he did not stare aghast,
   For all those visions were o'ergone, and past,                590
   And he in loneliness: he felt assur'd
   Of happy times, when all he had endur'd
   Would seem a feather to the mighty prize.
   So, with unusual gladness, on he hies
   Through caves, and palaces of mottled ore,
   Gold dome, and crystal wall, and turquois floor,
   Black polish'd porticos of awful shade,
   And, at the last, a diamond balustrade,
   Leading afar past wild magnificence,
   Spiral through ruggedest loopholes, and thence                600
   Stretching across a void, then guiding o'er
   Enormous chasms, where, all foam and roar,
   Streams subterranean tease their granite beds;
   Then heighten'd just above the silvery heads
   Of a thousand fountains, so that he could dash
   The waters with his spear; but at the splash,
   Done heedlessly, those spouting columns rose
   Sudden a poplar's height, and 'gan to enclose
   His diamond path with fretwork, streaming round
   Alive, and dazzling cool, and with a sound,                   610
   Haply, like dolphin tumults, when sweet shells
   Welcome the float of Thetis. Long he dwells
   On this delight; for, every minute's space,
   The streams with changed magic interlace:
   Sometimes like delicatest lattices,
   Cover'd with crystal vines; then weeping trees,
   Moving about as in a gentle wind,
   Which, in a wink, to watery gauze refin'd,
   Pour'd into shapes of curtain'd canopies,
   Spangled, and rich with liquid broideries                     620
   Of flowers, peacocks, swans, and naiads fair.
   Swifter than lightning went these wonders rare;
   And then the water, into stubborn streams
   Collecting, mimick'd the wrought oaken beams,
   Pillars, and frieze, and high fantastic roof,
   Of those dusk places in times far aloof
   Cathedrals call'd. He bade a loth farewel
   To these founts Protean, passing gulph, and dell,
   And torrent, and ten thousand jutting shapes,
   Half seen through deepest gloom, and griesly gapes,           630
   Blackening on every side, and overhead
   A vaulted dome like Heaven's, far bespread
   With starlight gems: aye, all so huge and strange,
   The solitary felt a hurried change
   Working within him into something dreary,--
   Vex'd like a morning eagle, lost, and weary,
   And purblind amid foggy, midnight wolds.
   But he revives at once: for who beholds
   New sudden things, nor casts his mental slough?
   Forth from a rugged arch, in the dusk below,                  640
   Came mother Cybele! alone--alone--
   In sombre chariot; dark foldings thrown
   About her majesty, and front death-pale,
   With turrets crown'd. Four maned lions hale
   The sluggish wheels; solemn their toothed maws,
   Their surly eyes brow-hidden, heavy paws
   Uplifted drowsily, and nervy tails
   Cowering their tawny brushes. Silent sails
   This shadowy queen athwart, and faints away
   In another gloomy arch.                                       650
 
                            Wherefore delay,
   Young traveller, in such a mournful place?
   Art thou wayworn, or canst not further trace
   The diamond path? And does it indeed end
   Abrupt in middle air? Yet earthward bend
   Thy forehead, and to Jupiter cloud-borne
   Call ardently! He was indeed wayworn;
   Abrupt, in middle air, his way was lost;
   To cloud-borne Jove he bowed, and there crost
   Towards him a large eagle, 'twixt whose wings,                660
   Without one impious word, himself he flings,
   Committed to the darkness and the gloom:
   Down, down, uncertain to what pleasant doom,
   Swift as a fathoming plummet down he fell
   Through unknown things; till exhaled asphodel,
   And rose, with spicy fannings interbreath'd,
   Came swelling forth where little caves were wreath'd
   So thick with leaves and mosses, that they seem'd
   Large honey-combs of green, and freshly teem'd
   With airs delicious. In the greenest nook                     670
   The eagle landed him, and farewel took.
 
     It was a jasmine bower, all bestrown
   With golden moss. His every sense had grown
   Ethereal for pleasure; 'bove his head
   Flew a delight half-graspable; his tread
   Was Hesperean; to his capable ears
   Silence was music from the holy spheres;
   A dewy luxury was in his eyes;
   The little flowers felt his pleasant sighs
   And stirr'd them faintly. Verdant cave and cell               680
   He wander'd through, oft wondering at such swell
   Of sudden exaltation: but, "Alas!
   Said he, "will all this gush of feeling pass
   Away in solitude? And must they wane,
   Like melodies upon a sandy plain,
   Without an echo? Then shall I be left
   So sad, so melancholy, so bereft!
   Yet still I feel immortal! O my love,
   My breath of life, where art thou? High above,
   Dancing before the morning gates of heaven?                   690
   Or keeping watch among those starry seven,
   Old Atlas' children? Art a maid of the waters,
   One of shell-winding Triton's bright-hair'd daughters?
   Or art, impossible! a nymph of Dian's,
   Weaving a coronal of tender scions
   For very idleness? Where'er thou art,
   Methinks it now is at my will to start
   Into thine arms; to scare Aurora's train,
   And snatch thee from the morning; o'er the main
   To scud like a wild bird, and take thee off                   700
   From thy sea-foamy cradle; or to doff
   Thy shepherd vest, and woo thee mid fresh leaves.
   No, no, too eagerly my soul deceives
   Its powerless self: I know this cannot be.
   O let me then by some sweet dreaming flee
   To her entrancements: hither sleep awhile!
   Hither most gentle sleep! and soothing foil
   For some few hours the coming solitude."
 
     Thus spake he, and that moment felt endued
   With power to dream deliciously; so wound                     710
   Through a dim passage, searching till he found
   The smoothest mossy bed and deepest, where
   He threw himself, and just into the air
   Stretching his indolent arms, he took, O bliss!
   A naked waist: "Fair Cupid, whence is this?"
   A well-known voice sigh'd, "Sweetest, here am I!"
   At which soft ravishment, with doating cry
   They trembled to each other.--Helicon!
   O fountain'd hill! Old Homer's Helicon!
   That thou wouldst spout a little streamlet o'er               720
   These sorry pages; then the verse would soar
   And sing above this gentle pair, like lark
   Over his nested young: but all is dark
   Around thine aged top, and thy clear fount
   Exhales in mists to heaven. Aye, the count
   Of mighty Poets is made up; the scroll
   Is folded by the Muses; the bright roll
   Is in Apollo's hand: our dazed eyes
   Have seen a new tinge in the western skies:
   The world has done its duty. Yet, oh yet,                     730
   Although the sun of poesy is set,
   These lovers did embrace, and we must weep
   That there is no old power left to steep
   A quill immortal in their joyous tears.
   Long time in silence did their anxious fears
   Question that thus it was; long time they lay
   Fondling and kissing every doubt away;
   Long time ere soft caressing sobs began
   To mellow into words, and then there ran
   Two bubbling springs of talk from their sweet lips.           740
   "O known Unknown! from whom my being sips
   Such darling essence, wherefore may I not
   Be ever in these arms? in this sweet spot
   Pillow my chin for ever? ever press
   These toying hands and kiss their smooth excess?
   Why not for ever and for ever feel
   That breath about my eyes? Ah, thou wilt steal
   Away from me again, indeed, indeed--
   Thou wilt be gone away, and wilt not heed
   My lonely madness. Speak, my kindest fair!                    750
   Is--is it to be so? No! Who will dare
   To pluck thee from me? And, of thine own will,
   Full well I feel thou wouldst not leave me. Still
   Let me entwine thee surer, surer--now
   How can we part? Elysium! who art thou?
   Who, that thou canst not be for ever here,
   Or lift me with thee to some starry sphere?
   Enchantress! tell me by this soft embrace,
   By the most soft completion of thy face,
   Those lips, O slippery blisses, twinkling eyes,               760
   And by these tenderest, milky sovereignties--
   These tenderest, and by the nectar-wine,
   The passion"----"O lov'd Ida the divine!
   Endymion! dearest! Ah, unhappy me!
   His soul will 'scape us--O felicity!
   How he does love me! His poor temples beat
   To the very tune of love--how sweet, sweet, sweet.
   Revive, dear youth, or I shall faint and die;
   Revive, or these soft hours will hurry by
   In tranced dulness; speak, and let that spell                 770
   Affright this lethargy! I cannot quell
   Its heavy pressure, and will press at least
   My lips to thine, that they may richly feast
   Until we taste the life of love again.
   What! dost thou move? dost kiss? O bliss! O pain!
   I love thee, youth, more than I can conceive;
   And so long absence from thee doth bereave
   My soul of any rest: yet must I hence:
   Yet, can I not to starry eminence
   Uplift thee; nor for very shame can own                       780
   Myself to thee. Ah, dearest, do not groan
   Or thou wilt force me from this secrecy,
   And I must blush in heaven. O that I
   Had done it already; that the dreadful smiles
   At my lost brightness, my impassion'd wiles,
   Had waned from Olympus' solemn height,
   And from all serious Gods; that our delight
   Was quite forgotten, save of us alone!
   And wherefore so ashamed? 'Tis but to atone
   For endless pleasure, by some coward blushes:                 790
   Yet must I be a coward!--Honour rushes
   Too palpable before me--the sad look
   Of Jove--Minerva's start--no bosom shook
   With awe of purity--no Cupid pinion
   In reverence veiled--my crystalline dominion
   Half lost, and all old hymns made nullity!
   But what is this to love? O I could fly
   With thee into the ken of heavenly powers,
   So thou wouldst thus, for many sequent hours,
   Press me so sweetly. Now I swear at once                      800
   That I am wise, that Pallas is a dunce--
   Perhaps her love like mine is but unknown--
   O I do think that I have been alone
   In chastity: yes, Pallas has been sighing,
   While every eye saw me my hair uptying
   With fingers cool as aspen leaves. Sweet love,
   I was as vague as solitary dove,
   Nor knew that nests were built. Now a soft kiss--
   Aye, by that kiss, I vow an endless bliss,
   An immortality of passion's thine:                            810
   Ere long I will exalt thee to the shine
   Of heaven ambrosial; and we will shade
   Ourselves whole summers by a river glade;
   And I will tell thee stories of the sky,
   And breathe thee whispers of its minstrelsy.
   My happy love will overwing all bounds!
   O let me melt into thee; let the sounds
   Of our close voices marry at their birth;
   Let us entwine hoveringly--O dearth
   Of human words! roughness of mortal speech!                   820
   Lispings empyrean will I sometime teach
   Thine honied tongue--lute-breathings, which I gasp
   To have thee understand, now while I clasp
   Thee thus, and weep for fondness--I am pain'd,
   Endymion: woe! woe! is grief contain'd
   In the very deeps of pleasure, my sole life?"--
   Hereat, with many sobs, her gentle strife
   Melted into a languor. He return'd
   Entranced vows and tears.
 
                             Ye who have yearn'd                 830
   With too much passion, will here stay and pity,
   For the mere sake of truth; as 'tis a ditty
   Not of these days, but long ago 'twas told
   By a cavern wind unto a forest old;
   And then the forest told it in a dream
   To a sleeping lake, whose cool and level gleam
   A poet caught as he was journeying
   To Phoebus' shrine; and in it he did fling
   His weary limbs, bathing an hour's space,
   And after, straight in that inspired place                    840
   He sang the story up into the air,
   Giving it universal freedom. There
   Has it been ever sounding for those ears
   Whose tips are glowing hot. The legend cheers
   Yon centinel stars; and he who listens to it
   Must surely be self-doomed or he will rue it:
   For quenchless burnings come upon the heart,
   Made fiercer by a fear lest any part
   Should be engulphed in the eddying wind.
   As much as here is penn'd doth always find                    850
   A resting place, thus much comes clear and plain;
   Anon the strange voice is upon the wane--
   And 'tis but echo'd from departing sound,
   That the fair visitant at last unwound
   Her gentle limbs, and left the youth asleep.--
   Thus the tradition of the gusty deep.
 
     Now turn we to our former chroniclers.--
   Endymion awoke, that grief of hers
   Sweet paining on his ear: he sickly guess'd
   How lone he was once more, and sadly press'd                  860
   His empty arms together, hung his head,
   And most forlorn upon that widow'd bed
   Sat silently. Love's madness he had known:
   Often with more than tortured lion's groan
   Moanings had burst from him; but now that rage
   Had pass'd away: no longer did he wage
   A rough-voic'd war against the dooming stars.
   No, he had felt too much for such harsh jars:
   The lyre of his soul Eolian tun'd
   Forgot all violence, and but commun'd                         870
   With melancholy thought: O he had swoon'd
   Drunken from pleasure's nipple; and his love
   Henceforth was dove-like.--Loth was he to move
   From the imprinted couch, and when he did,
   'Twas with slow, languid paces, and face hid
   In muffling hands. So temper'd, out he stray'd
   Half seeing visions that might have dismay'd
   Alecto's serpents; ravishments more keen
   Than Hermes' pipe, when anxious he did lean
   Over eclipsing eyes: and at the last                          880
   It was a sounding grotto, vaulted, vast,
   O'er studded with a thousand, thousand pearls,
   And crimson mouthed shells with stubborn curls,
   Of every shape and size, even to the bulk
   In which whales arbour close, to brood and sulk
   Against an endless storm. Moreover too,
   Fish-semblances, of green and azure hue,
   Ready to snort their streams. In this cool wonder
   Endymion sat down, and 'gan to ponder
   On all his life: his youth, up to the day                     890
   When 'mid acclaim, and feasts, and garlands gay,
   He stept upon his shepherd throne: the look
   Of his white palace in wild forest nook,
   And all the revels he had lorded there:
   Each tender maiden whom he once thought fair,
   With every friend and fellow-woodlander--
   Pass'd like a dream before him. Then the spur
   Of the old bards to mighty deeds: his plans
   To nurse the golden age 'mong shepherd clans:
   That wondrous night: the great Pan-festival:                  900
   His sister's sorrow; and his wanderings all,
   Until into the earth's deep maw he rush'd:
   Then all its buried magic, till it flush'd
   High with excessive love. "And now," thought he,
   "How long must I remain in jeopardy
   Of blank amazements that amaze no more?
   Now I have tasted her sweet soul to the core
   All other depths are shallow: essences,
   Once spiritual, are like muddy lees,
   Meant but to fertilize my earthly root,                       910
   And make my branches lift a golden fruit
   Into the bloom of heaven: other light,
   Though it be quick and sharp enough to blight
   The Olympian eagle's vision, is dark,
   Dark as the parentage of chaos. Hark!
   My silent thoughts are echoing from these shells;
   Or they are but the ghosts, the dying swells
   Of noises far away?--list!"--Hereupon
   He kept an anxious ear. The humming tone
   Came louder, and behold, there as he lay,                     920
   On either side outgush'd, with misty spray,
   A copious spring; and both together dash'd
   Swift, mad, fantastic round the rocks, and lash'd
   Among the conchs and shells of the lofty grot,
   Leaving a trickling dew. At last they shot
   Down from the ceiling's height, pouring a noise
   As of some breathless racers whose hopes poize
   Upon the last few steps, and with spent force
   Along the ground they took a winding course.
   Endymion follow'd--for it seem'd that one                     930
   Ever pursued, the other strove to shun--
   Follow'd their languid mazes, till well nigh
   He had left thinking of the mystery,--
   And was now rapt in tender hoverings
   Over the vanish'd bliss. Ah! what is it sings
   His dream away? What melodies are these?
   They sound as through the whispering of trees,
   Not native in such barren vaults. Give ear!
 
     "O Arethusa, peerless nymph! why fear
   Such tenderness as mine? Great Dian, why,                     940
   Why didst thou hear her prayer? O that I
   Were rippling round her dainty fairness now,
   Circling about her waist, and striving how
   To entice her to a dive! then stealing in
   Between her luscious lips and eyelids thin.
   O that her shining hair was in the sun,
   And I distilling from it thence to run
   In amorous rillets down her shrinking form!
   To linger on her lily shoulders, warm
   Between her kissing breasts, and every charm                  950
   Touch raptur'd!--See how painfully I flow:
   Fair maid, be pitiful to my great woe.
   Stay, stay thy weary course, and let me lead,
   A happy wooer, to the flowery mead
   Where all that beauty snar'd me."--"Cruel god,
   Desist! or my offended mistress' nod
   Will stagnate all thy fountains:--tease me not
   With syren words--Ah, have I really got
   Such power to madden thee? And is it true--
   Away, away, or I shall dearly rue                             960
   My very thoughts: in mercy then away,
   Kindest Alpheus, for should I obey
   My own dear will, 'twould be a deadly bane."--
   "O, Oread-Queen! would that thou hadst a pain
   Like this of mine, then would I fearless turn
   And be a criminal."--"Alas, I burn,
   I shudder--gentle river, get thee hence.
   Alpheus! thou enchanter! every sense
   Of mine was once made perfect in these woods.
   Fresh breezes, bowery lawns, and innocent floods,             970
   Ripe fruits, and lonely couch, contentment gave;
   But ever since I heedlessly did lave
   In thy deceitful stream, a panting glow
   Grew strong within me: wherefore serve me so,
   And call it love? Alas, 'twas cruelty.
   Not once more did I close my happy eyes
   Amid the thrush's song. Away! Avaunt!
   O 'twas a cruel thing."--"Now thou dost taunt
   So softly, Arethusa, that I think
   If thou wast playing on my shady brink,                       980
   Thou wouldst bathe once again. Innocent maid!
   Stifle thine heart no more:--nor be afraid
   Of angry powers: there are deities
   Will shade us with their wings. Those fitful sighs
   'Tis almost death to hear: O let me pour
   A dewy balm upon them!--fear no more,
   Sweet Arethusa! Dian's self must feel
   Sometimes these very pangs. Dear maiden, steal
   Blushing into my soul, and let us fly
   These dreary caverns for the open sky.                        990
   I will delight thee all my winding course,
   From the green sea up to my hidden source
   About Arcadian forests; and will shew
   The channels where my coolest waters flow
   Through mossy rocks; where, 'mid exuberant green,
   I roam in pleasant darkness, more unseen
   Than Saturn in his exile; where I brim
   Round flowery islands, and take thence a skim
   Of mealy sweets, which myriads of bees
   Buzz from their honied wings: and thou shouldst please
   Thyself to choose the richest, where we might                1001
   Be incense-pillow'd every summer night.
   Doff all sad fears, thou white deliciousness,
   And let us be thus comforted; unless
   Thou couldst rejoice to see my hopeless stream
   Hurry distracted from Sol's temperate beam,
   And pour to death along some hungry sands."--
   "What can I do, Alpheus? Dian stands
   Severe before me: persecuting fate!
   Unhappy Arethusa! thou wast late                             1010
   A huntress free in"--At this, sudden fell
   Those two sad streams adown a fearful dell.
   The Latmian listen'd, but he heard no more,
   Save echo, faint repeating o'er and o'er
   The name of Arethusa. On the verge
   Of that dark gulph he wept, and said: "I urge
   Thee, gentle Goddess of my pilgrimage,
   By our eternal hopes, to soothe, to assuage,
   If thou art powerful, these lovers pains;
   And make them happy in some happy plains.                    1020
 
     He turn'd--there was a whelming sound--he stept,
   There was a cooler light; and so he kept
   Towards it by a sandy path, and lo!
   More suddenly than doth a moment go,
   The visions of the earth were gone and fled--
   He saw the giant sea above his head.
 
 
 
 
 ENDYMION.
 
 BOOK III.
 
 
   There are who lord it o'er their fellow-men
   With most prevailing tinsel: who unpen
   Their baaing vanities, to browse away
   The comfortable green and juicy hay
   From human pastures; or, O torturing fact!
   Who, through an idiot blink, will see unpack'd
   Fire-branded foxes to sear up and singe
   Our gold and ripe-ear'd hopes. With not one tinge
   Of sanctuary splendour, not a sight
   Able to face an owl's, they still are dight                    10
   By the blear-eyed nations in empurpled vests,
   And crowns, and turbans. With unladen breasts,
   Save of blown self-applause, they proudly mount
   To their spirit's perch, their being's high account,
   Their tiptop nothings, their dull skies, their thrones--
   Amid the fierce intoxicating tones
   Of trumpets, shoutings, and belabour'd drums,
   And sudden cannon. All! how all this hums,
   In wakeful ears, like uproar past and gone--
   Like thunder clouds that spake to Babylon,                     20
   And set those old Chaldeans to their tasks.--
   Are then regalities all gilded masks?
   No, there are throned seats unscalable
   But by a patient wing, a constant spell,
   Or by ethereal things that, unconfin'd,
   Can make a ladder of the eternal wind,
   And poise about in cloudy thunder-tents
   To watch the abysm-birth of elements.
   Aye, 'bove the withering of old-lipp'd Fate
   A thousand Powers keep religious state,                        30
   In water, fiery realm, and airy bourne;
   And, silent as a consecrated urn,
   Hold sphery sessions for a season due.
   Yet few of these far majesties, ah, few!
   Have bared their operations to this globe--
   Few, who with gorgeous pageantry enrobe
   Our piece of heaven--whose benevolence
   Shakes hand with our own Ceres; every sense
   Filling with spiritual sweets to plenitude,
   As bees gorge full their cells. And, by the feud               40
   'Twixt Nothing and Creation, I here swear,
   Eterne Apollo! that thy Sister fair
   Is of all these the gentlier-mightiest.
   When thy gold breath is misting in the west,
   She unobserved steals unto her throne,
   And there she sits most meek and most alone;
   As if she had not pomp subservient;
   As if thine eye, high Poet! was not bent
   Towards her with the Muses in thine heart;
   As if the ministring stars kept not apart,                     50
   Waiting for silver-footed messages.
   O Moon! the oldest shades 'mong oldest trees
   Feel palpitations when thou lookest in:
   O Moon! old boughs lisp forth a holier din
   The while they feel thine airy fellowship.
   Thou dost bless every where, with silver lip
   Kissing dead things to life. The sleeping kine,
   Couched in thy brightness, dream of fields divine:
   Innumerable mountains rise, and rise,
   Ambitious for the hallowing of thine eyes;                     60
   And yet thy benediction passeth not
   One obscure hiding-place, one little spot
   Where pleasure may be sent: the nested wren
   Has thy fair face within its tranquil ken,
   And from beneath a sheltering ivy leaf
   Takes glimpses of thee; thou art a relief
   To the poor patient oyster, where it sleeps
   Within its pearly house.--The mighty deeps,
   The monstrous sea is thine--the myriad sea!
   O Moon! far-spooming Ocean bows to thee,                       70
   And Tellus feels his forehead's cumbrous load.
 
     Cynthia! where art thou now? What far abode
   Of green or silvery bower doth enshrine
   Such utmost beauty? Alas, thou dost pine
   For one as sorrowful: thy cheek is pale
   For one whose cheek is pale: thou dost bewail
   His tears, who weeps for thee. Where dost thou sigh?
   Ah! surely that light peeps from Vesper's eye,
   Or what a thing is love! 'Tis She, but lo!
   How chang'd, how full of ache, how gone in woe!                80
   She dies at the thinnest cloud; her loveliness
   Is wan on Neptune's blue: yet there's a stress
   Of love-spangles, just off yon cape of trees,
   Dancing upon the waves, as if to please
   The curly foam with amorous influence.
   O, not so idle: for down-glancing thence
   She fathoms eddies, and runs wild about
   O'erwhelming water-courses; scaring out
   The thorny sharks from hiding-holes, and fright'ning
   Their savage eyes with unaccustomed lightning.                 90
   Where will the splendor be content to reach?
   O love! how potent hast thou been to teach
   Strange journeyings! Wherever beauty dwells,
   In gulf or aerie, mountains or deep dells,
   In light, in gloom, in star or blazing sun,
   Thou pointest out the way, and straight 'tis won.
   Amid his toil thou gav'st Leander breath;
   Thou leddest Orpheus through the gleams of death;
   Thou madest Pluto bear thin element;
   And now, O winged Chieftain! them hast sent                   100
   A moon-beam to the deep, deep water-world,
   To find Endymion.
 
                     On gold sand impearl'd
   With lily shells, and pebbles milky white,
   Poor Cynthia greeted him, and sooth'd her light
   Against his pallid face: he felt the charm
   To breathlessness, and suddenly a warm
   Of his heart's blood: 'twas very sweet; he stay'd
   His wandering steps, and half-entranced laid
   His head upon a tuft of straggling weeds,                     110
   To taste the gentle moon, and freshening beads,
   Lashed from the crystal roof by fishes' tails.
   And so he kept, until the rosy veils
   Mantling the east, by Aurora's peering hand
   Were lifted from the water's breast, and faun'd
   Into sweet air; and sober'd morning came
   Meekly through billows:--when like taper-flame
   Left sudden by a dallying breath of air,
   He rose in silence, and once more 'gan fare
   Along his fated way.                                          120
 
                         Far had he roam'd,
   With nothing save the hollow vast, that foam'd
   Above, around, and at his feet; save things
   More dead than Morpheus' imaginings:
   Old rusted anchors, helmets, breast-plates large
   Of gone sea-warriors; brazen beaks and targe;
   Rudders that for a hundred years had lost
   The sway of human hand; gold vase emboss'd
   With long-forgotten story, and wherein
   No reveller had ever dipp'd a chin                            130
   But those of Saturn's vintage; mouldering scrolls,
   Writ in the tongue of heaven, by those souls
   Who first were on the earth; and sculptures rude
   In ponderous stone, developing the mood
   Of ancient Nox;--then skeletons of man,
   Of beast, behemoth, and leviathan,
   And elephant, and eagle, and huge jaw
   Of nameless monster. A cold leaden awe
   These secrets struck into him; and unless
   Dian had chaced away that heaviness,                          140
   He might have died: but now, with cheered feel,
   He onward kept; wooing these thoughts to steal
   About the labyrinth in his soul of love.
 
     "What is there in thee, Moon! that thou shouldst move
   My heart so potently? When yet a child
   I oft have dried my tears when thou hast smil'd.
   Thou seem'dst my sister: hand in hand we went
   From eve to morn across the firmament.
   No apples would I gather from the tree,
   Till thou hadst cool'd their cheeks deliciously:              150
   No tumbling water ever spake romance,
   But when my eyes with thine thereon could dance:
   No woods were green enough, no bower divine,
   Until thou liftedst up thine eyelids fine:
   In sowing time ne'er would I dibble take,
   Or drop a seed, till thou wast wide awake;
   And, in the summer tide of blossoming,
   No one but thee hath heard me blithly sing
   And mesh my dewy flowers all the night.
   No melody was like a passing spright                          160
   If it went not to solemnize thy reign.
   Yes, in my boyhood, every joy and pain
   By thee were fashion'd to the self-same end;
   And as I grew in years, still didst thou blend
   With all my ardours: thou wast the deep glen;
   Thou wast the mountain-top--the sage's pen--
   The poet's harp--the voice of friends--the sun;
   Thou wast the river--thou wast glory won;
   Thou wast my clarion's blast--thou wast my steed--
   My goblet full of wine--my topmost deed:--                    170
   Thou wast the charm of women, lovely Moon!
   O what a wild and harmonized tune
   My spirit struck from all the beautiful!
   On some bright essence could I lean, and lull
   Myself to immortality: I prest
   Nature's soft pillow in a wakeful rest.
   But, gentle Orb! there came a nearer bliss--
   My strange love came--Felicity's abyss!
   She came, and thou didst fade, and fade away--
   Yet not entirely; no, thy starry sway                         180
   Has been an under-passion to this hour.
   Now I begin to feel thine orby power
   Is coming fresh upon me: O be kind,
   Keep back thine influence, and do not blind
   My sovereign vision.--Dearest love, forgive
   That I can think away from thee and live!--
   Pardon me, airy planet, that I prize
   One thought beyond thine argent luxuries!
   How far beyond!" At this a surpris'd start
   Frosted the springing verdure of his heart;                   190
   For as he lifted up his eyes to swear
   How his own goddess was past all things fair,
   He saw far in the concave green of the sea
   An old man sitting calm and peacefully.
   Upon a weeded rock this old man sat,
   And his white hair was awful, and a mat
   Of weeds were cold beneath his cold thin feet;
   And, ample as the largest winding-sheet,
   A cloak of blue wrapp'd up his aged bones,
   O'erwrought with symbols by the deepest groans                200
   Of ambitious magic: every ocean-form
   Was woven in with black distinctness; storm,
   And calm, and whispering, and hideous roar
   Were emblem'd in the woof; with every shape
   That skims, or dives, or sleeps, 'twixt cape and cape.
   The gulphing whale was like a dot in the spell,
   Yet look upon it, and 'twould size and swell
   To its huge self; and the minutest fish
   Would pass the very hardest gazer's wish,
   And shew his little eye's anatomy.                            210
   Then there was pictur'd the regality
   Of Neptune; and the sea nymphs round his state,
   In beauteous vassalage, look up and wait.
   Beside this old man lay a pearly wand,
   And in his lap a book, the which he conn'd
   So stedfastly, that the new denizen
   Had time to keep him in amazed ken,
   To mark these shadowings, and stand in awe.
 
     The old man rais'd his hoary head and saw
   The wilder'd stranger--seeming not to see,                    220
   His features were so lifeless. Suddenly
   He woke as from a trance; his snow-white brows
   Went arching up, and like two magic ploughs
   Furrow'd deep wrinkles in his forehead large,
   Which kept as fixedly as rocky marge,
   Till round his wither'd lips had gone a smile.
   Then up he rose, like one whose tedious toil
   Had watch'd for years in forlorn hermitage,
   Who had not from mid-life to utmost age
   Eas'd in one accent his o'er-burden'd soul,                   230
   Even to the trees. He rose: he grasp'd his stole,
   With convuls'd clenches waving it abroad,
   And in a voice of solemn joy, that aw'd
   Echo into oblivion, he said:--
 
     "Thou art the man! Now shall I lay my head
   In peace upon my watery pillow: now
   Sleep will come smoothly to my weary brow.
   O Jove! I shall be young again, be young!
   O shell-borne Neptune, I am pierc'd and stung
   With new-born life! What shall I do? Where go,                240
   When I have cast this serpent-skin of woe?--
   I'll swim to the syrens, and one moment listen
   Their melodies, and see their long hair glisten;
   Anon upon that giant's arm I'll be,
   That writhes about the roots of Sicily:
   To northern seas I'll in a twinkling sail,
   And mount upon the snortings of a whale
   To some black cloud; thence down I'll madly sweep
   On forked lightning, to the deepest deep,
   Where through some sucking pool I will be hurl'd              250
   With rapture to the other side of the world!
   O, I am full of gladness! Sisters three,
   I bow full hearted to your old decree!
   Yes, every god be thank'd, and power benign,
   For I no more shall wither, droop, and pine.
   Thou art the man!" Endymion started back
   Dismay'd; and, like a wretch from whom the rack
   Tortures hot breath, and speech of agony,
   Mutter'd: "What lonely death am I to die
   In this cold region? Will he let me freeze,                   260
   And float my brittle limbs o'er polar seas?
   Or will he touch me with his searing hand,
   And leave a black memorial on the sand?
   Or tear me piece-meal with a bony saw,
   And keep me as a chosen food to draw
   His magian fish through hated fire and flame?
   O misery of hell! resistless, tame,
   Am I to be burnt up? No, I will shout,
   Until the gods through heaven's blue look out!--
   O Tartarus! but some few days agone                           270
   Her soft arms were entwining me, and on
   Her voice I hung like fruit among green leaves:
   Her lips were all my own, and--ah, ripe sheaves
   Of happiness! ye on the stubble droop,
   But never may be garner'd. I must stoop
   My head, and kiss death's foot. Love! love, farewel!
   Is there no hope from thee? This horrid spell
   Would melt at thy sweet breath.--By Dian's hind
   Feeding from her white fingers, on the wind
   I see thy streaming hair! and now, by Pan,                    280
   I care not for this old mysterious man!"
 
     He spake, and walking to that aged form,
   Look'd high defiance. Lo! his heart 'gan warm
   With pity, for the grey-hair'd creature wept.
   Had he then wrong'd a heart where sorrow kept?
   Had he, though blindly contumelious, brought
   Rheum to kind eyes, a sting to human thought,
   Convulsion to a mouth of many years?
   He had in truth; and he was ripe for tears.
   The penitent shower fell, as down he knelt                    290
   Before that care-worn sage, who trembling felt
   About his large dark locks, and faultering spake:
 
     "Arise, good youth, for sacred Phoebus' sake!
   I know thine inmost bosom, and I feel
   A very brother's yearning for thee steal
   Into mine own: for why? thou openest
   The prison gates that have so long opprest
   My weary watching. Though thou know'st it not,
   Thou art commission'd to this fated spot
   For great enfranchisement. O weep no more;                    300
   I am a friend to love, to loves of yore:
   Aye, hadst thou never lov'd an unknown power,
   I had been grieving at this joyous hour.
   But even now most miserable old,
   I saw thee, and my blood no longer cold
   Gave mighty pulses: in this tottering case
   Grew a new heart, which at this moment plays
   As dancingly as thine. Be not afraid,
   For thou shalt hear this secret all display'd,
   Now as we speed towards our joyous task."                     310
 
     So saying, this young soul in age's mask
   Went forward with the Carian side by side:
   Resuming quickly thus; while ocean's tide
   Hung swollen at their backs, and jewel'd sands
   Took silently their foot-prints.
 
                                    "My soul stands
   Now past the midway from mortality,
   And so I can prepare without a sigh
   To tell thee briefly all my joy and pain.
   I was a fisher once, upon this main,                          320
   And my boat danc'd in every creek and bay;
   Rough billows were my home by night and day,--
   The sea-gulls not more constant; for I had
   No housing from the storm and tempests mad,
   But hollow rocks,--and they were palaces
   Of silent happiness, of slumberous ease:
   Long years of misery have told me so.
   Aye, thus it was one thousand years ago.
   One thousand years!--Is it then possible
   To look so plainly through them? to dispel                    330
   A thousand years with backward glance sublime?
   To breathe away as 'twere all scummy slime
   From off a crystal pool, to see its deep,
   And one's own image from the bottom peep?
   Yes: now I am no longer wretched thrall,
   My long captivity and moanings all
   Are but a slime, a thin-pervading scum,
   The which I breathe away, and thronging come
   Like things of yesterday my youthful pleasures.
 
     "I touch'd no lute, I sang not, trod no measures:
   I was a lonely youth on desert shores.                        341
   My sports were lonely, 'mid continuous roars,
   And craggy isles, and sea-mew's plaintive cry
   Plaining discrepant between sea and sky.
   Dolphins were still my playmates; shapes unseen
   Would let me feel their scales of gold and green,
   Nor be my desolation; and, full oft,
   When a dread waterspout had rear'd aloft
   Its hungry hugeness, seeming ready ripe
   To burst with hoarsest thunderings, and wipe                  350
   My life away like a vast sponge of fate,
   Some friendly monster, pitying my sad state,
   Has dived to its foundations, gulph'd it down,
   And left me tossing safely. But the crown
   Of all my life was utmost quietude:
   More did I love to lie in cavern rude,
   Keeping in wait whole days for Neptune's voice,
   And if it came at last, hark, and rejoice!
   There blush'd no summer eve but I would steer
   My skiff along green shelving coasts, to hear                 360
   The shepherd's pipe come clear from aery steep,
   Mingled with ceaseless bleatings of his sheep:
   And never was a day of summer shine,
   But I beheld its birth upon the brine:
   For I would watch all night to see unfold
   Heaven's gates, and AEthon snort his morning gold
   Wide o'er the swelling streams: and constantly
   At brim of day-tide, on some grassy lea,
   My nets would be spread out, and I at rest.
   The poor folk of the sea-country I blest                      370
   With daily boon of fish most delicate:
   They knew not whence this bounty, and elate
   Would strew sweet flowers on a sterile beach.
 
     "Why was I not contented? Wherefore reach
   At things which, but for thee, O Latmian!
   Had been my dreary death? Fool! I began
   To feel distemper'd longings: to desire
   The utmost privilege that ocean's sire
   Could grant in benediction: to be free
   Of all his kingdom. Long in misery                            380
   I wasted, ere in one extremest fit
   I plung'd for life or death. To interknit
   One's senses with so dense a breathing stuff
   Might seem a work of pain; so not enough
   Can I admire how crystal-smooth it felt,
   And buoyant round my limbs. At first I dwelt
   Whole days and days in sheer astonishment;
   Forgetful utterly of self-intent;
   Moving but with the mighty ebb and flow.
   Then, like a new fledg'd bird that first doth shew            390
   His spreaded feathers to the morrow chill,
   I tried in fear the pinions of my will.
   'Twas freedom! and at once I visited
   The ceaseless wonders of this ocean-bed.
   No need to tell thee of them, for I see
   That thou hast been a witness--it must be--
   For these I know thou canst not feel a drouth,
   By the melancholy corners of that mouth.
   So I will in my story straightway pass
   To more immediate matter. Woe, alas!                          400
   That love should be my bane! Ah, Scylla fair!
   Why did poor Glaucus ever--ever dare
   To sue thee to his heart? Kind stranger-youth!
   I lov'd her to the very white of truth,
   And she would not conceive it. Timid thing!
   She fled me swift as sea-bird on the wing,
   Round every isle, and point, and promontory,
   From where large Hercules wound up his story
   Far as Egyptian Nile. My passion grew
   The more, the more I saw her dainty hue                       410
   Gleam delicately through the azure clear:
   Until 'twas too fierce agony to bear;
   And in that agony, across my grief
   It flash'd, that Circe might find some relief--
   Cruel enchantress! So above the water
   I rear'd my head, and look'd for Phoebus' daughter.
   AEaea's isle was wondering at the moon:--
   It seem'd to whirl around me, and a swoon
   Left me dead-drifting to that fatal power.
 
     "When I awoke, 'twas in a twilight bower;                   420
   Just when the light of morn, with hum of bees,
   Stole through its verdurous matting of fresh trees.
   How sweet, and sweeter! for I heard a lyre,
   And over it a sighing voice expire.
   It ceased--I caught light footsteps; and anon
   The fairest face that morn e'er look'd upon
   Push'd through a screen of roses. Starry Jove!
   With tears, and smiles, and honey-words she wove
   A net whose thraldom was more bliss than all
   The range of flower'd Elysium. Thus did fall                  430
   The dew of her rich speech: "Ah! Art awake?
   O let me hear thee speak, for Cupid's sake!
   I am so oppress'd with joy! Why, I have shed
   An urn of tears, as though thou wert cold dead;
   And now I find thee living, I will pour
   From these devoted eyes their silver store,
   Until exhausted of the latest drop,
   So it will pleasure thee, and force thee stop
   Here, that I too may live: but if beyond
   Such cool and sorrowful offerings, thou art fond              440
   Of soothing warmth, of dalliance supreme;
   If thou art ripe to taste a long love dream;
   If smiles, if dimples, tongues for ardour mute,
   Hang in thy vision like a tempting fruit,
   O let me pluck it for thee." Thus she link'd
   Her charming syllables, till indistinct
   Their music came to my o'er-sweeten'd soul;
   And then she hover'd over me, and stole
   So near, that if no nearer it had been
   This furrow'd visage thou hadst never seen.                   450
 
     "Young man of Latmos! thus particular
   Am I, that thou may'st plainly see how far
   This fierce temptation went: and thou may'st not
   Exclaim, How then, was Scylla quite forgot?
 
     "Who could resist? Who in this universe?
   She did so breathe ambrosia; so immerse
   My fine existence in a golden clime.
   She took me like a child of suckling time,
   And cradled me in roses. Thus condemn'd,
   The current of my former life was stemm'd,                    460
   And to this arbitrary queen of sense
   I bow'd a tranced vassal: nor would thence
   Have mov'd, even though Amphion's harp had woo'd
   Me back to Scylla o'er the billows rude.
   For as Apollo each eve doth devise
   A new appareling for western skies;
   So every eve, nay every spendthrift hour
   Shed balmy consciousness within that bower.
   And I was free of haunts umbrageous;
   Could wander in the mazy forest-house                         470
   Of squirrels, foxes shy, and antler'd deer,
   And birds from coverts innermost and drear
   Warbling for very joy mellifluous sorrow--
   To me new born delights!
 
                            "Now let me borrow,
   For moments few, a temperament as stern
   As Pluto's sceptre, that my words not burn
   These uttering lips, while I in calm speech tell
   How specious heaven was changed to real hell.
 
     "One morn she left me sleeping: half awake                  480
   I sought for her smooth arms and lips, to slake
   My greedy thirst with nectarous camel-draughts;
   But she was gone. Whereat the barbed shafts
   Of disappointment stuck in me so sore,
   That out I ran and search'd the forest o'er.
   Wandering about in pine and cedar gloom
   Damp awe assail'd me; for there 'gan to boom
   A sound of moan, an agony of sound,
   Sepulchral from the distance all around.
   Then came a conquering earth-thunder, and rumbled             490
   That fierce complain to silence: while I stumbled
   Down a precipitous path, as if impell'd.
   I came to a dark valley.--Groanings swell'd
   Poisonous about my ears, and louder grew,
   The nearer I approach'd a flame's gaunt blue,
   That glar'd before me through a thorny brake.
   This fire, like the eye of gordian snake,
   Bewitch'd me towards; and I soon was near
   A sight too fearful for the feel of fear:
   In thicket hid I curs'd the haggard scene--                   500
   The banquet of my arms, my arbour queen,
   Seated upon an uptorn forest root;
   And all around her shapes, wizard and brute,
   Laughing, and wailing, groveling, serpenting,
   Shewing tooth, tusk, and venom-bag, and sting!
   O such deformities! Old Charon's self,
   Should he give up awhile his penny pelf,
   And take a dream 'mong rushes Stygian,
   It could not be so phantasied. Fierce, wan,
   And tyrannizing was the lady's look,                          510
   As over them a gnarled staff she shook.
   Oft-times upon the sudden she laugh'd out,
   And from a basket emptied to the rout
   Clusters of grapes, the which they raven'd quick
   And roar'd for more; with many a hungry lick
   About their shaggy jaws. Avenging, slow,
   Anon she took a branch of mistletoe,
   And emptied on't a black dull-gurgling phial:
   Groan'd one and all, as if some piercing trial
   Was sharpening for their pitiable bones.                      520
   She lifted up the charm: appealing groans
   From their poor breasts went sueing to her ear
   In vain; remorseless as an infant's bier
   She whisk'd against their eyes the sooty oil.
   Whereat was heard a noise of painful toil,
   Increasing gradual to a tempest rage,
   Shrieks, yells, and groans of torture-pilgrimage;
   Until their grieved bodies 'gan to bloat
   And puff from the tail's end to stifled throat:
   Then was appalling silence: then a sight                      530
   More wildering than all that hoarse affright;
   For the whole herd, as by a whirlwind writhen,
   Went through the dismal air like one huge Python
   Antagonizing Boreas,--and so vanish'd.
   Yet there was not a breath of wind: she banish'd
   These phantoms with a nod. Lo! from the dark
   Came waggish fauns, and nymphs, and satyrs stark,
   With dancing and loud revelry,--and went
   Swifter than centaurs after rapine bent.--
   Sighing an elephant appear'd and bow'd                        540
   Before the fierce witch, speaking thus aloud
   In human accent: "Potent goddess! chief
   Of pains resistless! make my being brief,
   Or let me from this heavy prison fly:
   Or give me to the air, or let me die!
   I sue not for my happy crown again;
   I sue not for my phalanx on the plain;
   I sue not for my lone, my widow'd wife;
   I sue not for my ruddy drops of life,
   My children fair, my lovely girls and boys!                   550
   I will forget them; I will pass these joys;
   Ask nought so heavenward, so too--too high:
   Only I pray, as fairest boon, to die,
   Or be deliver'd from this cumbrous flesh,
   From this gross, detestable, filthy mesh,
   And merely given to the cold bleak air.
   Have mercy, Goddess! Circe, feel my prayer!"
 
     That curst magician's name fell icy numb
   Upon my wild conjecturing: truth had come
   Naked and sabre-like against my heart.                        560
   I saw a fury whetting a death-dart;
   And my slain spirit, overwrought with fright,
   Fainted away in that dark lair of night.
   Think, my deliverer, how desolate
   My waking must have been! disgust, and hate,
   And terrors manifold divided me
   A spoil amongst them. I prepar'd to flee
   Into the dungeon core of that wild wood:
   I fled three days--when lo! before me stood
   Glaring the angry witch. O Dis, even now,                     570
   A clammy dew is beading on my brow,
   At mere remembering her pale laugh, and curse.
   "Ha! ha! Sir Dainty! there must be a nurse
   Made of rose leaves and thistledown, express,
   To cradle thee my sweet, and lull thee: yes,
   I am too flinty-hard for thy nice touch:
   My tenderest squeeze is but a giant's clutch.
   So, fairy-thing, it shall have lullabies
   Unheard of yet; and it shall still its cries
   Upon some breast more lily-feminine.                          580
   Oh, no--it shall not pine, and pine, and pine
   More than one pretty, trifling thousand years;
   And then 'twere pity, but fate's gentle shears
   Cut short its immortality. Sea-flirt!
   Young dove of the waters! truly I'll not hurt
   One hair of thine: see how I weep and sigh,
   That our heart-broken parting is so nigh.
   And must we part? Ah, yes, it must be so.
   Yet ere thou leavest me in utter woe,
   Let me sob over thee my last adieus,                          590
   And speak a blessing: Mark me! Thou hast thews
   Immortal, for thou art of heavenly race:
   But such a love is mine, that here I chase
   Eternally away from thee all bloom
   Of youth, and destine thee towards a tomb.
   Hence shalt thou quickly to the watery vast;
   And there, ere many days be overpast,
   Disabled age shall seize thee; and even then
   Thou shalt not go the way of aged men;
   But live and wither, cripple and still breathe                600
   Ten hundred years: which gone, I then bequeath
   Thy fragile bones to unknown burial.
   Adieu, sweet love, adieu!"--As shot stars fall,
   She fled ere I could groan for mercy. Stung
   And poisoned was my spirit: despair sung
   A war-song of defiance 'gainst all hell.
   A hand was at my shoulder to compel
   My sullen steps; another 'fore my eyes
   Moved on with pointed finger. In this guise
   Enforced, at the last by ocean's foam                         610
   I found me; by my fresh, my native home.
   Its tempering coolness, to my life akin,
   Came salutary as I waded in;
   And, with a blind voluptuous rage, I gave
   Battle to the swollen billow-ridge, and drave
   Large froth before me, while there yet remain'd
   Hale strength, nor from my bones all marrow drain'd.
 
     "Young lover, I must weep--such hellish spite
   With dry cheek who can tell? While thus my might
   Proving upon this element, dismay'd,                          620
   Upon a dead thing's face my hand I laid;
   I look'd--'twas Scylla! Cursed, cursed Circe!
   O vulture-witch, hast never heard of mercy?
   Could not thy harshest vengeance be content,
   But thou must nip this tender innocent
   Because I lov'd her?--Cold, O cold indeed
   Were her fair limbs, and like a common weed
   The sea-swell took her hair. Dead as she was
   I clung about her waist, nor ceas'd to pass
   Fleet as an arrow through unfathom'd brine,                   630
   Until there shone a fabric crystalline,
   Ribb'd and inlaid with coral, pebble, and pearl.
   Headlong I darted; at one eager swirl
   Gain'd its bright portal, enter'd, and behold!
   'Twas vast, and desolate, and icy-cold;
   And all around--But wherefore this to thee
   Who in few minutes more thyself shalt see?--
   I left poor Scylla in a niche and fled.
   My fever'd parchings up, my scathing dread
   Met palsy half way: soon these limbs became                   640
   Gaunt, wither'd, sapless, feeble, cramp'd, and lame.
 
     "Now let me pass a cruel, cruel space,
   Without one hope, without one faintest trace
   Of mitigation, or redeeming bubble
   Of colour'd phantasy; for I fear 'twould trouble
   Thy brain to loss of reason: and next tell
   How a restoring chance came down to quell
   One half of the witch in me.
 
                                 "On a day,
   Sitting upon a rock above the spray,                          650
   I saw grow up from the horizon's brink
   A gallant vessel: soon she seem'd to sink
   Away from me again, as though her course
   Had been resum'd in spite of hindering force--
   So vanish'd: and not long, before arose
   Dark clouds, and muttering of winds morose.
   Old Eolus would stifle his mad spleen,
   But could not: therefore all the billows green
   Toss'd up the silver spume against the clouds.
   The tempest came: I saw that vessel's shrouds                 660
   In perilous bustle; while upon the deck
   Stood trembling creatures. I beheld the wreck;
   The final gulphing; the poor struggling souls:
   I heard their cries amid loud thunder-rolls.
   O they had all been sav'd but crazed eld
   Annull'd my vigorous cravings: and thus quell'd
   And curb'd, think on't, O Latmian! did I sit
   Writhing with pity, and a cursing fit
   Against that hell-born Circe. The crew had gone,
   By one and one, to pale oblivion;                             670
   And I was gazing on the surges prone,
   With many a scalding tear and many a groan,
   When at my feet emerg'd an old man's hand,
   Grasping this scroll, and this same slender wand.
   I knelt with pain--reached out my hand--had grasp'd
   These treasures--touch'd the knuckles--they unclasp'd--
   I caught a finger: but the downward weight
   O'erpowered me--it sank. Then 'gan abate
   The storm, and through chill aguish gloom outburst
   The comfortable sun. I was athirst                            680
   To search the book, and in the warming air
   Parted its dripping leaves with eager care.
   Strange matters did it treat of, and drew on
   My soul page after page, till well-nigh won
   Into forgetfulness; when, stupefied,
   I read these words, and read again, and tried
   My eyes against the heavens, and read again.
   O what a load of misery and pain
   Each Atlas-line bore off!--a shine of hope
   Came gold around me, cheering me to cope                      690
   Strenuous with hellish tyranny. Attend!
   For thou hast brought their promise to an end.
 
     "_In the wide sea there lives a forlorn wretch,
   Doom'd with enfeebled carcase to outstretch
   His loath'd existence through ten centuries,
   And then to die alone. Who can devise
   A total opposition? No one. So
   One million times ocean must ebb and flow,
   And he oppressed. Yet he shall not die,
   These things accomplish'd:--If he utterly_                    700
   _Scans all the depths of magic, and expounds
   The meanings of all motions, shapes, and sounds;
   If he explores all forms and substances
   Straight homeward to their symbol-essences;
   He shall not die. Moreover, and in chief,_
   _He must pursue this task of joy and grief
   Most piously;--all lovers tempest-tost,
   And in the savage overwhelming lost,
   He shall deposit side by side, until
   Time's creeping shall the dreary space fulfil:_               710
   _Which done, and all these labours ripened,
   A youth, by heavenly power lov'd and led,
   Shall stand before him; whom he shall direct
   How to consummate all. The youth elect
   Must do the thing, or both will be destroy'd._"--
 
     "Then," cried the young Endymion, overjoy'd,
   "We are twin brothers in this destiny!
   Say, I intreat thee, what achievement high
   Is, in this restless world, for me reserv'd.
   What! if from thee my wandering feet had swerv'd,             720
   Had we both perish'd?"--"Look!" the sage replied,
   "Dost thou not mark a gleaming through the tide,
   Of divers brilliances? 'tis the edifice
   I told thee of, where lovely Scylla lies;
   And where I have enshrined piously
   All lovers, whom fell storms have doom'd to die
   Throughout my bondage." Thus discoursing, on
   They went till unobscur'd the porches shone;
   Which hurryingly they gain'd, and enter'd straight.
   Sure never since king Neptune held his state                  730
   Was seen such wonder underneath the stars.
   Turn to some level plain where haughty Mars
   Has legion'd all his battle; and behold
   How every soldier, with firm foot, doth hold
   His even breast: see, many steeled squares,
   And rigid ranks of iron--whence who dares
   One step? Imagine further, line by line,
   These warrior thousands on the field supine:--
   So in that crystal place, in silent rows,
   Poor lovers lay at rest from joys and woes.--                 740
   The stranger from the mountains, breathless, trac'd
   Such thousands of shut eyes in order plac'd;
   Such ranges of white feet, and patient lips
   All ruddy,--for here death no blossom nips.
   He mark'd their brows and foreheads; saw their hair
   Put sleekly on one side with nicest care;
   And each one's gentle wrists, with reverence,
   Put cross-wise to its heart.
 
                                 "Let us commence,
   Whisper'd the guide, stuttering with joy, even now."          750
   He spake, and, trembling like an aspen-bough,
   Began to tear his scroll in pieces small,
   Uttering the while some mumblings funeral.
   He tore it into pieces small as snow
   That drifts unfeather'd when bleak northerns blow;
   And having done it, took his dark blue cloak
   And bound it round Endymion: then struck
   His wand against the empty air times nine.--
   "What more there is to do, young man, is thine:
   But first a little patience; first undo                       760
   This tangled thread, and wind it to a clue.
   Ah, gentle! 'tis as weak as spider's skein;
   And shouldst thou break it--What, is it done so clean?
   A power overshadows thee! Oh, brave!
   The spite of hell is tumbling to its grave.
   Here is a shell; 'tis pearly blank to me,
   Nor mark'd with any sign or charactery--
   Canst thou read aught? O read for pity's sake!
   Olympus! we are safe! Now, Carian, break
   This wand against yon lyre on the pedestal."                  770
 
     'Twas done: and straight with sudden swell and fall
   Sweet music breath'd her soul away, and sigh'd
   A lullaby to silence.--"Youth! now strew
   These minced leaves on me, and passing through
   Those files of dead, scatter the same around,
   And thou wilt see the issue."--'Mid the sound
   Of flutes and viols, ravishing his heart,
   Endymion from Glaucus stood apart,
   And scatter'd in his face some fragments light.
   How lightning-swift the change! a youthful wight              780
   Smiling beneath a coral diadem,
   Out-sparkling sudden like an upturn'd gem,
   Appear'd, and, stepping to a beauteous corse,
   Kneel'd down beside it, and with tenderest force
   Press'd its cold hand, and wept,--and Scylla sigh'd!
   Endymion, with quick hand, the charm applied--
   The nymph arose: he left them to their joy,
   And onward went upon his high employ,
   Showering those powerful fragments on the dead.
   And, as he pass'd, each lifted up its head,                   790
   As doth a flower at Apollo's touch.
   Death felt it to his inwards: 'twas too much:
   Death fell a weeping in his charnel-house.
   The Latmian persever'd along, and thus
   All were re-animated. There arose
   A noise of harmony, pulses and throes
   Of gladness in the air--while many, who
   Had died in mutual arms devout and true,
   Sprang to each other madly; and the rest
   Felt a high certainty of being blest.                         800
   They gaz'd upon Endymion. Enchantment
   Grew drunken, and would have its head and bent.
   Delicious symphonies, like airy flowers,
   Budded, and swell'd, and, full-blown, shed full showers
   Of light, soft, unseen leaves of sounds divine.
   The two deliverers tasted a pure wine
   Of happiness, from fairy-press ooz'd out.
   Speechless they eyed each other, and about
   The fair assembly wander'd to and fro,
   Distracted with the richest overflow                          810
   Of joy that ever pour'd from heaven.
 
                                   ----"Away!"
   Shouted the new born god; "Follow, and pay
   Our piety to Neptunus supreme!"--
   Then Scylla, blushing sweetly from her dream,
   They led on first, bent to her meek surprise,
   Though portal columns of a giant size,
   Into the vaulted, boundless emerald.
   Joyous all follow'd, as the leader call'd,
   Down marble steps; pouring as easily                          820
   As hour-glass sand,--and fast, as you might see
   Swallows obeying the south summer's call,
   Or swans upon a gentle waterfall.
 
     Thus went that beautiful multitude, nor far,
   Ere from among some rocks of glittering spar,
   Just within ken, they saw descending thick
   Another multitude. Whereat more quick
   Moved either host. On a wide sand they met,
   And of those numbers every eye was wet;
   For each their old love found. A murmuring rose,              830
   Like what was never heard in all the throes
   Of wind and waters: 'tis past human wit
   To tell; 'tis dizziness to think of it.
 
     This mighty consummation made, the host
   Mov'd on for many a league; and gain'd, and lost
   Huge sea-marks; vanward swelling in array,
   And from the rear diminishing away,--
   Till a faint dawn surpris'd them. Glaucus cried,
   "Behold! behold, the palace of his pride!
   God Neptune's palaces!" With noise increas'd,                 840
   They shoulder'd on towards that brightening cast.
   At every onward step proud domes arose
   In prospect,--diamond gleams, and golden glows
   Of amber 'gainst their faces levelling.
   Joyous, and many as the leaves in spring,
   Still onward; still the splendour gradual swell'd.
   Rich opal domes were seen, on high upheld
   By jasper pillars, letting through their shafts
   A blush of coral. Copious wonder-draughts
   Each gazer drank; and deeper drank more near:                 850
   For what poor mortals fragment up, as mere
   As marble was there lavish, to the vast
   Of one fair palace, that far far surpass'd,
   Even for common bulk, those olden three,
   Memphis, and Babylon, and Nineveh.
 
     As large, as bright, as colour'd as the bow
   Of Iris, when unfading it doth shew
   Beyond a silvery shower, was the arch
   Through which this Paphian army took its march,
   Into the outer courts of Neptune's state:                     860
   Whence could be seen, direct, a golden gate,
   To which the leaders sped; but not half raught
   Ere it burst open swift as fairy thought,
   And made those dazzled thousands veil their eyes
   Like callow eagles at the first sunrise.
   Soon with an eagle nativeness their gaze
   Ripe from hue-golden swoons took all the blaze,
   And then, behold! large Neptune on his throne
   Of emerald deep: yet not exalt alone;
   At his right hand stood winged Love, and on                   870
   His left sat smiling Beauty's paragon.
 
     Far as the mariner on highest mast
   Can see all round upon the calmed vast,
   So wide was Neptune's hall: and as the blue
   Doth vault the waters, so the waters drew
   Their doming curtains, high, magnificent,
   Aw'd from the throne aloof;--and when storm-rent
   Disclos'd the thunder-gloomings in Jove's air;
   But sooth'd as now, flash'd sudden everywhere,
   Noiseless, sub-marine cloudlets, glittering                   880
   Death to a human eye: for there did spring
   From natural west, and east, and south, and north,
   A light as of four sunsets, blazing forth
   A gold-green zenith 'bove the Sea-God's head.
   Of lucid depth the floor, and far outspread
   As breezeless lake, on which the slim canoe
   Of feather'd Indian darts about, as through
   The delicatest air: air verily,
   But for the portraiture of clouds and sky:
   This palace floor breath-air,--but for the amaze              890
   Of deep-seen wonders motionless,--and blaze
   Of the dome pomp, reflected in extremes,
   Globing a golden sphere.
 
                             They stood in dreams
   Till Triton blew his horn. The palace rang;
   The Nereids danc'd; the Syrens faintly sang;
   And the great Sea-King bow'd his dripping head.
   Then Love took wing, and from his pinions shed
   On all the multitude a nectarous dew.
   The ooze-born Goddess beckoned and drew                       900
   Fair Scylla and her guides to conference;
   And when they reach'd the throned eminence
   She kist the sea-nymph's cheek,--who sat her down
   A toying with the doves. Then,--"Mighty crown
   And sceptre of this kingdom!" Venus said,
   "Thy vows were on a time to Nais paid:
   Behold!"--Two copious tear-drops instant fell
   From the God's large eyes; he smil'd delectable,
   And over Glaucus held his blessing hands.--
   "Endymion! Ah! still wandering in the bands                   910
   Of love? Now this is cruel. Since the hour
   I met thee in earth's bosom, all my power
   Have I put forth to serve thee. What, not yet
   Escap'd from dull mortality's harsh net?
   A little patience, youth! 'twill not be long,
   Or I am skilless quite: an idle tongue,
   A humid eye, and steps luxurious,
   Where these are new and strange, are ominous.
   Aye, I have seen these signs in one of heaven,
   When others were all blind; and were I given                  920
   To utter secrets, haply I might say
   Some pleasant words:--but Love will have his day.
   So wait awhile expectant. Pr'ythee soon,
   Even in the passing of thine honey-moon,
   Visit my Cytherea: thou wilt find
   Cupid well-natured, my Adonis kind;
   And pray persuade with thee--Ah, I have done,
   All blisses be upon thee, my sweet son!"--
   Thus the fair goddess: while Endymion
   Knelt to receive those accents halcyon.                       930
 
     Meantime a glorious revelry began
   Before the Water-Monarch. Nectar ran
   In courteous fountains to all cups outreach'd;
   And plunder'd vines, teeming exhaustless, pleach'd
   New growth about each shell and pendent lyre;
   The which, in disentangling for their fire,
   Pull'd down fresh foliage and coverture
   For dainty toying. Cupid, empire-sure,
   Flutter'd and laugh'd, and oft-times through the throng
   Made a delighted way. Then dance, and song,                   940
   And garlanding grew wild; and pleasure reign'd.
   In harmless tendril they each other chain'd,
   And strove who should be smother'd deepest in
   Fresh crush of leaves.
 
                           O 'tis a very sin
   For one so weak to venture his poor verse
   In such a place as this. O do not curse,
   High Muses! let him hurry to the ending.
 
     All suddenly were silent. A soft blending
   Of dulcet instruments came charmingly;                        950
   And then a hymn.
 
                    "KING of the stormy sea!
   Brother of Jove, and co-inheritor
   Of elements! Eternally before
   Thee the waves awful bow. Fast, stubborn rock,
   At thy fear'd trident shrinking, doth unlock
   Its deep foundations, hissing into foam.
   All mountain-rivers lost, in the wide home
   Of thy capacious bosom ever flow.
   Thou frownest, and old Eolus thy foe                          960
   Skulks to his cavern, 'mid the gruff complaint
   Of all his rebel tempests. Dark clouds faint
   When, from thy diadem, a silver gleam
   Slants over blue dominion. Thy bright team
   Gulphs in the morning light, and scuds along
   To bring thee nearer to that golden song
   Apollo singeth, while his chariot
   Waits at the doors of heaven. Thou art not
   For scenes like this: an empire stern hast thou;
   And it hath furrow'd that large front: yet now,               970
   As newly come of heaven, dost thou sit
   To blend and interknit
   Subdued majesty with this glad time.
   O shell-borne King sublime!
   We lay our hearts before thee evermore--
   We sing, and we adore!
 
     "Breathe softly, flutes;
   Be tender of your strings, ye soothing lutes;
   Nor be the trumpet heard! O vain, O vain;
   Not flowers budding in an April rain,                         980
   Nor breath of sleeping dove, nor river's flow,--
   No, nor the Eolian twang of Love's own bow,
   Can mingle music fit for the soft ear
   Of goddess Cytherea!
   Yet deign, white Queen of Beauty, thy fair eyes
   On our souls' sacrifice.
 
     "Bright-winged Child!
   Who has another care when thou hast smil'd?
   Unfortunates on earth, we see at last
   All death-shadows, and glooms that overcast                   990
   Our spirits, fann'd away by thy light pinions.
   O sweetest essence! sweetest of all minions!
   God of warm pulses, and dishevell'd hair,
   And panting bosoms bare!
   Dear unseen light in darkness! eclipser
   Of light in light! delicious poisoner!
   Thy venom'd goblet will we quaff until
   We fill--we fill!
   And by thy Mother's lips----"
 
                           Was heard no more                    1000
   For clamour, when the golden palace door
   Opened again, and from without, in shone
   A new magnificence. On oozy throne
   Smooth-moving came Oceanus the old,
   To take a latest glimpse at his sheep-fold,
   Before he went into his quiet cave
   To muse for ever--Then a lucid wave,
   Scoop'd from its trembling sisters of mid-sea,
   Afloat, and pillowing up the majesty
   Of Doris, and the Egean seer, her spouse--                   1010
   Next, on a dolphin, clad in laurel boughs,
   Theban Amphion leaning on his lute:
   His fingers went across it--All were mute
   To gaze on Amphitrite, queen of pearls,
   And Thetis pearly too.--
 
                           The palace whirls
   Around giddy Endymion; seeing he
   Was there far strayed from mortality.
   He could not bear it--shut his eyes in vain;
   Imagination gave a dizzier pain.                             1020
   "O I shall die! sweet Venus, be my stay!
   Where is my lovely mistress? Well-away!
   I die--I hear her voice--I feel my wing--"
   At Neptune's feet he sank. A sudden ring
   Of Nereids were about him, in kind strife
   To usher back his spirit into life:
   But still he slept. At last they interwove
   Their cradling arms, and purpos'd to convey
   Towards a crystal bower far away.
 
     Lo! while slow carried through the pitying crowd,
   To his inward senses these words spake aloud;                1031
   Written in star-light on the dark above:
   _Dearest Endymion! my entire love!
   How have I dwelt in fear of fate: 'tis done--
   Immortal bliss for me too hast thou won._
   _Arise then! for the hen-dove shall not hatch
   Her ready eggs, before I'll kissing snatch
   Thee into endless heaven. Awake! awake!_
 
     The youth at once arose: a placid lake
   Came quiet to his eyes; and forest green,                    1040
   Cooler than all the wonders he had seen,
   Lull'd with its simple song his fluttering breast.
   How happy once again in grassy nest!
 
 
 
 
 ENDYMION.
 
 BOOK IV.
 
 
   Muse of my native land! loftiest Muse!
   O first-born on the mountains! by the hues
   Of heaven on the spiritual air begot:
   Long didst thou sit alone in northern grot,
   While yet our England was a wolfish den;
   Before our forests heard the talk of men;
   Before the first of Druids was a child;--
   Long didst thou sit amid our regions wild
   Rapt in a deep prophetic solitude.
   There came an eastern voice of solemn mood:--                  10
   Yet wast thou patient. Then sang forth the Nine,
   Apollo's garland:--yet didst thou divine
   Such home-bred glory, that they cry'd in vain,
   "Come hither, Sister of the Island!" Plain
   Spake fair Ausonia; and once more she spake
   A higher summons:--still didst thou betake
   Thee to thy native hopes. O thou hast won
   A full accomplishment! The thing is done,
   Which undone, these our latter days had risen
   On barren souls. Great Muse, thou know'st what prison,
   Of flesh and bone, curbs, and confines, and frets              21
   Our spirit's wings: despondency besets
   Our pillows; and the fresh to-morrow morn
   Seems to give forth its light in very scorn
   Of our dull, uninspired, snail-paced lives.
   Long have I said, how happy he who shrives
   To thee! But then I thought on poets gone,
   And could not pray:--nor can I now--so on
   I move to the end in lowliness of heart.--
 
     "Ah, woe is me! that I should fondly part                    30
   From my dear native land! Ah, foolish maid!
   Glad was the hour, when, with thee, myriads bade
   Adieu to Ganges and their pleasant fields!
   To one so friendless the clear freshet yields
   A bitter coolness; the ripe grape is sour:
   Yet I would have, great gods! but one short hour
   Of native air--let me but die at home."
 
     Endymion to heaven's airy dome
   Was offering up a hecatomb of vows,
   When these words reach'd him. Whereupon he bows
   His head through thorny-green entanglement                     41
   Of underwood, and to the sound is bent,
   Anxious as hind towards her hidden fawn.
 
     "Is no one near to help me? No fair dawn
   Of life from charitable voice? No sweet saying
   To set my dull and sadden'd spirit playing?
   No hand to toy with mine? No lips so sweet
   That I may worship them? No eyelids meet
   To twinkle on my bosom? No one dies
   Before me, till from these enslaving eyes                      50
   Redemption sparkles!--I am sad and lost."
 
     Thou, Carian lord, hadst better have been tost
   Into a whirlpool. Vanish into air,
   Warm mountaineer! for canst thou only bear
   A woman's sigh alone and in distress?
   See not her charms! Is Phoebe passionless?
   Phoebe is fairer far--O gaze no more:--
   Yet if thou wilt behold all beauty's store,
   Behold her panting in the forest grass!
   Do not those curls of glossy jet surpass                       60
   For tenderness the arms so idly lain
   Amongst them? Feelest not a kindred pain,
   To see such lovely eyes in swimming search
   After some warm delight, that seems to perch
   Dovelike in the dim cell lying beyond
   Their upper lids?--Hist!
 
                             "O for Hermes' wand,
   To touch this flower into human shape!
   That woodland Hyacinthus could escape
   From his green prison, and here kneeling down                  70
   Call me his queen, his second life's fair crown!
   Ah me, how I could love!--My soul doth melt
   For the unhappy youth--Love! I have felt
   So faint a kindness, such a meek surrender
   To what my own full thoughts had made too tender,
   That but for tears my life had fled away!--
   Ye deaf and senseless minutes of the day,
   And thou, old forest, hold ye this for true,
   There is no lightning, no authentic dew
   But in the eye of love: there's not a sound,                   80
   Melodious howsoever, can confound
   The heavens and earth in one to such a death
   As doth the voice of love: there's not a breath
   Will mingle kindly with the meadow air,
   Till it has panted round, and stolen a share
   Of passion from the heart!"--
 
                                 Upon a bough
   He leant, wretched. He surely cannot now
   Thirst for another love: O impious,
   That he can even dream upon it thus!--                         90
   Thought he, "Why am I not as are the dead,
   Since to a woe like this I have been led
   Through the dark earth, and through the wondrous sea?
   Goddess! I love thee not the less: from thee
   By Juno's smile I turn not--no, no, no--
   While the great waters are at ebb and flow.--
   I have a triple soul! O fond pretence--
   For both, for both my love is so immense,
   I feel my heart is cut in twain for them."
 
     And so he groan'd, as one by beauty slain.                  100
   The lady's heart beat quick, and he could see
   Her gentle bosom heave tumultuously.
   He sprang from his green covert: there she lay,
   Sweet as a muskrose upon new-made hay;
   With all her limbs on tremble, and her eyes
   Shut softly up alive. To speak he tries.
   "Fair damsel, pity me! forgive that I
   Thus violate thy bower's sanctity!
   O pardon me, for I am full of grief--
   Grief born of thee, young angel! fairest thief!               110
   Who stolen hast away the wings wherewith
   I was to top the heavens. Dear maid, sith
   Thou art my executioner, and I feel
   Loving and hatred, misery and weal,
   Will in a few short hours be nothing to me,
   And all my story that much passion slew me;
   Do smile upon the evening of my days:
   And, for my tortur'd brain begins to craze,
   Be thou my nurse; and let me understand
   How dying I shall kiss that lily hand.--                      120
   Dost weep for me? Then should I be content.
   Scowl on, ye fates! until the firmament
   Outblackens Erebus, and the full-cavern'd earth
   Crumbles into itself. By the cloud girth
   Of Jove, those tears have given me a thirst
   To meet oblivion."--As her heart would burst
   The maiden sobb'd awhile, and then replied:
   "Why must such desolation betide
   As that thou speakest of? Are not these green nooks
   Empty of all misfortune? Do the brooks                        130
   Utter a gorgon voice? Does yonder thrush,
   Schooling its half-fledg'd little ones to brush
   About the dewy forest, whisper tales?--
   Speak not of grief, young stranger, or cold snails
   Will slime the rose to night. Though if thou wilt,
   Methinks 'twould be a guilt--a very guilt--
   Not to companion thee, and sigh away
   The light--the dusk--the dark--till break of day!"
   "Dear lady," said Endymion, "'tis past:
   I love thee! and my days can never last.                      140
   That I may pass in patience still speak:
   Let me have music dying, and I seek
   No more delight--I bid adieu to all.
   Didst thou not after other climates call,
   And murmur about Indian streams?"--Then she,
   Sitting beneath the midmost forest tree,
   For pity sang this roundelay----
 
         "O Sorrow,
         Why dost borrow
   The natural hue of health, from vermeil lips?--               150
         To give maiden blushes
         To the white rose bushes?
   Or is it thy dewy hand the daisy tips?
 
         "O Sorrow,
         Why dost borrow
   The lustrous passion from a falcon-eye?--
         To give the glow-worm light?
         Or, on a moonless night,
   To tinge, on syren shores, the salt sea-spry?
 
         "O Sorrow,                                              160
         Why dost borrow
   The mellow ditties from a mourning tongue?--
         To give at evening pale
         Unto the nightingale,
   That thou mayst listen the cold dews among?
 
         "O Sorrow,
         Why dost borrow
   Heart's lightness from the merriment of May?--
         A lover would not tread
         A cowslip on the head,                                  170
   Though he should dance from eve till peep of day--
         Nor any drooping flower
         Held sacred for thy bower,
   Wherever he may sport himself and play.
 
         "To Sorrow,
         I bade good-morrow,
   And thought to leave her far away behind;
         But cheerly, cheerly,
         She loves me dearly;
   She is so constant to me, and so kind:                        180
         I would deceive her
         And so leave her,
   But ah! she is so constant and so kind.
 
   "Beneath my palm trees, by the river side,
   I sat a weeping: in the whole world wide
   There was no one to ask me why I wept,--
         And so I kept
   Brimming the water-lily cups with tears
         Cold as my fears.
 
   "Beneath my palm trees, by the river side,                    190
   I sat a weeping: what enamour'd bride,
   Cheated by shadowy wooer from the clouds,
         But hides and shrouds
   Beneath dark palm trees by a river side?
   "And as I sat, over the light blue hills
   There came a noise of revellers: the rills
   Into the wide stream came of purple hue--
         'Twas Bacchus and his crew!
   The earnest trumpet spake, and silver thrills
   From kissing cymbals made a merry din--                       200
         'Twas Bacchus and his kin!
   Like to a moving vintage down they came,
   Crown'd with green leaves, and faces all on flame;
   All madly dancing through the pleasant valley,
         To scare thee, Melancholy!
   O then, O then, thou wast a simple name!
   And I forgot thee, as the berried holly
   By shepherds is forgotten, when, in June,
   Tall chesnuts keep away the sun and moon:--
         I rush'd into the folly!                                210
 
   "Within his car, aloft, young Bacchus stood,
   Trifling his ivy-dart, in dancing mood,
         With sidelong laughing;
   And little rills of crimson wine imbrued
   His plump white arms, and shoulders, enough white
         For Venus' pearly bite:
   And near him rode Silenus on his ass,
   Pelted with flowers as he on did pass
         Tipsily quaffing.
 
   "Whence came ye, merry Damsels! whence came ye!
   So many, and so many, and such glee?                          221
   Why have ye left your bowers desolate,
         Your lutes, and gentler fate?--
   'We follow Bacchus! Bacchus on the wing,
         A conquering!
   Bacchus, young Bacchus! good or ill betide,
   We dance before him thorough kingdoms wide:--
   Come hither, lady fair, and joined be
         To our wild minstrelsy!'
 
   "Whence came ye, jolly Satyrs! whence came ye!                230
   So many, and so many, and such glee?
   Why have ye left your forest haunts, why left
         Your nuts in oak-tree cleft?--
   'For wine, for wine we left our kernel tree;
   For wine we left our heath, and yellow brooms,
         And cold mushrooms;
   For wine we follow Bacchus through the earth;
   Great God of breathless cups and chirping mirth!--
   Come hither, lady fair, and joined be
   To our mad minstrelsy!'                                       240
 
   "Over wide streams and mountains great we went,
   And, save when Bacchus kept his ivy tent,
   Onward the tiger and the leopard pants,
         With Asian elephants:
   Onward these myriads--with song and dance,
   With zebras striped, and sleek Arabians' prance,
   Web-footed alligators, crocodiles,
   Bearing upon their scaly backs, in files,
   Plump infant laughers mimicking the coil
   Of seamen, and stout galley-rowers' toil:                     250
   With toying oars and silken sails they glide,
         Nor care for wind and tide.
 
   "Mounted on panthers' furs and lions' manes,
   From rear to van they scour about the plains;
   A three days' journey in a moment done:
   And always, at the rising of the sun,
   About the wilds they hunt with spear and horn,
         On spleenful unicorn.
 
   "I saw Osirian Egypt kneel adown
         Before the vine-wreath crown!                           260
   I saw parch'd Abyssinia rouse and sing
         To the silver cymbals' ring!
   I saw the whelming vintage hotly pierce
         Old Tartary the fierce!
   The kings of Inde their jewel-sceptres vail,
   And from their treasures scatter pearled hail;
   Great Brahma from his mystic heaven groans,
         And all his priesthood moans;
   Before young Bacchus' eye-wink turning pale.--
   Into these regions came I following him,                      270
   Sick hearted, weary--so I took a whim
   To stray away into these forests drear
         Alone, without a peer:
   And I have told thee all thou mayest hear.
 
         "Young stranger!
         I've been a ranger
   In search of pleasure throughout every clime:
         Alas, 'tis not for me!
         Bewitch'd I sure must be,
   To lose in grieving all my maiden prime.                      280
 
         "Come then, Sorrow!
         Sweetest Sorrow!
   Like an own babe I nurse thee on my breast:
         I thought to leave thee
         And deceive thee,
   But now of all the world I love thee best.
 
         "There is not one,
         No, no, not one
   But thee to comfort a poor lonely maid;
         Thou art her mother,                                    290
         And her brother,
   Her playmate, and her wooer in the shade."
 
     O what a sigh she gave in finishing,
   And look, quite dead to every worldly thing!
   Endymion could not speak, but gazed on her;
   And listened to the wind that now did stir
   About the crisped oaks full drearily,
   Yet with as sweet a softness as might be
   Remember'd from its velvet summer song.
   At last he said: "Poor lady, how thus long                    300
   Have I been able to endure that voice?
   Fair Melody! kind Syren! I've no choice;
   I must be thy sad servant evermore:
   I cannot choose but kneel here and adore.
   Alas, I must not think--by Phoebe, no!
   Let me not think, soft Angel! shall it be so?
   Say, beautifullest, shall I never think?
   O thou could'st foster me beyond the brink
   Of recollection! make my watchful care
   Close up its bloodshot eyes, nor see despair!                 310
   Do gently murder half my soul, and I
   Shall feel the other half so utterly!--
   I'm giddy at that cheek so fair and smooth;
   O let it blush so ever! let it soothe
   My madness! let it mantle rosy-warm
   With the tinge of love, panting in safe alarm.--
   This cannot be thy hand, and yet it is;
   And this is sure thine other softling--this
   Thine own fair bosom, and I am so near!
   Wilt fall asleep? O let me sip that tear!                     320
   And whisper one sweet word that I may know
   This is this world--sweet dewy blossom!"--_Woe!
   Woe! Woe to that Endymion! Where is he?_--
   Even these words went echoing dismally
   Through the wide forest--a most fearful tone,
   Like one repenting in his latest moan;
   And while it died away a shade pass'd by,
   As of a thunder cloud. When arrows fly
   Through the thick branches, poor ring-doves sleek forth
   Their timid necks and tremble; so these both                  330
   Leant to each other trembling, and sat so
   Waiting for some destruction--when lo,
   Foot-feather'd Mercury appear'd sublime
   Beyond the tall tree tops; and in less time
   Than shoots the slanted hail-storm, down he dropt
   Towards the ground; but rested not, nor stopt
   One moment from his home: only the sward
   He with his wand light touch'd, and heavenward
   Swifter than sight was gone--even before
   The teeming earth a sudden witness bore                       340
   Of his swift magic. Diving swans appear
   Above the crystal circlings white and clear;
   And catch the cheated eye in wild surprise,
   How they can dive in sight and unseen rise--
   So from the turf outsprang two steeds jet-black,
   Each with large dark blue wings upon his back.
   The youth of Caria plac'd the lovely dame
   On one, and felt himself in spleen to tame
   The other's fierceness. Through the air they flew,
   High as the eagles. Like two drops of dew                     350
   Exhal'd to Phoebus' lips, away they are gone,
   Far from the earth away--unseen, alone,
   Among cool clouds and winds, but that the free,
   The buoyant life of song can floating be
   Above their heads, and follow them untir'd.--
   Muse of my native land, am I inspir'd?
   This is the giddy air, and I must spread
   Wide pinions to keep here; nor do I dread
   Or height, or depth, or width, or any chance
   Precipitous: I have beneath my glance                         360
   Those towering horses and their mournful freight.
   Could I thus sail, and see, and thus await
   Fearless for power of thought, without thine aid?--
   There is a sleepy dusk, an odorous shade
   From some approaching wonder, and behold
   Those winged steeds, with snorting nostrils bold
   Snuff at its faint extreme, and seem to tire,
   Dying to embers from their native fire!
 
     There curl'd a purple mist around them; soon,
   It seem'd as when around the pale new moon                    370
   Sad Zephyr droops the clouds like weeping willow:
   'Twas Sleep slow journeying with head on pillow.
   For the first time, since he came nigh dead born
   From the old womb of night, his cave forlorn
   Had he left more forlorn; for the first time,
   He felt aloof the day and morning's prime--
   Because into his depth Cimmerian
   There came a dream, shewing how a young man,
   Ere a lean bat could plump its wintery skin,
   Would at high Jove's empyreal footstool win                   380
   An immortality, and how espouse
   Jove's daughter, and be reckon'd of his house.
   Now was he slumbering towards heaven's gate,
   That he might at the threshold one hour wait
   To hear the marriage melodies, and then
   Sink downward to his dusky cave again.
   His litter of smooth semilucent mist,
   Diversely ting'd with rose and amethyst,
   Puzzled those eyes that for the centre sought;
   And scarcely for one moment could be caught                   390
   His sluggish form reposing motionless.
   Those two on winged steeds, with all the stress
   Of vision search'd for him, as one would look
   Athwart the sallows of a river nook
   To catch a glance at silver throated eels,--
   Or from old Skiddaw's top, when fog conceals
   His rugged forehead in a mantle pale,
   With an eye-guess towards some pleasant vale
   Descry a favourite hamlet faint and far.
 
     These raven horses, though they foster'd are                400
   Of earth's splenetic fire, dully drop
   Their full-veined ears, nostrils blood wide, and stop;
   Upon the spiritless mist have they outspread
   Their ample feathers, are in slumber dead,--
   And on those pinions, level in mid air,
   Endymion sleepeth and the lady fair.
   Slowly they sail, slowly as icy isle
   Upon a calm sea drifting: and meanwhile
   The mournful wanderer dreams. Behold! he walks
   On heaven's pavement; brotherly he talks                      410
   To divine powers: from his hand full fain
   Juno's proud birds are pecking pearly grain:
   He tries the nerve of Phoebus' golden bow,
   And asketh where the golden apples grow:
   Upon his arm he braces Pallas' shield,
   And strives in vain to unsettle and wield
   A Jovian thunderbolt: arch Hebe brings
   A full-brimm'd goblet, dances lightly, sings
   And tantalizes long; at last he drinks,
   And lost in pleasure at her feet he sinks,                    420
   Touching with dazzled lips her starlight hand.
   He blows a bugle,--an ethereal band
   Are visible above: the Seasons four,--
   Green-kyrtled Spring, flush Summer, golden store
   In Autumn's sickle, Winter frosty hoar,
   Join dance with shadowy Hours; while still the blast,
   In swells unmitigated, still doth last
   To sway their floating morris. "Whose is this?
   Whose bugle?" he inquires: they smile--"O Dis!
   Why is this mortal here? Dost thou not know                   430
   Its mistress' lips? Not thou?--'Tis Dian's: lo!
   She rises crescented!" He looks, 'tis she,
   His very goddess: good-bye earth, and sea,
   And air, and pains, and care, and suffering;
   Good-bye to all but love! Then doth he spring
   Towards her, and awakes--and, strange, o'erhead,
   Of those same fragrant exhalations bred,
   Beheld awake his very dream: the gods
   Stood smiling; merry Hebe laughs and nods;
   And Phoebe bends towards him crescented.                       440
   O state perplexing! On the pinion bed,
   Too well awake, he feels the panting side
   Of his delicious lady. He who died
   For soaring too audacious in the sun,
   Where that same treacherous wax began to run,
   Felt not more tongue-tied than Endymion.
   His heart leapt up as to its rightful throne,
   To that fair shadow'd passion puls'd its way--
   Ah, what perplexity! Ah, well a day!
   So fond, so beauteous was his bed-fellow,                     450
   He could not help but kiss her: then he grew
   Awhile forgetful of all beauty save
   Young Phoebe's, golden hair'd; and so 'gan crave
   Forgiveness: yet he turn'd once more to look
   At the sweet sleeper,--all his soul was shook,--
   She press'd his hand in slumber; so once more
   He could not help but kiss her and adore.
   At this the shadow wept, melting away.
   The Latmian started up: "Bright goddess, stay!
   Search my most hidden breast! By truth's own tongue,
   I have no daedale heart: why is it wrung                       461
   To desperation? Is there nought for me,
   Upon the bourne of bliss, but misery?"
 
     These words awoke the stranger of dark tresses:
   Her dawning love-look rapt Endymion blesses
   With 'haviour soft. Sleep yawned from underneath.
   "Thou swan of Ganges, let us no more breathe
   This murky phantasm! thou contented seem'st
   Pillow'd in lovely idleness, nor dream'st
   What horrors may discomfort thee and me.                      470
   Ah, shouldst thou die from my heart-treachery!--
   Yet did she merely weep--her gentle soul
   Hath no revenge in it: as it is whole
   In tenderness, would I were whole in love!
   Can I prize thee, fair maid, till price above,
   Even when I feel as true as innocence?
   I do, I do.--What is this soul then? Whence
   Came it? It does not seem my own, and I
   Have no self-passion or identity.
   Some fearful end must be: where, where is it?                 480
   By Nemesis, I see my spirit flit
   Alone about the dark--Forgive me, sweet:
   Shall we away?" He rous'd the steeds: they beat
   Their wings chivalrous into the clear air,
   Leaving old Sleep within his vapoury lair.
 
     The good-night blush of eve was waning slow,
   And Vesper, risen star, began to throe
   In the dusk heavens silvery, when they
   Thus sprang direct towards the Galaxy.
   Nor did speed hinder converse soft and strange--              490
   Eternal oaths and vows they interchange,
   In such wise, in such temper, so aloof
   Up in the winds, beneath a starry roof,
   So witless of their doom, that verily
   'Tis well nigh past man's search their hearts to see;
   Whether they wept, or laugh'd, or griev'd, or toy'd--
   Most like with joy gone mad, with sorrow cloy'd.
 
     Fell facing their swift flight, from ebon streak,
   The moon put forth a little diamond peak,
   No bigger than an unobserved star,                            500
   Or tiny point of fairy scymetar;
   Bright signal that she only stoop'd to tie
   Her silver sandals, ere deliciously
   She bow'd into the heavens her timid head.
   Slowly she rose, as though she would have fled,
   While to his lady meek the Carian turn'd,
   To mark if her dark eyes had yet discern'd
   This beauty in its birth--Despair! despair!
   He saw her body fading gaunt and spare
   In the cold moonshine. Straight he seiz'd her wrist;
   It melted from his grasp: her hand he kiss'd,                 511
   And, horror! kiss'd his own--he was alone.
   Her steed a little higher soar'd, and then
   Dropt hawkwise to the earth.
 
                                There lies a den,
   Beyond the seeming confines of the space
   Made for the soul to wander in and trace
   Its own existence, of remotest glooms.
   Dark regions are around it, where the tombs
   Of buried griefs the spirit sees, but scarce                  520
   One hour doth linger weeping, for the pierce
   Of new-born woe it feels more inly smart:
   And in these regions many a venom'd dart
   At random flies; they are the proper home
   Of every ill: the man is yet to come
   Who hath not journeyed in this native hell.
   But few have ever felt how calm and well
   Sleep may be had in that deep den of all.
   There anguish does not sting; nor pleasure pall:
   Woe-hurricanes beat ever at the gate,                         530
   Yet all is still within and desolate.
   Beset with plainful gusts, within ye hear
   No sound so loud as when on curtain'd bier
   The death-watch tick is stifled. Enter none
   Who strive therefore: on the sudden it is won.
   Just when the sufferer begins to burn,
   Then it is free to him; and from an urn,
   Still fed by melting ice, he takes a draught--
   Young Semele such richness never quaft
   In her maternal longing. Happy gloom!                         540
   Dark Paradise! where pale becomes the bloom
   Of health by due; where silence dreariest
   Is most articulate; where hopes infest;
   Where those eyes are the brightest far that keep
   Their lids shut longest in a dreamless sleep.
   O happy spirit-home! O wondrous soul!
   Pregnant with such a den to save the whole
   In thine own depth. Hail, gentle Carian!
   For, never since thy griefs and woes began,
   Hast thou felt so content: a grievous feud                    550
   Hath let thee to this Cave of Quietude.
   Aye, his lull'd soul was there, although upborne
   With dangerous speed: and so he did not mourn
   Because he knew not whither he was going.
   So happy was he, not the aerial blowing
   Of trumpets at clear parley from the east
   Could rouse from that fine relish, that high feast.
   They stung the feather'd horse: with fierce alarm
   He flapp'd towards the sound. Alas, no charm
   Could lift Endymion's head, or he had view'd                  560
   A skyey mask, a pinion'd multitude,--
   And silvery was its passing: voices sweet
   Warbling the while as if to lull and greet
   The wanderer in his path. Thus warbled they,
   While past the vision went in bright array.
 
     "Who, who from Dian's feast would be away?
   For all the golden bowers of the day
   Are empty left? Who, who away would be
   From Cynthia's wedding and festivity?
   Not Hesperus: lo! upon his silver wings                       570
   He leans away for highest heaven and sings,
   Snapping his lucid fingers merrily!--
   Ah, Zephyrus! art here, and Flora too!
   Ye tender bibbers of the rain and dew,
   Young playmates of the rose and daffodil,
   Be careful, ere ye enter in, to fill
         Your baskets high
   With fennel green, and balm, and golden pines,
   Savory, latter-mint, and columbines,
   Cool parsley, basil sweet, and sunny thyme;                   580
   Yea, every flower and leaf of every clime,
   All gather'd in the dewy morning: hie
         Away! fly, fly!--
   Crystalline brother of the belt of heaven,
   Aquarius! to whom king Jove has given
   Two liquid pulse streams 'stead of feather'd wings,
   Two fan-like fountains,--thine illuminings
         For Dian play:
   Dissolve the frozen purity of air;
   Let thy white shoulders silvery and bare                      590
   Shew cold through watery pinions; make more bright
   The Star-Queen's crescent on her marriage night:
         Haste, haste away!--
   Castor has tamed the planet Lion, see!
   And of the Bear has Pollux mastery:
   A third is in the race! who is the third,
   Speeding away swift as the eagle bird?
         The ramping Centaur!
   The Lion's mane's on end: the Bear how fierce!
   The Centaur's arrow ready seems to pierce                     600
   Some enemy: far forth his bow is bent
   Into the blue of heaven. He'll be shent,
         Pale unrelentor,
   When he shall hear the wedding lutes a playing.--
   Andromeda! sweet woman! why delaying
   So timidly among the stars: come hither!
   Join this bright throng, and nimbly follow whither
         They all are going.
   Danae's Son, before Jove newly bow'd,
   Has wept for thee, calling to Jove aloud.                     610
   Thee, gentle lady, did he disenthral:
   Ye shall for ever live and love, for all
         Thy tears are flowing.--
   By Daphne's fright, behold Apollo!--"
 
                                         More
   Endymion heard not: down his steed him bore,
   Prone to the green head of a misty hill.
 
     His first touch of the earth went nigh to kill.
   "Alas!" said he, "were I but always borne
   Through dangerous winds, had but my footsteps worn
   A path in hell, for ever would I bless                        621
   Horrors which nourish an uneasiness
   For my own sullen conquering: to him
   Who lives beyond earth's boundary, grief is dim,
   Sorrow is but a shadow: now I see
   The grass; I feel the solid ground--Ah, me!
   It is thy voice--divinest! Where?--who? who
   Left thee so quiet on this bed of dew?
   Behold upon this happy earth we are;
   Let us ay love each other; let us fare                        630
   On forest-fruits, and never, never go
   Among the abodes of mortals here below,
   Or be by phantoms duped. O destiny!
   Into a labyrinth now my soul would fly,
   But with thy beauty will I deaden it.
   Where didst thou melt too? By thee will I sit
   For ever: let our fate stop here--a kid
   I on this spot will offer: Pan will bid
   Us live in peace, in love and peace among
   His forest wildernesses. I have clung                         640
   To nothing, lov'd a nothing, nothing seen
   Or felt but a great dream! O I have been
   Presumptuous against love, against the sky,
   Against all elements, against the tie
   Of mortals each to each, against the blooms
   Of flowers, rush of rivers, and the tombs
   Of heroes gone! Against his proper glory
   Has my own soul conspired: so my story
   Will I to children utter, and repent.
   There never liv'd a mortal man, who bent                      650
   His appetite beyond his natural sphere,
   But starv'd and died. My sweetest Indian, here,
   Here will I kneel, for thou redeemed hast
   My life from too thin breathing: gone and past
   Are cloudy phantasms. Caverns lone, farewel!
   And air of visions, and the monstrous swell
   Of visionary seas! No, never more
   Shall airy voices cheat me to the shore
   Of tangled wonder, breathless and aghast.
   Adieu, my daintiest Dream! although so vast                   660
   My love is still for thee. The hour may come
   When we shall meet in pure elysium.
   On earth I may not love thee; and therefore
   Doves will I offer up, and sweetest store
   All through the teeming year: so thou wilt shine
   On me, and on this damsel fair of mine,
   And bless our simple lives. My Indian bliss!
   My river-lily bud! one human kiss!
   One sigh of real breath--one gentle squeeze,
   Warm as a dove's nest among summer trees,                     670
   And warm with dew at ooze from living blood!
   Whither didst melt? Ah, what of that!--all good
   We'll talk about--no more of dreaming.--Now,
   Where shall our dwelling be? Under the brow
   Of some steep mossy hill, where ivy dun
   Would hide us up, although spring leaves were none;
   And where dark yew trees, as we rustle through,
   Will drop their scarlet berry cups of dew?
   O thou wouldst joy to live in such a place;
   Dusk for our loves, yet light enough to grace                 680
   Those gentle limbs on mossy bed reclin'd:
   For by one step the blue sky shouldst thou find,
   And by another, in deep dell below,
   See, through the trees, a little river go
   All in its mid-day gold and glimmering.
   Honey from out the gnarled hive I'll bring,
   And apples, wan with sweetness, gather thee,--
   Cresses that grow where no man may them see,
   And sorrel untorn by the dew-claw'd stag:
   Pipes will I fashion of the syrinx flag,                      690
   That thou mayst always know whither I roam,
   When it shall please thee in our quiet home
   To listen and think of love. Still let me speak;
   Still let me dive into the joy I seek,--
   For yet the past doth prison me. The rill,
   Thou haply mayst delight in, will I fill
   With fairy fishes from the mountain tarn,
   And thou shall feed them from the squirrel's barn.
   Its bottom will I strew with amber shells,
   And pebbles blue from deep enchanted wells.                   700
   Its sides I'll plant with dew-sweet eglantine,
   And honeysuckles full of clear bee-wine.
   I will entice this crystal rill to trace
   Love's silver name upon the meadow's face.
   I'll kneel to Vesta, for a flame of fire;
   And to god Phoebus, for a golden lyre;
   To Empress Dian, for a hunting spear;
   To Vesper, for a taper silver-clear,
   That I may see thy beauty through the night;
   To Flora, and a nightingale shall light                       710
   Tame on thy finger; to the River-gods,
   And they shall bring thee taper fishing-rods
   Of gold, and lines of Naiads' long bright tress.
   Heaven shield thee for thine utter loveliness!
   Thy mossy footstool shall the altar be
   'Fore which I'll bend, bending, dear love, to thee:
   Those lips shall be my Delphos, and shall speak
   Laws to my footsteps, colour to my cheek,
   Trembling or stedfastness to this same voice,
   And of three sweetest pleasurings the choice:                 720
   And that affectionate light, those diamond things,
   Those eyes, those passions, those supreme pearl springs,
   Shall be my grief, or twinkle me to pleasure.
   Say, is not bliss within our perfect seisure?
   O that I could not doubt?"
 
                               The mountaineer
   Thus strove by fancies vain and crude to clear
   His briar'd path to some tranquillity.
   It gave bright gladness to his lady's eye,
   And yet the tears she wept were tears of sorrow;              730
   Answering thus, just as the golden morrow
   Beam'd upward from the vallies of the east:
   "O that the flutter of this heart had ceas'd,
   Or the sweet name of love had pass'd away.
   Young feathor'd tyrant! by a swift decay
   Wilt thou devote this body to the earth:
   And I do think that at my very birth
   I lisp'd thy blooming titles inwardly;
   For at the first, first dawn and thought of thee,
   With uplift hands I blest the stars of heaven.                740
   Art thou not cruel? Ever have I striven
   To think thee kind, but ah, it will not do!
   When yet a child, I heard that kisses drew
   Favour from thee, and so I gave and gave
   To the void air, bidding them find out love:
   But when I came to feel how far above
   All fancy, pride, and fickle maidenhood,
   All earthly pleasure, all imagin'd good,
   Was the warm tremble of a devout kiss,--
   Even then, that moment, at the thought of this,               750
   Fainting I fell into a bed of flowers,
   And languish'd there three days. Ye milder powers,
   Am I not cruelly wrong'd? Believe, believe
   Me, dear Endymion, were I to weave
   With my own fancies garlands of sweet life,
   Thou shouldst be one of all. Ah, bitter strife!
   I may not be thy love: I am forbidden--
   Indeed I am--thwarted, affrighted, chidden,
   By things I trembled at, and gorgon wrath.
   Twice hast thou ask'd whither I went: henceforth              760
   Ask me no more! I may not utter it,
   Nor may I be thy love. We might commit
   Ourselves at once to vengeance; we might die;
   We might embrace and die: voluptuous thought!
   Enlarge not to my hunger, or I'm caught
   In trammels of perverse deliciousness.
   No, no, that shall not be: thee will I bless,
   And bid a long adieu."
 
                           The Carian
   No word return'd: both lovelorn, silent, wan,                 770
   Into the vallies green together went.
   Far wandering, they were perforce content
   To sit beneath a fair lone beechen tree;
   Nor at each other gaz'd, but heavily
   Por'd on its hazle cirque of shedded leaves.
 
     Endymion! unhappy! it nigh grieves
   Me to behold thee thus in last extreme:
   Ensky'd ere this, but truly that I deem
   Truth the best music in a first-born song.
   Thy lute-voic'd brother will I sing ere long,                 780
   And thou shall aid--hast thou not aided me?
   Yes, moonlight Emperor! felicity
   Has been thy meed for many thousand years;
   Yet often have I, on the brink of tears,
   Mourn'd as if yet thou wert a forester;--
   Forgetting the old tale.
 
                             He did not stir
   His eyes from the dead leaves, or one small pulse
   Of joy he might have felt. The spirit culls
   Unfaded amaranth, when wild it strays                         790
   Through the old garden-ground of boyish days.
   A little onward ran the very stream
   By which he took his first soft poppy dream;
   And on the very bark 'gainst which he leant
   A crescent he had carv'd, and round it spent
   His skill in little stars. The teeming tree
   Had swollen and green'd the pious charactery,
   But not ta'en out. Why, there was not a slope
   Up which he had not fear'd the antelope;
   And not a tree, beneath whose rooty shade                     800
   He had not with his tamed leopards play'd;
   Nor could an arrow light, or javelin,
   Fly in the air where his had never been--
   And yet he knew it not.
 
                           O treachery!
   Why does his lady smile, pleasing her eye
   With all his sorrowing? He sees her not.
   But who so stares on him? His sister sure!
   Peona of the woods!--Can she endure--
   Impossible--how dearly they embrace!                          810
   His lady smiles; delight is in her face;
   It is no treachery.
 
                       "Dear brother mine!
   Endymion, weep not so! Why shouldst thou pine
   When all great Latmos so exalt will be?
   Thank the great gods, and look not bitterly;
   And speak not one pale word, and sigh no more.
   Sure I will not believe thou hast such store
   Of grief, to last thee to my kiss again.
   Thou surely canst not bear a mind in pain,                    820
   Come hand in hand with one so beautiful.
   Be happy both of you! for I will pull
   The flowers of autumn for your coronals.
   Pan's holy priest for young Endymion calls;
   And when he is restor'd, thou, fairest dame,
   Shalt be our queen. Now, is it not a shame
   To see ye thus,--not very, very sad?
   Perhaps ye are too happy to be glad:
   O feel as if it were a common day;
   Free-voic'd as one who never was away.                        830
   No tongue shall ask, whence come ye? but ye shall
   Be gods of your own rest imperial.
   Not even I, for one whole month, will pry
   Into the hours that have pass'd us by,
   Since in my arbour I did sing to thee.
   O Hermes! on this very night will be
   A hymning up to Cynthia, queen of light;
   For the soothsayers old saw yesternight
   Good visions in the air,--whence will befal,
   As say these sages, health perpetual                          840
   To shepherds and their flocks; and furthermore,
   In Dian's face they read the gentle lore:
   Therefore for her these vesper-carols are.
   Our friends will all be there from nigh and far.
   Many upon thy death have ditties made;
   And many, even now, their foreheads shade
   With cypress, on a day of sacrifice.
   New singing for our maids shalt thou devise,
   And pluck the sorrow from our huntsmen's brows.
   Tell me, my lady-queen, how to espouse                        850
   This wayward brother to his rightful joys!
   His eyes are on thee bent, as thou didst poise
   His fate most goddess-like. Help me, I pray,
   To lure--Endymion, dear brother, say
   What ails thee?" He could bear no more, and so
   Bent his soul fiercely like a spiritual bow,
   And twang'd it inwardly, and calmly said:
   "I would have thee my only friend, sweet maid!
   My only visitor! not ignorant though,
   That those deceptions which for pleasure go                   860
   'Mong men, are pleasures real as real may be:
   But there are higher ones I may not see,
   If impiously an earthly realm I take.
   Since I saw thee, I have been wide awake
   Night after night, and day by day, until
   Of the empyrean I have drunk my fill.
   Let it content thee, Sister, seeing me
   More happy than betides mortality.
   A hermit young, I'll live in mossy cave,
   Where thou alone shalt come to me, and lave                   870
   Thy spirit in the wonders I shall tell.
   Through me the shepherd realm shall prosper well;
   For to thy tongue will I all health confide.
   And, for my sake, let this young maid abide
   With thee as a dear sister. Thou alone,
   Peona, mayst return to me. I own
   This may sound strangely: but when, dearest girl,
   Thou seest it for my happiness, no pearl
   Will trespass down those cheeks. Companion fair!
   Wilt be content to dwell with her, to share                   880
   This sister's love with me?" Like one resign'd
   And bent by circumstance, and thereby blind
   In self-commitment, thus that meek unknown:
   "Aye, but a buzzing by my ears has flown,
   Of jubilee to Dian:--truth I heard!
   Well then, I see there is no little bird,
   Tender soever, but is Jove's own care.
   Long have I sought for rest, and, unaware,
   Behold I find it! so exalted too!
   So after my own heart! I knew, I knew                         890
   There was a place untenanted in it:
   In that same void white Chastity shall sit,
   And monitor me nightly to lone slumber.
   With sanest lips I vow me to the number
   Of Dian's sisterhood; and, kind lady,
   With thy good help, this very night shall see
   My future days to her fane consecrate."
 
     As feels a dreamer what doth most create
   His own particular fright, so these three felt:
   Or like one who, in after ages, knelt                         900
   To Lucifer or Baal, when he'd pine
   After a little sleep: or when in mine
   Far under-ground, a sleeper meets his friends
   Who know him not. Each diligently bends
   Towards common thoughts and things for very fear;
   Striving their ghastly malady to cheer,
   By thinking it a thing of yes and no,
   That housewives talk of. But the spirit-blow
   Was struck, and all were dreamers. At the last
   Endymion said: "Are not our fates all cast?                   910
   Why stand we here? Adieu, ye tender pair!
   Adieu!" Whereat those maidens, with wild stare,
   Walk'd dizzily away. Pained and hot
   His eyes went after them, until they got
   Near to a cypress grove, whose deadly maw,
   In one swift moment, would what then he saw
   Engulph for ever. "Stay!" he cried, "ah, stay!
   Turn, damsels! hist! one word I have to say.
   Sweet Indian, I would see thee once again.
   It is a thing I dote on: so I'd fain,                         920
   Peona, ye should hand in hand repair
   Into those holy groves, that silent are
   Behind great Dian's temple. I'll be yon,
   At vesper's earliest twinkle--they are gone--
   But once, once, once again--" At this he press'd
   His hands against his face, and then did rest
   His head upon a mossy hillock green,
   And so remain'd as he a corpse had been
   All the long day; save when he scantly lifted
   His eyes abroad, to see how shadows shifted                   930
   With the slow move of time,--sluggish and weary
   Until the poplar tops, in journey dreary,
   Had reach'd the river's brim. Then up he rose,
   And, slowly as that very river flows,
   Walk'd towards the temple grove with this lament:
   "Why such a golden eve? The breeze is sent
   Careful and soft, that not a leaf may fall
   Before the serene father of them all
   Bows down his summer head below the west.
   Now am I of breath, speech, and speed possest,                940
   But at the setting I must bid adieu
   To her for the last time. Night will strew
   On the damp grass myriads of lingering leaves,
   And with them shall I die; nor much it grieves
   To die, when summer dies on the cold sward.
   Why, I have been a butterfly, a lord
   Of flowers, garlands, love-knots, silly posies,
   Groves, meadows, melodies, and arbour roses;
   My kingdom's at its death, and just it is
   That I should die with it: so in all this                     950
   We miscal grief, bale, sorrow, heartbreak, woe,
   What is there to plain of? By Titan's foe
   I am but rightly serv'd." So saying, he
   Tripp'd lightly on, in sort of deathful glee;
   Laughing at the clear stream and setting sun,
   As though they jests had been: nor had he done
   His laugh at nature's holy countenance,
   Until that grove appear'd, as if perchance,
   And then his tongue with sober seemlihed
   Gave utterance as he entered: "Ha!" I said,                   960
   "King of the butterflies; but by this gloom,
   And by old Rhadamanthus' tongue of doom,
   This dusk religion, pomp of solitude,
   And the Promethean clay by thief endued,
   By old Saturnus' forelock, by his head
   Shook with eternal palsy, I did wed
   Myself to things of light from infancy;
   And thus to be cast out, thus lorn to die,
   Is sure enough to make a mortal man
   Grow impious." So he inwardly began                           970
   On things for which no wording can be found;
   Deeper and deeper sinking, until drown'd
   Beyond the reach of music: for the choir
   Of Cynthia he heard not, though rough briar
   Nor muffling thicket interpos'd to dull
   The vesper hymn, far swollen, soft and full,
   Through the dark pillars of those sylvan aisles.
   He saw not the two maidens, nor their smiles,
   Wan as primroses gather'd at midnight
   By chilly finger'd spring. "Unhappy wight!                    980
   Endymion!" said Peona, "we are here!
   What wouldst thou ere we all are laid on bier?"
   Then he embrac'd her, and his lady's hand
   Press'd, saying: "Sister, I would have command,
   If it were heaven's will, on our sad fate."
   At which that dark-eyed stranger stood elate
   And said, in a new voice, but sweet as love,
   To Endymion's amaze: "By Cupid's dove,
   And so thou shalt! and by the lily truth
   Of my own breast thou shalt, beloved youth!"                  990
   And as she spake, into her face there came
   Light, as reflected from a silver flame:
   Her long black hair swell'd ampler, in display
   Full golden; in her eyes a brighter day
   Dawn'd blue and full of love. Aye, he beheld
   Phoebe, his passion! joyous she upheld
   Her lucid bow, continuing thus: "Drear, drear
   Has our delaying been; but foolish fear
   Withheld me first; and then decrees of fate;
   And then 'twas fit that from this mortal state               1000
   Thou shouldst, my love, by some unlook'd for change
   Be spiritualiz'd. Peona, we shall range
   These forests, and to thee they safe shall be
   As was thy cradle; hither shalt thou flee
   To meet us many a time." Next Cynthia bright
   Peona kiss'd, and bless'd with fair good night:
   Her brother kiss'd her too, and knelt adown
   Before his goddess, in a blissful swoon.
   She gave her fair hands to him, and behold,
   Before three swiftest kisses he had told,                    1010
   They vanish'd far away!--Peona went
   Home through the gloomy wood in wonderment.
 
   THE END.
 
 _T. Miller, Printer, Noble Street, Cheapside._
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Notes
 
 
 Book II, line 795: "crystaline" corrected to "crystalline".
 
 Book III, line 71: "her" corrected to "his".
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by An Anonymous Volunteer
 
 
 
 
 
 LAMIA
 
 By John Keats
 
 
 
 
 Part 1
 
      Upon a time, before the faery broods
      Drove Nymph and Satyr from the prosperous woods,
      Before King Oberon's bright diadem,
      Sceptre, and mantle, clasp'd with dewy gem,
      Frighted away the Dryads and the Fauns
      From rushes green, and brakes, and cowslip'd lawns,
      The ever-smitten Hermes empty left
      His golden throne, bent warm on amorous theft:
      From high Olympus had he stolen light,
      On this side of Jove's clouds, to escape the sight
      Of his great summoner, and made retreat
      Into a forest on the shores of Crete.
      For somewhere in that sacred island dwelt
      A nymph, to whom all hoofed Satyrs knelt;
      At whose white feet the languid Tritons poured
      Pearls, while on land they wither'd and adored.
      Fast by the springs where she to bathe was wont,
      And in those meads where sometime she might haunt,
      Were strewn rich gifts, unknown to any Muse,
      Though Fancy's casket were unlock'd to choose.
      Ah, what a world of love was at her feet!
      So Hermes thought, and a celestial heat
      Burnt from his winged heels to either ear,
      That from a whiteness, as the lily clear,
      Blush'd into roses 'mid his golden hair,
      Fallen in jealous curls about his shoulders bare.
      From vale to vale, from wood to wood, he flew,
      Breathing upon the flowers his passion new,
      And wound with many a river to its head,
      To find where this sweet nymph prepar'd her secret bed:
      In vain; the sweet nymph might nowhere be found,
      And so he rested, on the lonely ground,
      Pensive, and full of painful jealousies
      Of the Wood-Gods, and even the very trees.
      There as he stood, he heard a mournful voice,
      Such as once heard, in gentle heart, destroys
      All pain but pity: thus the lone voice spake:
      "When from this wreathed tomb shall I awake!
      When move in a sweet body fit for life,
      And love, and pleasure, and the ruddy strife
      Of hearts and lips! Ah, miserable me!"
      The God, dove-footed, glided silently
      Round bush and tree, soft-brushing, in his speed,
      The taller grasses and full-flowering weed,
      Until he found a palpitating snake,
      Bright, and cirque-couchant in a dusky brake.
 
         She was a gordian shape of dazzling hue,
      Vermilion-spotted, golden, green, and blue;
      Striped like a zebra, freckled like a pard,
      Eyed like a peacock, and all crimson barr'd;
      And full of silver moons, that, as she breathed,
      Dissolv'd, or brighter shone, or interwreathed
      Their lustres with the gloomier tapestries--
      So rainbow-sided, touch'd with miseries,
      She seem'd, at once, some penanced lady elf,
      Some demon's mistress, or the demon's self.
      Upon her crest she wore a wannish fire
      Sprinkled with stars, like Ariadne's tiar:
      Her head was serpent, but ah, bitter-sweet!
      She had a woman's mouth with all its pearls complete:
      And for her eyes: what could such eyes do there
      But weep, and weep, that they were born so fair?
      As Proserpine still weeps for her Sicilian air.
      Her throat was serpent, but the words she spake
      Came, as through bubbling honey, for Love's sake,
      And thus; while Hermes on his pinions lay,
      Like a stoop'd falcon ere he takes his prey.
 
         "Fair Hermes, crown'd with feathers, fluttering light,
      I had a splendid dream of thee last night:
      I saw thee sitting, on a throne of gold,
      Among the Gods, upon Olympus old,
      The only sad one; for thou didst not hear
      The soft, lute-finger'd Muses chaunting clear,
      Nor even Apollo when he sang alone,
      Deaf to his throbbing throat's long, long melodious moan.
      I dreamt I saw thee, robed in purple flakes,
      Break amorous through the clouds, as morning breaks,
      And, swiftly as a bright Phoebean dart,
      Strike for the Cretan isle; and here thou art!
      Too gentle Hermes, hast thou found the maid?"
      Whereat the star of Lethe not delay'd
      His rosy eloquence, and thus inquired:
      "Thou smooth-lipp'd serpent, surely high inspired!
      Thou beauteous wreath, with melancholy eyes,
      Possess whatever bliss thou canst devise,
      Telling me only where my nymph is fled,--
      Where she doth breathe!" "Bright planet, thou hast said,"
      Return'd the snake, "but seal with oaths, fair God!"
      "I swear," said Hermes, "by my serpent rod,
      And by thine eyes, and by thy starry crown!"
      Light flew his earnest words, among the blossoms blown.
      Then thus again the brilliance feminine:
      "Too frail of heart! for this lost nymph of thine,
      Free as the air, invisibly, she strays
      About these thornless wilds; her pleasant days
      She tastes unseen; unseen her nimble feet
      Leave traces in the grass and flowers sweet;
      From weary tendrils, and bow'd branches green,
      She plucks the fruit unseen, she bathes unseen:
      And by my power is her beauty veil'd
      To keep it unaffronted, unassail'd
      By the love-glances of unlovely eyes,
      Of Satyrs, Fauns, and blear'd Silenus' sighs.
      Pale grew her immortality, for woe
      Of all these lovers, and she grieved so
      I took compassion on her, bade her steep
      Her hair in weird syrops, that would keep
      Her loveliness invisible, yet free
      To wander as she loves, in liberty.
      Thou shalt behold her, Hermes, thou alone,
      If thou wilt, as thou swearest, grant my boon!"
      Then, once again, the charmed God began
      An oath, and through the serpent's ears it ran
      Warm, tremulous, devout, psalterian.
      Ravish'd, she lifted her Circean head,
      Blush'd a live damask, and swift-lisping said,
      "I was a woman, let me have once more
      A woman's shape, and charming as before.
      I love a youth of Corinth--O the bliss!
      Give me my woman's form, and place me where he is.
      Stoop, Hermes, let me breathe upon thy brow,
      And thou shalt see thy sweet nymph even now."
      The God on half-shut feathers sank serene,
      She breath'd upon his eyes, and swift was seen
      Of both the guarded nymph near-smiling on the green.
      It was no dream; or say a dream it was,
      Real are the dreams of Gods, and smoothly pass
      Their pleasures in a long immortal dream.
      One warm, flush'd moment, hovering, it might seem
      Dash'd by the wood-nymph's beauty, so he burn'd;
      Then, lighting on the printless verdure, turn'd
      To the swoon'd serpent, and with languid arm,
      Delicate, put to proof the lythe Caducean charm.
      So done, upon the nymph his eyes he bent,
      Full of adoring tears and blandishment,
      And towards her stept: she, like a moon in wane,
      Faded before him, cower'd, nor could restrain
      Her fearful sobs, self-folding like a flower
      That faints into itself at evening hour:
      But the God fostering her chilled hand,
      She felt the warmth, her eyelids open'd bland,
      And, like new flowers at morning song of bees,
      Bloom'd, and gave up her honey to the lees.
      Into the green-recessed woods they flew;
      Nor grew they pale, as mortal lovers do.
 
         Left to herself, the serpent now began
      To change; her elfin blood in madness ran,
      Her mouth foam'd, and the grass, therewith besprent,
      Wither'd at dew so sweet and virulent;
      Her eyes in torture fix'd, and anguish drear,
      Hot, glaz'd, and wide, with lid-lashes all sear,
      Flash'd phosphor and sharp sparks, without one cooling tear.
      The colours all inflam'd throughout her train,
      She writh'd about, convuls'd with scarlet pain:
      A deep volcanian yellow took the place
      Of all her milder-mooned body's grace;
      And, as the lava ravishes the mead,
      Spoilt all her silver mail, and golden brede;
      Made gloom of all her frecklings, streaks and bars,
      Eclips'd her crescents, and lick'd up her stars:
      So that, in moments few, she was undrest
      Of all her sapphires, greens, and amethyst,
      And rubious-argent: of all these bereft,
      Nothing but pain and ugliness were left.
      Still shone her crown; that vanish'd, also she
      Melted and disappear'd as suddenly;
      And in the air, her new voice luting soft,
      Cried, "Lycius! gentle Lycius!"--Borne aloft
      With the bright mists about the mountains hoar
      These words dissolv'd: Crete's forests heard no more.
 
         Whither fled Lamia, now a lady bright,
      A full-born beauty new and exquisite?
      She fled into that valley they pass o'er
      Who go to Corinth from Cenchreas' shore;
      And rested at the foot of those wild hills,
      The rugged founts of the Peraean rills,
      And of that other ridge whose barren back
      Stretches, with all its mist and cloudy rack,
      South-westward to Cleone. There she stood
      About a young bird's flutter from a wood,
      Fair, on a sloping green of mossy tread,
      By a clear pool, wherein she passioned
      To see herself escap'd from so sore ills,
      While her robes flaunted with the daffodils.
 
         Ah, happy Lycius!--for she was a maid
      More beautiful than ever twisted braid,
      Or sigh'd, or blush'd, or on spring-flowered lea
      Spread a green kirtle to the minstrelsy:
      A virgin purest lipp'd, yet in the lore
      Of love deep learned to the red heart's core:
      Not one hour old, yet of sciential brain
      To unperplex bliss from its neighbour pain;
      Define their pettish limits, and estrange
      Their points of contact, and swift counterchange;
      Intrigue with the specious chaos, and dispart
      Its most ambiguous atoms with sure art;
      As though in Cupid's college she had spent
      Sweet days a lovely graduate, still unshent,
      And kept his rosy terms in idle languishment.
 
         Why this fair creature chose so fairily
      By the wayside to linger, we shall see;
      But first 'tis fit to tell how she could muse
      And dream, when in the serpent prison-house,
      Of all she list, strange or magnificent:
      How, ever, where she will'd, her spirit went;
      Whether to faint Elysium, or where
      Down through tress-lifting waves the Nereids fair
      Wind into Thetis' bower by many a pearly stair;
      Or where God Bacchus drains his cups divine,
      Stretch'd out, at ease, beneath a glutinous pine;
      Or where in Pluto's gardens palatine
      Mulciber's columns gleam in far piazzian line.
      And sometimes into cities she would send
      Her dream, with feast and rioting to blend;
      And once, while among mortals dreaming thus,
      She saw the young Corinthian Lycius
      Charioting foremost in the envious race,
      Like a young Jove with calm uneager face,
      And fell into a swooning love of him.
      Now on the moth-time of that evening dim
      He would return that way, as well she knew,
      To Corinth from the shore; for freshly blew
      The eastern soft wind, and his galley now
      Grated the quaystones with her brazen prow
      In port Cenchreas, from Egina isle
      Fresh anchor'd; whither he had been awhile
      To sacrifice to Jove, whose temple there
      Waits with high marble doors for blood and incense rare.
      Jove heard his vows, and better'd his desire;
      For by some freakful chance he made retire
      From his companions, and set forth to walk,
      Perhaps grown wearied of their Corinth talk:
      Over the solitary hills he fared,
      Thoughtless at first, but ere eve's star appeared
      His phantasy was lost, where reason fades,
      In the calm'd twilight of Platonic shades.
      Lamia beheld him coming, near, more near--
      Close to her passing, in indifference drear,
      His silent sandals swept the mossy green;
      So neighbour'd to him, and yet so unseen
      She stood: he pass'd, shut up in mysteries,
      His mind wrapp'd like his mantle, while her eyes
      Follow'd his steps, and her neck regal white
      Turn'd--syllabling thus, "Ah, Lycius bright,
      And will you leave me on the hills alone?
      Lycius, look back! and be some pity shown."
      He did; not with cold wonder fearingly,
      But Orpheus-like at an Eurydice;
      For so delicious were the words she sung,
      It seem'd he had lov'd them a whole summer long:
      And soon his eyes had drunk her beauty up,
      Leaving no drop in the bewildering cup,
      And still the cup was full,--while he afraid
      Lest she should vanish ere his lip had paid
      Due adoration, thus began to adore;
      Her soft look growing coy, she saw his chain so sure:
      "Leave thee alone! Look back! Ah, Goddess, see
      Whether my eyes can ever turn from thee!
      For pity do not this sad heart belie--
      Even as thou vanishest so I shall die.
      Stay! though a Naiad of the rivers, stay!
      To thy far wishes will thy streams obey:
      Stay! though the greenest woods be thy domain,
      Alone they can drink up the morning rain:
      Though a descended Pleiad, will not one
      Of thine harmonious sisters keep in tune
      Thy spheres, and as thy silver proxy shine?
      So sweetly to these ravish'd ears of mine
      Came thy sweet greeting, that if thou shouldst fade
      Thy memory will waste me to a shade--
      For pity do not melt!"--"If I should stay,"
      Said Lamia, "here, upon this floor of clay,
      And pain my steps upon these flowers too rough,
      What canst thou say or do of charm enough
      To dull the nice remembrance of my home?
      Thou canst not ask me with thee here to roam
      Over these hills and vales, where no joy is,--
      Empty of immortality and bliss!
      Thou art a scholar, Lycius, and must know
      That finer spirits cannot breathe below
      In human climes, and live: Alas! poor youth,
      What taste of purer air hast thou to soothe
      My essence? What serener palaces,
      Where I may all my many senses please,
      And by mysterious sleights a hundred thirsts appease?
      It cannot be--Adieu!" So said, she rose
      Tiptoe with white arms spread. He, sick to lose
      The amorous promise of her lone complain,
      Swoon'd, murmuring of love, and pale with pain.
      The cruel lady, without any show
      Of sorrow for her tender favourite's woe,
      But rather, if her eyes could brighter be,
      With brighter eyes and slow amenity,
      Put her new lips to his, and gave afresh
      The life she had so tangled in her mesh:
      And as he from one trance was wakening
      Into another, she began to sing,
      Happy in beauty, life, and love, and every thing,
      A song of love, too sweet for earthly lyres,
      While, like held breath, the stars drew in their panting fires
      And then she whisper'd in such trembling tone,
      As those who, safe together met alone
      For the first time through many anguish'd days,
      Use other speech than looks; bidding him raise
      His drooping head, and clear his soul of doubt,
      For that she was a woman, and without
      Any more subtle fluid in her veins
      Than throbbing blood, and that the self-same pains
      Inhabited her frail-strung heart as his.
      And next she wonder'd how his eyes could miss
      Her face so long in Corinth, where, she said,
      She dwelt but half retir'd, and there had led
      Days happy as the gold coin could invent
      Without the aid of love; yet in content
      Till she saw him, as once she pass'd him by,
      Where 'gainst a column he leant thoughtfully
      At Venus' temple porch, 'mid baskets heap'd
      Of amorous herbs and flowers, newly reap'd
      Late on that eve, as 'twas the night before
      The Adonian feast; whereof she saw no more,
      But wept alone those days, for why should she adore?
      Lycius from death awoke into amaze,
      To see her still, and singing so sweet lays;
      Then from amaze into delight he fell
      To hear her whisper woman's lore so well;
      And every word she spake entic'd him on
      To unperplex'd delight and pleasure known.
      Let the mad poets say whate'er they please
      Of the sweets of Fairies, Peris, Goddesses,
      There is not such a treat among them all,
      Haunters of cavern, lake, and waterfall,
      As a real woman, lineal indeed
      From Pyrrha's pebbles or old Adam's seed.
      Thus gentle Lamia judg'd, and judg'd aright,
      That Lycius could not love in half a fright,
      So threw the goddess off, and won his heart
      More pleasantly by playing woman's part,
      With no more awe than what her beauty gave,
      That, while it smote, still guaranteed to save.
      Lycius to all made eloquent reply,
      Marrying to every word a twinborn sigh;
      And last, pointing to Corinth, ask'd her sweet,
      If 'twas too far that night for her soft feet.
      The way was short, for Lamia's eagerness
      Made, by a spell, the triple league decrease
      To a few paces; not at all surmised
      By blinded Lycius, so in her comprized.
      They pass'd the city gates, he knew not how
      So noiseless, and he never thought to know.
 
         As men talk in a dream, so Corinth all,
      Throughout her palaces imperial,
      And all her populous streets and temples lewd,
      Mutter'd, like tempest in the distance brew'd,
      To the wide-spreaded night above her towers.
      Men, women, rich and poor, in the cool hours,
      Shuffled their sandals o'er the pavement white,
      Companion'd or alone; while many a light
      Flared, here and there, from wealthy festivals,
      And threw their moving shadows on the walls,
      Or found them cluster'd in the corniced shade
      Of some arch'd temple door, or dusky colonnade.
 
         Muffling his face, of greeting friends in fear,
      Her fingers he press'd hard, as one came near
      With curl'd gray beard, sharp eyes, and smooth bald crown,
      Slow-stepp'd, and robed in philosophic gown:
      Lycius shrank closer, as they met and past,
      Into his mantle, adding wings to haste,
      While hurried Lamia trembled: "Ah," said he,
      "Why do you shudder, love, so ruefully?
      Why does your tender palm dissolve in dew?"--
      "I'm wearied," said fair Lamia: "tell me who
      Is that old man? I cannot bring to mind
      His features--Lycius! wherefore did you blind
      Yourself from his quick eyes?" Lycius replied,
      'Tis Apollonius sage, my trusty guide
      And good instructor; but to-night he seems
      The ghost of folly haunting my sweet dreams.
 
         While yet he spake they had arrived before
      A pillar'd porch, with lofty portal door,
      Where hung a silver lamp, whose phosphor glow
      Reflected in the slabbed steps below,
      Mild as a star in water; for so new,
      And so unsullied was the marble hue,
      So through the crystal polish, liquid fine,
      Ran the dark veins, that none but feet divine
      Could e'er have touch'd there. Sounds Aeolian
      Breath'd from the hinges, as the ample span
      Of the wide doors disclos'd a place unknown
      Some time to any, but those two alone,
      And a few Persian mutes, who that same year
      Were seen about the markets: none knew where
      They could inhabit; the most curious
      Were foil'd, who watch'd to trace them to their house:
      And but the flitter-winged verse must tell,
      For truth's sake, what woe afterwards befel,
      'Twould humour many a heart to leave them thus,
      Shut from the busy world of more incredulous.
 
 
 
 
 Part 2
 
      Love in a hut, with water and a crust,
      Is--Love, forgive us!--cinders, ashes, dust;
      Love in a palace is perhaps at last
      More grievous torment than a hermit's fast--
      That is a doubtful tale from faery land,
      Hard for the non-elect to understand.
      Had Lycius liv'd to hand his story down,
      He might have given the moral a fresh frown,
      Or clench'd it quite: but too short was their bliss
      To breed distrust and hate, that make the soft voice hiss.
      Besides, there, nightly, with terrific glare,
      Love, jealous grown of so complete a pair,
      Hover'd and buzz'd his wings, with fearful roar,
      Above the lintel of their chamber door,
      And down the passage cast a glow upon the floor.
 
         For all this came a ruin: side by side
      They were enthroned, in the even tide,
      Upon a couch, near to a curtaining
      Whose airy texture, from a golden string,
      Floated into the room, and let appear
      Unveil'd the summer heaven, blue and clear,
      Betwixt two marble shafts:--there they reposed,
      Where use had made it sweet, with eyelids closed,
      Saving a tythe which love still open kept,
      That they might see each other while they almost slept;
      When from the slope side of a suburb hill,
      Deafening the swallow's twitter, came a thrill
      Of trumpets--Lycius started--the sounds fled,
      But left a thought, a buzzing in his head.
      For the first time, since first he harbour'd in
      That purple-lined palace of sweet sin,
      His spirit pass'd beyond its golden bourn
      Into the noisy world almost forsworn.
      The lady, ever watchful, penetrant,
      Saw this with pain, so arguing a want
      Of something more, more than her empery
      Of joys; and she began to moan and sigh
      Because he mused beyond her, knowing well
      That but a moment's thought is passion's passing bell.
      "Why do you sigh, fair creature?" whisper'd he:
      "Why do you think?" return'd she tenderly:
      "You have deserted me--where am I now?
      Not in your heart while care weighs on your brow:
      No, no, you have dismiss'd me; and I go
      From your breast houseless: ay, it must be so."
      He answer'd, bending to her open eyes,
      Where he was mirror'd small in paradise,
      My silver planet, both of eve and morn!
      Why will you plead yourself so sad forlorn,
      While I am striving how to fill my heart
      With deeper crimson, and a double smart?
      How to entangle, trammel up and snare
      Your soul in mine, and labyrinth you there
      Like the hid scent in an unbudded rose?
      Ay, a sweet kiss--you see your mighty woes.
      My thoughts! shall I unveil them? Listen then!
      What mortal hath a prize, that other men
      May be confounded and abash'd withal,
      But lets it sometimes pace abroad majestical,
      And triumph, as in thee I should rejoice
      Amid the hoarse alarm of Corinth's voice.
      "Let my foes choke, and my friends shout afar,
      While through the thronged streets your bridal car
      Wheels round its dazzling spokes." The lady's cheek
      Trembled; she nothing said, but, pale and meek,
      Arose and knelt before him, wept a rain
      Of sorrows at his words; at last with pain
      Beseeching him, the while his hand she wrung,
      To change his purpose. He thereat was stung,
      Perverse, with stronger fancy to reclaim
      Her wild and timid nature to his aim:
      Besides, for all his love, in self despite,
      Against his better self, he took delight
      Luxurious in her sorrows, soft and new.
      His passion, cruel grown, took on a hue
      Fierce and sanguineous as 'twas possible
      In one whose brow had no dark veins to swell.
      Fine was the mitigated fury, like
      Apollo's presence when in act to strike
      The serpent--Ha, the serpent! certes, she
      Was none. She burnt, she lov'd the tyranny,
      And, all subdued, consented to the hour
      When to the bridal he should lead his paramour.
      Whispering in midnight silence, said the youth,
      "Sure some sweet name thou hast, though, by my truth,
      I have not ask'd it, ever thinking thee
      Not mortal, but of heavenly progeny,
      As still I do. Hast any mortal name,
      Fit appellation for this dazzling frame?
      Or friends or kinsfolk on the citied earth,
      To share our marriage feast and nuptial mirth?"
      "I have no friends," said Lamia," no, not one;
      My presence in wide Corinth hardly known:
      My parents' bones are in their dusty urns
      Sepulchred, where no kindled incense burns,
      Seeing all their luckless race are dead, save me,
      And I neglect the holy rite for thee.
      Even as you list invite your many guests;
      But if, as now it seems, your vision rests
      With any pleasure on me, do not bid
      Old Apollonius--from him keep me hid."
      Lycius, perplex'd at words so blind and blank,
      Made close inquiry; from whose touch she shrank,
      Feigning a sleep; and he to the dull shade
      Of deep sleep in a moment was betray'd
 
         It was the custom then to bring away
      The bride from home at blushing shut of day,
      Veil'd, in a chariot, heralded along
      By strewn flowers, torches, and a marriage song,
      With other pageants: but this fair unknown
      Had not a friend. So being left alone,
      (Lycius was gone to summon all his kin)
      And knowing surely she could never win
      His foolish heart from its mad pompousness,
      She set herself, high-thoughted, how to dress
      The misery in fit magnificence.
      She did so, but 'tis doubtful how and whence
      Came, and who were her subtle servitors.
      About the halls, and to and from the doors,
      There was a noise of wings, till in short space
      The glowing banquet-room shone with wide-arched grace.
      A haunting music, sole perhaps and lone
      Supportress of the faery-roof, made moan
      Throughout, as fearful the whole charm might fade.
      Fresh carved cedar, mimicking a glade
      Of palm and plantain, met from either side,
      High in the midst, in honour of the bride:
      Two palms and then two plantains, and so on,
      From either side their stems branch'd one to one
      All down the aisled place; and beneath all
      There ran a stream of lamps straight on from wall to wall.
      So canopied, lay an untasted feast
      Teeming with odours. Lamia, regal drest,
      Silently paced about, and as she went,
      In pale contented sort of discontent,
      Mission'd her viewless servants to enrich
      The fretted splendour of each nook and niche.
      Between the tree-stems, marbled plain at first,
      Came jasper pannels; then, anon, there burst
      Forth creeping imagery of slighter trees,
      And with the larger wove in small intricacies.
      Approving all, she faded at self-will,
      And shut the chamber up, close, hush'd and still,
      Complete and ready for the revels rude,
      When dreadful guests would come to spoil her solitude.
 
         The day appear'd, and all the gossip rout.
      O senseless Lycius! Madman! wherefore flout
      The silent-blessing fate, warm cloister'd hours,
      And show to common eyes these secret bowers?
      The herd approach'd; each guest, with busy brain,
      Arriving at the portal, gaz'd amain,
      And enter'd marveling: for they knew the street,
      Remember'd it from childhood all complete
      Without a gap, yet ne'er before had seen
      That royal porch, that high-built fair demesne;
      So in they hurried all, maz'd, curious and keen:
      Save one, who look'd thereon with eye severe,
      And with calm-planted steps walk'd in austere;
      'Twas Apollonius: something too he laugh'd,
      As though some knotty problem, that had daft
      His patient thought, had now begun to thaw,
      And solve and melt--'twas just as he foresaw.
 
         He met within the murmurous vestibule
      His young disciple. "'Tis no common rule,
      Lycius," said he, "for uninvited guest
      To force himself upon you, and infest
      With an unbidden presence the bright throng
      Of younger friends; yet must I do this wrong,
      And you forgive me." Lycius blush'd, and led
      The old man through the inner doors broad-spread;
      With reconciling words and courteous mien
      Turning into sweet milk the sophist's spleen.
 
         Of wealthy lustre was the banquet-room,
      Fill'd with pervading brilliance and perfume:
      Before each lucid pannel fuming stood
      A censer fed with myrrh and spiced wood,
      Each by a sacred tripod held aloft,
      Whose slender feet wide-swerv'd upon the soft
      Wool-woofed carpets: fifty wreaths of smoke
      From fifty censers their light voyage took
      To the high roof, still mimick'd as they rose
      Along the mirror'd walls by twin-clouds odorous.
      Twelve sphered tables, by silk seats insphered,
      High as the level of a man's breast rear'd
      On libbard's paws, upheld the heavy gold
      Of cups and goblets, and the store thrice told
      Of Ceres' horn, and, in huge vessels, wine
      Come from the gloomy tun with merry shine.
      Thus loaded with a feast the tables stood,
      Each shrining in the midst the image of a God.
 
         When in an antichamber every guest
      Had felt the cold full sponge to pleasure press'd,
      By minist'ring slaves, upon his hands and feet,
      And fragrant oils with ceremony meet
      Pour'd on his hair, they all mov'd to the feast
      In white robes, and themselves in order placed
      Around the silken couches, wondering
      Whence all this mighty cost and blaze of wealth could spring.
 
         Soft went the music the soft air along,
      While fluent Greek a vowel'd undersong
      Kept up among the guests discoursing low
      At first, for scarcely was the wine at flow;
      But when the happy vintage touch'd their brains,
      Louder they talk, and louder come the strains
      Of powerful instruments--the gorgeous dyes,
      The space, the splendour of the draperies,
      The roof of awful richness, nectarous cheer,
      Beautiful slaves, and Lamia's self, appear,
      Now, when the wine has done its rosy deed,
      And every soul from human trammels freed,
      No more so strange; for merry wine, sweet wine,
      Will make Elysian shades not too fair, too divine.
      Soon was God Bacchus at meridian height;
      Flush'd were their cheeks, and bright eyes double bright:
      Garlands of every green, and every scent
      From vales deflower'd, or forest-trees branch rent,
      In baskets of bright osier'd gold were brought
      High as the handles heap'd, to suit the thought
      Of every guest; that each, as he did please,
      Might fancy-fit his brows, silk-pillow'd at his ease.
 
         What wreath for Lamia? What for Lycius?
      What for the sage, old Apollonius?
      Upon her aching forehead be there hung
      The leaves of willow and of adder's tongue;
      And for the youth, quick, let us strip for him
      The thyrsus, that his watching eyes may swim
      Into forgetfulness; and, for the sage,
      Let spear-grass and the spiteful thistle wage
      War on his temples. Do not all charms fly
      At the mere touch of cold philosophy?
      There was an awful rainbow once in heaven:
      We know her woof, her texture; she is given
      In the dull catalogue of common things.
      Philosophy will clip an Angel's wings,
      Conquer all mysteries by rule and line,
      Empty the haunted air, and gnomed mine--
      Unweave a rainbow, as it erewhile made
      The tender-person'd Lamia melt into a shade.
 
         By her glad Lycius sitting, in chief place,
      Scarce saw in all the room another face,
      Till, checking his love trance, a cup he took
      Full brimm'd, and opposite sent forth a look
      'Cross the broad table, to beseech a glance
      From his old teacher's wrinkled countenance,
      And pledge him. The bald-head philosopher
      Had fix'd his eye, without a twinkle or stir
      Full on the alarmed beauty of the bride,
      Brow-beating her fair form, and troubling her sweet pride.
      Lycius then press'd her hand, with devout touch,
      As pale it lay upon the rosy couch:
      'Twas icy, and the cold ran through his veins;
      Then sudden it grew hot, and all the pains
      Of an unnatural heat shot to his heart.
      "Lamia, what means this? Wherefore dost thou start?
      Know'st thou that man?" Poor Lamia answer'd not.
      He gaz'd into her eyes, and not a jot
      Own'd they the lovelorn piteous appeal:
      More, more he gaz'd: his human senses reel:
      Some hungry spell that loveliness absorbs;
      There was no recognition in those orbs.
      "Lamia!" he cried--and no soft-toned reply.
      The many heard, and the loud revelry
      Grew hush; the stately music no more breathes;
      The myrtle sicken'd in a thousand wreaths.
      By faint degrees, voice, lute, and pleasure ceased;
      A deadly silence step by step increased,
      Until it seem'd a horrid presence there,
      And not a man but felt the terror in his hair.
      "Lamia!" he shriek'd; and nothing but the shriek
      With its sad echo did the silence break.
      "Begone, foul dream!" he cried, gazing again
      In the bride's face, where now no azure vein
      Wander'd on fair-spaced temples; no soft bloom
      Misted the cheek; no passion to illume
      The deep-recessed vision--all was blight;
      Lamia, no longer fair, there sat a deadly white.
      "Shut, shut those juggling eyes, thou ruthless man!
      Turn them aside, wretch! or the righteous ban
      Of all the Gods, whose dreadful images
      Here represent their shadowy presences,
      May pierce them on the sudden with the thorn
      Of painful blindness; leaving thee forlorn,
      In trembling dotage to the feeblest fright
      Of conscience, for their long offended might,
      For all thine impious proud-heart sophistries,
      Unlawful magic, and enticing lies.
      Corinthians! look upon that gray-beard wretch!
      Mark how, possess'd, his lashless eyelids stretch
      Around his demon eyes! Corinthians, see!
      My sweet bride withers at their potency."
      "Fool!" said the sophist, in an under-tone
      Gruff with contempt; which a death-nighing moan
      From Lycius answer'd, as heart-struck and lost,
      He sank supine beside the aching ghost.
      "Fool! Fool!" repeated he, while his eyes still
      Relented not, nor mov'd; "from every ill
      Of life have I preserv'd thee to this day,
      And shall I see thee made a serpent's prey?"
      Then Lamia breath'd death breath; the sophist's eye,
      Like a sharp spear, went through her utterly,
      Keen, cruel, perceant, stinging: she, as well
      As her weak hand could any meaning tell,
      Motion'd him to be silent; vainly so,
      He look'd and look'd again a level--No!
      "A Serpent!" echoed he; no sooner said,
      Than with a frightful scream she vanished:
      And Lycius' arms were empty of delight,
      As were his limbs of life, from that same night.
      On the high couch he lay!--his friends came round
      Supported him--no pulse, or breath they found,
      And, in its marriage robe, the heavy body wound.
 
 
 
 
 
FAMILY AND FRIENDS***
 
 
 E-text prepared by Jonathan Ingram and the Online Distributed Proofreading
 Team (http://www.pgdp.net)
 
 
 
 Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
       file which includes the original illustration.
       See 35698-h.htm or 35698-h.zip:
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/35698/35698-h/35698-h.htm)
       or
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/35698/35698-h.zip)
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
       Text in italics is enclosed by underscores (_italics_).
 
       Superscripted characters are enclosed by curly braces
       (example: Y{r} obed{t} serv{t}).
 
 
 
 
 
 [Illustration: JOHN KEATS.
 
 Portrait by Joseph Severn in the National Portrait Gallery.]
 
 
 LETTERS OF JOHN KEATS TO HIS FAMILY AND FRIENDS
 
 Edited by Sidney Colvin
 
 With Frontispiece
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Macmillan and Co., Limited
 St. Martin's Street, London
 1925
 
 Copyright
 First Edition (Globe 8vo) June 1891
 Reprinted October 1891, 1918, 1921
 Reprinted (Crown 8vo) 1925
 
 Printed in Great Britain
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
   LETTER                                         DATE        PAGE
 
   PREFACE                                                      xi
 
     1. TO CHARLES COWDEN CLARKE       Oct. 13, 1816             1
 
     2. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Nov. 20, 1816             1
 
     3.      "           "             Nov. 20, 1816             2
 
     4. TO CHARLES COWDEN CLARKE       Dec. 17, 1816             2
 
     5. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Mar. 2, 1817?             3
 
     6.      "           "             Mar. 17, 1817             4
 
     7. TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS     April 15, 1817            4
 
     8. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      April 17, 1817            6
 
     9. TO LEIGH HUNT                  May 10, 1817             10
 
    10. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      May 10, 1817             13
 
    11. TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY   May 16, 1817             17
 
    12.      "           "             July 8, 1817             19
 
    13. TO MARIANE AND JANE REYNOLDS   Sept. 5, 1817            19
 
    14. TO FANNY KEATS                 Sept. 10, 1817           21
 
    15. TO JANE REYNOLDS               Sept. 14, 1817           24
 
    16. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Sept. 21, 1817           28
 
    17. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Sept. 28, 1817           32
 
    18. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             Oct. 8, 1817             33
 
    19.      "        "                About Nov. 1, 1817       36
 
    20.      "        "                Nov. 5, 1817             39
 
    21. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     Nov. 1817                40
 
    22. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             Nov. 22, 1817            40
 
    23. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Nov. 22, 1817            44
 
    24. TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS     Dec. 22, 1817            46
 
    25.      "           "             Jan. 5, 1818             48
 
    26. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Jan. 10, 1818            53
 
    27. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Jan. 10, 1818            53
 
    28. TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS     Jan. 13-20, 1818         54
 
    29. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Jan. 23, 1818            56
 
    30. TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS     Jan. 23, 1818            57
 
    31. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             Jan. 23, 1818            61
 
    32. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Jan. 30, 1818            64
 
    33. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Jan. 31, 1818            65
 
    34.      "           "             Feb. 3, 1818             67
 
    35. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Feb. 5, 1818             71
 
    36. TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS     Feb. 14, 1818            71
 
    37. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Feb. 19, 1818            73
 
    38. TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS     Feb. 21, 1818            75
 
    39. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Feb. 27, 1818            77
 
    40. TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY   Mar. 1818?               78
 
    41. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             Mar. 13, 1818            78
 
    42. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Mar. 14, 1818            82
 
    43. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Mar. 21, 1818            85
 
    44. TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY   Mar. 21, 1818            88
 
    45. TO JAMES RICE                  Mar. 24, 1818            88
 
    46. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Mar. 25, 1818            90
 
    47. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      April 8, 1818            94
 
    48. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      April 9, 1818            96
 
    49.      "             "           April 10, 1818           98
 
    50. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 April 24, 1818           99
 
    51. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      April 27, 1818          100
 
    52.      "             "           May 3, 1818             103
 
    53. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             May 28, 1818            109
 
    54.       "      "                 June 10, 1818           111
 
    55. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 June 21, 1818           114
 
    56. TO THOMAS KEATS                June 29-July 2, 1818    114
 
    57. TO FANNY KEATS                 July 2-4, 1818          118
 
    58. TO THOMAS KEATS                July 2-9, 1818          123
 
    59.     "      "                   July 10-14, 1818        127
 
    60. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      July 11-13, 1818        132
 
    61. TO THOMAS KEATS                July 17-21, 1818        136
 
    62. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             July 18-22, 1818        142
 
    63. TO THOMAS KEATS                July 23-26, 1818        147
 
    64.     "      "                   Aug. 3, 1818            153
 
    65. TO MRS. WYLIE                  Aug. 6, 1818            158
 
    66. TO FANNY KEATS                 Aug. 18, 1818           161
 
    67.     "     "                    Aug. 25, 1818           162
 
    68. TO JANE REYNOLDS               Sept. 1, 1818           162
 
    69. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     Sept. 21, 1818          163
 
    70. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      About Sept. 22, 1818    165
 
    71. TO FANNY KEATS                 Oct. 9, 1818            166
 
    72. TO JAMES AUGUSTUS HESSEY       Oct. 9, 1818            167
 
    73. TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS  Oct. 13-31, 1818        168
 
    74. TO FANNY KEATS                 Oct. 16, 1818           182
 
    75.     "      "                   Oct. 26, 1818           183
 
    76. TO RICHARD WOODHOUSE           Oct. 27, 1818           183
 
    77. TO FANNY KEATS                 Nov. 5, 1818            185
 
    78. TO JAMES RICE                  Nov. 24, 1818           186
 
    79. TO FANNY KEATS                 Dec. 1, 1818            187
 
    80. TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS  {About Dec. 18,
                                       {1818-Jan. 4, 1819      187
 
    81. TO RICHARD WOODHOUSE           Dec. 18, 1818           210
 
    82. TO MRS. REYNOLDS               Dec. 22, 1818           211
 
    83. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Dec. 22, 1818           211
 
    84. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Dec. 24, 1818           212
 
    85. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Dec. 27, 1818           213
 
    86. TO FANNY KEATS                 Dec. 30, 1818           213
 
    87. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Jan. 4, 1819            214
 
    88.       "             "          {Between Jan. 7
                                       {and 14, 1819           214
 
    89.       "             "          Jan. 1819               215
 
    90. TO FANNY KEATS                 Jan. 1819               215
 
    91.       "    "                   Feb. 11, 1819           216
 
    92. TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS  Feb. 14-May 3, 1819     217
 
    93. TO FANNY KEATS                 Feb. 27, 1819           262
 
    94.      "     "                   Mar. 13, 1819           263
 
    95.      "     "                   Mar. 24, 1819           264
 
    96. TO JOSEPH SEVERN               Mar. 29? 1819           265
 
    97. TO FANNY KEATS                 April 13, 1819          265
 
    98. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      April 13, 1819          267
 
    99. TO FANNY KEATS                 April 17, 1819?         268
 
   100.     "     "                    May 13, 1819            270
 
   101.     "     "                    May 26, 1819            270
 
   102.     "     "                    June 9, 1819            271
 
   103. TO JAMES ELMES                 June 12, 1819           272
 
   104. TO FANNY KEATS                 June 14, 1819           272
 
   105.     "     "                    June 16, 1819           273
 
   106. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      June 17, 1819           274
 
   107. TO FANNY KEATS                 July 6, 1819           275
 
   108. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      July 11, 1819           276
 
   109. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     July 31, 1819           277
 
   110. TO BENJAMIN BAILEY             Aug. 15, 1819           280
 
   111. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Aug. 23, 1819           281
 
   112. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Aug. 25, 1819           282
 
   113. TO FANNY KEATS                 Aug. 28, 1819           283
 
   114. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Sept. 1, 1819           286
 
   115.      "    "                    Sept. 5, 1819           286
 
   116. TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS  Sept. 17-27, 1819       290
 
   117. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Sept. 22, 1819          319
 
   118. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     Sept. 22, 1819          322
 
   119. TO CHARLES BROWN               Sept. 23, 1819          325
 
   120.       "      "                 Sept. 23, 1819          327
 
   121. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     Oct. 1, 1819           328
 
   122. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Oct. 3, 1819           328
 
   123. TO FANNY KEATS                 Oct. 16, 1819           331
 
   124. TO JOSEPH SEVERN               Oct. 27? 1819           332
 
   125. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Nov. 17, 1819           333
 
   126. TO FANNY KEATS                 Nov. 17, 1819           334
 
   127. TO JOSEPH SEVERN               Dec. 6? 1819            334
 
   128. TO JAMES RICE                  Dec. 1819               335
 
   129. TO FANNY KEATS                 Dec. 20, 1819           335
 
   130.      "     "                   Dec. 22, 1819           337
 
   131. TO GEORGIANA KEATS             Jan. 13-28, 1820        338
 
   132. TO FANNY KEATS                 Feb. 6, 1820            347
 
   133.      "     "                   Feb. 8, 1820            348
 
   134.      "     "                   Feb. 11, 1820           350
 
   135.      "     "                   Feb. 14, 1820           350
 
   136. TO JAMES RICE                  Feb. 16, 1820           350
 
   137. TO FANNY KEATS                 Feb. 19, 1820           352
 
   138. TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS      Feb. 23 or 25, 1820     352
 
   139. TO FANNY KEATS                 Feb. 24, 1820           353
 
   140. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     Mar. 4, 1820            354
 
   141. TO FANNY KEATS                 Mar. 20, 1820           355
 
   142.      "     "                   April 1, 1820           356
 
   143.      "     "                   April 1820              357
 
   144.      "     "                   April 12, 1820          357
 
   145.      "     "                   April 21, 1820          357
 
   146.      "     "                   May 4, 1820             358
 
   147. TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE     May 1820                359
 
   148. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 June 11, 1820           360
 
   149. TO CHARLES BROWN               June 1820               360
 
   150. TO FANNY KEATS                 June 26, 1820           362
 
   151.      "     "                   July 5, 1820            363
 
   152. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      July 1820               363
 
   153. TO FANNY KEATS                 July 22, 1820           364
 
   154.      "     "                   Aug. 14, 1820           364
 
   155. TO PERCY BYSSHE SHELLEY        Aug. 1820               365
 
   156. TO JOHN TAYLOR                 Aug. 14, 1820           367
 
   157. TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON      Aug. 1820               367
 
   158. TO CHARLES BROWN               Aug. 1820               368
 
   159. TO FANNY KEATS                 Aug. 23, 1820           368
 
   160. TO CHARLES BROWN               Aug. 1820               370
 
   161.       "      "                 Sept. 28, 1820          370
 
   162. TO MRS. BRAWNE                 Oct. 24, 1820           372
 
   163. TO CHARLES BROWN               Nov. 1, 2, 1820         374
 
   164.       "      "                 Nov. 30, 1820           376
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 The object of the present volume is to supply the want, which many readers
 must have felt, of a separate and convenient edition of the letters of
 Keats to his family and friends. He is one of those poets whose genius
 makes itself felt in prose-writing almost as decisively as in verse, and
 at their best these letters are among the most beautiful in our language.
 Portions of them lent an especial charm to a book charming at any
 rate--the biography of the poet first published more than forty years ago
 by Lord Houghton. But the correspondence as given by Lord Houghton is
 neither accurate nor complete. He had in few cases the originals before
 him, but made use of copies, some of them quite fragmentary, especially
 those supplied him from America; and moreover, working while many of the
 poet's friends were still alive, he thought it right to exercise a degree
 of editorial freedom for which there would now be neither occasion nor
 excuse. While I was engaged in preparing the life of Keats for Mr.
 Morley's series some years since, the following materials for an improved
 edition of his letters came into my hands:--
 
 (1) The copies made by Richard Woodhouse, a few years after Keats's death,
 of the poet's correspondence with his principal friends, viz. the
 publishers, Messrs. Taylor and Hessey; the transcriber, Woodhouse himself,
 who was a young barrister of literary tastes in the confidence of those
 gentlemen; John Hamilton Reynolds, solicitor, poet, humourist, and critic
 (born 1796, died 1852); Jane and Mariane Reynolds, sisters of the
 last-named, the former afterwards Mrs. Tom Hood; James Rice, the bosom
 friend of Reynolds, and like him a young solicitor; Benjamin Bailey,
 undergraduate of Magdalen Hall, Oxford, afterwards Archdeacon of Colombo
 (1794?-1852), and one or two more.
 
 (2) The imperfect copies of the poet's letters to his brother and
 sister-in-law in America, which were made by the sister-in-law's second
 husband, Mr. Jeffrey of Louisville, and sent by him to Lord Houghton, who
 published them with further omissions and alterations of his own.
 
 (3) Somewhat later, after the publication of my book, the autograph
 originals of some of these same letters to America were put into my hands,
 including almost the entire text of Nos. lxiii. lxxiii. lxxx. and xcii. in
 the present edition. The three last are the long and famous
 journal-letters written in the autumn of 1818 and spring of 1819, and
 between them occupy nearly a quarter of the whole volume. I have shown
 elsewhere[1] how much of their value and interest was sacrificed by Mr.
 Jeffrey's omissions.
 
 Besides these manuscript sources, I have drawn largely on Mr. Buxton
 Forman's elaborate edition of Keats's works in four volumes (1883),[2] and
 to a much less extent on the edition published by the poet's American
 grand nephew, Mr. Speed (1884)[3]. Even thus, the correspondence is still
 probably not quite complete. In some of the voluminous journal-letters
 there may still be gaps, where a sheet of the autograph has gone astray;
 and since the following pages have been in print, I have heard of the
 existence in private collections of one or two letters which I have not
 been able to include. But it is not a case in which absolute completeness
 is of much importance.
 
 In matters of the date and sequence of the letters, I have taken pains to
 be more exact than previous editors, especially in tracing the daily
 progress and different halting-places of the poet on his Scotch tour
 (which it takes some knowledge of the ground to do), and in dating the
 successive parts, written at intervals sometimes during two or three
 months, of the long journal-letters to America. On these particulars Keats
 himself is very vague, and his manuscript sometimes runs on without a
 break at points where the sense shows that he has dropped and taken it up
 again after a pause of days or weeks.[4] Again, I have in all cases given
 in full the verse and other quotations contained in the correspondence,
 where other editors have only indicated them by their first lines. It is
 indeed from these that the letters derive a great part of their character.
 Writing to his nearest relatives or most intimate friends, he is always
 quoting for their pleasure poems of his own now classical, then warm from
 his brain, sent forth uncertain whether to live or die, or snatches of
 doggrel nonsense as the humour of the moment takes him. The former,
 familiar as we may be with them, gain a new interest and freshness from
 the context: the latter are nothing apart from it, and to print them
 gravely, as has been done, among the Poetical Works, is to punish the
 levities of genius too hard.
 
 As to the text, I have followed the autograph wherever it was possible,
 and in other cases the manuscript or printed version which I judged
 nearest the autograph; with this exception, that I have not thought it
 worth while to preserve mere slips of the pen or tricks of spelling. The
 curious in such matters will find them religiously reproduced by Mr.
 Buxton Forman wherever he has had the opportunity. The poet's punctuation,
 on the other hand, and his use of capitals, which is odd and full of
 character, I have preserved. As is well known, his handwriting is as a
 rule clear and beautiful, quite free from unsteadiness or sign of fatigue;
 and as mere specimens for the collector, few autographs can compare with
 these close-written quarto (or sometimes extra folio) sheets, in which the
 young poet has poured out to those he loved his whole self
 indiscriminately, generosity and fretfulness, ardour and despondency,
 boyish petulance side by side with manful good sense, the tattle of
 suburban parlours with the speculations of a spirit unsurpassed for native
 poetic gift and insight.
 
 The editor of familiar correspondence has at all times a difficult task
 before him in the choice what to give and what to withhold. In the case of
 Keats the difficulty is greater than in most, from the ferment of opposing
 elements and impulses in his nature, and from the extreme unreserve with
 which he lays himself open alike in his weakness and his strength. The
 other great letter-writers in English are men to some degree on their
 guard: men, if not of the world, at least of some worldly training and
 experience, and of characters in some degree formed and set. The phase of
 unlimited youthful expansiveness, of enthusiastic or fretful outcry, they
 have either escaped or left behind, and never give themselves away
 completely. Gray is of course an extreme case in point. With a masterly
 breadth of mind he unites an even finicking degree of academic
 fastidiousness and personal reserve, and his correspondence charms, not
 by impulse or openness, but by urbanity and irony, by ripeness of judgment
 and knowledge, by his playful kindliness towards the few intimates he has,
 and the sober wistfulness with which he looks out, from his Pisgah-height
 of universal culture, over regions of imaginative delight into which it
 was not given to him nor his contemporaries to enter fully. To take others
 differing most widely both as men and poets: Cowper, whether
 affectionately "chatting and chirping" to his cousin Lady Hesketh, or
 confiding his spiritual terrors to the Rev. John Newton, that unwise
 monitor who would not let them sleep,--Cowper is a letter-writer the most
 unaffected and sincere, but has nevertheless the degree of reticence
 natural to his breeding, as well as a touch of staidness and formality
 proper to his age. Byron offers an extreme contrast; unrestrained he is,
 but far indeed from being unaffected; the greatest attitudinist in
 literature as in life, and the most brilliant of all letter-writers after
 his fashion, with his wit, his wilfulness, his flash, his extraordinary
 unscrupulousness and resource, his vulgar pride of caste, his everlasting
 restlessness and egotism, his occasional true irradiations of the divine
 fire. Shelley, again--but he, as has been justly said, must have his
 singing robes about him to be quite truly Shelley, and in his
 correspondence is little more than any other amiable and enthusiastic
 gentleman and scholar on his travels. To the case of Keats, at any rate,
 none of these other distinguished letter-writers affords any close
 parallel. That admirable genius was from the social point of view an
 unformed lad in the flush and rawness of youth. His passion for beauty,
 his instinctive insight into the vital sources of imaginative delight in
 nature, in romance, and in antiquity, went along with perceptions
 painfully acute in matters of daily life, and nerves high-strung in the
 extreme. He was moreover almost incapable of artifice or disguise. Writing
 to his brothers and sister or to friends as dear, he is secret with them
 on one thing only, and that is his unlucky love-passion after he became a
 prey to it: for the rest he is open as the day, and keeps back nothing of
 what crosses his mind, nothing that vexes or jars on him or tries his
 patience. His character, as thus laid bare, contains elements of rare
 nobility and attraction--modesty, humour, sweetness, courage, impulsive
 disinterestedness, strong and tender family affection, the gift of
 righteous indignation, the gift of sober and strict self-knowledge. But it
 is only a character in the making. A strain of hereditary disease, lurking
 in his constitution from the first, was developed by over-exertion and
 aggravated by mischance, so that he never lived to be himself; and from
 about his twenty-fourth birthday his utterances are those of one
 struggling in vain against a hopeless distemper both of body and mind.
 
 If a selection could be made from those parts only of Keats's
 correspondence which show him at his best, we should have an anthology
 full of intuitions of beauty, even of wisdom, and breathing the very
 spirit of generous youth; one unrivalled for zest, whim, fancy, and
 amiability, and written in an English which by its peculiar alert and
 varied movement sometimes recalls, perhaps more closely than that of any
 other writer (for the young Cockney has Shakspeare in his blood), the
 prose passages of _Hamlet_ and _Much Ado about Nothing_. Had the
 correspondence never been printed before, were it there to be dealt with
 for the first time, this method of selection would no doubt be the
 tempting one to apply to it. But such a treatment is now hardly possible,
 and in any case would hardly be quite fair; since the object, or at all
 events the effect, of publishing a man's correspondence is not merely to
 give literary pleasure--it is to make the man himself known; and the
 revelation, though it need not be wholly without reserve, is bound to be
 just and proportionate as far as it goes. Even as an artist, in the work
 which he himself published to the world, Keats was not one of those of
 whom it could be said, "his worst he kept, his best he gave." Rather he
 gave promiscuously, in the just confidence that among the failures and
 half-successes of his inexperienced youth would be found enough of the
 best to establish his place among the poets after his death. Considering
 all things, the nature of the man, the difficulty of separating the
 exquisite from the common, the healthful from the diseased, in his mind
 and work, considering also the use that has already been made of the
 materials, I have decided in this edition to give the correspondence
 almost unpruned; omitting a few passages of mere crudity, hardly more than
 two pages in all, but not attempting to suppress those which betray the
 weak places in the writer's nature, his flaws of taste and training, his
 movements of waywardness, irritability, and morbid suspicion. Only the
 biographer without tact, the critic without balance, will insist on these.
 A truer as well as more charitable judgment will recognise that what was
 best in Keats was also what was most real, and will be fortified by
 remembering that to those who knew him his faults were almost unapparent,
 and that no man was ever held by his friends in more devoted or more
 unanimous affection while he lived and afterwards.
 
 There is one thing, however, which I have not chosen to do, and that is to
 include in this collection the poet's love-letters to Fanny Brawne. As it
 is, the intimate nature of the correspondence must sometimes give the
 reader a sense of eavesdropping, of being admitted into petty private
 matters with which he has no concern. If this is to some extent
 inevitable, it is by no means inevitable that the public should be farther
 asked to look over the shoulder of the sick and presently dying youth
 while he declares the impatience and torment of his passion to the object,
 careless and unresponsive as she seems to have been, who inspired it.
 These letters too have been printed. As a matter of feeling I cannot put
 myself in the place of the reader who desires to possess them; while as a
 matter of literature they are in a different key from the rest,--not
 lacking passages of beauty, but constrained and painful in the main, and
 quite without the genial ease and play of mind which make the letters to
 his family and friends so attractive. Therefore in this, which I hope may
 become the standard edition of his correspondence, they shall find no
 place.
 
 As to the persons, other than those already mentioned, to whom the letters
 here given are addressed:--Shelley of course needs no words; nor should
 any be needed for the painter Haydon (1786-1846), or the poet and critic
 Leigh Hunt (1784-1859). Theirs were the chief inspiring influences which
 determined the young medical student, about his twentieth year, at the
 time when this correspondence opens, to give up his intended profession
 for poetry. Both were men of remarkable gifts and strong intellectual
 enthusiasm, hampered in either case by foibles of character which their
 young friend and follower, who has left so far more illustrious a name,
 was only too quick to detect. Charles Cowden Clarke (1787-1877), the son
 of Keats's schoolmaster at Enfield, had exercised a still earlier
 influence on the lad's opening mind, and was himself afterwards long and
 justly distinguished as a Shakspearean student and lecturer and essayist
 on English literature. Charles Wentworth Dilke (1789-1864), having begun
 life in the Civil Service, early abandoned that calling for letters, and
 lived to be one of the most influential of English critics and
 journalists; he is chiefly known from his connection with the _Athenaeum_,
 and through the memoir published by his grandson. Charles Brown,
 afterwards styling himself Charles Armitage Brown (1786-1842), who became
 known to Keats through Dilke in the summer of 1817, and was his most
 intimate companion during the two years June 1818 to June 1820, had begun
 life as a merchant in St. Petersburg, and failing, came home, and took, he
 also, to literature, chiefly as a contributor to the various periodicals
 edited by Leigh Hunt. He lived mostly in Italy from 1822 to 1834, then
 for six years at Plymouth, and in 1841 emigrated to New Zealand, where he
 died the following year. Joseph Severn (1793-1879) was the son of a
 musician, himself beginning to practise as a painter when Keats knew him.
 His devoted tendance of the poet during the last sad months in Italy was
 the determining event of Severn's career, earning him the permanent regard
 and gratitude of all lovers of genius. He established himself for good in
 Rome, where he continued to practise his art, and was for many years
 English consul, and one of the most familiar figures in the society of the
 city.
 
 Lastly, of the poet's own relations, George Keats (1799-1842) after his
 brother's death continued to live at Louisville in America, where he made
 and lost a fortune in business before he died. His widow (born Georgiana
 Augusta Wylie), so often and affectionately addressed in these letters, by
 and by took a second husband, a Mr. Jeffrey, already mentioned as the
 correspondent of Lord Houghton. Frances Mary Keats (1803-1889), always
 called Fanny in the delightful series of letters which her brother
 addressed to her as a young girl,[5] in course of time married a Spanish
 gentleman, Senor Llanos, and lived in Madrid to a great old age. Several
 other members of the poet's circle enjoyed unusual length of days--Mr.
 William Dilke, for instance, dying a few years ago at ninety, and Mr.
 Gleig, long Chaplain-General of the Forces, at ninety-two. But with the
 death of his sister a year and a half ago, passed away probably the last
 survivor of those who could bear in memory the voice and features of
 Adonais.
 
 S. C.
 
 _May 1891._
 
 
 
 
 LETTERS OF JOHN KEATS TO HIS FAMILY AND FRIENDS
 
 
 
 
 I.--TO CHARLES COWDEN CLARKE.
 
 
 [London, October 31, 1816.]
 
 MY DAINTIE DAVIE--I will be as punctual as the Bee to the Clover. Very
 glad am I at the thoughts of seeing so soon this glorious Haydon and all
 his creation. I pray thee let me know when you go to Ollier's and where he
 resides--this I forgot to ask you--and tell me also when you will help me
 waste a sullen day--God 'ield you[6]--
 
 J. K.
 
 
 
 
 II.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 [London,] November 20, 1816.
 
 My dear Sir--Last evening wrought me up, and I cannot forbear sending you
 the following--
 
 Yours unfeignedly,
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Removed to 76 Cheapside.
 
   Great spirits now on earth are sojourning;
     He of the cloud, the cataract, the lake,
     Who on Helvellyn's summit, wide awake,
   Catches his freshness from Archangel's wing:
   He of the rose, the violet, the spring,
     The social smile, the chain for Freedom's sake:
     And lo!--whose stedfastness would never take
   A meaner sound than Raphael's whispering.
   And other spirits there are standing apart
     Upon the forehead of the age to come;
   These, these will give the world another heart,
     And other pulses. Hear ye not the hum
   Of mighty workings in the human mart?
     Listen awhile ye nations, and be dumb.[7]
 
 
 
 
 III.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 [London,] Thursday afternoon, November 20, 1816.
 
 My dear Sir--Your letter has filled me with a proud pleasure, and shall be
 kept by me as a stimulus to exertion--I begin to fix my eye upon one
 horizon. My feelings entirely fall in with yours in regard to the
 Ellipsis, and I glory in it. The Idea of your sending it to Wordsworth put
 me out of breath--you know with what Reverence I would send my Well-wishes
 to him.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 IV.--TO CHARLES COWDEN CLARKE.
 
 
 [London,] Tuesday [December 17, 1816].
 
 My dear Charles--You may now look at Minerva's Aegis with impunity, seeing
 that my awful Visage[8] did not turn you into a John Doree. You have
 accordingly a legitimate title to a Copy--I will use my interest to
 procure it for you. I'll tell you what--I met Reynolds at Haydon's a few
 mornings since--he promised to be with me this Evening and Yesterday I had
 the same promise from Severn and I must put you in mind that on last All
 hallowmas' day you gave me your word that you would spend this Evening
 with me--so no putting off. I have done little to Endymion lately[9]--I
 hope to finish it in one more attack. I believe you I went to
 Richards's--it was so whoreson a Night that I stopped there all the next
 day. His Remembrances to you. (Ext. from the common place Book of my
 Mind--Mem.--Wednesday--Hampstead--call in Warner Street--a sketch of Mr.
 Hunt.)--I will ever consider you my sincere and affectionate friend--you
 will not doubt that I am yours.
 
 God bless you--
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 V.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [London,] Sunday Evening [March 2, 1817?].[10]
 
 My dear Reynolds--Your kindness affects me so sensibly that I can merely
 put down a few mono-sentences. Your Criticism only makes me extremely
 anxious that I should not deceive you.
 
 It's the finest thing by God as Hazlitt would say. However I hope I may
 not deceive you. There are some acquaintances of mine who will scratch
 their Beards and although I have, I hope, some Charity, I wish their Nails
 may be long. I will be ready at the time you mention in all Happiness.
 
 There is a report that a young Lady of 16 has written the new Tragedy, God
 bless her--I will know her by Hook or by Crook in less than a week. My
 Brothers' and my Remembrances to your kind Sisters.
 
 Yours most sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 VI.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [London, March 17, 1817.]
 
 My dear Reynolds--My Brothers are anxious that I should go by myself into
 the country--they have always been extremely fond of me, and now that
 Haydon has pointed out how necessary it is that I should be alone to
 improve myself, they give up the temporary pleasure of living with me
 continually for a great good which I hope will follow. So I shall soon be
 out of Town. You must soon bring all your present troubles to a close, and
 so must I, but we must, like the Fox, prepare for a fresh swarm of flies.
 Banish money--Banish sofas--Banish Wine--Banish Music; but right Jack
 Health, honest Jack Health, true Jack Health--Banish health and banish all
 the world. I must ... if I come this evening, I shall horribly commit
 myself elsewhere. So I will send my excuses to them and Mrs. Dilke by my
 brothers.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 VII.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 [Southampton,] Tuesday Morn [April 15, 1817].
 
 My dear Brothers--I am safe at Southampton--after having ridden three
 stages outside and the rest in for it began to be very cold. I did not
 know the Names of any of the Towns I passed through--all I can tell you is
 that sometimes I saw dusty Hedges--sometimes Ponds--then nothing--then a
 little Wood with trees look you like Launce's Sister "as white as a Lily
 and as small as a Wand"--then came houses which died away into a few
 straggling Barns--then came hedge trees aforesaid again. As the Lamplight
 crept along the following things were discovered--"long heath broom
 furze"--Hurdles here and there half a Mile--Park palings when the Windows
 of a House were always discovered by reflection--One Nymph of
 Fountain--_N.B. Stone_--lopped Trees--Cow ruminating--ditto Donkey--Man
 and Woman going gingerly along--William seeing his Sisters over the
 Heath--John waiting with a Lanthorn for his Mistress--Barber's
 Pole--Doctor's Shop--However after having had my fill of these I popped my
 Head out just as it began to Dawn--_N.B. this Tuesday Morn saw the Sun
 rise_--of which I shall say nothing at present. I felt rather lonely this
 Morning at Breakfast so I went and unbox'd a Shakspeare--"There's my
 Comfort."[11] I went immediately after Breakfast to Southampton Water
 where I enquired for the Boat to the Isle of Wight as I intend seeing that
 place before I settle--it will go at 3, so shall I after having taken a
 Chop. I know nothing of this place but that it is long--tolerably
 broad--has bye streets--two or three Churches--a very respectable old Gate
 with two Lions to guard it. The Men and Women do not materially differ
 from those I have been in the Habit of seeing. I forgot to say that from
 dawn till half-past six I went through a most delightful Country--some
 open Down but for the most part thickly wooded. What surprised me most was
 an immense quantity of blooming Furze on each side the road cutting a most
 rural dash. The Southampton water when I saw it just now was no better
 than a low Water Water which did no more than answer my expectations--it
 will have mended its Manners by 3. From the Wharf are seen the shores on
 each side stretching to the Isle of Wight. You, Haydon, Reynolds, etc.
 have been pushing each other out of my Brain by turns. I have conned over
 every Head in Haydon's Picture--you must warn them not to be afraid should
 my Ghost visit them on Wednesday--tell Haydon to Kiss his Hand at Betty
 over the Way for me yea and to spy at her for me. I hope one of you will
 be competent to take part in a Trio while I am away--you need only
 aggravate your voices a little and mind not to speak Cues and all--when
 you have said Rum-ti-ti--you must not be rum any more or else another will
 take up the ti-ti alone and then he might be taken God shield us for
 little better than a Titmouse. By the by talking of Titmouse Remember me
 particularly to all my Friends--give my Love to the Miss Reynoldses and to
 Fanny who I hope you will soon see. Write to me soon about them all--and
 you George particularly how you get on with Wilkinson's plan. What could I
 have done without my Plaid? I don't feel inclined to write any more at
 present for I feel rather muzzy--you must be content with this fac simile
 of the rough plan of Aunt Dinah's Counterpane.
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Reynolds shall hear from me soon.
 
 
 
 
 VIII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Carisbrooke, April 17th [1817].
 
 My dear Reynolds--Ever since I wrote to my Brothers from Southampton I
 have been in a taking--and at this moment I am about to become
 settled--for I have unpacked my books, put them into a snug corner, pinned
 up Haydon, Mary Queen of Scots, and Milton with his daughters in a row. In
 the passage I found a head of Shakspeare which I had not before seen. It
 is most likely the same that George spoke so well of, for I like it
 extremely. Well--this head I have hung over my Books, just above the three
 in a row, having first discarded a French Ambassador--now this alone is a
 good morning's work. Yesterday I went to Shanklin, which occasioned a
 great debate in my mind whether I should live there or at Carisbrooke.
 Shanklin is a most beautiful place--Sloping wood and meadow ground reach
 round the Chine, which is a cleft between the Cliffs of the depth of
 nearly 300 feet at least. This cleft is filled with trees and bushes in
 the narrow part, and as it widens becomes bare, if it were not for
 primroses on one side, which spread to the very verge of the Sea, and some
 fishermen's huts on the other, perched midway in the Balustrades of
 beautiful green Hedges along their steps down to the sands. But the sea,
 Jack, the sea--the little waterfall--then the white cliff--then St.
 Catherine's Hill--"the sheep in the meadows, the cows in the corn." Then,
 why are you at Carisbrooke? say you. Because, in the first place, I should
 be at twice the Expense, and three times the inconvenience--next that from
 here I can see your continent--from a little hill close by the whole north
 Angle of the Isle of Wight, with the water between us. In the 3rd place, I
 see Carisbrooke Castle from my window, and have found several delightful
 wood-alleys, and copses, and quick freshes.[12] As for primroses--the
 Island ought to be called Primrose Island--that is, if the nation of
 Cowslips agree thereto, of which there are divers Clans just beginning to
 lift up their heads. Another reason of my fixing is, that I am more in
 reach of the places around me. I intend to walk over the Island
 east--West--North--South. I have not seen many specimens of Ruins--I don't
 think however I shall ever see one to surpass Carisbrooke Castle. The
 trench is overgrown with the smoothest turf, and the Walls with ivy. The
 Keep within side is one Bower of ivy--a colony of Jackdaws have been there
 for many years. I dare say I have seen many a descendant of some old cawer
 who peeped through the Bars at Charles the first, when he was there in
 Confinement. On the road from Cowes to Newport I saw some extensive
 Barracks, which disgusted me extremely with the Government for placing
 such a Nest of Debauchery in so beautiful a place. I asked a man on the
 Coach about this--and he said that the people had been spoiled. In the
 room where I slept at Newport, I found this on the Window--"O Isle spoilt
 by the mil_a_tary!..."
 
 The wind is in a sulky fit, and I feel that it would be no bad thing to be
 the favourite of some Fairy, who would give one the power of seeing how
 our Friends got on at a Distance. I should like, of all Loves, a sketch of
 you and Tom and George in ink which Haydon will do if you tell him how I
 want them. From want of regular rest I have been rather _narvus_--and the
 passage in _Lear_--"Do you not hear the sea?"--has haunted me intensely.
 
 ON THE SEA
 
   It keeps eternal whisperings around
     Desolate shores, and with its mighty swell
     Gluts twice ten thousand Caverns, till the spell
   Of Hecate leaves them their old shadowy sound.
   Often 'tis in such gentle temper found,
     That scarcely will the very smallest shell
     Be mov'd for days from where it sometime fell,
   When last the winds of Heaven were unbound.
   O ye! who have your eye-balls vex'd and tir'd,
     Feast them upon the wideness of the Sea;
       O ye! whose Ears are dinn'd with uproar rude,
     Or fed too much with cloying melody--
       Sit ye near some old Cavern's Mouth, and brood
   Until ye start as if the sea Nymphs quired--[13]
 
 
 April 18th.
 
 Will you have the goodness to do this? Borrow a Botanical Dictionary--turn
 to the words Laurel and Prunus, show the explanations to your sisters and
 Mrs. Dilke and without more ado let them send me the Cups Basket and Books
 they trifled and put off and off while I was in town. Ask them what they
 can say for themselves--ask Mrs. Dilke wherefore she does so distress
 me--let me know how Jane has her health--the Weather is unfavourable for
 her. Tell George and Tom to write. I'll tell you what--on the 23d was
 Shakspeare born. Now if I should receive a letter from you and another
 from my Brothers on that day 'twould be a parlous good thing. Whenever you
 write say a word or two on some Passage in Shakspeare that may have come
 rather new to you, which must be continually happening, notwithstanding
 that we read the same Play forty times--for instance, the following from
 the Tempest never struck me so forcibly as at present,
 
                                           "Urchins
   _Shall, for the vast of night that they may work_,
   All exercise on thee--"
 
 How can I help bringing to your mind the line--
 
   _In the dark backward and abysm of time_--
 
 I find I cannot exist without Poetry--without eternal Poetry--half the day
 will not do--the whole of it--I began with a little, but habit has made me
 a Leviathan. I had become all in a Tremble from not having written
 anything of late--the Sonnet overleaf did me good. I slept the better last
 night for it--this Morning, however, I am nearly as bad again. Just now I
 opened Spenser, and the first Lines I saw were these--
 
   "The noble heart that harbours virtuous thought,
   And is with child of glorious great intent,
   Can never rest until it forth have brought
   Th' eternal brood of glory excellent--"
 
 Let me know particularly about Haydon, ask him to write to me about Hunt,
 if it be only ten lines--I hope all is well--I shall forthwith begin my
 Endymion, which I hope I shall have got some way with by the time you
 come, when we will read our verses in a delightful place I have set my
 heart upon, near the Castle. Give my Love to your Sisters severally--to
 George and Tom. Remember me to Rice, Mr. and Mrs. Dilke and all we know.
 
 Your sincere Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Direct J. Keats, Mrs. Cook's, New Village, Carisbrooke.
 
 
 
 
 IX.--TO LEIGH HUNT.
 
 
 Margate, May 10, 1817.
 
 My dear Hunt--The little gentleman that sometimes lurks in a gossip's
 bowl, ought to have come in the very likeness of a _roasted_ crab, and
 choaked me outright for not answering your letter ere this: however, you
 must not suppose that I was in town to receive it: no, it followed me to
 the Isle of Wight, and I got it just as I was going to pack up for
 Margate, for reasons which you anon shall hear. On arriving at this
 treeless affair, I wrote to my brother George to request C. C. C.[14] to
 do the thing you wot of respecting Rimini; and George tells me he has
 undertaken it with great pleasure; so I hope there has been an
 understanding between you for many proofs: C. C. C. is well acquainted
 with Bensley. Now why did you not send the key of your cupboard, which, I
 know, was full of papers? We would have locked them all in a trunk,
 together with those you told me to destroy, which indeed I did not do, for
 fear of demolishing receipts, there not being a more unpleasant thing in
 the world (saving a thousand and one others) than to pay a bill twice.
 Mind you, old Wood's a "very varmint," shrouded in covetousness:--and now
 I am upon a horrid subject--what a horrid one you were upon last Sunday,
 and well you handled it. The last Examiner[15] was a battering-ram against
 Christianity, blasphemy, Tertullian, Erasmus, Sir Philip Sidney; and then
 the dreadful Petzelians and their expiation by blood; and do Christians
 shudder at the same thing in a newspaper which they attribute to their God
 in its most aggravated form? What is to be the end of this? I must mention
 Hazlitt's Southey.[16] O that he had left out the grey hairs; or that
 they had been in any other paper not concluding with such a thunderclap!
 That sentence about making a page of the feeling of a whole life, appears
 to me like a whale's back in the sea of prose. I ought to have said a word
 on Shakspeare's Christianity. There are two which I have not looked over
 with you, touching the thing: the one for, the other against: that in
 favour is in Measure for Measure, Act II. Scene ii.--
 
     _Isab._ Alas, alas!
   Why, all the souls that were, were forfeit once;
   And He that might the 'vantage best have took,
   Found out the remedy.
 
 That against is in Twelfth Night, Act III. Scene ii.--
 
      _Maria._ For there is no Christian that means to be saved by
      believing rightly, can ever believe such impossible passages of
      grossness.
 
 Before I come to the Nymphs,[17] I must get through all disagreeables. I
 went to the Isle of Wight, thought so much about poetry, so long together,
 that I could not get to sleep at night; and, moreover, I know not how it
 was, I could not get wholesome food. By this means, in a week or so, I
 became not over capable in my upper stories, and set off pell-mell for
 Margate, at least a hundred and fifty miles, because, forsooth, I fancied
 that I should like my old lodging here, and could contrive to do without
 trees. Another thing, I was too much in solitude, and consequently was
 obliged to be in continual burning of thought, as an only resource.
 However, Tom is with me at present, and we are very comfortable. We
 intend, though, to get among some trees. How have you got on among them?
 How are the Nymphs? I suppose they have led you a fine dance. Where are
 you now?--in Judea, Cappadocia, or the parts of Libya about Cyrene?
 Stranger from "Heaven, Hues, and Prototypes," I wager you have given
 several new turns to the old saying, "Now the maid was fair and pleasant
 to look on," as well as made a little variation in "Once upon a time."
 Perhaps, too, you have rather varied, "Here endeth the first lesson." Thus
 I hope you have made a horseshoe business of "unsuperfluous life," "faint
 bowers," and fibrous roots. I vow that I have been down in the mouth
 lately at this work. These last two days, however, I have felt more
 confident--I have asked myself so often why I should be a poet more than
 other men, seeing how great a thing it is,--how great things are to be
 gained by it, what a thing to be in the mouth of Fame,--that at last the
 idea has grown so monstrously beyond my seeming power of attainment, that
 the other day I nearly consented with myself to drop into a Phaethon. Yet
 'tis a disgrace to fail, even in a huge attempt; and at this moment I
 drive the thought from me. I began my poem about a fortnight since, and
 have done some every day, except travelling ones. Perhaps I may have done
 a good deal for the time, but it appears such a pin's point to me, that I
 will not copy any out. When I consider that so many of these pin-points go
 to form a bodkin-point (God send I end not my life with a bare bodkin, in
 its modern sense!), and that it requires a thousand bodkins to make a
 spear bright enough to throw any light to posterity, I see nothing but
 continual uphill journeying. Now is there anything more unpleasant (it may
 come among the thousand and one) than to be so journeying and to miss the
 goal at last? But I intend to whistle all these cogitations into the sea,
 where I hope they will breed storms violent enough to block up all exit
 from Russia. Does Shelley go on telling strange stories of the deaths of
 kings?[18] Tell him, there are strange stories of the deaths of poets.
 Some have died before they were conceived. "How do you make that out,
 Master Vellum?" Does Mrs. S. cut bread and butter as neatly as ever? Tell
 her to procure some fatal scissors, and cut the thread of life of all
 to-be-disappointed poets. Does Mrs. Hunt tear linen as straight as ever?
 Tell her to tear from the book of life all blank leaves. Remember me to
 them all; to Miss Kent and the little ones all.
 
 Your sincere Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS _alias_ JUNKETS.
 
 You shall hear where we move.
 
 
 
 
 X.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Margate, Saturday Eve [May 10, 1817].
 
 My dear Haydon,
 
   "Let Fame, that all pant after in their lives,
   Live register'd upon our brazen tombs,
   And so grace us in the disgrace of death:
   When spite of cormorant devouring Time
   The endeavour of this present breath may buy
   That Honour which shall bate his Scythe's keen edge
   And make us heirs of all eternity."[19]
 
 To think that I have no right to couple myself with you in this speech
 would be death to me, so I have e'en written it, and I pray God that our
 "brazen tombs" be nigh neighbours. It cannot be long first; the "endeavour
 of this present breath" will soon be over, and yet it is as well to
 breathe freely during our sojourn--it is as well as if you have not been
 teased with that Money affair, that bill-pestilence. However, I must think
 that difficulties nerve the Spirit of a Man--they make our Prime Objects a
 Refuge as well as a Passion. The Trumpet of Fame is as a tower of
 Strength, the ambitious bloweth it and is safe. I suppose, by your telling
 me not to give way to forebodings, George has mentioned to you what I have
 lately said in my Letters to him--truth is I have been in such a state of
 Mind as to read over my Lines and hate them. I am one that "gathers
 Samphire, dreadful trade"--the Cliff of Poesy towers above me--yet when
 Tom who meets with some of Pope's Homer in Plutarch's Lives reads some of
 those to me they seem like Mice to mine. I read and write about eight
 hours a day. There is an old saying "well begun is half done"--'tis a bad
 one. I would use instead, "Not begun at all till half done;" so according
 to that I have not begun my Poem and consequently (a priori) can say
 nothing about it. Thank God! I do begin arduously where I leave off,
 notwithstanding occasional depressions; and I hope for the support of a
 High Power while I climb this little eminence, and especially in my Years
 of more momentous Labour. I remember your saying that you had notions of a
 good Genius presiding over you. I have of late had the same thought, for
 things which I do half at Random are afterwards confirmed by my judgment
 in a dozen features of Propriety. Is it too daring to fancy Shakspeare
 this Presider? When in the Isle of Wight I met with a Shakspeare in the
 Passage of the House at which I lodged--it comes nearer to my idea of him
 than any I have seen--I was but there a Week, yet the old woman made me
 take it with me though I went off in a hurry. Do you not think this is
 ominous of good? I am glad you say every man of great views is at times
 tormented as I am.
 
 
 Sunday after [May 11].
 
 This Morning I received a letter from George by which it appears that
 Money Troubles are to follow us up for some time to come--perhaps for
 always--these vexations are a great hindrance to one--they are not like
 Envy and detraction stimulants to further exertion as being immediately
 relative and reflected on at the same time with the prime object--but
 rather like a nettle leaf or two in your bed. So now I revoke my Promise
 of finishing my Poem by the Autumn which I should have done had I gone on
 as I have done--but I cannot write while my spirit is fevered in a
 contrary direction and I am now sure of having plenty of it this Summer.
 At this moment I am in no enviable Situation--I feel that I am not in a
 Mood to write any to-day; and it appears that the loss of it is the
 beginning of all sorts of irregularities. I am extremely glad that a time
 must come when everything will leave not a wrack behind. You tell me never
 to despair--I wish it was as easy for me to observe the saying--truth is I
 have a horrid Morbidity of Temperament which has shown itself at
 intervals--it is I have no doubt the greatest Enemy and stumbling-block I
 have to fear--I may even say that it is likely to be the cause of my
 disappointment. However every ill has its share of good--this very bane
 would at any time enable me to look with an obstinate eye on the Devil
 Himself--aye to be as proud of being the lowest of the human race as
 Alfred could be in being of the highest. I feel confident I should have
 been a rebel angel had the opportunity been mine. I am very sure that you
 do love me as your very Brother--I have seen it in your continual anxiety
 for me--and I assure you that your welfare and fame is and will be a chief
 pleasure to me all my Life. I know no one but you who can be fully
 sensible of the turmoil and anxiety, the sacrifice of all what is called
 comfort, the readiness to measure time by what is done and to die in six
 hours could plans be brought to conclusions--the looking upon the Sun, the
 Moon, the Stars, the Earth and its contents, as materials to form greater
 things--that is to say ethereal things--but here I am talking like a
 Madman,--greater things than our Creator himself made!!
 
 I wrote to Hunt yesterday--scarcely know what I said in it. I could not
 talk about Poetry in the way I should have liked for I was not in humor
 with either his or mine. His self-delusions are very lamentable--they have
 enticed him into a Situation which I should be less eager after than that
 of a galley Slave--what you observe thereon is very true must be in time.
 
 Perhaps it is a self-delusion to say so--but I think I could not be
 deceived in the manner that Hunt is--may I die to-morrow if I am to be.
 There is no greater Sin after the seven deadly than to flatter oneself
 into an idea of being a great Poet--or one of those beings who are
 privileged to wear out their Lives in the pursuit of Honor--how
 comfortable a feel it is to feel that such a Crime must bring its heavy
 Penalty? That if one be a Self-deluder accounts must be balanced? I am
 glad you are hard at Work--'t will now soon be done--I long to see
 Wordsworth's as well as to have mine in:[20] but I would rather not show
 my face in Town till the end of the Year--if that will be time enough--if
 not I shall be disappointed if you do not write for me even when you think
 best. I never quite despair and I read Shakspeare--indeed I shall I think
 never read any other Book much. Now this might lead me into a long Confab
 but I desist. I am very near agreeing with Hazlitt that Shakspeare is
 enough for us. By the by what a tremendous Southean article his last
 was--I wish he had left out "grey hairs." It was very gratifying to meet
 your remarks on the manuscript--I was reading Anthony and Cleopatra when I
 got the Paper and there are several Passages applicable to the events you
 commentate. You say that he arrived by degrees and not by any single
 struggle to the height of his ambition--and that his Life had been as
 common in particulars as other Men's. Shakspeare makes Enobarb say--
 
                                  Where's Antony?
   _Eros._--He's walking in the garden, and _spurns
   The rush that lies_ before him; cries, Fool, Lepidus!
 
 In the same scene we find--
 
                        Let determined things
   To destiny hold unbewailed their way.
 
 Dolabella says of Anthony's Messenger,
 
   An argument that he is pluck'd when hither
   He sends so poor a pinion of his wing.
 
 Then again--
 
     _Eno._--I see Men's Judgments are
   A parcel of their fortunes; and things outward
   Do draw the inward quality after them,
   To suffer all alike.
 
 The following applies well to Bertrand[21]--
 
                 Yet he that can endure
   To follow with allegiance a fallen Lord,
   Does conquer him that did his Master conquer,
   And earns a place i' the story.
 
 But how differently does Buonaparte bear his fate from Anthony!
 
 'Tis good, too, that the Duke of Wellington has a good Word or so in the
 Examiner. A Man ought to have the Fame he deserves--and I begin to think
 that detracting from him as well as from Wordsworth is the same thing. I
 wish he had a little more taste--and did not in that respect "deal in
 Lieutenantry." You should have heard from me before this--but in the first
 place I did not like to do so before I had got a little way in the First
 Book, and in the next as G. told me you were going to write I delayed till
 I had heard from you. Give my Respects the next time you write to the
 North and also to John Hunt. Remember me to Reynolds and tell him to
 write. Ay, and when you send Westward tell your Sister that I mentioned
 her in this. So now in the name of Shakspeare, Raphael and all our Saints,
 I commend you to the care of heaven!
 
 Your everlasting Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XI.--TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY.
 
 
 Margate, May 16, 1817.
 
 My dear Sirs--I am extremely indebted to you for your liberality in the
 shape of manufactured rag, value L20, and shall immediately proceed to
 destroy some of the minor heads of that hydra the dun; to conquer which
 the knight need have no Sword Shield Cuirass, Cuisses Herbadgeon Spear
 Casque Greaves Paldrons spurs Chevron or any other scaly commodity, but
 he need only take the Bank-note of Faith and Cash of Salvation, and set
 out against the monster, invoking the aid of no Archimago or Urganda, but
 finger me the paper, light as the Sibyl's leaves in Virgil, whereat the
 fiend skulks off with his tail between his legs. Touch him with this
 enchanted paper, and he whips you his head away as fast as a snail's
 horn--but then the horrid propensity he has to put it up again has
 discouraged many very valiant Knights. He is such a never-ending
 still-beginning sort of a body--like my landlady of the Bell. I should
 conjecture that the very spright that "the green sour ringlets makes
 Whereof the ewe not bites" had manufactured it of the dew fallen on said
 sour ringlets. I think I could make a nice little allegorical poem, called
 "The Dun," where we would have the Castle of Carelessness, the drawbridge
 of credit, Sir Novelty Fashion's expedition against the City of Tailors,
 etc. etc. I went day by day at my poem for a Month--at the end of which
 time the other day I found my Brain so over-wrought that I had neither
 rhyme nor reason in it--so was obliged to give up for a few days. I hope
 soon to be able to resume my work--I have endeavoured to do so once or
 twice; but to no purpose. Instead of Poetry, I have a swimming in my head
 and feel all the effects of a Mental debauch, lowness of Spirits, anxiety
 to go on without the power to do so, which does not at all tend to my
 ultimate progression. However to-morrow I will begin my next month. This
 evening I go to Canterbury, having got tired of Margate. I was not right
 in my head when I came--At Canterbury I hope the remembrance of Chaucer
 will set me forward like a Billiard Ball. I am glad to hear of Mr. T.'s
 health, and of the welfare of the "In-town-stayers." And think Reynolds
 will like his Trip--I have some idea of seeing the Continent some time
 this summer. In repeating how sensible I am of your kindness, I remain
 
 Y{r} obed{t} serv{t} and friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 I shall be happy to hear any little intelligence in the literary or
 friendly way when you have time to scribble.
 
 
 
 
 XII.--TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY.
 
 
 [London] Tuesday Morn [July 8, 1817].
 
 My dear Sirs--I must endeavour to lose my maidenhead with respect to money
 Matters as soon as possible--And I will too--So, here goes! A couple of
 Duns that I thought would be silent till the beginning, at least, of next
 month (when I am certain to be on my legs, for certain sure), have opened
 upon me with a cry most "untuneable"; never did you hear such
 _un-_"gallant chiding." Now you must know, I am not desolate, but have,
 thank God, 25 good notes in my fob. But then, you know, I laid them by to
 write with and would stand at bay a fortnight ere they should grab me. In
 a month's time I must pay, but it would relieve my mind if I owed you,
 instead of these Pelican duns.
 
 I am afraid you will say I have "wound about with circumstance," when I
 should have asked plainly--however as I said I am a little maidenish or
 so, and I feel my virginity come strong upon me, the while I request the
 loan of a L20 and a L10, which, if you would enclose to me, I would
 acknowledge and save myself a hot forehead. I am sure you are confident of
 my responsibility, and in the sense of squareness that is always in me.
 
 Your obliged friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XIII.--TO MARIANE AND JANE REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [Oxford,[22] September 5, 1817].
 
 My dear Friends--You are I am glad to hear comfortable at Hampton,[23]
 where I hope you will receive the Biscuits we ate the other night at
 Little Britain.[24] I hope you found them good. There you are among
 sands, stones, Pebbles, Beeches, Cliffs, Rocks, Deeps, Shallows, weeds,
 ships, Boats (at a distance), Carrots, Turnips, sun, moon, and stars and
 all those sort of things--here am I among Colleges, halls, Stalls, Plenty
 of Trees, thank God--Plenty of water, thank heaven--Plenty of Books, thank
 the Muses--Plenty of Snuff, thank Sir Walter Raleigh--Plenty of
 segars,--Ditto--Plenty of flat country, thank Tellus's rolling-pin. I'm on
 the sofa--Buonaparte is on the snuff-box--But you are by the
 seaside--argal, you bathe--you walk--you say "how beautiful"--find out
 resemblances between waves and camels--rocks and dancing-masters--
 fireshovels and telescopes--Dolphins and Madonas--which word, by the way,
 I must acquaint you was derived from the Syriac, and came down in a way
 which neither of you I am sorry to say are at all capable of comprehending.
 But as a time may come when by your occasional converse with me you may
 arrive at "something like prophetic strain," I will unbar the gates of my
 pride and let my condescension stalk forth like a ghost at the
 Circus.--The word Ma-don-a, my dear Ladies--or--the word Mad--Ona--so I
 say! I am not mad--Howsumever when that aged Tamer Kewthon sold a certain
 camel called Peter to the overseer of the Babel Sky-works, he thus spake,
 adjusting his cravat round the tip of his chin--"My dear
 Ten-story-up-in-air! this here Beast, though I say it as shouldn't say't,
 not only has the power of subsisting 40 days and 40 nights without fire
 and candle but he can sing.--Here I have in my Pocket a Certificate from
 Signor Nicolini of the King's Theatre; a Certificate to this effect----" I
 have had dinner since I left that effect upon you, and feel too heavy in
 mentibus to display all the Profundity of the Polygon--so you had better
 each of you take a glass of cherry Brandy and drink to the health of
 Archimedes, who was of so benign a disposition that he never would leave
 Syracuse in his life--So kept himself out of all Knight-Errantry.--This I
 know to be a fact; for it is written in the 45th book of Winkine's
 treatise on garden-rollers, that he trod on a fishwoman's toe in
 Liverpool, and never begged her pardon. Now the long and short is
 this--that is by comparison--for a long day may be a short year--A long
 Pole may be a very stupid fellow as a man. But let us refresh ourself from
 this depth of thinking, and turn to some innocent jocularity--the Bow
 cannot always be bent--nor the gun always loaded, if you ever let it
 off--and the life of man is like a great Mountain--his breath is like a
 Shrewsbury cake--he comes into the world like a shoeblack, and goes out of
 it like a cobbler--he eats like a chimney-sweeper, drinks like a
 gingerbread baker--and breathes like Achilles--so it being that we are
 such sublunary creatures, let us endeavour to correct all our bad
 spelling--all our most delightful abominations, and let us wish health to
 Marian and Jane, whoever they be and wherever.
 
 Yours truly
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XIV--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Oxford, September 10 [1817].
 
 My dear Fanny--Let us now begin a regular question and answer--a little
 pro and con; letting it interfere as a pleasant method of my coming at
 your favorite little wants and enjoyments, that I may meet them in a way
 befitting a brother.
 
 We have been so little together since you have been able to reflect on
 things that I know not whether you prefer the History of King Pepin to
 Bunyan's Pilgrim's Progress--or Cinderella and her glass slipper to
 Moore's Almanack. However in a few Letters I hope I shall be able to come
 at that and adapt my scribblings to your Pleasure. You must tell me about
 all you read if it be only six Pages in a Week and this transmitted to me
 every now and then will procure you full sheets of Writing from me pretty
 frequently.--This I feel as a necessity for we ought to become intimately
 acquainted, in order that I may not only, as you grow up love you as my
 only Sister, but confide in you as my dearest friend. When I saw you last
 I told you of my intention of going to Oxford and 'tis now a Week since I
 disembark'd from his Whipship's Coach the Defiance in this place. I am
 living in Magdalen Hall on a visit to a young Man with whom I have not
 been long acquainted, but whom I like very much--we lead very industrious
 lives--he in general Studies and I in proceeding at a pretty good rate
 with a Poem which I hope you will see early in the next year.--Perhaps you
 might like to know what I am writing about. I will tell you. Many Years
 ago there was a young handsome Shepherd who fed his flocks on a Mountain's
 Side called Latmus--he was a very contemplative sort of a Person and lived
 solitary among the trees and Plains little thinking that such a beautiful
 Creature as the Moon was growing mad in Love with him.--However so it was;
 and when he was asleep on the Grass she used to come down from heaven and
 admire him excessively for a long time; and at last could not refrain from
 carrying him away in her arms to the top of that high Mountain Latmus
 while he was a dreaming--but I daresay you have read this and all the
 other beautiful Tales which have come down from the ancient times of that
 beautiful Greece. If you have not let me know and I will tell you more at
 large of others quite as delightful. This Oxford I have no doubt is the
 finest City in the world--it is full of old Gothic buildings--Spires--
 towers--Quadrangles--Cloisters--Groves, etc., and is surrounded with more
 clear streams than ever I saw together. I take a Walk by the Side of one
 of them every Evening and, thank God, we have not had a drop of rain these
 many days. I had a long and interesting Letter from George, cross lines by
 a short one from Tom yesterday dated Paris. They both send their loves to
 you. Like most Englishmen they feel a mighty preference for everything
 English--the French Meadows, the trees, the People, the Towns, the
 Churches, the Books, the everything--although they may be in themselves
 good: yet when put in comparison with our green Island they all vanish
 like Swallows in October. They have seen Cathedrals, Manuscripts,
 Fountains, Pictures, Tragedy, Comedy,--with other things you may by chance
 meet with in this Country such as Washerwomen, Lamplighters, Turnpikemen,
 Fishkettles, Dancing Masters, Kettle drums, Sentry Boxes, Rocking Horses,
 etc.--and, now they have taken them over a set of boxing-gloves.
 
 I have written to George and requested him, as you wish I should, to write
 to you. I have been writing very hard lately, even till an utter
 incapacity came on, and I feel it now about my head: so you must not mind
 a little out-of-the-way sayings--though by the bye were my brain as clear
 as a bell I think I should have a little propensity thereto. I shall stop
 here till I have finished the 3d Book of my Story; which I hope will be
 accomplish'd in at most three Weeks from to-day--about which time you
 shall see me. How do you like Miss Taylor's essays in Rhyme--I just look'd
 into the Book and it appeared to me suitable to you--especially since I
 remember your liking for those pleasant little things the Original
 Poems--the essays are the more mature production of the same hand. While I
 was speaking about France it occurred to me to speak a few Words on their
 Language--it is perhaps the poorest one ever spoken since the jabbering in
 the Tower of Babel, and when you come to know that the real use and
 greatness of a Tongue is to be referred to its Literature--you will be
 astonished to find how very inferior it is to our native Speech.--I wish
 the Italian would supersede French in every school throughout the Country,
 for that is full of real Poetry and Romance of a kind more fitted for the
 Pleasure of Ladies than perhaps our own.--It seems that the only end to be
 gained in acquiring French is the immense accomplishment of speaking
 it--it is none at all--a most lamentable mistake indeed. Italian indeed
 would sound most musically from Lips which had began to pronounce it as
 early as French is crammed down our Mouths, as if we were young Jackdaws
 at the mercy of an overfeeding Schoolboy. Now Fanny you must write
 soon--and write all you think about, never mind what--only let me have a
 good deal of your writing--You need not do it all at once--be two or three
 or four days about it, and let it be a diary of your little Life. You will
 preserve all my Letters and I will secure yours--and thus in the course of
 time we shall each of us have a good Bundle--which, hereafter, when things
 may have strangely altered and God knows what happened, we may read over
 together and look with pleasure on times past--that now are to come. Give
 my Respects to the Ladies--and so my dear Fanny I am ever
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 If you direct--Post Office, Oxford--your Letter will be brought to me.
 
 
 
 
 XV.--TO JANE REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Oxford, Sunday Evg. [September 14, 1817].
 
 My dear Jane--You are such a literal translator, that I shall some day
 amuse myself with looking over some foreign sentences, and imagining how
 you would render them into English. This is an age for typical
 Curiosities; and I would advise you, as a good speculation, to study
 Hebrew, and astonish the world with a figurative version in our native
 tongue. The Mountains skipping like rams, and the little hills like lambs,
 you will leave as far behind as the hare did the tortoise. It must be so
 or you would never have thought that I really meant you would like to pro
 and con about those Honeycombs--no, I had no such idea, or, if I had,
 'twould be only to tease you a little for love. So now let me put down in
 black and white briefly my sentiments thereon.--Imprimis--I sincerely
 believe that Imogen is the finest creature, and that I should have been
 disappointed at hearing you prefer Juliet--Item--Yet I feel such a
 yearning towards Juliet that I would rather follow her into Pandemonium
 than Imogen into Paradise--heartily wishing myself a Romeo to be worthy of
 her, and to hear the Devils quote the old proverb, "Birds of a feather
 flock together"--Amen.--
 
 Now let us turn to the Seashore. Believe me, my dear Jane, it is a great
 happiness to see that you are in this finest part of the year winning a
 little enjoyment from the hard world. In truth, the great Elements we know
 of, are no mean comforters: the open sky sits upon our senses like a
 sapphire crown--the Air is our robe of state--the Earth is our throne, and
 the Sea a mighty minstrel playing before it--able, like David's harp, to
 make such a one as you forget almost the tempest cares of life. I have
 found in the ocean's music,--varying (tho self-same) more than the passion
 of Timotheus, an enjoyment not to be put into words; and, "though inland
 far I be," I now hear the voice most audibly while pleasing myself in the
 idea of your sensations.
 
 ---- is getting well apace, and if you have a few trees, and a little
 harvesting about you, I'll snap my fingers in Lucifer's eye. I hope you
 bathe too--if you do not, I earnestly recommend it. Bathe thrice a week,
 and let us have no more sitting up next winter. Which is the best of
 Shakspeare's plays? I mean in what mood and with what accompaniment do you
 like the sea best? It is very fine in the morning, when the sun,
 
   "Opening on Neptune with fair blessed beams,
   Turns into yellow gold his salt sea streams,"
 
 and superb when
 
   "The sun from meridian height
     Illumines the depth of the sea,
   And the fishes, beginning to sweat,
     Cry d---- it! how hot we shall be,"
 
 and gorgeous, when the fair planet hastens
 
              "To his home
   Within the Western foam."
 
 But don't you think there is something extremely fine after sunset, when
 there are a few white clouds about and a few stars blinking--when the
 waters are ebbing, and the horizon a mystery? This state of things has
 been so fulfilling to me that I am anxious to hear whether it is a
 favourite with you. So when you and Marianne club your letter to me put in
 a word or two about it. Tell Dilke that it would be perhaps as well if he
 left a Pheasant or Partridge alive here and there to keep up a supply of
 game for next season--tell him to rein in if Possible all the Nimrod of
 his disposition, he being a mighty hunter before the Lord--of the Manor.
 Tell him to shoot fair, and not to have at the Poor devils in a
 furrow--when they are flying, he may fire, and nobody will be the wiser.
 
 Give my sincerest respects to Mrs. Dilke, saying that I have not forgiven
 myself for not having got her the little box of medicine I promised, and
 that, had I remained at Hampstead I would have made precious havoc with
 her house and furniture--drawn a great harrow over her garden--poisoned
 Boxer--eaten her clothes-pegs--fried her cabbages--fricaseed (how is it
 spelt?) her radishes--ragout'd her Onions--belaboured her
 _beat_-root--outstripped her scarlet-runners--parlez-vous'd with her
 french-beans--devoured her mignon or mignionette--metamorphosed her
 bell-handles--splintered her looking-glasses--bullocked at her cups and
 saucers--agonised her decanters--put old Phillips to pickle in the
 brine-tub--dis_organ_ised her piano--dislocated her candlesticks--emptied
 her wine-bins in a fit of despair--turned out her maid to grass--and
 astonished Brown; whose letter to her on these events I would rather see
 than the original Copy of the Book of Genesis. Should you see Mr. W.
 D.[25] remember me to him, and to little Robinson Crusoe, and to Mr.
 Snook. Poor Bailey, scarcely ever well, has gone to bed, pleased that I
 am writing to you. To your brother John (whom henceforth I shall consider
 as mine) and to you, my dear friends, Marianne and Jane, I shall ever feel
 grateful for having made known to me so real a fellow as Bailey. He
 delights me in the selfish and (please God) the disinterested part of my
 disposition. If the old Poets have any pleasure in looking down at the
 enjoyers of their works, their eyes must bend with a double satisfaction
 upon him. I sit as at a feast when he is over them, and pray that if,
 after my death, any of my labours should be worth saving, they may have so
 "honest a chronicler" as Bailey. Out of this, his enthusiasm in his own
 pursuit and for all good things is of an exalted kind--worthy a more
 healthful frame and an untorn spirit. He must have happy years to
 come--"he shall not die by God."
 
 A letter from John the other day was a chief happiness to me. I made a
 little mistake when, just now, I talked of being far inland. How can that
 be when Endymion and I are at the bottom of the sea? whence I hope to
 bring him in safety before you leave the seaside; and, if I can so
 contrive it, you shall be greeted by him upon the sea-sands, and he shall
 tell you all his adventures, which having finished, he shall thus
 proceed--"My dear Ladies, favourites of my gentle mistress, however my
 friend Keats may have teased and vexed you, believe me he loves you not
 the less--for instance, I am deep in his favour, and yet he has been
 hauling me through the earth and sea with unrelenting perseverance. I know
 for all this that he is mighty fond of me, by his contriving me all sorts
 of pleasures. Nor is this the least, fair ladies, this one of meeting you
 on the desert shore, and greeting you in his name. He sends you moreover
 this little scroll--" My dear Girls, I send you, per favour of Endymion,
 the assurance of my esteem for you, and my utmost wishes for your health
 and pleasure, being ever,
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XVI.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Oxford, Sunday Morn [September 21, 1817].
 
 My dear Reynolds--So you are determined to be my mortal foe--draw a Sword
 at me, and I will forgive--Put a Bullet in my Brain, and I will shake it
 out as a dew-drop from the Lion's Mane--put me on a Gridiron, and I will
 fry with great complacency--but--oh, horror! to come upon me in the shape
 of a Dun! Send me bills! as I say to my Tailor, send me Bills and I'll
 never employ you more. However, needs must, when the devil drives: and for
 fear of "before and behind Mr. Honeycomb" I'll proceed. I have not time to
 elucidate the forms and shapes of the grass and trees; for, rot it! I
 forgot to bring my mathematical case with me, which unfortunately
 contained my triangular Prism so that the hues of the grass cannot be
 dissected for you--
 
 For these last five or six days, we have had regularly a Boat on the Isis,
 and explored all the streams about, which are more in number than your
 eye-lashes. We sometimes skim into a Bed of rushes, and there become
 naturalised river-folks,--there is one particularly nice nest, which we
 have christened "Reynolds's Cove," in which we have read Wordsworth and
 talked as may be. I think I see you and Hunt meeting in the Pit.--What a
 very pleasant fellow he is, if he would give up the sovereignty of a Room
 pro bono. What Evenings we might pass with him, could we have him from
 Mrs. H. Failings I am always rather rejoiced to find in a man than sorry
 for; they bring us to a Level. He has them, but then his makes-up are very
 good. He agrees with the Northern Poet in this, "He is not one of those
 who much delight to season their fireside with personal talk"--I must
 confess however having a little itch that way, and at this present moment
 I have a few neighbourly remarks to make. The world, and especially our
 England, has, within the last thirty years, been vexed and teased by a
 set of Devils, whom I detest so much that I almost hunger after an
 Acherontic promotion to a Torturer, purposely for their accommodation.
 These devils are a set of women, who having taken a snack or Luncheon of
 Literary scraps, set themselves up for towers of Babel in languages,
 Sapphos in Poetry, Euclids in Geometry, and everything in nothing. Among
 such the name of Montague has been pre-eminent. The thing has made a very
 uncomfortable impression on me. I had longed for some real feminine
 Modesty in these things, and was therefore gladdened in the extreme on
 opening the other day, one of Bailey's Books--a book of poetry written by
 one beautiful Mrs. Philips, a friend of Jeremy Taylor's, and called "The
 Matchless Orinda--" You must have heard of her, and most likely read her
 Poetry--I wish you have not, that I may have the pleasure of treating you
 with a few stanzas--I do it at a venture--You will not regret reading them
 once more. The following, to her friend Mrs. M. A. at parting, you will
 judge of.
 
 1
 
   I have examin'd and do find,
     Of all that favour me
   There's none I grieve to leave behind
     But only, only thee.
   To part with thee I needs must die,
   Could parting sep'rate thee and I.
 
 2
 
   But neither Chance nor Complement
     Did element our Love;
   'Twas sacred sympathy was lent
     Us from the Quire above.
   That Friendship Fortune did create,
   Still fears a wound from Time or Fate.
 
 3
 
   Our chang'd and mingled Souls are grown
     To such acquaintance now,
   That if each would resume their own,
     Alas! we know not how.
   We have each other so engrost,
   That each is in the Union lost.
 
 4
 
   And thus we can no Absence know,
     Nor shall we be confin'd;
   Our active Souls will daily go
     To learn each others mind.
   Nay, should we never meet to Sense,
   Our Souls would hold Intelligence.
 
 5
 
   Inspired with a Flame Divine
     I scorn to court a stay;
   For from that noble Soul of thine
     I ne're can be away.
   But I shall weep when thou dost grieve;
   Nor can I die whil'st thou dost live.
 
 6
 
   By my own temper I shall guess
     At thy felicity,
   And only like my happiness
     Because it pleaseth thee.
   Our hearts at any time will tell
   If thou, or I, be sick, or well.
 
 7
 
   All Honour sure I must pretend,
     All that is good or great;
   She that would be _Rosania's_ Friend,
     Must be at least compleat.[A]
   If I have any bravery,
   'Tis cause I have so much of thee.
 
 8
 
   Thy Leiger Soul in me shall lie,
     And all thy thoughts reveal;
   Then back again with mine shall flie,
     And thence to me shall steal.
   Thus still to one another tend;
   Such is the sacred name of _Friend_.
 
 9
 
   Thus our twin-Souls in one shall grow,
     And teach the World new Love,
   Redeem the Age and Sex, and show
     A Flame Fate dares not move:
   And courting Death to be our friend,
   Our Lives together too shall end.
 
 10
 
   A Dew shall dwell upon our Tomb
     Of such a quality,
   That fighting Armies, thither come,
     Shall reconciled be.
   We'll ask no Epitaph, but say
   Orinda and Rosania.
 
 In other of her poems there is a most delicate fancy of the Fletcher
 kind--which we will con over together. So Haydon is in Town. I had a
 letter from him yesterday. We will contrive as the winter comes on--but
 that is neither here nor there. Have you heard from Rice? Has Martin met
 with the Cumberland Beggar, or been wondering at the old Leech-gatherer?
 Has he a turn for fossils? that is, is he capable of sinking up to his
 Middle in a Morass? How is Hazlitt? We were reading his Table[26] last
 night. I know he thinks him self not estimated by ten people in the
 world--I wish he knew he is. I am getting on famous with my third
 Book--have written 800 lines thereof, and hope to finish it next Week.
 Bailey likes what I have done very much. Believe me, my dear Reynolds, one
 of my chief layings-up is the pleasure I shall have in showing it to you,
 I may now say, in a few days. I have heard twice from my Brothers, they
 are going on very well, and send their Remembrances to you. We expected to
 have had notices from little-Hampton this morning--we must wait till
 Tuesday. I am glad of their Days with the Dilkes. You are, I know, very
 much teased in that precious London, and want all the rest possible; so I
 shall be contented with as brief a scrawl--a Word or two, till there comes
 a pat hour.
 
 Send us a few of your stanzas to read in "Reynolds's Cove." Give my Love
 and respects to your Mother, and remember me kindly to all at home.
 
 Yours faithfully
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 I have left the doublings for Bailey, who is going to say that he will
 write to you to-morrow.
 
 
 
 
 XVII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Oxford, September 28 [1817].
 
 My dear Haydon--I read your letter to the young Man, whose Name is Cripps.
 He seemed more than ever anxious to avail himself of your offer. I think I
 told you we asked him to ascertain his Means. He does not possess the
 Philosopher's stone--nor Fortunatus's purse, nor Gyges's ring--but at
 Bailey's suggestion, whom I assure you is a very capital fellow, we have
 stummed up a kind of contrivance whereby he will be enabled to do himself
 the benefits you will lay in his Path. I have a great Idea that he will be
 a tolerable neat brush. 'Tis perhaps the finest thing that will befal him
 this many a year: for he is just of an age to get grounded in bad habits
 from which you will pluck him. He brought a copy of Mary Queen of Scots:
 it appears to me that he has copied the bad style of the painting, as well
 as coloured the eyeballs yellow like the original. He has also the fault
 that you pointed out to me in Hazlitt on the constringing and diffusing of
 substance. However I really believe that he will take fire at the sight of
 your Picture--and set about things. If he can get ready in time to return
 to town with me, which will be in a few days--I will bring him to you. You
 will be glad to hear that within these last three weeks I have written
 1000 lines--which are the third Book of my Poem. My Ideas with respect to
 it I assure you are very low--and I would write the subject thoroughly
 again--but I am tired of it and think the time would be better spent in
 writing a new Romance which I have in my eye for next summer--Rome was not
 built in a Day--and all the good I expect from my employment this summer
 is the fruit of Experience which I hope to gather in my next Poem.
 Bailey's kindest wishes, and my vow of being
 
 Yours eternally
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XVIII.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 Hampstead, Wednesday [October 8, 1817].
 
 My dear Bailey--After a tolerable journey, I went from Coach to Coach as
 far as Hampstead where I found my Brothers--the next Morning finding
 myself tolerably well I went to Lamb's Conduit Street and delivered your
 parcel. Jane and Marianne were greatly improved. Marianne especially, she
 has no unhealthy plumpness in the face, but she comes me healthy and
 angular to the chin--I did not see John--I was extremely sorry to hear
 that poor Rice, after having had capital health during his tour, was very
 ill. I daresay you have heard from him. From No. 19 I went to Hunt's and
 Haydon's who live now neighbours.--Shelley was there--I know nothing about
 anything in this part of the world--every Body seems at Loggerheads.
 There's Hunt infatuated--there's Haydon's picture in statu quo--There's
 Hunt walks up and down his painting room criticising every head most
 unmercifully. There's Horace Smith tired of Hunt. "The web of our life is
 of mingled yarn."[27] Haydon having removed entirely from Marlborough
 Street, Cripps must direct his letter to Lisson Grove, North Paddington.
 Yesterday Morning while I was at Brown's, in came Reynolds, he was pretty
 bobbish, we had a pleasant day--he would walk home at night that cursed
 cold distance. Mrs. Bentley's children are making a horrid
 row[28]--whereby I regret I cannot be transported to your Room to write to
 you. I am quite disgusted with literary men and will never know another
 except Wordsworth--no not even Byron. Here is an instance of the
 friendship of such. Haydon and Hunt have known each other many years--now
 they live, pour ainsi dire, jealous neighbours--Haydon says to me, Keats,
 don't show your lines to Hunt on any Account, or he will have done half
 for you--so it appears Hunt wishes it to be thought. When he met Reynolds
 in the Theatre, John told him that I was getting on to the completion of
 4000 lines--Ah! says Hunt, had it not been for me they would have been
 7000! If he will say this to Reynolds, what would he to other people?
 Haydon received a Letter a little while back on this subject from some
 Lady--which contains a caution to me, through him, on the subject--now is
 not all this a most paltry thing to think about? You may see the whole of
 the case by the following Extract from a Letter I wrote to George in the
 Spring--"As to what you say about my being a Poet, I can return no Answer
 but by saying that the high Idea I have of poetical fame makes me think I
 see it towering too high above me. At any rate, I have no right to talk
 until Endymion is finished--it will be a test, a trial of my Powers of
 Imagination, and chiefly of my invention, which is a rare thing indeed--by
 which I must make 4000 lines of one bare circumstance, and fill them with
 poetry: and when I consider that this is a great task, and that when done
 it will take me but a dozen paces towards the temple of fame--it makes me
 say--God forbid that I should be without such a task! I have heard Hunt
 say, and I may be asked--_why endeavour after a long Poem?_ To which I
 should answer, Do not the Lovers of Poetry like to have a little Region to
 wander in, where they may pick and choose, and in which the images are so
 numerous that many are forgotten and found new in a second Reading: which
 may be food for a Week's stroll in the Summer? Do not they like this
 better than what they can read through before Mrs. Williams comes down
 stairs? a Morning work at most.
 
 "Besides, a long poem is a test of invention, which I take to be the Polar
 star of Poetry, as Fancy is the Sails--and Imagination the rudder. Did our
 great Poets ever write short Pieces? I mean in the shape of Tales--this
 same invention seems indeed of late years to have been forgotten as a
 Poetical excellence--But enough of this, I put on no Laurels till I shall
 have finished Endymion, and I hope Apollo is not angered at my having made
 a Mockery at him at Hunt's"----
 
 You see, Bailey, how independent my Writing has been. Hunt's dissuasion
 was of no avail--I refused to visit Shelley that I might have my own
 unfettered scope;--and after all, I shall have the Reputation of Hunt's
 eleve. His corrections and amputations will by the knowing ones be traced
 in the Poem. This is, to be sure, the vexation of a day, nor would I say
 so many words about it to any but those whom I know to have my welfare and
 reputation at heart. Haydon promised to give directions for those Casts,
 and you may expect to see them soon, with as many Letters--You will soon
 hear the dinning of Bells--never mind! you and Gleig[29] will defy the
 foul fiend--But do not sacrifice your health to Books: do take it kindly
 and not so voraciously. I am certain if you are your own Physician, your
 Stomach will resume its proper strength and then what great benefits will
 follow.--My sister wrote a Letter to me, which I think must be at the
 post-office--Ax Will to see. My Brother's kindest remembrances to you--we
 are going to dine at Brown's where I have some hopes of meeting Reynolds.
 The little Mercury I have taken has corrected the poison and improved my
 health--though I feel from my employment that I shall never be again
 secure in Robustness. Would that you were as well as
 
 Your Sincere friend and brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XIX.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 [Hampstead: about November 1, 1817.]
 
 My dear Bailey--So you have got a Curacy--good, but I suppose you will be
 obliged to stop among your Oxford favourites during Term time. Never mind.
 When do you preach your first sermon?--tell me, for I shall propose to the
 two R.'s[30] to hear it,--so don't look into any of the old corner oaken
 pews, for fear of being put out by us. Poor Johnny Moultrie can't be
 there. He is ill, I expect--but that's neither here nor there. All I can
 say, I wish him as well through it as I am like to be. For this fortnight
 I have been confined at Hampstead. Saturday evening was my first day in
 town, when I went to Rice's--as we intend to do every Saturday till we
 know not when. We hit upon an old gent we had known some few years ago,
 and had a _veiry pleasante daye_. In this world there is no
 quiet,--nothing but teasing and snubbing and vexation. My brother Tom
 looked very unwell yesterday, and I am for shipping him off to Lisbon.
 Perhaps I ship there with him. I have not seen Mrs. Reynolds since I left
 you, wherefore my conscience smites me. I think of seeing her to-morrow;
 have you any message? I hope Gleig came soon after I left. I don't suppose
 I've written as many lines as you have read volumes, or at least chapters,
 since I saw you. However, I am in a fair way now to come to a conclusion
 in at least three weeks, when I assure you I shall be glad to dismount for
 a month or two; although I'll keep as tight a rein as possible till then,
 nor suffer myself to sleep. I will copy for you the opening of the Fourth
 Book, in which you will see from the manner I had not an opportunity of
 mentioning any poets, for fear of spoiling the effect of the passage by
 particularising them.
 
 Thus far had I written when I received your last, which made me at the
 sight of the direction caper for despair; but for one thing I am glad
 that I have been neglectful, and that is, therefrom I have received a
 proof of your utmost kindness, which at this present I feel very much, and
 I wish I had a heart always open to such sensations; but there is no
 altering a man's nature, and mine must be radically wrong, for it will lie
 dormant a whole month. This leads me to suppose that there are no men
 thoroughly wicked, so as never to be self-spiritualised into a kind of
 sublime misery; but, alas! 'tis but for an hour. He is the only Man "who
 has kept watch on man's mortality," who has philanthropy enough to
 overcome the disposition to an indolent enjoyment of intellect, who is
 brave enough to volunteer for uncomfortable hours. You remember in
 Hazlitt's essay on commonplace people he says, "they read the Edinburgh
 and Quarterly, and think as they do." Now, with respect to Wordsworth's
 "Gipsy," I think he is right, and yet I think Hazlitt is right, and yet I
 think Wordsworth is rightest. If Wordsworth had not been idle, he had not
 been without his task; nor had the "Gipsies"--they in the visible world
 had been as picturesque an object as he in the invisible. The smoke of
 their fire, their attitudes, their voices, were all in harmony with the
 evenings. It is a bold thing to say--and I would not say it in print--but
 it seems to me that if Wordsworth had thought a little deeper at that
 moment, he would not have written the poem at all. I should judge it to
 have been written in one of the most comfortable moods of his life--it is
 a kind of sketchy intellectual landscape, not a search after truth, nor is
 it fair to attack him on such a subject; for it is with the critic as with
 the poet; had Hazlitt thought a little deeper, and been in a good temper,
 he would never have spied out imaginary faults there. The Sunday before
 last I asked Haydon to dine with me, when I thought of settling all
 matters with him in regard to Cripps, and let you know about it. Now,
 although I engaged him a fortnight before, he sent illness as an excuse.
 He never will come. I have not been well enough to stand the chance of a
 wet night, and so have not seen him, nor been able to expurgatorise more
 masks for you; but I will not speak--your speakers are never doers. Then
 Reynolds,--every time I see him and mention you, he puts his hand to his
 head and looks like a son of Niobe's; but he'll write soon.
 
 Rome, you know, was not built in a day. I shall be able, by a little
 perseverance, to read your letters off-hand. I am afraid your health will
 suffer from over study before your examination. I think you might regulate
 the thing according to your own pleasure,--and I would too. They were
 talking of your being up at Christmas. Will it be before you have passed?
 There is nothing, my dear Bailey, I should rejoice at more than to see you
 comfortable with a little Peona wife; an affectionate wife, I have a sort
 of confidence, would do you a great happiness. May that be one of the many
 blessings I wish you. Let me be but the one-tenth of one to you, and I
 shall think it great. My brother George's kindest wishes to you. My dear
 Bailey, I am,
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 I should not like to be pages in your way; when in a tolerable hungry mood
 you have no mercy. Your teeth are the Rock Tarpeian down which you capsize
 epic poems like mad. I would not for forty shillings be Coleridge's Lays
 in your way. I hope you will soon get through this abominable writing in
 the schools, and be able to keep the terms with more comfort in the hope
 of retiring to a comfortable and quiet home out of the way of all
 Hopkinses and black beetles. When you are settled, I will come and take a
 peep at your church, your house; try whether I shall have grown too lusty
 for my chair by the fireside, and take a peep at my earliest bower. A
 question is the best beacon towards a little speculation. Then ask me
 after my health and spirits. This question ratifies in my mind what I have
 said above. Health and spirits can only belong unalloyed to the selfish
 man--the man who thinks much of his fellows can never be in spirits. You
 must forgive, although I have only written three hundred lines; they would
 have been five, but I have been obliged to go to town. Yesterday I called
 at Lamb's. St. Jane looked very flush when I first looked in, but was much
 better before I left.
 
 
 
 
 XX.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 [_Fragment from an outside sheet: postmark_ London, November 5, 1817.]
 
 ... I will speak of something else, or my spleen will get higher and
 higher--and I am a bearer of the two-edged sword.--I hope you will receive
 an answer from Haydon soon--if not, Pride! Pride! Pride! I have received
 no more subscription--but shall soon have a full health, Liberty and
 leisure to give a good part of my time to him. I will certainly be in time
 for him. We have promised him one year: let that have elapsed, then do as
 we think proper. If I did not know how impossible it is, I should say--"do
 not at this time of disappointments, disturb yourself about others."
 
 There has been a flaming attack upon Hunt in the E_n_dinburgh Magazine. I
 never read anything so virulent--accusing him of the greatest Crimes,
 depreciating his Wife, his Poetry, his Habits, his Company, his
 Conversation. These Philippics are to come out in numbers--called "the
 Cockney School of Poetry." There has been but one number published--that
 on Hunt--to which they have prefixed a motto from one Cornelius Webb
 Poetaster--who unfortunately was of our party occasionally at Hampstead
 and took it into his head to write the following,--something about "we'll
 talk on Wordsworth, Byron, a theme we never tire on;" and so forth till he
 comes to Hunt and Keats. In the Motto they have put Hunt and Keats in
 large letters--I have no doubt that the second number was intended for me:
 but have hopes of its non-appearance, from the following Advertisement in
 last Sunday's Examiner:--"To Z.--The Writer of the Article signed Z., in
 Blackwood's Edinburgh Magazine for October 1817 is invited to send his
 address to the printer of the Examiner, in order that Justice may be
 Executed on the proper person." I don't mind the thing much--but if he
 should go to such lengths with me as he has done with Hunt, I must
 infallibly call him to an Account if he be a human being, and appears in
 Squares and Theatres, where we might possibly meet--I don't relish his
 abuse....
 
 
 
 
 XXI.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 [Hampstead, November 1817.]
 
 My dear Dilke--Mrs. Dilke or Mr. Wm. Dilke, whoever of you shall receive
 this present, have the kindness to send pr. bearer Sibylline Leaves, and
 your petitioner shall ever pray as in duty bound.
 
 Given under my hand this Wednesday morning of Novr. 1817.
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Vivant Rex et Regina--amen.
 
 
 
 
 XXII.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 [Burford Bridge, November 22, 1817.]
 
 My dear Bailey--I will get over the first part of this (_un_said[31])
 Letter as soon as possible, for it relates to the affairs of poor
 Cripps.--To a Man of your nature such a Letter as Haydon's must have been
 extremely cutting--What occasions the greater part of the World's
 Quarrels?--simply this--two Minds meet, and do not understand each other
 time enough to prevent any shock or surprise at the conduct of either
 party--As soon as I had known Haydon three days, I had got enough of his
 Character not to have been surprised at such a Letter as he has hurt you
 with. Nor, when I knew it, was it a principle with me to drop his
 acquaintance; although with you it would have been an imperious feeling. I
 wish you knew all that I think about Genius and the Heart--and yet I think
 that you are thoroughly acquainted with my innermost breast in that
 respect, or you could not have known me even thus long, and still hold me
 worthy to be your dear Friend. In passing, however, I must say one thing
 that has pressed upon me lately, and increased my Humility and capability
 of submission--and that is this truth--Men of Genius are great as certain
 ethereal Chemicals operating on the Mass of neutral intellect--but they
 have not any individuality, any determined Character--I would call the top
 and head of those who have a proper self Men of Power.
 
 But I am running my head into a subject which I am certain I could not do
 justice to under five Years' study, and 3 vols. octavo--and, moreover, I
 long to be talking about the Imagination--so my dear Bailey, do not think
 of this unpleasant affair, if possible do not--I defy any harm to come of
 it--I defy. I shall write to Cripps this week, and request him to tell me
 all his goings-on from time to time by Letter wherever I may be. It will
 go on well--so don't because you have suddenly discovered a Coldness in
 Haydon suffer yourself to be teased--Do not my dear fellow--O! I wish I
 was as certain of the end of all your troubles as that of your momentary
 start about the authenticity of the Imagination. I am certain of nothing
 but of the holiness of the Heart's affections, and the truth of
 Imagination. What the Imagination seizes as Beauty must be truth--whether
 it existed before or not,--for I have the same idea of all our passions as
 of Love: they are all, in their sublime, creative of essential Beauty. In
 a Word, you may know my favourite speculation by my first Book, and the
 little Song I sent in my last, which is a representation from the fancy of
 the probable mode of operating in these Matters. The Imagination may be
 compared to Adam's dream,--he awoke and found it truth:[32]--I am more
 zealous in this affair, because I have never yet been able to perceive how
 anything can be known for truth by consecutive reasoning--and yet it must
 be. Can it be that even the greatest Philosopher ever arrived at his Goal
 without putting aside numerous objections? However it may be, O for a life
 of Sensations rather than of Thoughts! It is "a Vision in the form of
 Youth," a shadow of reality to come--And this consideration has further
 convinced me,--for it has come as auxiliary to another favourite
 speculation of mine,--that we shall enjoy ourselves hereafter by having
 what we called happiness on Earth repeated in a finer tone--And yet such a
 fate can only befall those who delight in Sensation, rather than hunger as
 you do after Truth. Adam's dream will do here, and seems to be a
 Conviction that Imagination and its empyreal reflection, is the same as
 human life and its spiritual repetition. But, as I was saying, the Simple
 imaginative Mind may have its rewards in the repetition of its own silent
 Working coming continually on the Spirit with a fine Suddenness--to
 compare great things with small, have you never by being surprised with an
 old Melody, in a delicious place by a delicious voice, _felt_ over again
 your very speculations and surmises at the time it first operated on your
 soul?--do you not remember forming to yourself the Singer's face--more
 beautiful than it was possible, and yet with the elevation of the Moment
 you did not think so? Even then you were mounted on the Wings of
 Imagination, so high that the prototype must be hereafter--that delicious
 face you will see. What a time! I am continually running away from the
 subject. Sure this cannot be exactly the Case with a complex mind--one
 that is imaginative, and at the same time careful of its fruits,--who
 would exist partly on Sensation, partly on thought--to whom it is
 necessary that years should bring the philosophic Mind? Such a one I
 consider yours, and therefore it is necessary to your eternal happiness
 that you not only drink this old Wine of Heaven, which I shall call the
 redigestion of our most ethereal Musings upon Earth, but also increase in
 knowledge and know all things. I am glad to hear that you are in a fair
 way for Easter. You will soon get through your unpleasant reading, and
 then!--but the world is full of troubles, and I have not much reason to
 think myself pestered with many.
 
 I think Jane or Marianne has a better opinion of me than I deserve: for,
 really and truly, I do not think my Brother's illness connected with
 mine--you know more of the real Cause than they do; nor have I any chance
 of being rack'd as you have been. You perhaps at one time thought there
 was such a thing as worldly happiness to be arrived at, at certain periods
 of time marked out,--you have of necessity from your disposition been thus
 led away--I scarcely remember counting upon any Happiness--I look not for
 it if it be not in the present hour,--nothing startles me beyond the
 moment. The Setting Sun will always set me to rights, or if a Sparrow come
 before my Window, I take part in its existence and pick about the gravel.
 The first thing that strikes me on hearing a Misfortune having befallen
 another is this--"Well, it cannot be helped: he will have the pleasure of
 trying the resources of his Spirit"--and I beg now, my dear Bailey, that
 hereafter should you observe anything cold in me not to put it to the
 account of heartlessness, but abstraction--for I assure you I sometimes
 feel not the influence of a passion or affection during a whole Week--and
 so long this sometimes continues, I begin to suspect myself, and the
 genuineness of my feelings at other times--thinking them a few barren
 Tragedy Tears.
 
 My brother Tom is much improved--he is going to Devonshire--whither I
 shall follow him. At present, I am just arrived at Dorking--to change the
 Scene--change the Air, and give me a spur to wind up my Poem, of which
 there are wanting 500 lines. I should have been here a day sooner, but the
 Reynoldses persuaded me to stop in Town to meet your friend Christie.
 There were Rice and Martin--we talked about Ghosts. I will have some Talk
 with Taylor and let you know,--when please God I come down at Christmas. I
 will find that Examiner if possible. My best regards to Gleig, my
 Brothers' to you and Mrs. Bentley.
 
 Your affectionate Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 I want to say much more to you--a few hints will set me going. Direct
 Burford Bridge near Dorking.
 
 
 
 
 XXIII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [Burford Bridge,] November 22, 1817.
 
 My dear Reynolds--There are two things which tease me here--one of them
 Cripps, and the other that I cannot go with Tom into Devonshire. However,
 I hope to do my duty to myself in a week or so; and then I'll try what I
 can do for my neighbour--now, is not this virtuous? On returning to Town
 I'll damm all Idleness--indeed, in superabundance of employment, I must
 not be content to run here and there on little two-penny errands, but turn
 Rakehell, _i.e._ go a masking, or Bailey will think me just as great a
 Promise Keeper as _he_ thinks you; for myself I do not, and do not
 remember above one complaint against you for matter o' that. Bailey writes
 so abominable a hand, to give his Letter a fair reading requires a little
 time: so I had not seen, when I saw you last, his invitation to Oxford at
 Christmas. I'll go with you. You know how poorly Rice was. I do not think
 it was all corporeal,--bodily pain was not used to keep him silent. I'll
 tell you what; he was hurt at what your Sisters said about his joking with
 your Mother, he was, soothly to sain. It will all blow over. God knows,
 my dear Reynolds, I should not talk any sorrow to you--you must have
 enough vexations--so I won't any more. If I ever start a rueful subject in
 a letter to you--blow me! Why don't you?--now I am going to ask you a very
 silly Question neither you nor anybody else could answer, under a folio,
 or at least a Pamphlet--you shall judge--why don't you, as I do, look
 unconcerned at what may be called more particularly Heart-vexations? They
 never surprise me--lord! a man should have the fine point of his soul
 taken off to become fit for this world.
 
 I like this place very much. There is Hill and Dale and a little River. I
 went up Box hill this Evening after the Moon--"you a' seen the Moon"--came
 down, and wrote some lines. Whenever I am separated from you, and not
 engaged in a continued Poem, every letter shall bring you a lyric--but I
 am too anxious for you to enjoy the whole to send you a particle. One of
 the three books I have with me is Shakspeare's Poems: I never found so
 many beauties in the sonnets--they seem to be full of fine things said
 unintentionally--in the intensity of working out conceits. Is this to be
 borne? Hark ye!
 
   When lofty trees I see barren of leaves,
      Which erst from heat did canopy the head,
   And Summer's green all girded up in sheaves,
      Borne on the bier with white and bristly head.
 
 He has left nothing to say about nothing or anything: for look at
 snails--you know what he says about Snails--you know when he talks about
 "cockled Snails"--well, in one of these sonnets, he says--the chap slips
 into--no! I lie! this is in the Venus and Adonis: the simile brought it to
 my Mind.
 
   As the snail, whose tender horns being hit,
      Shrinks back into his shelly cave with pain,
   And there all smothered up in shade doth sit,
      Long after fearing to put forth again;
   So at his bloody view her eyes are fled,
   Into the deep dark Cabins of her head.
 
 He overwhelms a genuine Lover of poesy with all manner of abuse, talking
 about--
 
                               "a poet's rage
   And stretched metre of an antique song."
 
 Which, by the bye, will be a capital motto for my poem, won't it? He
 speaks too of "Time's antique pen"--and "April's first-born flowers"--and
 "Death's eternal cold."--By the Whim-King! I'll give you a stanza, because
 it is not material in connection, and when I wrote it I wanted you--to
 give your vote, pro or con.--
 
   Crystalline Brother of the belt of Heaven,
   Aquarius! to whom King Jove hath given
   Two liquid pulse-streams, 'stead of feather'd wings--
   Two fan-like fountains--thine illuminings
   For Dian play:
   Dissolve the frozen purity of air;
   Let thy white shoulders, silvery and bare,
   Show cold through wat'ry pinions: make more bright
   The Star-Queen's Crescent on her marriage night:
   Haste, haste away!
 
 ... I see there is an advertisement in the _Chronicle_ to Poets--he is so
 over-loaded with poems on the "late Princess." I suppose you do not
 lack--send me a few--lend me thy hand to laugh a little--send me a little
 pullet-sperm, a few finch-eggs--and remember me to each of our
 card-playing Club. When you die you will all be turned into Dice, and be
 put in pawn with the devil: for cards, they crumple up like anything....
 
 I rest Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Give my love to both houses--hinc atque illinc.
 
 
 
 
 XXIV.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Hampstead, December 22, 1817.
 
 My dear Brothers--I must crave your pardon for not having written ere
 this.... I saw Kean return to the public in Richard III., and finely he
 did it, and, at the request of Reynolds, I went to criticise his _Duke_
 in Rich{d.}--the critique is in to-day's Champion, which I send you with
 the Examiner, in which you will find very proper lamentation on the
 obsoletion of Christmas Gambols and pastimes: but it was mixed up with so
 much egotism of that drivelling nature that pleasure is entirely lost.
 Hone the publisher's trial, you must find very amusing, and as Englishmen
 very encouraging: his _Not Guilty_ is a thing, which not to have been,
 would have dulled still more Liberty's Emblazoning--Lord Ellenborough has
 been paid in his own coin--Wooler and Hone have done us an essential
 service. I have had two very pleasant evenings with Dilke yesterday and
 to-day, and am at this moment just come from him, and feel in the humour
 to go on with this, begun in the morning, and from which he came to fetch
 me. I spent Friday evening with Wells[33] and went next morning to see
 _Death on the Pale horse_. It is a wonderful picture, when West's age is
 considered; but there is nothing to be intense upon, no women one feels
 mad to kiss, no face swelling into reality. The excellence of every art is
 its intensity, capable of making all disagreeables evaporate from their
 being in close relationship with Beauty and Truth--Examine King Lear, and
 you will find this exemplified throughout; but in this picture we have
 unpleasantness without any momentous depth of speculation excited, in
 which to bury its repulsiveness--The picture is larger than Christ
 rejected.
 
 I dined with Haydon the Sunday after you left, and had a very pleasant
 day, I dined too (for I have been out too much lately) with Horace Smith
 and met his two Brothers with Hill and Kingston and one Du Bois, they only
 served to convince me how superior humour is to wit, in respect to
 enjoyment--These men say things which make one start, without making one
 feel, they are all alike; their manners are alike; they all know
 fashionables; they have all a mannerism in their very eating and drinking,
 in their mere handling a Decanter. They talked of Kean and his low
 company--would I were with that company instead of yours said I to myself!
 I know such like acquaintance will never do for me and yet I am going to
 Reynolds, on Wednesday. Brown and Dilke walked with me and back from the
 Christmas pantomime. I had not a dispute, but a disquisition, with Dilke
 upon various subjects; several things dove-tailed in my mind, and at once
 it struck me what quality went to form a Man of Achievement, especially in
 Literature, and which Shakspeare possessed so enormously--I mean _Negative
 Capability_, that is, when a man is capable of being in uncertainties,
 mysteries, doubts, without any irritable reaching after fact and reason.
 Coleridge, for instance, would let go by a fine isolated verisimilitude
 caught from the Penetralium of mystery,[34] from being incapable of
 remaining content with half-knowledge. This pursued through volumes would
 perhaps take us no further than this, that with a great poet the sense of
 Beauty overcomes every other consideration, or rather obliterates all
 consideration.
 
 Shelley's poem[35] is out and there are words about its being objected to,
 as much as Queen Mab was. Poor Shelley I think he has his Quota of good
 qualities, in sooth la! Write soon to your most sincere friend and
 affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XXV.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Featherstone Buildings,[36] Monday [January 5, 1818].
 
 My dear Brothers--I ought to have written before, and you should have had
 a long letter last week, but I undertook the Champion for Reynolds, who
 is at Exeter. I wrote two articles, one on the Drury Lane Pantomime, the
 other on the Covent Garden new Tragedy, which they have not put in;[37]
 the one they have inserted is so badly punctuated that you perceive I am
 determined never to write more, without some care in that particular.
 Wells tells me that you are licking your chops, Tom, in expectation of my
 book coming out. I am sorry to say I have not begun my corrections yet:
 to-morrow I set out. I called on Sawrey[38] this morning. He did not seem
 to be at all put out at anything I said and the inquiries I made with
 regard to your spitting of blood, and moreover desired me to ask you to
 send him a correct account of all your sensations and symptoms concerning
 the palpitation and the spitting and the cough--if you have any. Your last
 letter gave me a great pleasure, for I think the invalid is in a better
 spirit there along the Edge; and as for George, I must immediately, now I
 think of it, correct a little misconception of a part of my last letter.
 The Misses Reynolds have never said one word against me about you, or by
 any means endeavoured to lessen you in my estimation. That is not what I
 referred to; but the manner and thoughts which I knew they internally had
 towards you, time will show. Wells and Severn dined with me yesterday. We
 had a very pleasant day. I pitched upon another bottle of claret, we
 enjoyed ourselves very much; were all very witty and full of Rhymes. We
 played a concert from 4 o'clock till 10--drank your healths, the Hunts',
 and (_N.B._) seven Peter Pindars. I said on that day the only good thing I
 was ever guilty of. We were talking about Stephens and the 1st Gallery. I
 said I wondered that careful folks would go there, for although it was but
 a shilling, still you had to pay through the Nose. I saw the Peachey
 family in a box at Drury one night. I have got such a curious[39] ... or
 rather I had such, now I am in my own hand.
 
 I have had a great deal of pleasant time with Rice lately, and am getting
 initiated into a little band. They call drinking deep dyin' scarlet. They
 call good wine a pretty tipple, and call getting a child knocking out an
 apple; stopping at a tavern they call hanging out. Where do you sup? is
 where do you hang out?
 
 Thursday I promised to dine with Wordsworth, and the weather is so bad
 that I am undecided, for he lives at Mortimer Street. I had an invitation
 to meet him at Kingston's,[40] but not liking that place I sent my excuse.
 What I think of doing to-day is to dine in Mortimer Street (Words{th}),
 and sup here in the Feath{s} buildings, as Mr. Wells has invited me. On
 Saturday, I called on Wordsworth before he went to Kingston's, and was
 surprised to find him with a stiff collar. I saw his spouse, and I think
 his daughter. I forget whether I had written my last before my Sunday
 evening at Haydon's--no, I did not, or I should have told you, Tom, of a
 young man you met at Paris, at Scott's, ... Ritchie. I think he is going
 to Fezan, in Africa; then to proceed if possible like Mungo Park. He was
 very polite to me, and inquired very particularly after you. Then there
 was Wordsworth, Lamb, Monkhouse, Landseer, Kingston, and your humble
 servant. Lamb got tipsy and blew up Kingston--proceeding so far as to take
 the candle across the room, hold it to his face, and show us what a soft
 fellow he was.[41] I astonished Kingston at supper with a pertinacity in
 favour of drinking, keeping my two glasses at work in a knowing way.
 
 I have seen Fanny twice lately--she inquired particularly after you and
 wants a co-partnership letter from you. She has been unwell, but is
 improving. I think she will be quick. Mrs. Abbey was saying that the
 Keatses were ever indolent, that they would ever be so, and that it is
 born in them. Well, whispered Fanny to me, if it is born with us, how can
 we help it? She seems very anxious for a letter. As I asked her what I
 should get for her, she said a "Medal of the Princess." I called on
 Haslam--we dined very snugly together. He sent me a Hare last week, which
 I sent to Mrs. Dilke. Brown is not come back. I and Dilke are getting
 capital friends. He is going to take the Champion. He has sent his farce
 to Covent Garden. I met Bob Harris[42] on the steps at Covent Garden; we
 had a good deal of curious chat. He came out with his old humble opinion.
 The Covent Garden pantomime is a very nice one, but they have a middling
 Harlequin, a bad Pantaloon, a worse Clown, and a shocking Columbine, who
 is one of the Miss Dennets. I suppose you will see my critique on the new
 tragedy in the next week's Champion. It is a shocking bad one. I have not
 seen Hunt; he was out when I called. Mrs. Hunt looks as well as ever I saw
 her after her confinement. There is an article in the se'nnight Examiner
 on Godwin's Mandeville, signed E. K.--I think it Miss Kent's--I will send
 it. There are fine subscriptions going on for Hone.
 
 You ask me what degrees there are between Scott's novels and those of
 Smollett. They appear to me to be quite distinct in every particular, more
 especially in their aims. Scott endeavours to throw so interesting and
 romantic a colouring into common and low characters as to give them a
 touch of the sublime. Smollett on the contrary pulls down and levels what
 with other men would continue romance. The grand parts of Scott are
 within the reach of more minds than the finest humours in Humphrey
 Clinker. I forget whether that fine thing of the Serjeant is Fielding or
 Smollett, but it gives me more pleasure than the whole novel of the
 Antiquary. You must remember what I mean. Some one says to the Serjeant:
 "That's a non-sequitur!"--"If you come to that," replies the Serjeant,
 "you're another!"--
 
 I see by Wells's letter Mr. Abbey[43] does not overstock you with money.
 You must write. I have not seen ... yet, but expect it on Wednesday. I am
 afraid it is gone. Severn tells me he has an order for some drawings for
 the Emperor of Russia.
 
 You must get well Tom, and then I shall feel whole and genial as the
 winter air. Give me as many letters as you like, and write to Sawrey soon.
 I received a short letter from Bailey about Cripps, and one from Haydon,
 ditto. Haydon thinks he improved very much. Mrs. Wells desires
 particularly ... to Tom and her respects to George, and I desire no better
 than to be ever your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 _P.S._--I had not opened the Champion before I found both my articles in
 it.
 
 I was at a dance at Redhall's, and passed a pleasant time enough--drank
 deep, and won 10.6 at cutting for half guineas.... Bailey was there and
 seemed to enjoy the evening. Rice said he cared less about the hour than
 any one, and the proof is his dancing--he cares not for time, dancing as
 if he was deaf. Old Redhall not being used to give parties, had no idea of
 the quantity of wine that would be drank, and he actually put in readiness
 on the kitchen stairs eight dozen.
 
 Every one inquires after you, and desires their remembrances to you.
 
 Your Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XXVI.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Saturday Morn [January 10, 1818].
 
 My dear Haydon--I should have seen you ere this, but on account of my
 sister being in Town: so that when I have sometimes made ten paces towards
 you, Fanny has called me into the City; and the Christmas Holydays are
 your only time to see Sisters, that is if they are so situated as mine. I
 will be with you early next week--to-night it should be, but we have a
 sort of a Club every Saturday evening--to-morrow, but I have on that day
 an insuperable engagement. Cripps has been down to me, and appears
 sensible that a binding to you would be of the greatest advantage to
 him--if such a thing be done it cannot be before L150 or L200 are secured
 in subscriptions to him. I will write to Bailey about it, give a Copy of
 the Subscribers' names to every one I know who is likely to get a L5 for
 him. I will leave a Copy at Taylor and Hessey's, Rodwell and Martin, and
 will ask Kingston and Co. to cash up.
 
 Your friendship for me is now getting into its teens--and I feel the past.
 Also every day older I get--the greater is my idea of your achievements in
 Art: and I am convinced that there are three things to rejoice at in this
 Age--The Excursion, Your Pictures, and Hazlitt's depth of Taste.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXVII.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Saturday Morning [January 10, 1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--Several things have kept me from you lately:--first you
 had got into a little hell, which I was not anxious to reconnoitre--
 secondly, I have made a vow not to call again without my first book: so you
 may expect to see me in four days. Thirdly, I have been racketing too
 much, and do not feel over well. I have seen Wordsworth frequently--Dined
 with him last Monday--Reynolds, I suppose you have seen. Just scribble me
 thus many lines, to let me know you are in the land of the living, and
 well. Remember me to the Fleet Street Household--and should you see any
 from Percy Street, give my kindest regards to them.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXVIII.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Tuesday [January 13, 1818].
 
 My dear Brothers--I am certain I think of having a letter to-morrow
 morning for I expected one so much this morning, having been in town two
 days, at the end of which my expectations began to get up a little. I
 found two on the table, one from Bailey and one from Haydon, I am quite
 perplexed in a world of doubts and fancies--there is nothing stable in the
 world; uproar's your only music--I don't mean to include Bailey in this
 and so dismiss him from this with all the opprobrium he deserves--that is
 in so many words, he is one of the noblest men alive at the present day.
 In a note to Haydon about a week ago (which I wrote with a full sense of
 what he had done, and how he had never manifested any little mean drawback
 in his value of me) I said if there were three things superior in the
 modern world, they were "the Excursion," "Haydon's pictures," and
 "Hazlitt's depth of Taste"--so I do believe--Not thus speaking with any
 poor vanity that works of genius were the first things in this world. No!
 for that sort of probity and disinterestedness which such men as Bailey
 possess, does hold and grasp the tiptop of any spiritual honours that can
 be paid to anything in this world--And moreover having this feeling at
 this present come over me in its full force, I sat down to write to you
 with a grateful heart, in that I had not a Brother who did not feel and
 credit me for a deeper feeling and devotion for his uprightness, than for
 any marks of genius however splendid. I was speaking about doubts and
 fancies--I mean there has been a quarrel of a severe nature between Haydon
 and Reynolds and another ("the Devil rides upon a fiddlestick") between
 Hunt and Haydon--the first grew from the Sunday on which Haydon invited
 some friends to meet Wordsworth. Reynolds never went, and never sent any
 Notice about it, this offended Haydon more than it ought to have done--he
 wrote a very sharp and high note to Reynolds and then another in
 palliation--but which Reynolds feels as an aggravation of the
 first--Considering all things, Haydon's frequent neglect of his
 Appointments, etc. his notes were bad enough to put Reynolds on the right
 side of the question--but then Reynolds has no power of sufferance; no
 idea of having the thing against him; so he answered Haydon in one of the
 most cutting letters I ever read; exposing to himself all his own
 weaknesses and going on to an excess, which whether it is just or no, is
 what I would fain have unsaid, the fact is, they are both in the right and
 both in the wrong.
 
 The quarrel with Hunt I understand thus far. Mrs. H. was in the habit of
 borrowing silver of Haydon--the last time she did so, Haydon asked her to
 return it at a certain time--she did not--Haydon sent for it--Hunt went to
 expostulate on the indelicacy, etc.--they got to words and parted for
 ever. All I hope is at some time to bring them together again.--Lawk!
 Molly there's been such doings--Yesterday evening I made an appointment
 with Wells to go to a private theatre, and it being in the neighbourhood
 of Drury Lane, and thinking we might be fatigued with sitting the whole
 evening in one dirty hole, I got the Drury Lane ticket, and therewith we
 divided the evening with a spice of Richard III----
 
 
 [Later, January 19 or 20.]
 
 Good Lord! I began this letter nearly a week ago, what have I been doing
 since--I have been--I mean not been--sending last Sunday's paper to you.
 I believe because it was not near me--for I cannot find it, and my
 conscience presses heavy on me for not sending it. You would have had one
 last Thursday, but I was called away, and have been about somewhere ever
 since. Where? What! Well I rejoice almost that I have not heard from you
 because no news is good news. I cannot for the world recollect why I was
 called away, all I know is that there has been a dance at Dilke's, and
 another at the London Coffee House; to both of which I went. But I must
 tell you in another letter the circumstances thereof--for though a week
 should have passed since I wrote on the other side it quite appals me. I
 can only write in scraps and patches. Brown is returned from Hampstead.
 Haydon has returned an answer in the same style--they are all dreadfully
 irritated against each other. On Sunday I saw Hunt and dined with Haydon,
 met Hazlitt and Bewick there, and took Haslam with me--forgot to speak
 about Cripps though I broke my engagement to Haslam's on purpose.
 Mem.--Haslam came to meet me, found me at Breakfast, had the goodness to
 go with me my way--I have just finished the revision of my first book, and
 shall take it to Taylor's to-morrow--intend to persevere--Do not let me
 see many days pass without hearing from you.
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XXIX.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Friday 23d [January 1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--I have spoken to Haydon about the drawing. He would do it
 with all his Art and Heart too, if so I will it; however, he has written
 thus to me; but I must tell you, first, he intends painting a finished
 Picture from the Poem. Thus he writes--"When I do anything for your Poem
 it must be effectual--an honour to both of us: to hurry up a sketch for
 the season won't do. I think an engraving from your head, from a Chalk
 drawing of mine, done with all my might, to which I would put my name,
 would answer Taylor's idea better than the other. Indeed, I am sure of it.
 This I will do, and this will be effectual, and as I have not done it for
 any other human being, it will have an effect."
 
 What think you of this? Let me hear. I shall have my second Book in
 readiness forthwith.
 
 Yours most sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 If Reynolds calls tell him three lines will be acceptable, for I am squat
 at Hampstead.
 
 
 
 
 XXX.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Friday 23d January [1818].
 
 My dear Brothers--I was thinking what hindered me from writing so long,
 for I have so many things to say to you, and know not where to begin. It
 shall be upon a thing most interesting to you, my Poem. Well! I have given
 the first Book to Taylor; he seemed more than satisfied with it, and to my
 surprise proposed publishing it in Quarto if Haydon would make a drawing
 of some event therein, for a Frontispiece. I called on Haydon, he said he
 would do anything I liked, but said he would rather paint a finished
 picture, from it, which he seems eager to do; this in a year or two will
 be a glorious thing for us; and it will be, for Haydon is struck with the
 1st Book. I left Haydon and the next day received a letter from him,
 proposing to make, as he says, with all his might, a finished chalk sketch
 of my head, to be engraved in the first style and put at the head of my
 Poem, saying at the same time he had never done the thing for any human
 being, and that it must have considerable effect as he will put his name
 to it--I begin to-day to copy my 2nd Book--"thus far into the bowels of
 the land"--You shall hear whether it will be Quarto or non Quarto, picture
 or non picture. Leigh Hunt I showed my 1st Book to--he allows it not much
 merit as a whole; says it is unnatural and made ten objections to it in
 the mere skimming over. He says the conversation is unnatural and too
 high-flown for Brother and Sister--says it should be simple forgetting do
 ye mind that they are both overshadowed by a supernatural Power, and of
 force could not speak like Francesca in the Rimini. He must first prove
 that Caliban's poetry is unnatural--This with me completely overturns his
 objections--the fact is he and Shelley are hurt, and perhaps justly, at my
 not having showed them the affair officiously and from several hints I
 have had they appear much disposed to dissect and anatomise any trip or
 slip I may have made.--But who's afraid? Ay! Tom! Demme if I am. I went
 last Tuesday, an hour too late, to Hazlitt's Lecture on poetry, got there
 just as they were coming out, when all these pounced upon me. Hazlitt,
 John Hunt and Son, Wells, Bewick, all the Landseers, Bob Harris, aye and
 more--the Landseers enquired after you particularly--I know not whether
 Wordsworth has left town--But Sunday I dined with Hazlitt and Haydon, also
 that I took Haslam with me--I dined with Brown lately. Dilke having taken
 the Champion Theatricals was obliged to be in town--Fanny has returned to
 Walthamstow.--Mr. Abbey appeared very glum, the last time I went to see
 her, and said in an indirect way, that I had no business there--Rice has
 been ill, but has been mending much lately--
 
 I think a little change has taken place in my intellect lately--I cannot
 bear to be uninterested or unemployed, I, who for so long a time have been
 addicted to passiveness. Nothing is finer for the purposes of great
 productions than a very gradual ripening of the intellectual powers. As an
 instance of this--observe--I sat down yesterday to read King Lear once
 again: the thing appeared to demand the prologue of a sonnet, I wrote it,
 and began to read--(I know you would like to see it.)
 
 ON SITTING DOWN TO KING LEAR ONCE AGAIN.
 
   O golden-tongued Romance with serene Lute!
   Fair-plumed Syren, Queen of far-away!
   Leave melodising on this wintry day,
   Shut up thine olden volume and be mute.
   Adieu! for once again the fierce dispute
   Betwixt Hell torment and impassion'd Clay
   Must I burn through; once more assay
   The bitter sweet of this Shakspearian fruit.
   Chief Poet! and ye clouds of Albion,
   Begetters of our deep eternal theme,
   When I am through the old oak forest gone
   Let me not wander in a barren dream,
   But, when I am consumed with the Fire,
   Give me new Phoenix-wings to fly at my desire.
 
 So you see I am getting at it, with a sort of determination and strength,
 though verily I do not feel it at this moment--this is my fourth letter
 this morning, and I feel rather tired, and my head rather swimming--so I
 will leave it open till to-morrow's post.--
 
 I am in the habit of taking my papers to Dilke's and copying there; so I
 chat and proceed at the same time. I have been there at my work this
 evening, and the walk over the Heath takes off all sleep, so I will even
 proceed with you. I left off short in my last just as I began an account
 of a private theatrical--Well it was of the lowest order, all greasy and
 oily, insomuch that if they had lived in olden times, when signs were hung
 over the doors, the only appropriate one for that oily place would have
 been--a guttered Candle. They played John Bull, The Review, and it was to
 conclude with Bombastes Furioso--I saw from a Box the first Act of John
 Bull, then went to Drury and did not return till it was over--when by
 Wells's interest we got behind the scenes--there was not a yard wide all
 the way round for actors, scene-shifters, and interlopers to move in--for
 'Nota Bene' the Green Room was under the stage, and there was I threatened
 over and over again to be turned out by the oily scene-shifters, there did
 I hear a little painted Trollop own, very candidly, that she had failed
 in Mary, with a "damn'd if she'd play a serious part again, as long as she
 lived," and at the same time she was habited as the Quaker in the
 Review.--There was a quarrel, and a fat good-natured looking girl in
 soldiers' clothes wished she had only been a man for Tom's sake. One
 fellow began a song, but an unlucky finger-point from the Gallery sent him
 off like a shot. One chap was dressed to kill for the King in Bombastes,
 and he stood at the edge of the scene in the very sweat of anxiety to show
 himself, but Alas the thing was not played. The sweetest morsel of the
 night moreover was, that the musicians began pegging and fagging away--at
 an overture--never did you see faces more in earnest, three times did they
 play it over, dropping all kinds of corrections and still did not the
 curtain go up. Well then they went into a country dance, then into a
 region they well knew, into the old boonsome Pothouse, and then to see how
 pompous o' the sudden they turned; how they looked about and chatted; how
 they did not care a damn; was a great treat----
 
 I hope I have not tired you by this filling up of the dash in my last.
 Constable the bookseller has offered Reynolds ten guineas a sheet to write
 for his Magazine--it is an Edinburgh one, which Blackwood's started up in
 opposition to. Hunt said he was nearly sure that the 'Cockney School' was
 written by Scott[44] so you are right Tom!--There are no more little bits
 of news I can remember at present.
 
 I remain, My dear Brothers, Your very affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XXXI.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Friday Jan{y.} 23 [1818].
 
 My dear Bailey--Twelve days have pass'd since your last reached me.--What
 has gone through the myriads of human minds since the 12th? We talk of the
 immense Number of Books, the Volumes ranged thousands by thousands--but
 perhaps more goes through the human intelligence in Twelve days than ever
 was written.--_How has that unfortunate family lived through the twelve?_
 One saying of yours I shall never forget--you may not recollect it--it
 being perhaps said when you were looking on the Surface and seeming of
 Humanity alone, without a thought of the past or the future--or the deeps
 of good and evil--you were at that moment estranged from speculation, and
 I think you have arguments ready for the Man who would utter it to
 you--this is a formidable preface for a simple thing--merely you said,
 "_Why should woman suffer?_" Aye, why should she? "By heavens I'd coin my
 very Soul, and drop my Blood for Drachmas!" These things are, and he, who
 feels how incompetent the most skyey Knight-errantry is to heal this
 bruised fairness, is like a sensitive leaf on the hot hand of
 thought.--Your tearing, my dear friend, a spiritless and gloomy letter up,
 to re-write to me, is what I shall never forget--it was to me a real
 thing--Things have happened lately of great perplexity--you must have
 heard of them--Reynolds and Haydon retorting and recriminating--and
 parting for ever--the same thing has happened between Haydon and Hunt. It
 is unfortunate--Men should bear with each other: there lives not the Man
 who may not be cut up, aye Lashed to pieces on his weakest side. The best
 of Men have but a portion of good in them--a kind of spiritual yeast in
 their frames, which creates the ferment of existence--by which a Man is
 propelled to act, and strive, and buffet with Circumstance. The sure way,
 Bailey, is first to know a Man's faults, and then be passive--if after
 that he insensibly draws you towards him then you have no power to break
 the link. Before I felt interested in either Reynolds or Haydon, I was
 well read in their faults; yet, knowing them, I have been cementing
 gradually with both. I have an affection for them both, for reasons almost
 opposite--and to both must I of necessity cling, supported always by the
 hope that, when a little time, a few years, shall have tried me more fully
 in their esteem, I may be able to bring them together. The time must come,
 because they have both hearts: and they will recollect the best parts of
 each other, when this gust is overblown.--I had a message from you through
 a letter to Jane--I think, about Cripps--there can be no idea of binding
 until a sufficient sum is sure for him--and even then the thing should be
 maturely considered by all his helpers--I shall try my luck upon as many
 fat purses as I can meet with.--Cripps is improving very fast: I have the
 greater hopes of him because he is so slow in development. A Man of great
 executing powers at 20, with a look and a speech almost stupid, is sure to
 do something.
 
 I have just looked through the Second Side of your Letter--I feel a great
 content at it.--I was at Hunt's the other day, and he surprised me with a
 real authenticated lock of _Milton's Hair_. I know you would like what I
 wrote thereon, so here it is--_as they say of a Sheep in a Nursery
 Book_:--
 
 ON SEEING A LOCK OF MILTON'S HAIR.
 
   Chief of Organic Numbers!
     Old Scholar of the Spheres!
   Thy spirit never slumbers,
     But rolls about our ears
   For ever, and for ever!
   O what a mad endeavour
             Worketh he,
   Who to thy sacred and ennobled hearse
   Would offer a burnt sacrifice of verse
             And melody.
 
   How heavenward thou soundest,
     Live Temple of sweet noise,
   And Discord unconfoundest,
     Giving Delight new joys,
   And Pleasure nobler pinions!
   O, where are thy dominions?
             Lend thine ear
   To a young Delian oath,--aye, by thy soul,
   By all that from thy mortal lips did roll,
   And by the kernel of thine earthly love,
   Beauty, in things on earth, and things above,
             I swear!
     When every childish fashion
       Has vanish'd from my rhyme,
     Will I, gray-gone in passion,
       Leave to an after-time,
         Hymning and harmony
   Of thee, and of thy works, and of thy life;
   But vain is now the burning and the strife,
   Pangs are in vain, until I grow high-rife
         With old Philosophy,
   And mad with glimpses of futurity!
 
   For many years my offering must be hush'd;
     When I do speak, I'll think upon this hour,
   Because I feel my forehead hot and flush'd,
     Even at the simplest vassal of thy power,--
       A lock of thy bright hair,--
       Sudden it came,
   And I was startled, when I caught thy name
       Coupled so unaware;
   Yet, at the moment, temperate was my blood.
   I thought I had beheld it from the flood.
 
 This I did at Hunt's at his request--perhaps I should have done something
 better alone and at home.--I have sent my first Book to the press, and
 this afternoon shall begin preparing the Second--my visit to you will be a
 great spur to quicken the proceeding.--I have not had your Sermon
 returned--I long to make it the Subject of a Letter to you--What do they
 say at Oxford?
 
 I trust you and Gleig pass much fine time together. Remember me to him and
 Whitehead. My Brother Tom is getting stronger, but his spitting of Blood
 continues. I sat down to read King Lear yesterday, and felt the greatness
 of the thing up to the Writing of a Sonnet preparatory thereto--in my next
 you shall have it.--There were some miserable reports of Rice's health--I
 went, and lo! Master Jemmy had been to the play the night before, and was
 out at the time--he always comes on his legs like a Cat. I have seen a
 good deal of Wordsworth. Hazlitt is lecturing on Poetry at the Surrey
 Institution--I shall be there next Tuesday.
 
 Your most affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXXII.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 [Hampstead, January 30, 1818.]
 
 My dear Taylor--These lines as they now stand about "happiness," have rung
 in my ears like "a chime a mending"--See here,
 
                                 "Behold
   Wherein lies happiness, Peona? fold, etc."
 
 It appears to me the very contrary of blessed. I hope this will appear to
 you more eligible.
 
   "Wherein lies Happiness? In that which becks
   Our ready minds to fellowship divine,
   A fellowship with Essence till we shine
   Full alchemised, and free of space--Behold
   The clear religion of Heaven--fold, etc."
 
 You must indulge me by putting this in, for setting aside the badness of
 the other, such a preface is necessary to the subject. The whole thing
 must, I think, have appeared to you, who are a consecutive man, as a thing
 almost of mere words, but I assure you that, when I wrote it, it was a
 regular stepping of the Imagination towards a truth. My having written
 that argument will perhaps be of the greatest service to me of anything I
 ever did. It set before me the gradations of happiness, even like a kind
 of pleasure thermometer, and is my first step towards the chief attempt in
 the drama. The playing of different natures with joy and Sorrow--Do me
 this favour, and believe me
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 J. KEATS.
 
 I hope your next work will be of a more general Interest. I suppose you
 cogitate a little about it, now and then.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Hampstead, Saturday [January 31, 1818].
 
 My dear Reynolds--I have parcelled out this day for Letter Writing--more
 resolved thereon because your Letter will come as a refreshment and will
 have (sic parvis etc.) the same effect as a Kiss in certain situations
 where people become over-generous. I have read this first sentence over,
 and think it savours rather; however an inward innocence is like a nested
 dove, as the old song says....
 
 Now I purposed to write to you a serious poetical letter, but I find that
 a maxim I met with the other day is a just one: "On cause mieux quand on
 ne dit pas _causons_." I was hindered, however, from my first intention by
 a mere muslin Handkerchief very neatly pinned--but "Hence, vain deluding,"
 etc. Yet I cannot write in prose; it is a sunshiny day and I cannot, so
 here goes,--
 
   Hence Burgundy, Claret, and Port,
     Away with old Hock and Madeira,
   Too earthly ye are for my sport;
     There's a beverage brighter and clearer.
   Instead of a pitiful rummer,
   My wine overbrims a whole summer;
     My bowl is the sky,
     And I drink at my eye,
     Till I feel in the brain
     A Delphian pain--
   Then follow, my Caius! then follow:
     On the green of the hill
     We will drink our fill
     Of golden sunshine,
     Till our brains intertwine
   With the glory and grace of Apollo!
 
   God of the Meridian,
     And of the East and West,
   To thee my soul is flown,
     And my body is earthward press'd.--
   It is an awful mission,
   A terrible division;
   And leaves a gulph austere
   To be fill'd with worldly fear.
   Aye, when the soul is fled
   Too high above our head,
   Affrighted do we gaze
   After its airy maze,
   As doth a mother wild,
   When her young infant child
   Is in an eagle's claws--
   And is not this the cause
   Of madness?--God of Song,
   Thou bearest me along
   Through sights I scarce can bear:
   O let me, let me share
   With the hot lyre and thee,
   The staid Philosophy.
   Temper my lonely hours,
   And let me see thy bowers
   More unalarm'd!
 
 My dear Reynolds, you must forgive all this ranting--but the fact is, I
 cannot write sense this Morning--however you shall have some--I will copy
 out my last Sonnet.
 
   When I have fears that I may cease to be
     Before my pen has glean'd my teeming brain,
   Before high piled Books in charactery,
     Hold like rich garners the full ripen'd grain--
   When I behold, upon the night's starr'd face,
     Huge cloudy symbols of a high romance,
   And think that I may never live to trace
     Their shadows, with the magic hand of chance;
   And when I feel, fair creature of an hour,
     That I shall never look upon thee more,
   Never have relish in the faery power
     Of unreflecting Love;--then on the shore
         Of the wide world I stand alone, and think
         Till Love and Fame to nothingness do sink.
 
 I must take a turn, and then write to Teignmouth. Remember me to all, not
 excepting yourself.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIV.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Hampstead, Tuesday [February 3, 1818].
 
 My dear Reynolds--I thank you for your dish of Filberts--would I could get
 a basket of them by way of dessert every day for the sum of twopence.[45]
 Would we were a sort of ethereal Pigs, and turned loose to feed upon
 spiritual Mast and Acorns--which would be merely being a squirrel and
 feeding upon filberts, for what is a squirrel but an airy pig, or a
 filbert but a sort of archangelical acorn? About the nuts being worth
 cracking, all I can say is, that where there are a throng of delightful
 Images ready drawn, simplicity is the only thing. The first is the best on
 account of the first line, and the "arrow, foil'd of its antler'd food,"
 and moreover (and this is the only word or two I find fault with, the more
 because I have had so much reason to shun it as a quicksand) the last has
 "tender and true." We must cut this, and not be rattlesnaked into any more
 of the like. It may be said that we ought to read our contemporaries, that
 Wordsworth, etc., should have their due from us. But, for the sake of a
 few fine imaginative or domestic passages, are we to be bullied into a
 certain Philosophy engendered in the whims of an Egotist? Every man has
 his speculations, but every man does not brood and peacock over them till
 he makes a false coinage and deceives himself. Many a man can travel to
 the very bourne of Heaven, and yet want confidence to put down his
 half-seeing. Sancho will invent a Journey heavenward as well as anybody.
 We hate poetry that has a palpable design upon us, and, if we do not
 agree, seems to put its hand into its breeches pocket. Poetry should be
 great and unobtrusive, a thing which enters into one's soul, and does not
 startle it or amaze it with itself--but with its subject. How beautiful
 are the retired flowers!--how would they lose their beauty were they to
 throng into the highway, crying out, "Admire me, I am a violet! Dote upon
 me, I am a primrose!" Modern poets differ from the Elizabethans in this:
 each of the moderns like an Elector of Hanover governs his petty state and
 knows how many straws are swept daily from the Causeways in all his
 dominions, and has a continual itching that all the Housewives should have
 their coppers well scoured: The ancients were Emperors of vast Provinces,
 they had only heard of the remote ones and scarcely cared to visit them. I
 will cut all this--I will have no more of Wordsworth or Hunt in
 particular--Why should we be of the tribe of Manasseh, when we can wander
 with Esau? Why should we kick against the Pricks, when we can walk on
 Roses? Why should we be owls, when we can be eagles? Why be teased with
 "nice-eyed wagtails," when we have in sight "the Cherub Contemplation"?
 Why with Wordsworth's "Matthew with a bough of wilding in his hand," when
 we can have Jacques "under an oak," etc.? The secret of the Bough of
 Wilding will run through your head faster than I can write it. Old Matthew
 spoke to him some years ago on some nothing, and because he happens in an
 Evening Walk to imagine the figure of the old Man, he must stamp it down
 in black and white, and it is henceforth sacred. I don't mean to deny
 Wordsworth's grandeur and Hunt's merit, but I mean to say we need not be
 teased with grandeur and merit when we can have them uncontaminated and
 unobtrusive. Let us have the old Poets and Robin Hood. Your letter and its
 sonnets gave me more pleasure than will the Fourth Book of Childe Harold
 and the whole of anybody's life and opinions. In return for your Dish of
 Filberts, I have gathered a few Catkins, I hope they'll look pretty.
 
 TO J. H. R. IN ANSWER TO HIS ROBIN HOOD SONNETS.
 
   No! those days are gone away,
   And their hours are old and gray,
   And their minutes buried all
   Under the down-trodden pall
   Of the leaves of many years.
   Many times have Winter's shears,
   Frozen North and chilling East,
   Sounded tempests to the feast
   Of the forest's whispering fleeces,
   Since men paid no rent on Leases.
     No! the Bugle sounds no more,
   And the twanging bow no more;
   Silent is the ivory shrill
   Past the heath and up the Hill;
   There is no mid-forest laugh,
   Where lone Echo gives the half
   To some wight amaz'd to hear
   Jesting, deep in forest drear.
     On the fairest time of June
   You may go with Sun or Moon,
   Or the seven stars to light you,
   Or the polar ray to right you;
   But you never may behold
   Little John or Robin bold;
   Never any of all the clan,
   Thrumming on an empty can
   Some old hunting ditty, while
   He doth his green way beguile
   To fair Hostess Merriment
   Down beside the pasture Trent,
   For he left the merry tale,
   Messenger for spicy ale.
     Gone the merry morris din,
   Gone the song of Gamelyn,
   Gone the tough-belted outlaw
   Idling in the "grene shawe":
   All are gone away and past!
   And if Robin _should_ be cast
   Sudden from his turfed grave,
   And if Marian _should_ have
   Once again her forest days,
   She would weep, and he would craze:
   He would swear, for all his oaks,
   Fall'n beneath the Dock-yard strokes,
   Have rotted on the briny seas;
   She would weep that her wild bees
   Sang not to her--"strange that honey
   Can't be got without hard money!"
 
     So it is! yet let us sing,
   Honour to the old bow-string,
   Honour to the bugle-horn,
   Honour to the woods unshorn,
   Honour to the Lincoln green,
   Honour to the archer keen,
   Honour to tight little John,
   And the horse he rode upon:
   Honour to bold Robin Hood,
   Sleeping in the underwood!
   Honour to maid Marian,
   And to all the Sherwood clan--
   Though their days have hurried by
   Let us two a burden try.
 
 I hope you will like them--they are at least written in the Spirit of
 Outlawry. Here are the Mermaid lines,
 
   Souls of Poets dead and gone,
   What Elysium have ye known,
   Happy field, or mossy cavern,
   Fairer than the Mermaid Tavern?
     Have ye tippled drink more fine
   Than mine Host's Canary wine?
   Or are fruits of paradise
   Sweeter than those dainty pies
   Of Venison? O generous food
   Drest as though bold Robin Hood
   Would with his Maid Marian,
   Sup and bowse from horn and can.
     I have heard that, on a day,
   Mine host's sign-board flew away,
   No body knew whither, till
   An astrologer's old Quill
   To a sheepskin gave the story,
   Said he saw you in your glory,
   Underneath a new old-sign
   Sipping beverage divine,
   And pledging with contented smack,
   The Mermaid in the Zodiac.
     Souls of Poets dead and gone,
   Are the winds a sweeter home?
   Richer is uncellar'd cavern,
   Than the merry mermaid Tavern?[46]
 
 I will call on you at 4 to-morrow, and we will trudge together, for it is
 not the thing to be a stranger in the Land of Harpsicols. I hope also to
 bring you my 2nd Book. In the hope that these Scribblings will be some
 amusement for you this Evening, I remain, copying on the Hill,
 
 Your sincere friend and Co-scribbler
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXXV.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Fleet Street, Thursday Morn [February 5, 1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--I have finished copying my Second Book--but I want it for
 one day to overlook it. And moreover this day I have very particular
 employ in the affair of Cripps--so I trespass on your indulgence, and take
 advantage of your good nature. You shall hear from me or see me soon. I
 will tell Reynolds of your engagement to-morrow.
 
 Yours unfeignedly
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVI.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Hampstead, Saturday Night [February 14, 1818].
 
 My dear Brothers--When once a man delays a letter beyond the proper time,
 he delays it longer, for one or two reasons--first, because he must begin
 in a very common-place style, that is to say, with an excuse; and secondly
 things and circumstances become so jumbled in his mind, that he knows not
 what, or what not, he has said in his last--I shall visit you as soon as I
 have copied my poem all out, I am now much beforehand with the printer,
 they have done none yet, and I am half afraid they will let half the
 season by before the printing. I am determined they shall not trouble me
 when I have copied it all.--Horace Smith has lent me his manuscript called
 "Nehemiah Muggs, an exposure of the Methodists"--perhaps I may send you a
 few extracts--Hazlitt's last Lecture was on Thomson, Cowper, and Crabbe,
 he praised Thomson and Cowper but he gave Crabbe an unmerciful licking--I
 think Hunt's article of Fazio--no it was not, but I saw Fazio the first
 night, it hung rather heavily on me--I am in the high way of being
 introduced to a squad of people, Peter Pindar, Mrs. Opie, Mrs. Scott--Mr.
 Robinson a great friend of Coleridge's called on me.[47] Richards tells me
 that my poems are known in the west country, and that he saw a very clever
 copy of verses, headed with a Motto from my Sonnet to George--Honours rush
 so thickly upon me that I shall not be able to bear up against them. What
 think you--am I to be crowned in the Capitol, am I to be made a
 Mandarin--No! I am to be invited, Mrs. Hunt tells me, to a party at
 Ollier's, to keep Shakspeare's birthday--Shakspeare would stare to see me
 there.[48] The Wednesday before last Shelley, Hunt and I wrote each a
 Sonnet on the River Nile, some day you shall read them all. I saw a sheet
 of Endymion, and have all reason to suppose they will soon get it done,
 there shall be nothing wanting on my part. I have been writing at
 intervals many songs and Sonnets, and I long to be at Teignmouth, to read
 them over to you: however I think I had better wait till this Book is off
 my mind; it will not be long first.
 
 Reynolds has been writing two very capital articles, in the Yellow Dwarf,
 on popular Preachers--All the talk here is about Dr. Croft the Duke of
 Devon etc.
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, February 19, 1818.]
 
 My dear Reynolds--I had an idea that a Man might pass a very pleasant life
 in this manner--Let him on a certain day read a certain page of full Poesy
 or distilled Prose, and let him wander with it, and muse upon it, and
 reflect from it, and bring home to it, and prophesy upon it, and dream
 upon it: until it becomes stale--But when will it do so? Never--When Man
 has arrived at a certain ripeness in intellect any one grand and spiritual
 passage serves him as a starting-post towards all "the two-and-thirty
 Palaces." How happy is such a voyage of conception, what delicious
 diligent indolence! A doze upon a sofa does not hinder it, and a nap upon
 Clover engenders ethereal finger-pointings--the prattle of a child gives
 it wings, and the converse of middle-age a strength to beat them--a strain
 of music conducts to "an odd angle of the Isle," and when the leaves
 whisper it puts a girdle round the earth.--Nor will this sparing touch of
 noble Books be any irreverence to their Writers--for perhaps the honors
 paid by Man to Man are trifles in comparison to the benefit done by great
 works to the "spirit and pulse of good" by their mere passive existence.
 Memory should not be called Knowledge--Many have original minds who do not
 think it--they are led away by Custom. Now it appears to me that almost
 any Man may like the spider spin from his own inwards his own airy
 Citadel--the points of leaves and twigs on which the spider begins her
 work are few, and she fills the air with a beautiful circuiting. Man
 should be content with as few points to tip with the fine Web of his Soul,
 and weave a tapestry empyrean--full of symbols for his spiritual eye, of
 softness for his spiritual touch, of space for his wandering, of
 distinctness for his luxury. But the minds of mortals are so different and
 bent on such diverse journeys that it may at first appear impossible for
 any common taste and fellowship to exist between two or three under these
 suppositions. It is however quite the contrary. Minds would leave each
 other in contrary directions, traverse each other in numberless points,
 and at last greet each other at the journey's end. An old man and a child
 would talk together and the old man be led on his path and the child left
 thinking. Man should not dispute or assert, but whisper results to his
 Neighbour, and thus by every germ of spirit sucking the sap from mould
 ethereal every human might become great, and humanity instead of being a
 wide heath of furze and briars, with here and there a remote Oak or Pine,
 would become a grand democracy of forest trees. It has been an old
 comparison for our urging on--the beehive--however it seems to me that we
 should rather be the flower than the Bee--for it is a false notion that
 more is gained by receiving than giving--no, the receiver and the giver
 are equal in their benefits. The flower, I doubt not, receives a fair
 guerdon from the Bee--its leaves blush deeper in the next spring--and who
 shall say between Man and Woman which is the most delighted? Now it is
 more noble to sit like Jove than to fly like Mercury:--let us not
 therefore go hurrying about and collecting honey, bee-like, buzzing here
 and there impatiently from a knowledge of what is to be arrived at. But
 let us open our leaves like a flower, and be passive and receptive;
 budding patiently under the eye of Apollo and taking hints from every
 noble insect that favours us with a visit--Sap will be given us for meat,
 and dew for drink. I was led into these thoughts, my dear Reynolds, by the
 beauty of the morning operating on a sense of Idleness. I have not read
 any Books--the Morning said I was right--I had no idea but of the Morning,
 and the Thrush said I was right--seeming to say,
 
   "O thou whose face hath felt the Winter's wind,
   Whose eye has seen the snow-clouds hung in Mist,
   And the black Elmtops 'mong the freezing stars:
   To thee the Spring will be a harvest-time--
   O thou, whose only book has been the light
   Of supreme darkness which thou feddest on
   Night after night, when Phoebus was away,
   To thee the Spring shall be a triple morn--
   O fret not after knowledge--I have none,
   And yet my song comes native with the warmth.
   O fret not after knowledge--I have none,
   And yet the Evening listens. He who saddens
   At thought of idleness cannot be idle,
   And he's awake who thinks himself asleep."
 
 Now I am sensible all this is a mere sophistication (however it may
 neighbour to any truths), to excuse my own indolence--So I will not
 deceive myself that Man should be equal with Jove--but think himself very
 well off as a sort of scullion-Mercury or even a humble-bee. It is no
 matter whether I am right or wrong either one way or another, if there is
 sufficient to lift a little time from your shoulders--
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVIII.--TO GEORGE AND THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Hampstead, Saturday [February 21, 1818].
 
 My dear Brothers--I am extremely sorry to have given you so much
 uneasiness by not writing; however, you know good news is no news or vice
 versa. I do not like to write a short letter to you, or you would have had
 one long before. The weather although boisterous to-day has been very much
 milder; and I think Devonshire is not the last place to receive a
 temperate Change. I have been abominably idle since you left, but have
 just turned over a new leaf, and used as a marker a letter of excuse to an
 invitation from Horace Smith. The occasion of my writing to-day is the
 enclosed letter--by Postmark from Miss W----[49] Does she expect you in
 town George? I received a letter the other day from Haydon, in which he
 says, his Essays on the Elgin Marbles are being translated into Italian,
 the which he superintends. I did not mention that I had seen the British
 Gallery, there are some nice things by Stark, and Bathsheba by Wilkie,
 which is condemned. I could not bear Alston's Uriel.
 
 Reynolds has been very ill for some time, confined to the house, and had
 leeches applied to his chest; when I saw him on Wednesday he was much the
 same, and he is in the worst place for amendment, among the strife of
 women's tongues, in a hot and parch'd room: I wish he would move to
 Butler's for a short time. The Thrushes and Blackbirds have been singing
 me into an idea that it was Spring, and almost that leaves were on the
 trees. So that black clouds and boisterous winds seem to have mustered and
 collected in full Divan, for the purpose of convincing me to the contrary.
 Taylor says my poem shall be out in a month, I think he will be out before
 it....
 
 The thrushes are singing now as if they would speak to the winds, because
 their big brother Jack, the Spring, was not far off. I am reading Voltaire
 and Gibbon, although I wrote to Reynolds the other day to prove reading of
 no use; I have not seen Hunt since, I am a good deal with Dilke and Brown,
 we are very thick; they are very kind to me, they are well. I don't think
 I could stop in Hampstead but for their neighbourhood. I hear Hazlitt's
 lectures regularly, his last was on Gray, Collins, Young, etc., and he
 gave a very fine piece of discriminating Criticism on Swift, Voltaire, and
 Rabelais. I was very disappointed at his treatment of Chatterton. I
 generally meet with many I know there. Lord Byron's 4th Canto is expected
 out, and I heard somewhere, that Walter Scott has a new Poem in readiness.
 I am sorry that Wordsworth has left a bad impression wherever he visited
 in town by his egotism, Vanity, and bigotry. Yet he is a great poet if not
 a philosopher. I have not yet read Shelley's Poem, I do not suppose you
 have it yet, at the Teignmouth libraries. These double letters must come
 rather heavy, I hope you have a moderate portion of cash, but don't fret
 at all, if you have not--Lord! I intend to play at cut and run as well as
 Falstaff, that is to say, before he got so lusty.
 
 I remain praying for your health my dear Brothers
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIX.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Hampstead, February 27 [1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--Your alteration strikes me as being a great
 Improvement--And now I will attend to the punctuations you speak of--The
 comma should be at _soberly_, and in the other passage, the Comma should
 follow _quiet_. I am extremely indebted to you for this alteration, and
 also for your after admonitions. It is a sorry thing for me that any one
 should have to overcome prejudices in reading my verses--that affects me
 more than any hypercriticism on any particular passage--In Endymion, I
 have most likely but moved into the go-cart from the leading-strings--In
 poetry I have a few axioms, and you will see how far I am from their
 centre.
 
 1st. I think poetry should surprise by a fine excess, and not by
 singularity; It should strike the reader as a wording of his own highest
 thoughts, and appear almost a remembrance.
 
 2d. Its touches of beauty should never be half-way, thereby making the
 reader breathless, instead of content. The rise, the progress, the setting
 of Imagery should, like the sun, come natural to him, shine over him, and
 set soberly, although in magnificence, leaving him in the luxury of
 twilight. But it is easier to think what poetry should be, than to write
 it--And this leads me to
 
 Another axiom--That if poetry comes not as naturally as the leaves to a
 tree, it had better not come at all.--However it may be with me, I cannot
 help looking into new countries with "O for a Muse of Fire to ascend!" If
 Endymion serves me as a pioneer, perhaps I ought to be content--I have
 great reason to be content, for thank God I can read, and perhaps
 understand Shakspeare to his depths; and I have I am sure many friends,
 who, if I fail, will attribute any change in my life and temper to
 humbleness rather than pride--to a cowering under the wings of great
 poets, rather than to a bitterness that I am not appreciated. I am anxious
 to get Endymion printed that I may forget it and proceed. I have copied
 the 3rd Book and begun the 4th. On running my eye over the proofs, I saw
 one mistake--I will notice it presently, and also any others, if there be
 any. There should be no comma in "the raft branch down sweeping from a
 tall ash-top." I have besides made one or two alterations, and also
 altered the thirteenth line p. 32 to make sense of it, as you will see. I
 will take care the printer shall not trip up my heels. There should be no
 dash after Dryope, in the line "Dryope's lone lulling of her child."
 
 Remember me to Percy Street.
 
 Your sincere and obliged friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 _P.S._--You shall have a short preface in good time.
 
 
 
 
 XL.--TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY.
 
 
 [Hampstead, March 1818?]
 
 My dear Sirs--I am this morning making a general clearance of all lent
 Books--all--I am afraid I do not return all--I must fog your memories
 about them--however with many thanks here are the remainder--which I am
 afraid are not worth so much now as they were six months ago--I mean the
 fashions may have changed--
 
 Yours truly
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XLI.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 Teignmouth, Friday [March 13, 1818].[50]
 
 My dear Bailey--When a poor devil is drowning, it is said he comes thrice
 to the surface ere he makes his final sink--if however even at the third
 rise he can manage to catch hold of a piece of weed or rock he stands a
 fair chance, as I hope I do now, of being saved. I have sunk twice in our
 correspondence, have risen twice, and have been too idle, or something
 worse, to extricate myself. I have sunk the third time, and just now risen
 again at this two of the Clock P.M., and saved myself from utter perdition
 by beginning this, all drenched as I am, and fresh from the water. And I
 would rather endure the present inconvenience of a wet jacket than you
 should keep a laced one in store for me. Why did I not stop at Oxford in
 my way? How can you ask such a Question? Why, did I not promise to do so?
 Did I not in a letter to you make a promise to do so? Then how can you be
 so unreasonable as to ask me why I did not? This is the thing--(for I have
 been rubbing up my Invention--trying several sleights--I first polished a
 cold, felt it in my fingers, tried it on the table, but could not pocket
 it:--I tried Chillblains, Rheumatism, Gout, tight boots,--nothing of that
 sort would do,--so this is, as I was going to say, the thing)--I had a
 letter from Tom, saying how much better he had got, and thinking he had
 better stop--I went down to prevent his coming up. Will not this do? turn
 it which way you like--it is selvaged all round. I have used it, these
 three last days, to keep out the abominable Devonshire weather--by the by,
 you may say what you will of Devonshire: the truth is, it is a splashy,
 rainy, misty, snowy, foggy, haily, floody, muddy, slipshod county. The
 hills are very beautiful, when you get a sight of 'em--the primroses are
 out, but then you are in--the Cliffs are of a fine deep colour, but then
 the Clouds are continually vieing with them--the Women like your London
 people in a sort of negative way--because the native men are the poorest
 creatures in England--because Government never have thought it worth while
 to send a recruiting party among them. When I think of Wordsworth's sonnet
 "Vanguard of Liberty! ye men of Kent!" the degenerated race about me are
 Pulvis ipecac. simplex--a strong dose. Were I a corsair, I'd make a
 descent on the south coast of Devon; if I did not run the chance of having
 Cowardice imputed to me. As for the men, they'd run away into the
 Methodist meeting-houses, and the women would be glad of it. Had England
 been a large Devonshire, we should not have won the Battle of Waterloo.
 There are knotted oaks--there are lusty rivulets? there are meadows such
 as are not--there are valleys of feminine[51] climate--but there are no
 thews and sinews--Moore's Almanack is here a Curiosity--Arms, neck, and
 shoulders may at least be seen there, and the ladies read it as some
 out-of-the-way Romance. Such a quelling Power have these thoughts over me
 that I fancy the very air of a deteriorating quality. I fancy the flowers,
 all precocious, have an Acrasian spell about them--I feel able to beat off
 the Devonshire waves like soapfroth. I think it well for the honour of
 Britain that Julius Caesar did not first land in this County. A Devonshirer
 standing on his native hills is not a distinct object--he does not show
 against the light--a wolf or two would dispossess him. I like, I love
 England. I like its living men--give me a long brown plain "for my
 morning,"[51] so I may meet with some of Edmund Ironside's descendants.
 Give me a barren mould, so I may meet with some shadowing of Alfred in the
 shape of a Gipsy, a huntsman or a shepherd. Scenery is fine--but human
 nature is finer--the sward is richer for the tread of a real nervous
 English foot--the Eagle's nest is finer, for the Mountaineer has looked
 into it. Are these facts or prejudices? Whatever they be, for them I shall
 never be able to relish entirely any Devonshire scenery--Homer is fine,
 Achilles is fine, Diomed is fine, Shakspeare is fine, Hamlet is fine, Lear
 is fine, but dwindled Englishmen are not fine. Where too the women are so
 passable, and have such English names, such as Ophelia, Cordelia etc. that
 they should have such Paramours or rather Imparamours--As for them, I
 cannot in thought help wishing, as did the cruel Emperor, that they had
 but one head, and I might cut it off to deliver them from any horrible
 Courtesy they may do their undeserving countrymen, I wonder I meet with no
 born monsters--O Devonshire, last night I thought the moon had dwindled in
 heaven----
 
 I have never had your Sermon from Wordsworth, but Mr. Dilke lent it me.
 You know my ideas about Religion. I do not think myself more in the right
 than other people, and that nothing in this world is proveable. I wish I
 could enter into all your feelings on the subject, merely for one short 10
 minutes, and give you a page or two to your liking. I am sometimes so very
 sceptical as to think Poetry itself a mere Jack o' Lantern to amuse
 whoever may chance to be struck with its brilliance. As tradesmen say
 everything is worth what it will fetch, so probably every mental pursuit
 takes its reality and worth from the ardour of the pursuer--being in
 itself a Nothing. Ethereal things may at least be thus real, divided under
 three heads--Things real--things semireal--and nothings. Things real, such
 as existences of Sun moon and Stars--and passages of Shakspeare.--Things
 semireal, such as love, the Clouds etc., which require a greeting of the
 Spirit to make them wholly exist--and Nothings, which are made great and
 dignified by an ardent pursuit--which, by the by, stamp the Burgundy mark
 on the bottles of our minds, insomuch as they are able to "_consecrate
 whate'er they look upon_." I have written a sonnet here of a somewhat
 collateral nature--so don't imagine it an "apropos des bottes"--
 
   Four Seasons fill the measure of the year;
     There are four seasons in the mind of Man:
   He hath his lusty Spring, when Fancy clear
     Takes in all beauty with an easy span:
   He has his Summer, when luxuriously
     He chews the honied cud of fair Spring thoughts,
   Till in his Soul, dissolv'd, they come to be
     Part of himself: He hath his Autumn Ports
   And havens of repose, when his tired wings
     Are folded up, and he content to look[52]
   On Mists in idleness--to let fair things
     Pass by unheeded as a threshold brook.
           He has his winter too of Pale misfeature,
           Or else he would forego his mortal nature.
 
 Aye, this may be carried--but what am I talking of?--it is an old maxim of
 mine, and of course must be well known, that every point of thought is the
 Centre of an intellectual world. The two uppermost thoughts in a Man's
 mind are the two poles of his world--he revolves on them, and everything
 is Southward or Northward to him through their means.--We take but three
 steps from feathers to iron.--Now, my dear fellow, I must once for all
 tell you I have not one idea of the truth of any of my speculations--I
 shall never be a reasoner, because I care not to be in the right, when
 retired from bickering and in a proper philosophical temper. So you must
 not stare if in any future letter, I endeavour to prove that Apollo, as he
 had catgut strings to his lyre, used a cat's paw as a pecten--and further
 from said Pecten's reiterated and continual teasing came the term
 _hen-pecked_. My Brother Tom desires to be remembered to you; he has just
 this moment had a spitting of blood, poor fellow--Remember me to Gleig and
 Whitehead.
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XLII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Teignmouth, Saturday [March 14, 1818].
 
 Dear Reynolds--I escaped being blown over and blown under and trees and
 house being toppled on me.--I have since hearing of Brown's accident had
 an aversion to a dose of parapet, and being also a lover of antiquities I
 would sooner have a harmless piece of Herculaneum sent me quietly as a
 present than ever so modern a chimney-pot tumbled on to my head--Being
 agog to see some Devonshire, I would have taken a walk the first day, but
 the rain would not let me; and the second, but the rain would not let me;
 and the third, but the rain forbade it. Ditto 4--ditto 5--ditto--so I made
 up my Mind to stop indoors, and catch a sight flying between the showers:
 and, behold I saw a pretty valley--pretty cliffs, pretty Brooks, pretty
 Meadows, pretty trees, both standing as they were created, and blown down
 as they are uncreated--The green is beautiful, as they say, and pity it is
 that it is amphibious--_mais!_ but alas! the flowers here wait as
 naturally for the rain twice a day as the Mussels do for the Tide; so we
 look upon a brook in these parts as you look upon a splash in your
 Country. There must be something to support this--aye, fog, hail, snow,
 rain, Mist blanketing up three parts of the year. This Devonshire is like
 Lydia Languish, very entertaining when it smiles, but cursedly subject to
 sympathetic moisture. You have the sensation of walking under one great
 Lamplighter: and you can't go on the other side of the ladder to keep your
 frock clean, and cosset your superstition. Buy a girdle--put a pebble in
 your mouth--loosen your braces--for I am going among scenery whence I
 intend to tip you the Damosel Radcliffe--I'll cavern you, and grotto you,
 and waterfall you, and wood you, and water you, and immense-rock you, and
 tremendous-sound you, and solitude you. I'll make a lodgment on your
 glacis by a row of Pines, and storm your covered way with bramble Bushes.
 I'll have at you with hip and haw small-shot, and cannonade you with
 Shingles--I'll be witty upon salt-fish, and impede your cavalry with
 clotted cream. But ah Coward! to talk at this rate to a sick man, or, I
 hope, to one that was sick--for I hope by this you stand on your right
 foot. If you are not--that's all,--I intend to cut all sick people if they
 do not make up their minds to cut Sickness--a fellow to whom I have a
 complete aversion, and who strange to say is harboured and countenanced in
 several houses where I visit--he is sitting now quite impudent between me
 and Tom--He insults me at poor Jem Rice's--and you have seated him before
 now between us at the Theatre, when I thought he looked with a longing eye
 at poor Kean. I shall say, once for all, to my friends generally and
 severally, cut that fellow, or I cut you--
 
 I went to the Theatre here the other night, which I forgot to tell George,
 and got insulted, which I ought to remember to forget to tell any Body;
 for I did not fight, and as yet have had no redress--"Lie thou there,
 sweetheart!"[53] I wrote to Bailey yesterday, obliged to speak in a high
 way, and a damme who's afraid--for I had owed him so long; however, he
 shall see I will be better in future. Is he in town yet? I have directed
 to Oxford as the better chance. I have copied my fourth Book, and shall
 write the Preface soon. I wish it was all done; for I want to forget it
 and make my mind free for something new--Atkins the Coachman, Bartlett the
 Surgeon, Simmons the Barber, and the Girls over at the Bonnet-shop, say we
 shall now have a month of seasonable weather--warm, witty, and full of
 invention--Write to me and tell me that you are well or thereabouts, or by
 the holy Beaucoeur, which I suppose is the Virgin Mary, or the repented
 Magdalen (beautiful name, that Magdalen), I'll take to my Wings and fly
 away to anywhere but old or Nova Scotia--I wish I had a little innocent
 bit of Metaphysic in my head, to criss-cross the letter: but you know a
 favourite tune is hardest to be remembered when one wants it most and you,
 I know, have long ere this taken it for granted that I never have any
 speculations without associating you in them, where they are of a pleasant
 nature, and you know enough of me to tell the places where I haunt most,
 so that if you think for five minutes after having read this, you will
 find it a long letter, and see written in the Air above you,
 
 Your most affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Remember me to all. Tom's remembrances to you.
 
 
 
 
 XLIII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Teignmouth, Saturday Morn [March 21, 1818].
 
 My dear Haydon--In sooth, I hope you are not too sanguine about that
 seal--in sooth I hope it is not Brumidgeum--in double sooth I hope it is
 his--and in triple sooth I hope I shall have an impression.[54] Such a
 piece of intelligence came doubly welcome to me while in your own County
 and in your own hand--not but I have blown up the said County for its
 urinal qualifications--the six first days I was here it did nothing but
 rain; and at that time having to write to a friend I gave Devonshire a
 good blowing up--it has been fine for almost three days, and I was coming
 round a bit; but to-day it rains again--with me the County is yet upon its
 good behaviour. I have enjoyed the most delightful Walks these three fine
 days beautiful enough to make me content.
 
   Here all the summer could I stay,
       For there's Bishop's teign
       And King's teign
   And Coomb at the clear teign head--
       Where close by the stream
       You may have your cream
   All spread upon barley bread.
 
       There's arch Brook
       And there's larch Brook
   Both turning many a mill;
       And cooling the drouth
       Of the salmon's mouth,
   And fattening his silver gill.
 
       There is Wild wood,
       A Mild hood
   To the sheep on the lea o' the down,
       Where the golden furze,
       With its green, thin spurs,
   Doth catch at the maiden's gown.
 
       There is Newton marsh
       With its spear grass harsh--
   A pleasant summer level
       Where the maidens sweet
       Of the Market Street,
   Do meet in the dusk to revel.
 
       There's the Barton rich
       With dyke and ditch
   And hedge for the thrush to live in
       And the hollow tree
       For the buzzing bee
   And a bank for the wasp to hive in.
 
       And O, and O
       The daisies blow
   And the primroses are waken'd,
       And the violets white
       Sit in silver plight,
   And the green bud's as long as the spike end.
 
       Then who would go
       Into dark Soho,
   And chatter with dack'd hair'd critics,
       When he can stay
       For the new-mown hay,
   And startle the dappled Prickets?
 
 I know not if this rhyming fit has done anything--it will be safe with you
 if worthy to put among my Lyrics. Here's some doggrel for you--Perhaps you
 would like a bit of b----hrell--
 
   Where be ye going, you Devon Maid?
     And what have you there in the Basket?
   Ye tight little fairy just fresh from the dairy,
     Will ye give me some cream if I ask it?
 
   I love your Meads, and I love your flowers,
     And I love your junkets mainly,
   But 'hind the door I love kissing more,
     O look not so disdainly.
 
   I love your hills, and I love your dales,
     And I love your flocks a-bleating--
   But O, on the heather to lie together,
     With both our hearts a-beating!
 
   I'll put your Basket all safe in a nook,
     Your shawl I hang up on the willow,
   And we will sigh in the daisy's eye
     And kiss on a grass green pillow.
 
 How does the work go on? I should like to bring out my "Dentatus"[55] at
 the time your Epic makes its appearance. I expect to have my Mind soon
 clear for something new. Tom has been much worse: but is now getting
 better--his remembrances to you. I think of seeing the Dart and
 Plymouth--but I don't know. It has as yet been a Mystery to me how and
 where Wordsworth went. I can't help thinking he has returned to his
 Shell--with his beautiful Wife and his enchanting Sister. It is a great
 Pity that People should by associating themselves with the finest things,
 spoil them. Hunt has damned Hampstead and masks and sonnets and Italian
 tales. Wordsworth has damned the lakes--Milman has damned the old
 drama--West has damned----wholesale. Peacock has damned satire--Ollier has
 damn'd Music--Hazlitt has damned the bigoted and the blue-stockinged; how
 durst the Man?! he is your only good damner, and if ever I am damn'd--damn
 me if I shouldn't like him to damn me. It will not be long ere I see you,
 but I thought I would just give you a line out of Devon.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Remember me to all we know.
 
 
 
 
 XLIV.--TO MESSRS. TAYLOR AND HESSEY.
 
 
 Teignmouth, Saturday Morn [March 21, 1818].
 
 My dear Sirs--I had no idea of your getting on so fast--I thought of
 bringing my 4th Book to Town all in good time for you--especially after
 the late unfortunate chance.
 
 I did not however for my own sake delay finishing the copy which was done
 a few days after my arrival here. I send it off to-day, and will tell you
 in a Postscript at what time to send for it from the Bull and Mouth or
 other Inn. You will find the Preface and dedication and the title Page as
 I should wish it to stand--for a Romance is a fine thing notwithstanding
 the circulating Libraries. My respects to Mrs. Hessey and to Percy Street.
 
 Yours very sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 _P.S._--I have been advised to send it to you--you may expect it on
 Monday--for I sent it by the Postman to Exeter at the same time with this
 Letter. Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 XLV.--TO JAMES RICE.
 
 
 Teignmouth, Tuesday [March 24, 1818].
 
 My dear Rice--Being in the midst of your favourite Devon, I should not, by
 rights, pen one word but it should contain a vast portion of Wit, Wisdom
 and learning--for I have heard that Milton ere he wrote his answer to
 Salmasius came into these parts, and for one whole month, rolled himself
 for three whole hours (per day?), in a certain meadow hard by us--where
 the mark of his nose at equidistances is still shown. The exhibitor of the
 said meadow further saith, that, after these rollings, not a nettle sprang
 up in all the seven acres for seven years, and that from the said time, a
 new sort of plant was made from the whitethorn, of a thornless nature,
 very much used by the bucks of the present day to rap their boots withal.
 This account made me very naturally suppose that the nettles and thorns
 etherealised by the scholar's rotatory motion, and garnered in his head,
 thence flew after a process of fermentation against the luckless Salmasius
 and occasioned his well-known and unhappy end. What a happy thing it would
 be if we could settle our thoughts and make our minds up on any matter in
 five minutes, and remain content--that is, build a sort of mental cottage
 of feelings, quiet and pleasant--to have a sort of Philosophical
 back-garden, and cheerful holiday-keeping front one--but alas! this never
 can be: for as the material cottager knows there are such places as France
 and Italy, and the Andes and burning mountains, so the spiritual Cottager
 has knowledge of the terra semi-incognita of things unearthly, and cannot
 for his life keep in the check-rein--or I should stop here quiet and
 comfortable in my theory of nettles. You will see, however, I am obliged
 to run wild being attracted by the load-stone concatenation. No sooner had
 I settled the knotty point of Salmasius, than the Devil put this whim into
 my head in the likeness of one of Pythagoras's questionings--Did Milton do
 more good or harm in the world? He wrote, let me inform you (for I have it
 from a friend, who had it of ----,) he wrote Lycidas, Comus, Paradise Lost
 and other Poems, with much delectable prose--He was moreover an active
 friend to man all his life, and has been since his death.--Very good--but,
 my dear Fellow, I must let you know that, as there is ever the same
 quantity of matter constituting this habitable globe--as the ocean
 notwithstanding the enormous changes and revolutions taking place in some
 or other of its demesnes--notwithstanding Waterspouts whirlpools and
 mighty rivers emptying themselves into it--still is made up of the same
 bulk, nor ever varies the number of its atoms--and as a certain bulk of
 water was instituted at the creation--so very likely a certain portion of
 intellect was spun forth into the thin air, for the brains of man to prey
 upon it. You will see my drift without any unnecessary parenthesis. That
 which is contained in the Pacific could not lie in the hollow of the
 Caspian--that which was in Milton's head could not find room in Charles
 the Second's--He like a Moon attracted intellect to its flow--it has not
 ebbed yet, but has left the shore-pebbles all bare--I mean all Bucks,
 Authors of Hengist, and Castlereaghs of the present day; who without
 Milton's gormandising might have been all wise men--Now forasmuch as I was
 very predisposed to a country I had heard you speak so highly of, I took
 particular notice of everything during my journey, and have bought some
 folio asses' skins for memorandums. I have seen everything but the
 wind--and that, they say, becomes visible by taking a dose of acorns, or
 sleeping one night in a hog-trough, with your tail to the Sow Sow-West.
 Some of the little Bar-maids look'd at me as if I knew Jem Rice.... Well,
 I can't tell! I hope you are showing poor Reynolds the way to get well.
 Send me a good account of him, and if I can, I'll send you one of Tom--Oh!
 for a day and all well!
 
 I went yesterday to Dawlish fair.
 
   Over the Hill and over the Dale,
     And over the Bourne to Dawlish,
   Where ginger-bread wives have a scanty sale,
     And ginger-bread nuts are smallish, etc. etc.
 
 Tom's remembrances and mine to you all.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XLVI.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [Teignmouth, March 25, 1818.]
 
 My dear Reynolds--In hopes of cheering you through a Minute or two, I was
 determined will he nill he to send you some lines, so you will excuse the
 unconnected subject and careless verse. You know, I am sure, Claude's
 Enchanted Castle,[56] and I wish you may be pleased with my remembrance of
 it. The Rain is come on again--I think with me Devonshire stands a very
 poor chance. I shall damn it up hill and down dale, if it keep up to the
 average of six fine days in three weeks. Let me have better news of you.
 
 Tom's remembrances to you. Remember us to all.
 
 Your affectionate friend,
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
   Dear Reynolds! as last night I lay in bed,
   There came before my eyes that wonted thread
   Of shapes, and shadows, and remembrances,
   That every other minute vex and please:
   Things all disjointed come from north and south,--
   Two Witch's eyes above a Cherub's mouth,
   Voltaire with casque and shield and habergeon,
   And Alexander with his nightcap on;
   Old Socrates a-tying his cravat,
   And Hazlitt playing with Miss Edgeworth's cat;
   And Junius Brutus, pretty well so so,
   Making the best of's way towards Soho.
 
     Few are there who escape these visitings,--
   Perhaps one or two whose lives have patent wings,
   And thro' whose curtains peeps no hellish nose,
   No wild-boar tushes, and no Mermaid's toes;
   But flowers bursting out with lusty pride,
   And young Aeolian harps personify'd;
   Some Titian colours touch'd into real life,--
   The sacrifice goes on; the pontiff knife
   Gleams in the Sun, the milk-white heifer lows,
   The pipes go shrilly, the libation flows:
   A white sail shows above the green-head cliff,
   Moves round the point, and throws her anchor stiff;
   The mariners join hymn with those on land.
 
     You know the Enchanted Castle,--it doth stand
   Upon a rock, on the border of a Lake,
   Nested in trees, which all do seem to shake
   From some old magic-like Urganda's Sword.
   O Phoebus! that I had thy sacred word
   To show this Castle, in fair dreaming wise,
   Unto my friend, while sick and ill he lies!
 
     You know it well enough, where it doth seem
   A mossy place, a Merlin's Hall, a dream;
   You know the clear Lake, and the little Isles,
   The mountains blue, and cold near neighbour rills,
   All which elsewhere are but half animate;
   There do they look alive to love and hate,
   To smiles and frowns; they seem a lifted mound
   Above some giant, pulsing underground.
 
     Part of the Building was a chosen See,
   Built by a banish'd Santon of Chaldee;
   The other part, two thousand years from him,
   Was built by Cuthbert de Saint Aldebrim;
   Then there's a little wing, far from the Sun,
   Built by a Lapland Witch turn'd maudlin Nun;
   And many other juts of aged stone
   Founded with many a mason-devil's groan.
 
     The doors all look as if they op'd themselves
   The windows as if latch'd by Fays and Elves,
   And from them comes a silver flash of light,
   As from the westward of a Summer's night;
   Or like a beauteous woman's large blue eyes
   Gone mad thro' olden songs and poesies.
 
     See! what is coming from the distance dim!
   A golden Galley all in silken trim!
   Three rows of oars are lightening, moment whiles
   Into the verd'rous bosoms of those isles;
   Towards the shade, under the Castle wall,
   It comes in silence,--now 'tis hidden all.
   The Clarion sounds, and from a Postern-gate
   An echo of sweet music doth create
   A fear in the poor Herdsman, who doth bring
   His beasts to trouble the enchanted spring,--
   He tells of the sweet music, and the spot,
   To all his friends, and they believe him not.
 
     O that our dreamings all, of sleep or wake,
   Would all their colours from the sunset take:
   From something of material sublime,
   Rather than shadow our own soul's day-time
   In the dark void of night. For in the world
   We jostle,--but my flag is not unfurl'd
   On the Admiral-staff,--and so philosophise
   I dare not yet! Oh, never will the prize,
   High reason, and the love of good and ill,
   Be my award! Things cannot to the will
   Be settled, but they tease us out of thought;
   Or is it that imagination brought
   Beyond its proper bound, yet still confin'd,
   Lost in a sort of Purgatory blind,
   Cannot refer to any standard law
   Of either earth or heaven? It is a flaw
   In happiness, to see beyond our bourn,--
   It forces us in summer skies to mourn,
   It spoils the singing of the Nightingale.
 
     Dear Reynolds! I have a mysterious tale,
   And cannot speak it: the first page I read
   Upon a Lampit rock of green sea-weed
   Among the breakers; 'twas a quiet eve,
   The rocks were silent, the wide sea did weave
   An untumultuous fringe of silver foam
   Along the flat brown sand; I was at home
   And should have been most happy,--but I saw
   Too far into the sea, where every maw
   The greater on the less feeds evermore.--
   But I saw too distinct into the core
   Of an eternal fierce destruction,
   And so from happiness I far was gone.
   Still am I sick of it, and tho' to-day,
   I've gather'd young spring-leaves, and flowers gay
   Of periwinkle and wild strawberry,
   Still do I that most fierce destruction see,--
   The Shark at savage prey,--the Hawk at pounce,--
   The gentle Robin, like a Pard or Ounce,
   Ravening a worm,--Away, ye horrid moods!
   Moods of one's mind! You know I hate them well.
   You know I'd sooner be a clapping Bell
   To some Kamtschatkan Missionary Church,
   Than with these horrid moods be left i' the lurch.
 
 
 
 
 XLVII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wednesday, [Teignmouth, April 8, 1818].
 
 My dear Haydon--I am glad you were pleased with my nonsense, and if it so
 happen that the humour takes me when I have set down to prose to you I
 will not gainsay it. I should be (God forgive me) ready to swear because I
 cannot make use of your assistance in going through Devon if I was not in
 my own Mind determined to visit it thoroughly at some more favourable time
 of the year. But now Tom (who is getting greatly better) is anxious to be
 in Town--therefore I put off my threading the County. I purpose within a
 month to put my knapsack at my back and make a pedestrian tour through the
 North of England, and part of Scotland--to make a sort of Prologue to the
 Life I intend to pursue--that is to write, to study and to see all Europe
 at the lowest expence. I will clamber through the Clouds and exist. I will
 get such an accumulation of stupendous recollections that as I walk
 through the suburbs of London I may not see them--I will stand upon Mount
 Blanc and remember this coming Summer when I intend to straddle Ben
 Lomond--with my soul!--galligaskins are out of the Question. I am nearer
 myself to hear your "Christ" is being tinted into immortality. Believe me
 Haydon your picture is part of myself--I have ever been too sensible of
 the labyrinthian path to eminence in Art (judging from Poetry) ever to
 think I understood the emphasis of painting. The innumerable compositions
 and decompositions which take place between the intellect and its thousand
 materials before it arrives at that trembling delicate and snail-horn
 perception of beauty. I know not your many havens of intenseness--nor ever
 can know them: but for this I hope not you achieve is lost upon me[57]:
 for when a Schoolboy the abstract Idea I had of an heroic painting--was
 what I cannot describe. I saw it somewhat sideways, large, prominent,
 round, and colour'd with magnificence--somewhat like the feel I have of
 Anthony and Cleopatra. Or of Alcibiades leaning on his Crimson Couch in
 his Galley, his broad shoulders imperceptibly heaving with the Sea. That
 passage in Shakspeare is finer than this--
 
   See how the surly Warwick mans the Wall.
 
 I like your consignment of Corneille--that's the humour of it--they shall
 be called your Posthumous Works.[58] I don't understand your bit of
 Italian. I hope she will awake from her dream and flourish fair--my
 respects to her. The Hedges by this time are beginning to leaf--Cats are
 becoming more vociferous--young Ladies who wear Watches are always looking
 at them. Women about forty-five think the Season very backward--Ladies'
 Mares have but half an allowance of food. It rains here again, has been
 doing so for three days--however as I told you I'll take a trial in June,
 July, or August next year.
 
 I am afraid Wordsworth went rather huff'd out of Town--I am sorry for
 it--he cannot expect his fireside Divan to be infallible--he cannot expect
 but that every man of worth is as proud as himself. O that he had not fit
 with a Warrener[59]--that is dined at Kingston's. I shall be in town in
 about a fortnight and then we will have a day or so now and then before I
 set out on my northern expedition--we will have no more abominable
 Rows--for they leave one in a fearful silence--having settled the
 Methodists let us be rational--not upon compulsion--no--if it will out
 let it--but I will not play the Bassoon any more deliberately. Remember me
 to Hazlitt, and Bewick--
 
 Your affectionate friend,
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XLVIII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Thy. morng., [Teignmouth, April 9, 1818].
 
 My dear Reynolds--Since you all agree that the thing[60] is bad, it must
 be so--though I am not aware there is anything like Hunt in it (and if
 there is, it is my natural way, and I have something in common with Hunt).
 Look it over again, and examine into the motives, the seeds, from which
 any one sentence sprung--I have not the slightest feel of humility towards
 the public--or to anything in existence,--but the eternal Being, the
 Principle of Beauty, and the Memory of great Men. When I am writing for
 myself for the mere sake of the moment's enjoyment, perhaps nature has its
 course with me--but a Preface is written to the Public; a thing I cannot
 help looking upon as an Enemy, and which I cannot address without feelings
 of Hostility. If I write a Preface in a supple or subdued style, it will
 not be in character with me as a public speaker--I would be subdued before
 my friends, and thank them for subduing me--but among Multitudes of Men--I
 have no feel of stooping, I hate the idea of humility to them.
 
 I never wrote one single Line of Poetry with the least Shadow of public
 thought.
 
 Forgive me for vexing you and making a Trojan horse of such a Trifle, both
 with respect to the matter in Question, and myself--but it eases me to
 tell you--I could not live without the love of my friends--I would jump
 down Aetna for any great Public good--but I hate a Mawkish Popularity. I
 cannot be subdued before them--My glory would be to daunt and dazzle the
 thousand jabberers about Pictures and Books--I see swarms of Porcupines
 with their Quills erect "like lime-twigs set to catch my Winged Book," and
 I would fright them away with a torch. You will say my Preface is not much
 of a Torch. It would have been too insulting "to begin from Jove," and I
 could not set a golden head upon a thing of clay. If there is any fault in
 the Preface it is not affectation, but an undersong of disrespect to the
 Public--if I write another Preface it must be done without a thought of
 those people--I will think about it. If it should not reach you in four or
 five days, tell Taylor to publish it without a Preface, and let the
 Dedication simply stand--"inscribed to the Memory of Thomas Chatterton."
 
 I had resolved last night to write to you this morning--I wish it had been
 about something else--something to greet you towards the close of your
 long illness. I have had one or two intimations of your going to Hampstead
 for a space; and I regret to see your confounded Rheumatism keeps you in
 Little Britain where, I am sure the air is too confined. Devonshire
 continues rainy. As the drops beat against the window, they give me the
 same sensation as a quart of cold water offered to revive a half-drowned
 devil--no feel of the clouds dropping fatness; but as if the roots of the
 earth were rotten, cold, and drenched. I have not been able to go to
 Kent's cave at Babbicombe--however on one very beautiful day I had a fine
 Clamber over the rocks all along as far as that place. I shall be in Town
 in about Ten days--We go by way of Bath on purpose to call on Bailey. I
 hope soon to be writing to you about the things of the north, purposing to
 wayfare all over those parts. I have settled my accoutrements in my own
 mind, and will go to gorge wonders. However, we'll have some days together
 before I set out--
 
 I have many reasons for going wonder-ways: to make my winter chair free
 from spleen--to enlarge my vision--to escape disquisitions on Poetry and
 Kingston Criticism; to promote digestion and economise shoe-leather. I'll
 have leather buttons and belt; and, if Brown holds his mind, over the
 Hills we go. If my Books will help me to it, then will I take all Europe
 in turn, and see the Kingdoms of the Earth and the glory of them. Tom is
 getting better, he hopes you may meet him at the top o' the hill. My Love
 to your nurses. I am ever
 
 Your affectionate Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XLIX.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [Teignmouth,] Friday [April 10, 1818].
 
 My dear Reynolds--I am anxious you should find this Preface tolerable. If
 there is an affectation in it 'tis natural to me. Do let the Printer's
 Devil cook it, and let me be as "the casing air."
 
 You are too good in this Matter--were I in your state, I am certain I
 should have no thought but of discontent and illness--I might though be
 taught patience: I had an idea of giving no Preface; however, don't you
 think this had better go? O, let it--one should not be too timid--of
 committing faults.
 
 The climate here weighs us down completely; Tom is quite low-spirited. It
 is impossible to live in a country which is continually under hatches. Who
 would live in a region of Mists, Game Laws, indemnity Bills, etc., when
 there is such a place as Italy? It is said this England from its Clime
 produces a Spleen, able to engender the finest Sentiments, and cover the
 whole face of the isle with Green--so it ought, I'm sure.--I should still
 like the Dedication simply, as I said in my last.
 
 I wanted to send you a few songs written in your favorite Devon--it cannot
 be--Rain! Rain! Rain! I am going this morning to take a facsimile of a
 Letter of Nelson's, very much to his honour--you will be greatly pleased
 when you see it--in about a week. What a spite it is one cannot get
 out--the little way I went yesterday, I found a lane banked on each side
 with store of Primroses, while the earlier bushes are beginning to leaf.
 
 I shall hear a good account of you soon.
 
 Your affectionate Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 My Love to all and remember me to Taylor.
 
 
 
 
 L.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Teignmouth, Friday [April 24, 1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--I think I did wrong to leave to you all the trouble of
 Endymion--But I could not help it then--another time I shall be more bent
 to all sorts of troubles and disagreeables. Young men for some time have
 an idea that such a thing as happiness is to be had, and therefore are
 extremely impatient under any unpleasant restraining. In time however, of
 such stuff is the world about them, they know better, and instead of
 striving from uneasiness, greet it as an habitual sensation, a pannier
 which is to weigh upon them through life--And in proportion to my disgust
 at the task is my sense of your kindness and anxiety. The book pleased me
 much. It is very free from faults: and, although there are one or two
 words I should wish replaced, I see in many places an improvement greatly
 to the purpose.
 
 I think those speeches which are related--those parts where the speaker
 repeats a speech, such as Glaucus's repetition of Circe's words, should
 have inverted commas to every line. In this there is a little
 confusion.--If we divide the speeches into _identical_ and _related_; and
 to the former put merely one inverted Comma at the beginning and another
 at the end; and to the latter inverted Commas before every line, the book
 will be better understood at the 1st glance. Look at pages 126, 127, you
 will find in the 3d line the beginning of a related speech marked thus
 "Ah! art awake--" while, at the same time, in the next page the
 continuation of the _identical_ speech is marked in the same manner,
 "Young man of Latmos--" You will find on the other side all the parts
 which should have inverted commas to every line.
 
 I was proposing to travel over the North this summer. There is but one
 thing to prevent me.--I know nothing--I have read nothing--and I mean to
 follow Solomon's directions, "Get learning--get understanding." I find
 earlier days are gone by--I find that I can have no enjoyment in the world
 but continual drinking of knowledge. I find there is no worthy pursuit but
 the idea of doing some good for the world--Some do it with their
 Society--some with their wit--some with their benevolence--some with a
 sort of power of conferring pleasure and good-humour on all they meet--and
 in a thousand ways, all dutiful to the command of great Nature--there is
 but one way for me. The road lies through application, study, and
 thought.--I will pursue it; and for that end, purpose retiring for some
 years. I have been hovering for some time between an exquisite sense of
 the luxurious, and a love for philosophy,--were I calculated for the
 former, I should be glad. But as I am not, I shall turn all my soul to the
 latter.--My brother Tom is getting better, and I hope I shall see both him
 and Reynolds better before I retire from the world. I shall see you soon,
 and have some talk about what Books I shall take with me.
 
 Your very sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Pray remember me to Hessey Woodhouse and Percy Street.
 
 
 
 
 LI.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Teignmouth, April 27, 1818.
 
 My dear Reynolds--It is an awful while since you have heard from me--I
 hope I may not be punished, when I see you well, and so anxious as you
 always are for me, with the remembrance of my so seldom writing when you
 were so horribly confined. The most unhappy hours in our lives are those
 in which we recollect times past to our own blushing--If we are immortal
 that must be the Hell. If I must be immortal, I hope it will be after
 having taken a little of "that watery labyrinth" in order to forget some
 of my school-boy days and others since those.
 
 I have heard from George at different times how slowly you were
 recovering--It is a tedious thing--but all Medical Men will tell you how
 far a very gradual amendment is preferable; you will be strong after this,
 never fear. We are here still enveloped in clouds--I lay awake last night
 listening to the Rain with a sense of being drowned and rotted like a
 grain of wheat. There is a continual courtesy between the Heavens and the
 Earth. The heavens rain down their unwelcomeness, and the Earth sends it
 up again to be returned to-morrow. Tom has taken a fancy to a physician
 here, Dr. Turton, and I think is getting better--therefore I shall perhaps
 remain here some Months. I have written to George for some Books--shall
 learn Greek, and very likely Italian--and in other ways prepare myself to
 ask Hazlitt in about a year's time the best metaphysical road I can take.
 For although I take poetry to be Chief, yet there is something else
 wanting to one who passes his life among Books and thoughts on Books--I
 long to feast upon old Homer as we have upon Shakspeare, and as I have
 lately upon Milton. If you understood Greek, and would read me passages,
 now and then, explaining their meaning, 'twould be, from its mistiness,
 perhaps, a greater luxury than reading the thing one's self. I shall be
 happy when I can do the same for you. I have written for my folio
 Shakspeare, in which there are the first few stanzas of my "Pot of Basil."
 I have the rest here finished, and will copy the whole out fair shortly,
 and George will bring it you--The compliment is paid by us to Boccace,
 whether we publish or no: so there is content in this world--_mine_ is
 short--you must be deliberate about yours: you must not think of it till
 many months after you are quite well:--then put your passion to it, and I
 shall be bound up with you in the shadows of Mind, as we are in our
 matters of human life. Perhaps a Stanza or two will not be too foreign to
 your Sickness.
 
   Were they unhappy then?--It cannot be--
     Too many tears for lovers have been shed,
   Too many sighs give we to them in fee,
     Too much of pity after they are dead,
   Too many doleful stories do we see,
     Whose matter in bright gold were best be read;
   Except in such a page where Theseus' spouse
   Over the pathless waves towards him bows.
 
   But, for the general award of love
     The little sweet doth kill much bitterness;
   Though Dido silent is in under-grove,
     And Isabella's was a great distress,
   Though young Lorenzo in warm Indian clove
     Was not embalm'd, this truth is not the less--
   Even bees, the little almsmen of spring-bowers,
   Know there is richest juice in poison-flowers.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
   She wept alone for pleasures not to be;
     Sorely she wept until the night came on,
   And then, instead of love, O misery!
     She brooded o'er the luxury alone:
   What might have been too plainly did she see,[61]
     And to the silence made a gentle moan,
   Spreading her perfect arms upon the air,
   And on her couch low murmuring "Where? O where?"
 
 I heard from Rice this morning--very witty--and have just written to
 Bailey. Don't you think I am brushing up in the letter way? and being in
 for it, you shall hear again from me very shortly:--if you will promise
 not to put hand to paper for me until you can do it with a tolerable ease
 of health--except it be a line or two. Give my Love to your Mother and
 Sisters. Remember me to the Butlers--not forgetting Sarah.
 
 Your affectionate Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Teignmouth, May 3d [1818].
 
 My dear Reynolds--What I complain of is that I have been in so uneasy a
 state of Mind as not to be fit to write to an invalid. I cannot write to
 any length under a disguised feeling. I should have loaded you with an
 addition of gloom, which I am sure you do not want. I am now thank God in
 a humour to give you a good groat's worth--for Tom, after a Night without
 a Wink of sleep, and over-burthened with fever, has got up after a
 refreshing day-sleep and is better than he has been for a long time; and
 you I trust have been again round the common without any effect but
 refreshment. As to the Matter I hope I can say with Sir Andrew[62] "I have
 matter enough in my head" in your favour--And now, in the second place,
 for I reckon that I have finished my Imprimis, I am glad you blow up the
 weather--all through your letter there is a leaning towards a
 climate-curse, and you know what a delicate satisfaction there is in
 having a vexation anathematised: one would think there has been growing up
 for these last four thousand years, a grand-child Scion of the old
 forbidden tree, and that some modern Eve had just violated it; and that
 there was come with double charge
 
   "Notus and Afer, black with thundrous clouds
   From Serraliona--"
 
 I shall breathe worsted stockings[63] sooner than I thought for--Tom wants
 to be in Town--we will have some such days upon the heath like that of
 last summer--and why not with the same book? or what say you to a black
 Letter Chaucer, printed in 1596: aye I've got one huzza! I shall have it
 bound en gothique--a nice sombre binding--it will go a little way to
 unmodernise. And also I see no reason, because I have been away this last
 month, why I should not have a peep at your Spenserian--notwithstanding
 you speak of your office, in my thought a little too early, for I do not
 see why a Mind like yours is not capable of harbouring and digesting the
 whole Mystery of Law as easily as Parson Hugh does pippins, which did not
 hinder him from his poetic canary.[64] Were I to study physic or rather
 Medicine again, I feel it would not make the least difference in my
 Poetry; when the mind is in its infancy a Bias is in reality a Bias, but
 when we have acquired more strength, a Bias becomes no Bias. Every
 department of Knowledge we see excellent and calculated towards a great
 whole--I am so convinced of this that I am glad at not having given away
 my medical Books, which I shall again look over to keep alive the little I
 know thitherwards; and moreover intend through you and Rice to become a
 sort of pip-civilian. An extensive knowledge is needful to thinking
 people--it takes away the heat and fever; and helps, by widening
 speculation, to ease the Burden of the Mystery, a thing which I begin to
 understand a little, and which weighed upon you in the most gloomy and
 true sentence in your Letter. The difference of high Sensations with and
 without knowledge appears to me this: in the latter case we are falling
 continually ten thousand fathoms deep and being blown up again, without
 wings, and with all horror of a bare-shouldered Creature--in the former
 case, our shoulders are fledged, and we go through the same air and space
 without fear. This is running one's rigs on the score of abstracted
 benefit--when we come to human Life and the affections, it is impossible
 to know how a parallel of breast and head can be drawn (you will forgive
 me for thus privately treading out of my depth, and take it for treading
 as school-boys tread the water); it is impossible to know how far
 knowledge will console us for the death of a friend, and the ill "that
 flesh is heir to." With respect to the affections and Poetry you must know
 by a sympathy my thoughts that way, and I daresay these few lines will be
 but a ratification: I wrote them on Mayday--and intend to finish the ode
 all in good time--
 
   Mother of Hermes! and still youthful Maia!
               May I sing to thee
   As thou wast hymned on the shores of Baiae?
               Or may I woo thee
   In earlier Sicilian? or thy smiles
   Seek as they once were sought, in Grecian isles,
   By Bards who died content on pleasant sward,
   Leaving great verse unto a little clan?
   O, give me their old vigour, and unheard
   Save of the quiet Primrose, and the span
               Of heaven and few ears,
   Rounded by thee, my song should die away
               Content as theirs,
   Rich in the simple worship of a day.--
 
 You may perhaps be anxious to know for fact to what sentence in your
 Letter I allude. You say, "I fear there is little chance of anything else
 in this life"--you seem by that to have been going through with a more
 painful and acute zest the same labyrinth that I have--I have come to the
 same conclusion thus far. My Branchings out therefrom have been numerous:
 one of them is the consideration of Wordsworth's genius and as a help, in
 the manner of gold being the meridian Line of worldly wealth, how he
 differs from Milton. And here I have nothing but surmises, from an
 uncertainty whether Milton's apparently less anxiety for Humanity proceeds
 from his seeing further or not than Wordsworth: And whether Wordsworth has
 in truth epic passion, and martyrs himself to the human heart, the main
 region of his song. In regard to his genius alone--we find what he says
 true as far as we have experienced, and we can judge no further but by
 larger experience--for axioms in philosophy are not axioms until they are
 proved upon our pulses. We read fine things, but never feel them to the
 full until we have gone the same steps as the author.--I know this is not
 plain; you will know exactly my meaning when I say that now I shall
 relish Hamlet more than I ever have done--Or, better--you are sensible no
 man can set down Venery as a bestial or joyless thing until he is sick of
 it, and therefore all philosophising on it would be mere wording. Until we
 are sick, we understand not; in fine, as Byron says, "Knowledge is
 sorrow"; and I go on to say that "Sorrow is wisdom"--and further for aught
 we can know for certainty "Wisdom is folly"--So you see how I have run
 away from Wordsworth and Milton, and shall still run away from what was in
 my head, to observe, that some kind of letters are good squares, others
 handsome ovals, and other some orbicular, others spheroid--and why should
 not there be another species with two rough edges like a Rat-trap? I hope
 you will find all my long letters of that species, and all will be well;
 for by merely touching the spring delicately and ethereally, the
 rough-edged will fly immediately into a proper compactness; and thus you
 may make a good wholesome loaf, with your own leaven in it, of my
 fragments--If you cannot find this said Rat-trap sufficiently tractable,
 alas for me, it being an impossibility in grain for my ink to stain
 otherwise: If I scribble long letters I must play my vagaries--I must be
 too heavy, or too light, for whole pages--I must be quaint and free of
 Tropes and figures--I must play my draughts as I please, and for my
 advantage and your erudition, crown a white with a black, or a black with
 a white, and move into black or white, far and near as I please--I must go
 from Hazlitt to Patmore, and make Wordsworth and Coleman play at
 leap-frog, or keep one of them down a whole half-holiday at
 fly-the-garter--"From Gray to Gay, from Little to Shakspeare." Also as a
 long cause requires two or more sittings of the Court, so a long letter
 will require two or more sittings of the Breech, wherefore I shall resume
 after dinner--
 
 Have you not seen a Gull, an orc, a Sea-Mew, or anything to bring this
 Line to a proper length, and also fill up this clear part; that like the
 Gull I may _dip_[65]--I hope, not out of sight--and also, like a Gull, I
 hope to be lucky in a good-sized fish--This crossing a letter is not
 without its association--for chequer-work leads us naturally to a
 Milkmaid, a Milkmaid to Hogarth, Hogarth to Shakspeare--Shakspeare to
 Hazlitt--Hazlitt to Shakspeare--and thus by merely pulling an apron-string
 we set a pretty peal of Chimes at work--Let them chime on while, with your
 patience, I will return to Wordsworth--whether or no he has an extended
 vision or a circumscribed grandeur--whether he is an eagle in his nest or
 on the wing--And to be more explicit and to show you how tall I stand by
 the giant, I will put down a simile of human life as far as I now perceive
 it; that is, to the point to which I say we both have arrived at--Well--I
 compare human life to a large Mansion of Many apartments, two of which I
 can only describe, the doors of the rest being as yet shut upon me--The
 first we step into we call the infant or thoughtless Chamber, in which we
 remain as long as we do not think--We remain there a long while, and
 notwithstanding the doors of the second Chamber remain wide open, showing
 a bright appearance, we care not to hasten to it; but are at length
 imperceptibly impelled by the awakening of the thinking principle within
 us--we no sooner get into the second Chamber, which I shall call the
 Chamber of Maiden-Thought, than we become intoxicated with the light and
 the atmosphere, we see nothing but pleasant wonders, and think of delaying
 there for ever in delight: However among the effects this breathing is
 father of is that tremendous one of sharpening one's vision into the heart
 and nature of Man--of convincing one's nerves that the world is full of
 Misery and Heartbreak, Pain, Sickness, and oppression--whereby this
 Chamber of Maiden Thought becomes gradually darkened, and at the same
 time, on all sides of it, many doors are set open--but all dark--all
 leading to dark passages--We see not the balance of good and evil--we are
 in a mist--we are now in that state--We feel the "burden of the Mystery."
 To this point was Wordsworth come, as far as I can conceive, when he wrote
 'Tintern Abbey,' and it seems to me that his Genius is explorative of
 those dark Passages. Now if we live, and go on thinking, we too shall
 explore them--He is a genius and superior to us, in so far as he can, more
 than we, make discoveries and shed a light in them--Here I must think
 Wordsworth is deeper than Milton, though I think it has depended more upon
 the general and gregarious advance of intellect, than individual greatness
 of Mind--From the Paradise Lost and the other Works of Milton, I hope it
 is not too presuming, even between ourselves, to say, that his Philosophy,
 human and divine, may be tolerably understood by one not much advanced in
 years. In his time, Englishmen were just emancipated from a great
 superstition, and Men had got hold of certain points and resting-places in
 reasoning which were too newly born to be doubted, and too much opposed by
 the Mass of Europe not to be thought ethereal and authentically
 divine--Who could gainsay his ideas on virtue, vice, and Chastity in
 Comus, just at the time of the dismissal of a hundred disgraces? who would
 not rest satisfied with his hintings at good and evil in the Paradise
 Lost, when just free from the Inquisition and burning in Smithfield? The
 Reformation produced such immediate and great benefits, that Protestantism
 was considered under the immediate eye of heaven, and its own remaining
 Dogmas and superstitions then, as it were, regenerated, constituted those
 resting-places and seeming sure points of Reasoning--from that I have
 mentioned, Milton, whatever he may have thought in the sequel, appears to
 have been content with these by his writings--He did not think into the
 human heart as Wordsworth has done--Yet Milton as a Philosopher had sure
 as great powers as Wordsworth--What is then to be inferred? O many
 things--It proves there is really a grand march of intellect,--It proves
 that a mighty providence subdues the mightiest Minds to the service of the
 time being, whether it be in human Knowledge or Religion. I have often
 pitied a tutor who has to hear "Nom. Musa" so often dinn'd into his
 ears--I hope you may not have the same pain in this scribbling--I may have
 read these things before, but I never had even a thus dim perception of
 them; and moreover I like to say my lesson to one who will endure my
 tediousness for my own sake--After all there is certainly something real
 in the world--Moore's present to Hazlitt is real--I like that Moore, and
 am glad I saw him at the Theatre just before I left Town. Tom has spit a
 _leetle_ blood this afternoon, and that is rather a damper--but I
 know--the truth is there is something real in the World. Your third
 Chamber of Life shall be a lucky and a gentle one--stored with the wine of
 love--and the Bread of Friendship--When you see George if he should not
 have received a letter from me tell him he will find one at home most
 likely--tell Bailey I hope soon to see him--Remember me to all. The leaves
 have been out here for mony a day--I have written to George for the first
 stanzas of my Isabel--I shall have them soon, and will copy the whole out
 for you.
 
 Your affectionate Friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LIII.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 Hampstead, Thursday [May 28, 1818].
 
 My dear Bailey--I should have answered your Letter on the Moment, if I
 could have said yes to your invitation. What hinders me is insuperable: I
 will tell it at a little length. You know my Brother George has been out
 of employ for some time: it has weighed very much upon him, and driven him
 to scheme and turn over things in his Mind. The result has been his
 resolution to emigrate to the back Settlements of America, become Farmer
 and work with his own hands, after purchasing 14 hundred acres of the
 American Government. This for many reasons has met with my entire
 Consent--and the chief one is this; he is of too independent and liberal a
 Mind to get on in Trade in this Country, in which a generous Man with a
 scanty resource must be ruined. I would sooner he should till the ground
 than bow to a customer. There is no choice with him: he could not bring
 himself to the latter. I would not consent to his going alone;--no--but
 that objection is done away with: he will marry before he sets sail a
 young lady he has known for several years, of a nature liberal and
 high-spirited enough to follow him to the Banks of the Mississippi. He
 will set off in a month or six weeks, and you will see how I should wish
 to pass that time with him.--And then I must set out on a journey of my
 own. Brown and I are going a pedestrian tour through the north of England
 and Scotland as far as John o' Grot's. I have this morning such a lethargy
 that I cannot write. The reason of my delaying is oftentimes from this
 feeling,--I wait for a proper temper. Now you ask for an immediate answer,
 I do not like to wait even till to-morrow. However, I am now so depressed
 that I have not an idea to put to paper--my hand feels like lead--and yet
 it is an unpleasant numbness; it does not take away the pain of Existence.
 I don't know what to write.
 
 
 Monday [June 1].
 
 You see how I have delayed; and even now I have but a confused idea of
 what I should be about. My intellect must be in a degenerating state--it
 must be--for when I should be writing about--God knows what--I am
 troubling you with moods of my own mind, or rather body, for mind there is
 none. I am in that temper that if I were under water I would scarcely kick
 to come up to the top--I know very well 'tis all nonsense--In a short time
 I hope I shall be in a temper to feel sensibly your mention of my book. In
 vain have I waited till Monday to have any Interest in that or anything
 else. I feel no spur at my Brother's going to America, and am almost
 stony-hearted about his wedding. All this will blow over--All I am sorry
 for is having to write to you in such a time--but I cannot force my
 letters in a hotbed. I could not feel comfortable in making sentences for
 you. I am your debtor--I must ever remain so--nor do I wish to be clear of
 any Rational debt: there is a comfort in throwing oneself on the charity
 of one's friends--'tis like the albatross sleeping on its wings. I will be
 to you wine in the cellar, and the more modestly, or rather, indolently, I
 retire into the backward bin, the more Falerne will I be at the drinking.
 There is one thing I must mention--my Brother talks of sailing in a
 fortnight--if so I will most probably be with you a week before I set out
 for Scotland. The middle of your first page should be sufficient to rouse
 me. What I said is true, and I have dreamt of your mention of it, and my
 not answering it has weighed on me since. If I come, I will bring your
 letter, and hear more fully your sentiments on one or two points. I will
 call about the Lectures at Taylor's, and at Little Britain, to-morrow.
 Yesterday I dined with Hazlitt, Barnes, and Wilkie, at Haydon's. The topic
 was the Duke of Wellington--very amusingly pro-and-con'd. Reynolds has
 been getting much better; and Rice may begin to crow, for he got a little
 so-so at a party of his, and was none the worse for it the next morning. I
 hope I shall soon see you, for we must have many new thoughts and feelings
 to analyse, and to discover whether a little more knowledge has not made
 us more ignorant.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LIV.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 London [June 10, 1818].
 
 My dear Bailey--I have been very much gratified and very much hurt by your
 letters in the Oxford Paper:[66] because independent of that unlawful and
 mortal feeling of pleasure at praise, there is a glory in enthusiasm; and
 because the world is malignant enough to chuckle at the most honourable
 Simplicity. Yes, on my soul, my dear Bailey, you are too simple for the
 world--and that Idea makes me sick of it. How is it that by extreme
 opposites we have, as it were, got discontented nerves? You have all your
 life (I think so) believed everybody. I have suspected everybody. And,
 although you have been so deceived, you make a simple appeal--the world
 has something else to do, and I am glad of it--Were it in my choice, I
 would reject a Petrarchal coronation--on account of my dying day, and
 because women have cancers. I should not by rights speak in this tone to
 you for it is an incendiary spirit that would do so. Yet I am not old
 enough or magnanimous enough to annihilate self--and it would perhaps be
 paying you an ill compliment. I was in hopes some little time back to be
 able to relieve your dulness by my spirits--to point out things in the
 world worth your enjoyment--and now I am never alone without rejoicing
 that there is such a thing as death--without placing my ultimate in the
 glory of dying for a great human purpose. Perhaps if my affairs were in a
 different state, I should not have written the above--you shall judge: I
 have two brothers; one is driven, by the "burden of Society," to America;
 the other with an exquisite love of life, is in a lingering state--My love
 for my Brothers, from the early loss of our Parents, and even from earlier
 misfortunes,[67] has grown into an affection "passing the love of women."
 I have been ill-tempered with them--I have vexed them--but the thought of
 them has always stifled the impression that any woman might otherwise have
 made upon me. I have a sister too, and may not follow them either to
 America or to the grave. Life must be undergone, and I certainly derive
 some consolation from the thought of writing one or two more poems before
 it ceases.
 
 I have heard some hints of your retiring to Scotland--I should like to
 know your feeling on it--it seems rather remote. Perhaps Gleig will have a
 duty near you. I am not certain whether I shall be able to go any journey,
 on account of my Brother Tom, and a little indisposition of my own. If I
 do not you shall see me soon, if _no_ on my return or I'll quarter myself
 on you next winter. I had known my sister-in-law some time before she was
 my sister, and was very fond of her. I like her better and better. She is
 the most disinterested woman I ever knew--that is to say, she goes beyond
 degree in it. To see an entirely disinterested girl quite happy is the
 most pleasant and extraordinary thing in the world--It depends upon a
 thousand circumstances--On my word it is extraordinary. Women must want
 Imagination, and they may thank God for it; and so may we, that a delicate
 being can feel happy without any sense of crime. It puzzles me, and I have
 no sort of logic to comfort me--I shall think it over. I am not at home,
 and your letter being there I cannot look it over to answer any
 particular--only I must say I feel that passage of Dante. If I take any
 book with me it shall be those minute volumes of Carey, for they will go
 into the aptest corner.
 
 Reynolds is getting, I may say, robust, his illness has been of service to
 him--like every one just recovered, he is high-spirited--I hear also good
 accounts of Rice. With respect to domestic literature, the Edinburgh
 Magazine, in another blow-up against Hunt, calls me "the amiable Mister
 Keats"--and I have more than a laurel from the Quarterly Reviewers for
 they have smothered me in "Foliage." I want to read you my "Pot of
 Basil"--if you go to Scotland, I should much like to read it there to you,
 among the snows of next winter. My Brothers' remembrances to you.
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LV.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Sunday Evening [June 21, 1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--I am sorry I have not had time to call and wish you health
 till my return--Really I have been hard run these last three
 days--However, au revoir, God keep us all well! I start to-morrow Morning.
 My brother Tom will I am afraid be lonely. I can scarce ask a loan of
 books for him, since I still keep those you lent me a year ago. If I am
 overweening, you will I know be indulgent. Therefore when you shall write,
 do send him some you think will be most amusing--he will be careful in
 returning them. Let him have one of my books bound. I am ashamed to
 catalogue these messages. There is but one more, which ought to go for
 nothing as there is a lady concerned. I promised Mrs. Reynolds one of my
 books bound. As I cannot write in it let the opposite[68] be pasted in
 'prythee. Remember me to Percy St.--Tell Hilton that one gratification on
 my return will be to find him engaged on a history piece to his own
 content--And tell Dewint I shall become a disputant on the landscape--Bow
 for me very genteelly to Mrs. D. or she will not admit your diploma.
 Remember me to Hessey, saying I hope he'll _Cary_ his point. I would not
 forget Woodhouse. Adieu!
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN O' GROTS.
 
 
 
 
 LVI.--TO THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Keswick, June 29th [1818].
 
 My dear Tom--I cannot make my Journal as distinct and actual as I could
 wish, from having been engaged in writing to George, and therefore I must
 tell you without circumstance that we proceeded from Ambleside to Rydal,
 saw the Waterfalls there, and called on Wordsworth, who was not at home,
 nor was any one of his family. I wrote a note and left it on the
 mantel-piece. Thence on we came to the foot of Helvellyn, where we slept,
 but could not ascend it for the mist. I must mention that from Rydal we
 passed Thirlswater, and a fine pass in the Mountains--from Helvellyn we
 came to Keswick on Derwent Water. The approach to Derwent Water surpassed
 Windermere--it is richly wooded, and shut in with rich-toned Mountains.
 From Helvellyn to Keswick was eight miles to Breakfast, after which we
 took a complete circuit of the Lake, going about ten miles, and seeing on
 our way the Fall of Lowdore. I had an easy climb among the streams, about
 the fragments of Rocks and should have got I think to the summit, but
 unfortunately I was damped by slipping one leg into a squashy hole. There
 is no great body of water, but the accompaniment is delightful; for it
 oozes out from a cleft in perpendicular Rocks, all fledged with Ash and
 other beautiful trees.[69] It is a strange thing how they got there. At
 the south end of the Lake, the Mountains of Borrowdale are perhaps as fine
 as anything we have seen. On our return from this circuit, we ordered
 dinner, and set forth about a mile and a half on the Penrith road, to see
 the Druid temple. We had a fag up hill, rather too near dinner-time, which
 was rendered void by the gratification of seeing those aged stones on a
 gentle rise in the midst of the Mountains, which at that time darkened all
 around, except at the fresh opening of the Vale of St. John. We went to
 bed rather fatigued, but not so much so as to hinder us getting up this
 morning to mount Skiddaw. It promised all along to be fair, and we had
 fagged and tugged nearly to the top, when, at half-past six, there came a
 Mist upon us and shut out the view. We did not, however, lose anything by
 it: we were high enough without mist to see the coast of Scotland--the
 Irish Sea--the hills beyond Lancaster--and nearly all the large ones of
 Cumberland and Westmoreland, particularly Helvellyn and Scawfell. It grew
 colder and colder as we ascended, and we were glad, at about three parts
 of the way, to taste a little rum which the Guide brought with him, mixed,
 mind ye, with Mountain water. I took two glasses going and one returning.
 It is about six miles from where I am writing to the top--So we have
 walked ten miles before Breakfast to-day. We went up with two others, very
 good sort of fellows--All felt, on arising into the cold air, that same
 elevation which a cold bath gives one--I felt as if I were going to a
 Tournament.
 
 Wordsworth's house is situated just on the rise of the foot of Mount
 Rydal; his parlour-window looks directly down Windermere; I do not think I
 told you how fine the Vale of Grasmere is, and how I discovered "the
 ancient woman seated on Helm Crag"[70]--We shall proceed immediately to
 Carlisle, intending to enter Scotland on the 1st of July via--
 
 
 [Carlisle,] July 1st.
 
 We are this morning at Carlisle. After Skiddaw, we walked to Treby the
 oldest market town in Cumberland--where we were greatly amused by a
 country dancing-school holden at the Tun, it was indeed "no new cotillon
 fresh from France." No, they kickit and jumpit with mettle extraordinary,
 and whiskit, and friskit, and toed it, and go'd it, and twirl'd it, and
 whirl'd it, and stamped it, and sweated it, tattooing the floor like mad.
 The difference between our country dances and these Scottish figures is
 about the same as leisurely stirring a cup o' Tea and beating up a
 batter-pudding. I was extremely gratified to think that, if I had
 pleasures they knew nothing of, they had also some into which I could not
 possibly enter. I hope I shall not return without having got the Highland
 fling. There was as fine a row of boys and girls as you ever saw; some
 beautiful faces, and one exquisite mouth. I never felt so near the glory
 of Patriotism, the glory of making by any means a country happier. This is
 what I like better than scenery. I fear our continued moving from place to
 place will prevent our becoming learned in village affairs: we are mere
 creatures of Rivers, Lakes, and Mountains. Our yesterday's journey was
 from Treby to Wigton, and from Wigton to Carlisle. The Cathedral does not
 appear very fine--the Castle is very ancient, and of brick. The City is
 very various--old white-washed narrow streets--broad red-brick ones more
 modern--I will tell you anon whether the inside of the Cathedral is worth
 looking at. It is built of sandy red stone or Brick. We have now walked
 114 miles, and are merely a little tired in the thighs, and a little
 blistered. We shall ride 38 miles to Dumfries, when we shall linger awhile
 about Nithsdale and Galloway. I have written two letters to Liverpool. I
 found a letter from sister George; very delightful indeed: I shall
 preserve it in the bottom of my knapsack for you.
 
 
 [Dumfries, evening of same day, July 1.]
 
 ON VISITING THE TOMB OF BURNS.
 
   The Town, the churchyard, and the setting sun,
   The Clouds, the trees, the rounded hills all seem,
   Though beautiful, Cold--strange--as in a dream,
   I dreamed long ago, now new begun.
   The short-liv'd, paly Summer is but won
   From Winter's ague, for one hour's gleam;
   Though sapphire-warm, their stars do never beam:
   All is cold Beauty; pain is never done:
   For who has mind to relish, Minos-wise,
   The Real of Beauty, free from that dead hue
   Sickly imagination and sick pride
   Cast wan upon it! Burns! with honour due
   I oft have honour'd thee. Great shadow, hide
   Thy face; I sin against thy native skies.
 
 You will see by this sonnet that I am at Dumfries. We have dined in
 Scotland. Burns's tomb is in the Churchyard corner, not very much to my
 taste, though on a scale large enough to show they wanted to honour him.
 Mrs. Burns lives in this place; most likely we shall see her
 to-morrow--This Sonnet I have written in a strange mood, half-asleep. I
 know not how it is, the Clouds, the Sky, the Houses, all seem anti-Grecian
 and anti-Charlemagnish. I will endeavour to get rid of my prejudices and
 tell you fairly about the Scotch.
 
 
 [Dumfries,] July 2nd.
 
 In Devonshire they say, "Well, where be ye going?" Here it is, "How is it
 wi' yoursel?" A man on the Coach said the horses took a Hellish heap o'
 drivin'; the same fellow pointed out Burns's Tomb with a deal of
 life--"There de ye see it, amang the trees--white, wi' a roond tap?" The
 first well-dressed Scotchman we had any conversation with, to our surprise
 confessed himself a Deist. The careful manner of delivering his opinions,
 not before he had received several encouraging hints from us, was very
 amusing. Yesterday was an immense Horse-fair at Dumfries, so that we met
 numbers of men and women on the road, the women nearly all barefoot, with
 their shoes and clean stockings in hand, ready to put on and look smart in
 the Towns. There are plenty of wretched cottages whose smoke has no outlet
 but by the door. We have now begun upon Whisky, called here Whuskey,--very
 smart stuff it is. Mixed like our liquors, with sugar and water,'tis
 called toddy; very pretty drink, and much praised by Burns.
 
 
 
 
 LVII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Dumfries, July 2nd [1818].
 
 My dear Fanny--I intended to have written to you from Kirkcudbright, the
 town I shall be in to-morrow--but I will write now because my Knapsack has
 worn my coat in the Seams, my coat has gone to the Tailor's and I have but
 one Coat to my back in these parts. I must tell you how I went to
 Liverpool with George and our new Sister and the Gentleman my fellow
 traveller through the Summer and autumn--We had a tolerable journey to
 Liverpool--which I left the next morning before George was up for
 Lancaster--Then we set off from Lancaster on foot with our Knapsacks on,
 and have walked a Little zig-zag through the mountains and Lakes of
 Cumberland and Westmoreland--We came from Carlisle yesterday to this
 place--We are employed in going up Mountains, looking at strange towns,
 prying into old ruins and eating very hearty breakfasts. Here we are full
 in the Midst of broad Scotch "How is it a' wi' yoursel"--the Girls are
 walking about bare-footed and in the worst cottages the smoke finds its
 way out of the door. I shall come home full of news for you and for fear I
 should choak you by too great a dose at once I must make you used to it by
 a letter or two. We have been taken for travelling Jewellers, Razor
 sellers and Spectacle vendors because friend Brown wears a pair. The first
 place we stopped at with our Knapsacks contained one Richard Bradshaw, a
 notorious tippler. He stood in the shape of a [Symbol: ounce] and
 ballanced himself as well as he could saying with his nose right in Mr.
 Brown's face "Do--yo--u sell spect--ta--cles?" Mr. Abbey says we are Don
 Quixotes--tell him we are more generally taken for Pedlars. All I hope is
 that we may not be taken for excisemen in this whisky country. We are
 generally up about 5 walking before breakfast and we complete our 20 miles
 before dinner.--Yesterday we visited Burns's Tomb and this morning the
 fine Ruins of Lincluden.
 
 
 [Auchencairn, same day, July 2.]
 
 I had done thus far when my coat came back fortified at all points--so as
 we lose no time we set forth again through Galloway--all very pleasant and
 pretty with no fatigue when one is used to it--We are in the midst of Meg
 Merrilies's country of whom I suppose you have heard.
 
   Old Meg she was a Gipsy,
     And liv'd upon the Moors:
   Her bed it was the brown heath turf,
     And her house was out of doors.
 
   Her apples were swart blackberries,
     Her currants pods o' broom;
   Her wine was dew of the wild white rose,
     Her book a churchyard tomb.
 
   Her Brothers were the craggy hills,
     Her Sisters larchen trees--
   Alone with her great family
     She liv'd as she did please.
 
   No breakfast had she many a morn,
     No dinner many a noon,
   And 'stead of supper she would stare
     Full hard against the Moon.
 
   But every morn of woodbine fresh
     She made her garlanding,
   And every night the dark glen Yew
     She wove, and she would sing.
 
   And with her fingers old and brown
     She plaited Mats o' Rushes,
   And gave them to the Cottagers
     She met among the Bushes.
 
   Old Meg was brave as Margaret Queen
     And tall as Amazon:
   An old red blanket cloak she wore;
     A chip hat had she on.
   God rest her aged bones somewhere--
     She died full long agone!
 
 If you like these sort of Ballads I will now and then scribble one for
 you--if I send any to Tom I'll tell him to send them to you.
 
 
 [Kirkcudbright, evening of same day, July 2.]
 
 I have so many interruptions that I cannot manage to fill a Letter in one
 day--since I scribbled the song we have walked through a beautiful Country
 to Kirkcudbright--at which place I will write you a song about myself--
 
   There was a naughty Boy,
     A naughty boy was he,
   He would not stop at home,
     He could not quiet be--
       He took
       In his Knapsack
       A Book
       Full of vowels
       And a shirt
       With some towels--
       A slight cap
       For night cap--
       A hair brush,
       Comb ditto,
       New Stockings
       For old ones
       Would split O!
       This Knapsack
       Tight at's back
       He rivetted close
     And followed his Nose
       To the North,
       To the North,
     And follow'd his nose
       To the North.
 
   There was a naughty boy
     And a naughty boy was he,
   For nothing would he do
     But scribble poetry--
       He took
       An inkstand
       In his hand
       And a Pen
       Big as ten
       In the other,
       And away
       In a Pother
       He ran
       To the mountains
       And fountains
       And ghostes
       And Postes
       And witches
       And ditches
       And wrote
       In his coat
       When the weather
       Was cool,
       Fear of gout,
       And without
       When the weather
       Was warm--
       Och the charm
       When we choose
     To follow one's nose
       To the north,
       To the north,
     To follow one's nose
       To the north!
 
   There was a naughty boy
     And a naughty boy was he,
   He kept little fishes
     In washing tubs three
       In spite
       Of the might
       Of the Maid
       Nor afraid
       Of his Granny-good--
       He often would
       Hurly burly
       Get up early
       And go
       By hook or crook
       To the brook
       And bring home
       Miller's thumb,
       Tittlebat
       Not over fat,
       Minnows small
       As the stall
       Of a glove,
       Not above
       The size
       Of a nice
       Little Baby's
       Little fingers--
       O he made
       'Twas his trade
     Of Fish a pretty Kettle
       A Kettle--
       A Kettle
     Of Fish a pretty Kettle
       A Kettle!
 
   There was a naughty Boy,
     And a naughty Boy was he,
   He ran away to Scotland
     The people for to see--
       Then he found
       That the ground
       Was as hard,
       That a yard
       Was as long,
       That a song
       Was as merry,
       That a cherry
       Was as red--
       That lead
       Was as weighty,
       That fourscore
       Was as eighty,
       That a door
       Was as wooden
       As in England--
     So he stood in his shoes
       And he wonder'd
       He wonder'd,
     He stood in his shoes
       And he wonder'd.
 
 
 [Newton Stewart, July 4.]
 
 My dear Fanny, I am ashamed of writing you such stuff, nor would I if it
 were not for being tired after my day's walking, and ready to tumble into
 bed so fatigued that when I am asleep you might sew my nose to my great
 toe and trundle me round the town, like a Hoop, without waking me. Then I
 get so hungry a Ham goes but a very little way and fowls are like Larks to
 me--A Batch of Bread I make no more ado with than a sheet of parliament;
 and I can eat a Bull's head as easily as I used to do Bull's eyes. I take
 a whole string of Pork Sausages down as easily as a Pen'orth of Lady's
 fingers. Ah dear I must soon be contented with an acre or two of oaten
 cake a hogshead of Milk and a Clothes-basket of Eggs morning noon and
 night when I get among the Highlanders. Before we see them we shall pass
 into Ireland and have a chat with the Paddies, and look at the Giant's
 Causeway which you must have heard of--I have not time to tell you
 particularly for I have to send a Journal to Tom of whom you shall hear
 all particulars or from me when I return. Since I began this we have
 walked sixty miles to Newton Stewart at which place I put in this
 Letter--to-night we sleep at Glenluce--to-morrow at Portpatrick and the
 next day we shall cross in the passage boat to Ireland. I hope Miss Abbey
 has quite recovered. Present my Respects to her and to Mr. and Mrs.
 Abbey. God bless you.
 
 Your affectionate Brother,
 
 JOHN.
 
 Do write me a Letter directed to _Inverness_, Scotland.
 
 
 
 
 LVIII.--TO THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Auchtercairn [for Auchencairn,] 3rd [for 2d] July 1818.
 
 My dear Tom--We are now in Meg Merrilies's country, and have this morning
 passed through some parts exactly suited to her. Kirkcudbright County is
 very beautiful, very wild, with craggy hills, somewhat in the Westmoreland
 fashion. We have come down from Dumfries to the sea-coast part of it. The
 following song you will have from Dilke, but perhaps you would like it
 here.[71]...
 
 
 [Newton Stewart,] July 5th [for 4th].
 
 Yesterday was passed in Kirkcudbright, the country is very rich, very
 fine, and with a little of Devon. I am now writing at Newton Stewart, six
 miles into Wigtown. Our landlady of yesterday said very few southerners
 passed hereaways. The children jabber away, as if in a foreign language;
 the bare-footed girls look very much in keeping, I mean with the scenery
 about them. Brown praises their cleanliness and appearance of comfort, the
 neatness of their cottages, etc.--it may be--they are very squat among
 trees and fern and heath and broom, on levels slopes and heights--but I
 wish they were as snug as those up the Devonshire valleys. We are lodged
 and entertained in great varieties. We dined yesterday on dirty Bacon,
 dirtier eggs, and dirtiest potatoes, with a slice of salmon--we breakfast
 this morning in a nice carpeted room, with sofa, hair-bottomed Chairs, and
 green-baized Mahogany. A spring by the road-side is always welcome: we
 drink water for dinner, diluted with a Gill of whisky.
 
 
 [Donaghadee] July 6.
 
 Yesterday morning we set out from Glenluce, going some distance round to
 see some rivers: they were scarcely worth the while. We went on to
 Stranraer, in a burning sun, and had gone about six miles when the Mail
 overtook us: we got up, were at Port Patrick in a jiffey, and I am writing
 now in little Ireland. The dialects on the neighbouring shores of Scotland
 and Ireland are much the same, yet I can perceive a great difference in
 the nations, from the chamber-maid at this _nate toone_ kept by Mr. Kelly.
 She is fair, kind, and ready to laugh, because she is out of the horrible
 dominion of the Scotch Kirk. A Scotch girl stands in terrible awe of the
 Elders--poor little Susannahs, they will scarcely laugh, and their Kirk is
 greatly to be damned. These Kirk-men have done Scotland good (Query?).
 They have made men, women; old men, young men; old women, young women;
 boys, girls; and all infants careful--so that they are formed into regular
 Phalanges of savers and gainers. Such a thrifty army cannot fail to enrich
 their Country, and give it a greater appearance of Comfort, than that of
 their poor rash neighbourhood--these Kirk-men have done Scotland harm;
 they have banished puns, and laughing, and kissing, etc. (except in cases
 where the very danger and crime must make it very gustful). I shall make a
 full stop at kissing, for after that there should be a better parenthesis,
 and go on to remind you of the fate of Burns--poor unfortunate fellow, his
 disposition was Southern--how sad it is when a luxurious imagination is
 obliged, in self-defence, to deaden its delicacy in vulgarity, and rot[72]
 in things attainable, that it may not have leisure to go mad after things
 which are not. No man, in such matters, will be content with the
 experience of others--It is true that out of suffering there is no
 dignity, no greatness, that in the most abstracted pleasure there is no
 lasting happiness--Yet who would not like to discover over again that
 Cleopatra was a Gipsy, Helen a rogue, and Ruth a deep one? I have not
 sufficient reasoning faculty to settle the doctrine of thrift, as it is
 consistent with the dignity of human Society--with the happiness of
 Cottagers. All I can do is by plump contrasts; were the fingers made to
 squeeze a guinea or a white hand?--were the lips made to hold a pen or a
 kiss? and yet in Cities man is shut out from his fellows if he is
 poor--the cottager must be very dirty, and very wretched, if she be not
 thrifty--the present state of society demands this, and this convinces me
 that the world is very young, and in a very ignorant state--We live in a
 barbarous age--I would sooner be a wild deer, than a girl under the
 dominion of the Kirk; and I would sooner be a wild hog, than be the
 occasion of a poor Creature's penance before those execrable elders.
 
 It is not so far to the Giant's Causeway as we supposed--We thought it 70,
 and hear it is only 48 miles--So we shall leave one of our knapsacks here
 at Donaghadee, take our immediate wants, and be back in a week, when we
 shall proceed to the County of Ayr. In the Packet yesterday we heard some
 ballads from two old men--One was a Romance which seemed very poor--then
 there was "The Battle of the Boyne," then "Robin Huid," as they call
 him--"Before the King you shall go, go, go; before the King you shall go."
 
 
 [Stranraer,] July 9th.
 
 We stopped very little in Ireland, and that you may not have leisure to
 marvel at our speedy return to Port Patrick, I will tell you that it is as
 dear living in Ireland as at the Hummums--thrice the expense of
 Scotland--it would have cost us L15 before our return; moreover we found
 those 48 miles to be Irish ones, which reach to 70 English--so having
 walked to Belfast one day, and back to Donaghadee the next, we left
 Ireland with a fair breeze. We slept last night at Port Patrick, when I
 was gratified by a letter from you. On our walk in Ireland, we had too
 much opportunity to see the worse than nakedness, the rags, the dirt and
 misery, of the poor common Irish--A Scotch cottage, though in that
 sometimes the smoke has no exit but at the door, is a palace to an Irish
 one. We could observe that impetuosity in Man and Woman--We had the
 pleasure of finding our way through a Peat-bog, three miles long at
 least--dreary, flat, dank, black, and spongy--here and there were poor
 dirty Creatures, and a few strong men cutting or carting Peat--We heard on
 passing into Belfast through a most wretched suburb, that most disgusting
 of all noises, worse than the Bagpipes--the laugh of a Monkey--the chatter
 of women--the scream of a Macaw--I mean the sound of the Shuttle. What a
 tremendous difficulty is the improvement of such people. I cannot conceive
 how a mind "_with child_" of philanthrophy could grasp at its
 possibility--with me it is absolute despair--
 
 At a miserable house of entertainment, half-way between Donaghadee and
 Belfast, were two men sitting at Whisky--one a labourer, and the other I
 took to be a drunken weaver--the labourer took me to be a Frenchman, and
 the other hinted at bounty-money; saying he was ready to take it--On
 calling for the letters at Port Patrick, the man snapped out "what
 Regiment?" On our return from Belfast we met a sedan--the Duchess of
 Dunghill. It is no laughing matter though. Imagine the worst dog kennel
 you ever saw, placed upon two poles from a mouldy fencing--In such a
 wretched thing sat a squalid old woman, squat like an ape half-starved,
 from a scarcity of biscuit in its passage from Madagascar to the Cape,
 with a pipe in her mouth, and looking out with a round-eyed skinny-lidded
 inanity; with a sort of horizontal idiotic movement of her head--Squat and
 lean she sat, and puffed out the smoke, while two ragged tattered girls
 carried her along. What a thing would be a history of her life and
 sensations; I shall endeavour when I have thought a little more, to give
 you my idea of the difference between the Scotch and Irish--The two
 Irishmen I mentioned were speaking of their treatment in England, when the
 weaver said--"Ah you were a civil man, but I was a drinker."
 
 Till further notice you must direct to Inverness.
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 LIX.--TO THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Belantree [for Ballantrae,] July 10
 
   Ah! ken ye what I met the day
     Out oure the Mountains
   A coming down by craggies gray
     An mossie fountains--
   Ah goud-hair'd Marie yeve I pray
     Ane minute's guessing--
   For that I met upon the way
     Is past expressing.
   As I stood where a rocky brig
     A torrent crosses
   I spied upon a misty rig
     A troup o' Horses--
   And as they trotted down the glen
     I sped to meet them
   To see if I might know the Men
     To stop and greet them.
   First Willie on his sleek mare came
     At canting gallop
   His long hair rustled like a flame
     On board a shallop,
   Then came his brother Rab and then
     Young Peggy's Mither
   And Peggy too--adown the glen
     They went togither--
   I saw her wrappit in her hood
     Frae wind and raining--
   Her cheek was flush wi' timid blood
     Twixt growth and waning--
   She turn'd her dazed head full oft
     For there her Brithers
   Came riding with her Bridegroom soft
     And mony ithers.
   Young Tam came up and eyed me quick
     With reddened cheek--
   Braw Tam was daffed like a chick--
     He could na speak--
   Ah Marie they are all gane hame
     Through blustering weather
   An' every heart is full on flame
     An' light as feather.
   Ah! Marie they are all gone hame
     Frae happy wadding,
   Whilst I--Ah is it not a shame?
     Sad tears am shedding.
 
 My dear Tom--The reason for my writing these lines was that Brown wanted
 to impose a Galloway song upon Dilke--but it won't do. The subject I got
 from meeting a wedding just as we came down into this place--where I am
 afraid we shall be imprisoned a while by the weather. Yesterday we came 27
 Miles from Stranraer--entered Ayrshire a little beyond Cairn, and had our
 path through a delightful Country. I shall endeavour that you may follow
 our steps in this walk--it would be uninteresting in a Book of Travels--it
 can not be interesting but by my having gone through it. When we left
 Cairn our Road lay half way up the sides of a green mountainous shore,
 full of clefts of verdure and eternally varying--sometimes up sometimes
 down, and over little Bridges going across green chasms of moss, rock and
 trees--winding about everywhere. After two or three Miles of this we
 turned suddenly into a magnificent glen finely wooded in Parts--seven
 Miles long--with a Mountain stream winding down the Midst--full of
 cottages in the most happy situations--the sides of the Hills covered with
 sheep--the effect of cattle lowing I never had so finely. At the end we
 had a gradual ascent and got among the tops of the Mountains whence in a
 little time I descried in the Sea Ailsa Rock 940 feet high--it was 15
 Miles distant and seemed close upon us. The effect of Ailsa with the
 peculiar perspective of the Sea in connection with the ground we stood on,
 and the misty rain then falling gave me a complete Idea of a deluge. Ailsa
 struck me very suddenly--really I was a little alarmed.
 
 
 [Girvan, same day, July 10.]
 
 Thus far had I written before we set out this morning. Now we are at
 Girvan 13 Miles north of Belantree. Our Walk has been along a more grand
 shore to-day than yesterday--Ailsa beside us all the way.--From the
 heights we could see quite at home Cantire and the large Mountains of
 Arran, one of the Hebrides. We are in comfortable Quarters. The Rain we
 feared held up bravely and it has been "fu fine this day."----To-morrow we
 shall be at Ayr.
 
 
 [Kirkoswald, July 11.]
 
 'Tis now the 11th of July and we have come 8 Miles to Breakfast to
 Kirkoswald. I hope the next Kirk will be Kirk Alloway. I have nothing of
 consequence to say now concerning our journey--so I will speak as far as I
 can judge on the Irish and Scotch--I know nothing of the higher
 Classes--yet I have a persuasion that there the Irish are victorious. As
 to the profanum vulgus I must incline to the Scotch. They never laugh--but
 they are always comparatively neat and clean. Their constitutions are not
 so remote and puzzling as the Irish. The Scotchman will never give a
 decision on any point--he will never commit himself in a sentence which
 may be referred to as a meridian in his notion of things--so that you do
 not know him--and yet you may come in nigher neighbourhood to him than to
 the Irishman who commits himself in so many places that it dazes your
 head. A Scotchman's motive is more easily discovered than an Irishman's. A
 Scotchman will go wisely about to deceive you, an Irishman cunningly. An
 Irishman would bluster out of any discovery to his disadvantage. A
 Scotchman would retire perhaps without much desire for revenge. An
 Irishman likes to be thought a gallous fellow. A Scotchman is contented
 with himself. It seems to me they are both sensible of the Character they
 hold in England and act accordingly to Englishmen. Thus the Scotchman
 will become over grave and over decent and the Irishman over-impetuous. I
 like a Scotchman best because he is less of a bore--I like the Irishman
 best because he ought to be more comfortable.--The Scotchman has made up
 his Mind within himself in a sort of snail shell wisdom. The Irishman is
 full of strongheaded instinct. The Scotchman is farther in Humanity than
 the Irishman--there he will stick perhaps when the Irishman will be
 refined beyond him--for the former thinks he cannot be improved--the
 latter would grasp at it for ever, place but the good plain before him.
 
 
 Maybole, [same day, July 11].
 
 Since breakfast we have come only four Miles to dinner, not merely, for we
 have examined in the way two Ruins, one of them very fine, called
 Crossraguel Abbey--there is a winding Staircase to the top of a little
 Watch Tower.
 
 
 Kingswells, July 13.
 
 I have been writing to Reynolds--therefore any particulars since
 Kirkoswald have escaped me--from said Kirk we went to Maybole to
 dinner--then we set forward to Burness' town Ayr--the approach to it is
 extremely fine--quite outwent my expectations--richly meadowed, wooded,
 heathed and rivuleted--with a grand Sea view terminated by the black
 Mountains of the isle of Arran. As soon as I saw them so nearly I said to
 myself "How is it they did not beckon Burns to some grand attempt at
 Epic?"
 
 The bonny Doon is the sweetest river I ever saw--overhung with fine trees
 as far as we could see--We stood some time on the Brig across it, over
 which Tam o' Shanter fled--we took a pinch of snuff on the Key stone--then
 we proceeded to the "auld Kirk Alloway." As we were looking at it a Farmer
 pointed the spots where Mungo's Mither hang'd hersel' and "drunken Charlie
 brake's neck's bane." Then we proceeded to the Cottage he was born
 in--there was a board to that effect by the door side--it had the same
 effect as the same sort of memorial at Stratford on Avon. We drank some
 Toddy to Burns's Memory with an old Man who knew Burns--damn him and damn
 his anecdotes--he was a great bore--it was impossible for a Southron to
 understand above 5 words in a hundred.--There was something good in his
 description of Burns's melancholy the last time he saw him. I was
 determined to write a sonnet in the Cottage--I did--but it was so bad I
 cannot venture it here.
 
 Next we walked into Ayr Town and before we went to Tea saw the new Brig
 and the Auld Brig and Wallace tower. Yesterday we dined with a Traveller.
 We were talking about Kean. He said he had seen him at Glasgow "in Othello
 in the Jew, I mean er, er, er, the Jew in Shylock." He got bother'd
 completely in vague ideas of the Jew in Othello, Shylock in the Jew,
 Shylock in Othello, Othello in Shylock, the Jew in Othello, etc. etc.
 etc.--he left himself in a mess at last.--Still satisfied with himself he
 went to the Window and gave an abortive whistle of some tune or other--it
 might have been Handel. There is no end to these Mistakes--he'll go and
 tell people how he has seen "Malvolio in the Countess"--"Twelfth night in
 Midsummer night's dream"--Bottom in much ado about Nothing--Viola in
 Barrymore--Antony in Cleopatra--Falstaff in the mouse Trap.--
 
 
 [Glasgow,] July 14.
 
 We enter'd Glasgow last Evening under the most oppressive Stare a body
 could feel. When we had crossed the Bridge Brown look'd back and said its
 whole population had turned out to wonder at us--we came on till a drunken
 Man came up to me--I put him off with my Arm--he returned all up in Arms
 saying aloud that, "he had seen all foreigners bu-u-ut he never saw the
 like o' me." I was obliged to mention the word Officer and Police before
 he would desist.--The City of Glasgow I take to be a very fine one--I was
 astonished to hear it was twice the size of Edinburgh. It is built of
 Stone and has a much more solid appearance than London. We shall see the
 Cathedral this morning--they have devilled it into "High Kirk." I want
 very much to know the name of the ship George is gone in--also what port
 he will land in--I know nothing about it. I hope you are leading a quiet
 Life and gradually improving. Make a long lounge of the whole Summer--by
 the time the Leaves fall I shall be near you with plenty of confab--there
 are a thousand things I cannot write. Take care of yourself--I mean in not
 being vexed or bothered at anything.
 
 God bless you!
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LX.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Maybole, July 11 [1818].
 
 My dear Reynolds--I'll not run over the Ground we have passed; that would
 be merely as bad as telling a dream--unless perhaps I do it in the manner
 of the Laputan printing press--that is I put down Mountains, Rivers,
 Lakes, dells, glens, Rocks, and Clouds, with beautiful enchanting, Gothic
 picturesque fine, delightful, enchanting, Grand, sublime--a few blisters,
 etc.--and now you have our journey thus far: where I begin a letter to you
 because I am approaching Burns's Cottage very fast. We have made continual
 inquiries from the time we saw his Tomb at Dumfries--his name of course is
 known all about--his great reputation among the plodding people is, "that
 he wrote a good _mony_ sensible things." One of the pleasantest means of
 annulling self is approaching such a shrine as the Cottage of Burns--we
 need not think of his misery--that is all gone, bad luck to it--I shall
 look upon it hereafter with unmixed pleasure, as I do upon my
 Stratford-on-Avon day with Bailey. I shall fill this sheet for you in the
 Bardie's country, going no further than this till I get into the town of
 Ayr which will be a 9 miles' walk to Tea.
 
 
 [Kingswells, July 13.]
 
 We were talking on different and indifferent things, when on a sudden we
 turned a corner upon the immediate Country of Ayr--the Sight was as rich
 as possible. I had no Conception that the native place of Burns was so
 beautiful--the idea I had was more desolate, his 'rigs of Barley' seemed
 always to me but a few strips of Green on a cold hill--O prejudice! it was
 as rich as Devon--I endeavoured to drink in the Prospect, that I might
 spin it out to you as the Silkworm makes silk from Mulberry leaves--I
 cannot recollect it--Besides all the Beauty, there were the Mountains of
 Arran Isle, black and huge over the Sea. We came down upon everything
 suddenly--there were in our way the 'bonny Doon,' with the Brig that Tam
 o' Shanter crossed, Kirk Alloway, Burns's Cottage, and then the Brigs of
 Ayr. First we stood upon the Bridge across the Doon; surrounded by every
 Phantasy of green in Tree, Meadow, and Hill,--the stream of the Doon, as a
 Farmer told us, is covered with trees from head to foot--you know those
 beautiful heaths so fresh against the weather of a summer's evening--there
 was one stretching along behind the trees. I wish I knew always the humour
 my friends would be in at opening a letter of mine, to suit it to them as
 nearly as possible. I could always find an egg shell for Melancholy, and
 as for Merriment a Witty humour will turn anything to Account--My head is
 sometimes in such a whirl in considering the million likings and
 antipathies of our Moments--that I can get into no settled strain in my
 Letters. My Wig! Burns and sentimentality coming across you and Frank
 Fladgate in the office--O scenery that thou shouldst be crushed between
 two Puns--As for them I venture the rascalliest in the Scotch Region--I
 hope Brown does not put them punctually in his journal--If he does I must
 sit on the cutty-stool all next winter. We went to Kirk Alloway--"a
 Prophet is no Prophet in his own Country"--We went to the Cottage and
 took some Whisky. I wrote a sonnet for the mere sake of writing some lines
 under the roof--they are so bad I cannot transcribe them--The Man at the
 Cottage was a great Bore with his Anecdotes--I hate the rascal--his Life
 consists in fuz, fuzzy, fuzziest--He drinks glasses five for the Quarter
 and twelve for the hour--he is a mahogany-faced old Jackass who knew
 Burns--He ought to have been kicked for having spoken to him. He calls
 himself "a curious old Bitch"--but he is a flat old dog--I should like to
 employ Caliph Vathek to kick him. O the flummery of a birthplace! Cant!
 Cant! Cant! It is enough to give a spirit the guts-ache--Many a true word,
 they say, is spoken in jest--this may be because his gab hindered my
 sublimity: the flat dog made me write a flat sonnet. My dear Reynolds--I
 cannot write about scenery and visitings--Fancy is indeed less than a
 present palpable reality, but it is greater than remembrance--you would
 lift your eyes from Homer only to see close before you the real Isle of
 Tenedos--you would rather read Homer afterwards than remember
 yourself--One song of Burns's is of more worth to you than all I could
 think for a whole year in his native country. His Misery is a dead weight
 upon the nimbleness of one's quill--I tried to forget it--to drink Toddy
 without any Care--to write a merry sonnet--it won't do--he talked with
 Bitches--he drank with Blackguards, he was miserable--We can see horribly
 clear, in the works of such a Man his whole life, as if we were God's
 spies.--What were his addresses to Jean in the latter part of his life? I
 should not speak so to you--yet why not--you are not in the same case--you
 are in the right path, and you shall not be deceived. I have spoken to you
 against Marriage, but it was general--the Prospect in those matters has
 been to me so blank, that I have not been unwilling to die--I would not
 now, for I have inducements to Life--I must see my little Nephews in
 America, and I must see you marry your lovely Wife. My sensations are
 sometimes deadened for weeks together--but believe me I have more than
 once yearned for the time of your happiness to come, as much as I could
 for myself after the lips of Juliet.--From the tenor of my occasional
 rodomontade in chit-chat, you might have been deceived concerning me in
 these points--upon my soul, I have been getting more and more close to
 you, every day, ever since I knew you, and now one of the first pleasures
 I look to is your happy Marriage--the more, since I have felt the pleasure
 of loving a sister in Law. I did not think it possible to become so much
 attached in so short a time--Things like these, and they are real, have
 made me resolve to have a care of my health--you must be as careful.
 
 The rain has stopped us to-day at the end of a dozen Miles, yet we hope to
 see Loch Lomond the day after to-morrow;--I will piddle out my
 information, as Rice says, next Winter, at any time when a substitute is
 wanted for Vingt-un. We bear the fatigue very well--20 Miles a day in
 general--A Cloud came over us in getting up Skiddaw--I hope to be more
 lucky in Ben Lomond--and more lucky still in Ben Nevis. What I think you
 would enjoy is poking about Ruins--sometimes Abbey, sometimes Castle. The
 short stay we made in Ireland has left few remembrances--but an old woman
 in a dog-kennel Sedan with a pipe in her Mouth, is what I can never
 forget--I wish I may be able to give you an idea of her--Remember me to
 your Mother and Sisters, and tell your Mother how I hope she will pardon
 me for having a scrap of paper pasted in the Book sent to her. I was
 driven on all sides and had not time to call on Taylor--So Bailey is
 coming to Cumberland--well, if you'll let me know where at Inverness, I
 will call on my return and pass a little time with him--I am glad 'tis not
 Scotland--Tell my friends I do all I can for them, that is, drink their
 healths in Toddy. Perhaps I may have some lines by and by to send you
 fresh, on your own Letter--Tom has a few to show you.
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXI.--TO THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Cairn-something [for Cairndow,] July 17, [1818].
 
 My dear Tom--Here's Brown going on so that I cannot bring to mind how the
 two last days have vanished--for example he says The Lady of the Lake went
 to Rock herself to sleep on Arthur's seat and the Lord of the Isles coming
 to Press a Piece.... I told you last how we were stared at in Glasgow--we
 are not out of the Crowd yet. Steam Boats on Loch Lomond and Barouches on
 its sides take a little from the Pleasure of such romantic chaps as Brown
 and I. The Banks of the Clyde are extremely beautiful--the north end of
 Loch Lomond grand in excess--the entrance at the lower end to the narrow
 part from a little distance is precious good--the Evening was beautiful
 nothing could surpass our fortune in the weather--yet was I worldly enough
 to wish for a fleet of chivalry Barges with Trumpets and Banners just to
 die away before me into that blue place among the mountains--I must give
 you an outline as well as I can.[73]
 
 No{t} B--the Water was a fine Blue silvered and the Mountains a dark
 purple, the Sun setting aslant behind them--meantime the head of ben
 Lomond was covered with a rich Pink Cloud. We did not ascend Ben
 Lomond--the price being very high and a half a day of rest being quite
 acceptable. We were up at 4 this morning and have walked to breakfast 15
 Miles through two Tremendous Glens--at the end of the first there is a
 place called rest and be thankful which we took for an Inn--it was nothing
 but a Stone and so we were cheated into 5 more Miles to Breakfast--I have
 just been bathing in Loch Fyne a salt water Lake opposite the
 Windows,--quite pat and fresh but for the cursed Gad flies--damn 'em they
 have been at me ever since I left the Swan and two necks.[74]
 
   All gentle folks who owe a grudge
     To any living thing
   Open your ears and stay your trudge
     Whilst I in dudgeon sing.
 
   The Gadfly he hath stung me sore--
     O may he ne'er sting you!
   But we have many a horrid bore
     He may sting black and blue.
 
   Has any here an old gray Mare
     With three legs all her store,
   O put it to her Buttocks bare
     And straight she'll run on four.
 
   Has any here a Lawyer suit
     Of 1743,
   Take Lawyer's nose and put it to't
     And you the end will see.
 
   Is there a Man in Parliament
     Dumbfounder'd in his speech,
   O let his neighbour make a rent
     And put one in his breech.
 
   O Lowther how much better thou
     Hadst figur'd t'other day
   When to the folks thou mad'st a bow
     And hadst no more to say.
 
   If lucky Gadfly had but ta'en
     His seat upon thine A--e
   And put thee to a little pain
     To save thee from a worse.
 
   Better than Southey it had been,
     Better than Mr. D----,
   Better than Wordsworth too, I ween,
     Better than Mr. V----.
 
   Forgive me pray good people all
     For deviating so--
   In spirit sure I had a call--
     And now I on will go.
 
   Has any here a daughter fair
     Too fond of reading novels,
   Too apt to fall in love with care
     And charming Mister Lovels,
 
   O put a Gadfly to that thing
     She keeps so white and pert--
   I mean the finger for the ring,
     And it will breed a wort.
 
   Has any here a pious spouse
     Who seven times a day
   Scolds as King David pray'd, to chouse
     And have her holy way--
 
   O let a Gadfly's little sting
     Persuade her sacred tongue
   That noises are a common thing,
     But that her bell has rung.
 
   And as this is the summum bo-
     num of all conquering,
   I leave "withouten wordes mo"
     The Gadfly's little sting.
 
 
 [Inverary, July 18.]
 
 Last Evening we came round the End of Loch Fyne to Inverary--the Duke of
 Argyle's Castle is very modern magnificent and more so from the place it
 is in--the woods seem old enough to remember two or three changes in the
 Crags about them--the Lake was beautiful and there was a Band at a
 distance by the Castle. I must say I enjoyed two or three common
 tunes--but nothing could stifle the horrors of a solo on the Bag-pipe--I
 thought the Beast would never have done.--Yet was I doomed to hear
 another.--On entering Inverary we saw a Play Bill. Brown was knocked up
 from new shoes--so I went to the Barn alone where I saw the Stranger
 accompanied by a Bag-pipe. There they went on about interesting creaters
 and human nater till the Curtain fell and then came the Bag-pipe. When
 Mrs. Haller fainted down went the Curtain and out came the Bag-pipe--at
 the heartrending, shoemending reconciliation the Piper blew amain. I never
 read or saw this play before; not the Bag-pipe nor the wretched players
 themselves were little in comparison with it--thank heaven it has been
 scoffed at lately almost to a fashion--
 
   Of late two dainties were before me placed
     Sweet, holy, pure, sacred and innocent,
     From the ninth sphere to me benignly sent
   That Gods might know my own particular taste:
   First the soft Bag-pipe mourn'd with zealous haste,
     The Stranger next with head on bosom bent
     Sigh'd; rueful again the piteous Bag-pipe went,
   Again the Stranger sighings fresh did waste.
   O Bag-pipe thou didst steal my heart away--
     O Stranger thou my nerves from Pipe didst charm--
   O Bag-pipe thou didst re-assert thy sway--
     Again thou Stranger gav'st me fresh alarm--
   Alas! I could not choose. Ah! my poor heart
   Mumchance art thou with both oblig'd to part.
 
 I think we are the luckiest fellows in Christendom--Brown could not
 proceed this morning on account of his feet and lo there is thunder and
 rain.
 
 
 [Kilmelfort,] July 20th.
 
 For these two days past we have been so badly accommodated more
 particularly in coarse food that I have not been at all in cue to write.
 Last night poor Brown with his feet blistered and scarcely able to walk,
 after a trudge of 20 Miles down the Side of Loch Awe had no supper but
 Eggs and Oat Cake--we have lost the sight of white bread entirely--Now we
 had eaten nothing but Eggs all day--about 10 a piece and they had become
 sickening--To-day we have fared rather better--but no oat Cake wanting--we
 had a small Chicken and even a good bottle of Port but all together the
 fare is too coarse--I feel it a little.--Another week will break us in. I
 forgot to tell you that when we came through Glenside it was early in the
 morning and we were pleased with the noise of Shepherds, Sheep and dogs in
 the misty heights close above us--we saw none of them for some time, till
 two came in sight creeping among the Crags like Emmets, yet their voices
 came quite plainly to us--The approach to Loch Awe was very solemn
 towards nightfall--the first glance was a streak of water deep in the
 Bases of large black Mountains.--We had come along a complete mountain
 road, where if one listened there was not a sound but that of Mountain
 Streams. We walked 20 Miles by the side of Loch Awe--every ten steps
 creating a new and beautiful picture--sometimes through little wood--there
 are two islands on the Lake each with a beautiful ruin--one of them rich
 in ivy.--We are detained this morning by the rain. I will tell you exactly
 where we are. We are between Loch Craignish and the sea just opposite Long
 Island.[75] Yesterday our walk was of this description--the near Hills
 were not very lofty but many of them steep, beautifully wooded--the
 distant Mountains in the Hebrides very grand, the Saltwater Lakes coming
 up between Crags and Islands full tide and scarcely ruffled--sometimes
 appearing as one large Lake, sometimes as three distinct ones in different
 directions. At one point we saw afar off a rocky opening into the main
 sea.--We have also seen an Eagle or two. They move about without the least
 motion of Wings when in an indolent fit.--I am for the first time in a
 country where a foreign Language is spoken--they gabble away Gaelic at a
 vast rate--numbers of them speak English. There are not many Kilts in
 Argyleshire--at Fort William they say a Man is not admitted into Society
 without one--the Ladies there have a horror at the indecency of Breeches.
 I cannot give you a better idea of Highland Life than by describing the
 place we are in. The Inn or public is by far the best house in the
 immediate neighbourhood. It has a white front with tolerable windows--the
 table I am writing on surprises me as being a nice flapped Mahogany
 one.... You may if you peep see through the floor chinks into the ground
 rooms. The old Grandmother of the house seems intelligent though not over
 clean. _N.B._ No snuff being to be had in the village she made us some.
 The Guid Man is a rough-looking hardy stout Man who I think does not speak
 so much English as the Guid wife who is very obliging and sensible and
 moreover though stockingless has a pair of old Shoes--Last night some
 Whisky Men sat up clattering Gaelic till I am sure one o'Clock to our
 great annoyance. There is a Gaelic testament on the Drawers in the next
 room. White and blue China ware has crept all about here--Yesterday there
 passed a Donkey laden with tin-pots--opposite the Window there are hills
 in a Mist--a few Ash trees and a mountain stream at a little
 distance.--They possess a few head of Cattle.--If you had gone round to
 the back of the House just now--you would have seen more hills in a
 Mist--some dozen wretched black Cottages scented of peat smoke which finds
 its way by the door or a hole in the roof--a girl here and there barefoot.
 There was one little thing driving Cows down a slope like a mad thing.
 There was another standing at the cowhouse door rather pretty fac'd all up
 to the ankles in dirt.
 
 
 [Oban, July 21.]
 
 We have walk'd 15 Miles in a soaking rain to Oban opposite the Isle of
 Mull which is so near Staffa we had thought to pass to it--but the expense
 is 7 Guineas and those rather extorted.--Staffa you see is a fashionable
 place and therefore every one concerned with it either in this town or the
 Island are what you call up. 'Tis like paying sixpence for an apple at the
 playhouse--this irritated me and Brown was not best pleased--we have
 therefore resolved to set northward for fort William to-morrow morning. I
 fed upon a bit of white Bread to-day like a Sparrow--it was very fine--I
 cannot manage the cursed Oat Cake. Remember me to all and let me hear a
 good account of you at Inverness--I am sorry Georgy had not those lines.
 Good-bye.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LXII.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 Inverary, July 18 [1818].
 
 My dear Bailey--The only day I have had a chance of seeing you when you
 were last in London I took every advantage of--some devil led you out of
 the way--Now I have written to Reynolds to tell me where you will be in
 Cumberland--so that I cannot miss you. And when I see you, the first thing
 I shall do will be to read that about Milton and Ceres, and
 Proserpine--for though I am not going after you to John o' Grot's, it will
 be but poetical to say so. And here, Bailey, I will say a few words
 written in a sane and sober mind, a very scarce thing with me, for they
 may, hereafter, save you a great deal of trouble about me, which you do
 not deserve, and for which I ought to be bastinadoed. I carry all matters
 to an extreme--so that when I have any little vexation, it grows in five
 minutes into a theme for Sophocles. Then, and in that temper, if I write
 to any friend, I have so little self-possession that I give him matter for
 grieving at the very time perhaps when I am laughing at a Pun. Your last
 letter made me blush for the pain I had given you--I know my own
 disposition so well that I am certain of writing many times hereafter in
 the same strain to you--now, you know how far to believe in them. You must
 allow for Imagination. I know I shall not be able to help it.
 
 I am sorry you are grieved at my not continuing my visits to Little
 Britain--Yet I think I have as far as a Man can do who has Books to read
 and subjects to think upon--for that reason I have been nowhere else
 except to Wentworth Place so nigh at hand--moreover I have been too often
 in a state of health that made it prudent not to hazard the night air.
 Yet, further, I will confess to you that I cannot enjoy Society small or
 numerous--I am certain that our fair friends are glad I should come for
 the mere sake of my coming; but I am certain I bring with me a vexation
 they are better without--If I can possibly at any time feel my temper
 coming upon me I refrain even from a promised visit. I am certain I have
 not a right feeling towards women--at this moment, I am striving to be
 just to them, but I cannot--Is it because they fall so far beneath my
 boyish Imagination? When I was a schoolboy I thought a fair woman a pure
 Goddess; my mind was a soft nest in which some one of them slept, though
 she knew it not. I have no right to expect more than their reality--I
 thought them ethereal above men--I find them perhaps equal--great by
 comparison is very small. Insult may be inflicted in more ways than by
 word or action--One who is tender of being insulted does not like to think
 an insult against another. I do not like to think insults in a lady's
 company--I commit a crime with her which absence would not have known. Is
 it not extraordinary?--when among men, I have no evil thoughts, no malice,
 no spleen--I feel free to speak or to be silent--I can listen, and from
 every one I can learn--my hands are in my pockets, I am free from all
 suspicion and comfortable. When I am among women, I have evil thoughts,
 malice, spleen--I cannot speak, or be silent--I am full of suspicions and
 therefore listen to nothing--I am in a hurry to be gone. You must be
 charitable and put all this perversity to my being disappointed since my
 boyhood. Yet with such feelings I am happier alone among crowds of men, by
 myself, or with a friend or two. With all this, trust me, I have not the
 least idea that men of different feelings and inclinations are more
 short-sighted than myself. I never rejoiced more than at my Brother's
 marriage, and shall do so at that of any of my friends. I must absolutely
 get over this--but how? the only way is to find the root of the evil, and
 so cure it "with backward mutters of dissevering power"--that is a
 difficult thing; for an obstinate Prejudice can seldom be produced but
 from a gordian complication of feelings, which must take time to unravel,
 and care to keep unravelled. I could say a good deal about this, but I
 will leave it, in hopes of better and more worthy dispositions--and also
 content that I am wronging no one, for after all I do think better of
 womankind than to suppose they care whether Mister John Keats five feet
 high likes them or not. You appeared to wish to know my moods on this
 subject--don't think it a bore my dear fellow, it shall be my Amen. I
 should not have consented to myself these four months tramping in the
 highlands, but that I thought it would give me more experience, rub off
 more prejudice, use to more hardship, identify finer scenes, load me with
 grander mountains, and strengthen more my reach in Poetry, than would
 stopping at home among books, even though I should reach Homer. By this
 time I am comparatively a Mountaineer. I have been among wilds and
 mountains too much to break out much about their grandeur. I have fed upon
 oat-cake--not long enough to be very much attached to it.--The first
 mountains I saw, though not so large as some I have since seen, weighed
 very solemnly upon me. The effect is wearing away--yet I like them mainly.
 
 
 [Island of Mull, July 22.]
 
 We have come this Evening with a guide--for without was impossible--into
 the middle of the Isle of Mull, pursuing our cheap journey to Iona, and
 perhaps Staffa. We would not follow the common and fashionable mode, from
 the great Imposition of Expense. We have come over heath and rock, and
 river and bog, to what in England would be called a horrid place. Yet it
 belongs to a Shepherd pretty well off perhaps. The family speak not a word
 but Gaelic, and we have not yet seen their faces for the smoke, which,
 after visiting every cranny (not excepting my eyes very much incommoded
 for writing), finds its way out at the door. I am more comfortable than I
 could have imagined in such a place, and so is Brown. The people are all
 very kind--We lost our way a little yesterday; and inquiring at a Cottage,
 a young woman without a word threw on her cloak and walked a mile in a
 mizzling rain and splashy way to put us right again.
 
 I could not have had a greater pleasure in these parts than your mention
 of my sister. She is very much prisoned from me. I am afraid it will be
 some time before I can take her to many places I wish. I trust we shall
 see you ere long in Cumberland--At least I hope I shall, before my visit
 to America, more than once. I intend to pass a whole year there, if I live
 to the completion of the three next. My sister's welfare, and the hopes of
 such a stay in America, will make me observe your advice. I shall be
 prudent and more careful of my health than I have been. I hope you will be
 about paying your first visit to Town after settling when we come into
 Cumberland--Cumberland however will be no distance to me after my present
 journey. I shall spin to you in a Minute. I begin to get rather a contempt
 of distances. I hope you will have a nice convenient room for a library.
 Now you are so well in health, do keep it up by never missing your dinner,
 by not reading hard, and by taking proper exercise. You'll have a horse, I
 suppose, so you must make a point of sweating him. You say I must study
 Dante--well, the only Books I have with me are those 3 little volumes.[76]
 I read that fine passage you mention a few days ago. Your letter followed
 me from Hampstead to Port-Patrick, and thence to Glasgow. You must think
 me by this time a very pretty fellow. One of the pleasantest bouts we have
 had was our walk to Burns's Cottage, over the Doon, and past Kirk Alloway.
 I had determined to write a Sonnet in the Cottage. I did--but lawk! it was
 so wretched I destroyed it--however in a few days afterwards I wrote some
 lines cousin-german to the circumstance, which I will transcribe, or
 rather cross-scribe in the front of this.
 
 Reynolds's illness has made him a new man--he will be stronger than
 ever--before I left London he was really getting a fat face. Brown keeps
 on writing volumes of adventures to Dilke. When we get in of an evening
 and I have perhaps taken my rest on a couple of chairs, he affronts my
 indolence and Luxury by pulling out of his knapsack 1st his paper--2ndly
 his pens and last his ink. Now I would not care if he would change a
 little. I say now why not Bailey, take out his pens first sometimes--But I
 might as well tell a hen to hold up her head before she drinks instead of
 afterwards.
 
 Your affectionate Friend,
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 LINES WRITTEN IN THE HIGHLANDS AFTER A VISIT TO BURNS'S COUNTRY
 
   There is a charm in footing slow across a silent plain,
   Where patriot Battle has been fought, where glory had the gain;
   There is a pleasure on the heath where Druids old have been,
   Where Mantles gray have rustled by and swept the nettles green;
   There is a Joy in every spot made known by times of old,
   New to the feet, although each tale a hundred times be told;
   There is a deeper Joy than all, more solemn in the heart,
   More parching to the tongue than all, of more divine a smart,
   When weary steps forget themselves, upon a pleasant turf,
   Upon hot sand, or flinty road, or sea-shore iron scurf,
   Toward the Castle, or the Cot, where long ago was born
   One who was great through mortal days, and died of fame unshorn.
   Light heather-bells may tremble then, but they are far away;
   Wood-lark may sing from sandy fern,--the sun may hear his Lay;
   Runnels may kiss the grass on shelves and shallows clear,
   But their low voices are not heard, though come on travels drear;
   Blood-red the sun may set behind black mountain peaks;
   Blue tides may sluice and drench their time in Caves and weedy creeks;
   Eagles may seem to sleep wing-wide upon the Air;
   Ring-doves may fly convuls'd across to some high-cedar'd lair;
   But the forgotten eye is still fast lidded to the ground,
   As Palmer's, that, with weariness, mid-desert shrine hath found.
     At such a time the Soul's a child, in childhood is the brain;
   Forgotten is the worldly heart--alone, it beats in vain.--
   Aye, if a Madman could have leave to pass a healthful day
   To tell his forehead's swoon and faint when first began decay,
   He might make tremble many a one whose spirit had gone forth
   To find a Bard's low cradle-place about the silent North.
   Scanty the hour and few the steps beyond the bourn of Care,
   Beyond the sweet and bitter world,--beyond it unaware!
   Scanty the hour and few the steps, because a longer stay
   Would bar return, and make a man forget his mortal way:
   O horrible! to lose the sight of well remember'd face,
   Of Brother's eyes, of Sister's brow--constant to every place;
   Filling the Air, as on we move, with Portraiture intense;
   More warm than those heroic tints that pain a Painter's sense,
   When shapes of old come striding by, and visages of old,
   Locks shining black, hair scanty gray, and passions manifold.
   No No, that horror cannot be, for at the cable's length
   Man feels the gentle anchor pull and gladdens in its strength:--
   One hour, half-idiot, he stands by mossy waterfall,
   But in the very next he reads his soul's Memorial:--
   He reads it on the mountain's height, where chance he may sit down
   Upon rough marble diadem--that hill's eternal Crown.
   Yet be his Anchor e'er so fast, room is there for a prayer
   That man may never lose his Mind on Mountains black and bare;
   That he may stray league after league some Great birthplace to find
   And keep his vision clear from speck, his inward sight unblind.
 
 
 
 
 LXIII.--TO THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Dun an cullen,[77] Island of Mull [July 23, 1818].
 
 My dear Tom--Just after my last had gone to the Post, in came one of the
 Men with whom we endeavoured to agree about going to Staffa--he said what
 a pity it was we should turn aside and not see the curiosities. So we had
 a little talk, and finally agreed that he should be our guide across the
 Isle of Mull. We set out, crossed two ferries--one to the Isle of Kerrara,
 of little distance; the other from Kerrara to Mull 9 Miles across--we did
 it in forty minutes with a fine Breeze. The road through the Island, or
 rather the track, is the most dreary you can think of--between dreary
 Mountains, over bog and rock and river with our Breeches tucked up and our
 Stockings in hand. About 8 o'Clock we arrived at a shepherd's Hut, into
 which we could scarcely get for the Smoke through a door lower than my
 Shoulders. We found our way into a little compartment with the rafters and
 turf-thatch blackened with smoke, the earth floor full of Hills and Dales.
 We had some white Bread with us, made a good supper, and slept in our
 Clothes in some Blankets; our Guide snored on another little bed about an
 Arm's length off. This morning we came about sax Miles to Breakfast, by
 rather a better path, and we are now in by comparison a Mansion. Our Guide
 is I think a very obliging fellow--in the way this morning he sang us two
 Gaelic songs--one made by a Mrs. Brown on her husband's being drowned, the
 other a jacobin one on Charles Stuart. For some days Brown has been
 enquiring out his Genealogy here--he thinks his Grandfather came from long
 Island. He got a parcel of people about him at a Cottage door last
 Evening, chatted with ane who had been a Miss Brown, and who I think from
 a likeness, must have been a Relation--he jawed with the old
 Woman--flattered a young one--kissed a child who was afraid of his
 Spectacles and finally drank a pint of Milk. They handle his Spectacles as
 we do a sensitive leaf.
 
 
 [Oban,] July 26th.
 
 Well--we had a most wretched walk of 37 Miles across the Island of Mull
 and then we crossed to Iona or Icolmkill--from Icolmkill we took a boat at
 a bargain to take us to Staffa and land us at the head of Loch Nakgal,[78]
 whence we should only have to walk half the distance to Oban again and on
 a better road. All this is well passed and done, with this singular piece
 of Luck, that there was an interruption in the bad Weather just as we saw
 Staffa at which it is impossible to land but in a tolerable Calm sea. But
 I will first mention Icolmkill--I know not whether you have heard much
 about this Island; I never did before I came nigh it. It is rich in the
 most interesting Antiquities. Who would expect to find the ruins of a fine
 Cathedral Church, of Cloisters Colleges Monasteries and Nunneries in so
 remote an Island? The Beginning of these things was in the sixth Century,
 under the superstition of a would-be-Bishop-saint, who landed from
 Ireland, and chose the spot from its Beauty--for at that time the now
 treeless place was covered with magnificent Woods. Columba in the Gaelic
 is Colm, signifying Dove--Kill signifies church, and I is as good as
 Island--so I-colm-kill means the Island of Saint Columba's Church. Now
 this Saint Columba became the Dominic of the barbarian Christians of the
 north and was famed also far south--but more especially was reverenced by
 the Scots the Picts the Norwegians the Irish. In a course of years perhaps
 the Island was considered the most holy ground of the north, and the old
 Kings of the aforementioned nations chose it for their burial-place. We
 were shown a spot in the Churchyard where they say 61 Kings are buried 48
 Scotch from Fergus II. to Macbeth 8 Irish 4 Norwegians and 1 French--they
 lie in rows compact. Then we were shown other matters of later date, but
 still very ancient--many tombs of Highland Chieftains--their effigies in
 complete armour, face upwards, black and moss-covered--Abbots and Bishops
 of the island always of one of the chief Clans. There were plenty Macleans
 and Macdonnels; among these latter, the famous Macdonel Lord of the Isles.
 There have been 300 Crosses in the Island but the Presbyterians destroyed
 all but two, one of which is a very fine one, and completely covered with
 a shaggy coarse Moss. The old Schoolmaster, an ignorant little man but
 reckoned very clever, showed us these things. He is a Maclean, and as much
 above 4 foot as he is under 4 foot three inches. He stops at one glass of
 whisky unless you press another and at the second unless you press a
 third--
 
 I am puzzled how to give you an Idea of Staffa. It can only be represented
 by a first-rate drawing. One may compare the surface of the Island to a
 roof--this roof is supported by grand pillars of basalt standing together
 as thick as honeycombs. The finest thing is Fingal's Cave--it is entirely
 a hollowing out of Basalt Pillars. Suppose now the Giants who rebelled
 against Jove had taken a whole Mass of black Columns and bound them
 together like bunches of matches--and then with immense axes had made a
 cavern in the body of these columns--Of course the roof and floor must be
 composed of the broken ends of the Columns--such is Fingal's Cave, except
 that the Sea has done the work of excavations, and is continually dashing
 there--so that we walk along the sides of the cave on the pillars which
 are left as if for convenient stairs. The roof is arched somewhat
 gothic-wise, and the length of some of the entire side-pillars is fifty
 feet. About the island you might seat an army of Men each on a pillar. The
 length of the Cave is 120 feet, and from its extremity the view into the
 sea, through the large Arch at the entrance--the colour of the columns is
 a sort of black with a lurking gloom of purple therein. For solemnity and
 grandeur it far surpasses the finest Cathedral. At the extremity of the
 Cave there is a small perforation into another cave, at which the waters
 meeting and buffeting each other there is sometimes produced a report as
 of a cannon heard as far as Iona, which must be 12 Miles. As we approached
 in the boat, there was such a fine swell of the sea that the pillars
 appeared rising immediately out of the crystal. But it is impossible to
 describe it--
 
   Not Aladdin magian
   Ever such a work began.
   Not the Wizard of the Dee
   Ever such a dream could see,
   Not St. John in Patmos Isle
   In the passion of his toil
   When he saw the churches seven
   Golden-aisled built up in heaven
   Gaz'd at such a rugged wonder.
   As I stood its roofing under
   Lo! I saw one sleeping there
   On the marble cold and bare.
   While the surges wash'd his feet
   And his garments white did beat
   Drench'd about the sombre rocks,
   On his neck his well-grown locks
   Lifted dry above the Main
   Were upon the curl again--
   "What is this? and what art thou?"
   Whisper'd I, and touch'd his brow;
   "What art thou? and what is this?"
   Whisper'd I, and strove to kiss
   The Spirit's hand, to wake his eyes;
   Up he started in a trice:
   "I am Lycidas," said he,
   "Fam'd in funeral Minstrelsy--
   This was architected thus
   By the great Oceanus.
   Here his mighty waters play
   Hollow Organs all the day,
   Here, by turns, his dolphins all,
   Finny palmers great and small,
   Come to pay devotion due--
   Each a mouth of pearls must strew!
   Many a Mortal of these days
   Dares to pass our sacred ways,
   Dares to touch, audaciously
   This Cathedral of the sea--
   I have been the Pontiff-priest,
   Where the Waters never rest,
   Where a fledgy sea-bird choir
   Soars for ever--holy fire
   I have hid from Mortal Man.
   Proteus is my Sacristan.
   But the stupid eye of Mortal
   Hath pass'd beyond the Rocky portal.
   So for ever will I leave
   Such a taint and soon unweave
   All the magic of the place--
   'Tis now free to stupid face--
   To cutters and to fashion boats,
   To cravats and to Petticoats.
   The great Sea shall war it down,
   For its fame shall not be blown
   At every farthing quadrille dance."[79]
   So saying with a Spirit's glance
   He dived----
 
 I am sorry I am so indolent as to write such stuff as this. It can't be
 helped. The western coast of Scotland is a most strange place--it is
 composed of rocks, Mountains, mountainous and rocky Islands intersected by
 lochs--you can go but a short distance anywhere from salt water in the
 highlands.
 
 I have a slight sore throat and think it best to stay a day or two at
 Oban--then we shall proceed to Fort William and Inverness, where I am
 anxious to be on account of a Letter from you. Brown in his Letters puts
 down every little circumstance. I should like to do the same, but I
 confess myself too indolent, and besides next winter everything will come
 up in prime order as we verge on such and such things.
 
 Have you heard in any way of George? I should think by this time he must
 have landed. I in my carelessness never thought of knowing where a letter
 would find him on the other side--I think Baltimore, but I am afraid of
 directing it to the wrong place. I shall begin some chequer work for him
 directly, and it will be ripe for the post by the time I hear from you
 next after this. I assure you I often long for a seat and a Cup o' tea at
 Well Walk, especially now that mountains, castles, and Lakes are becoming
 common to me. Yet I would rather summer it out, for on the whole I am
 happier than when I have time to be glum--perhaps it may cure me.
 Immediately on my return I shall begin studying hard, with a peep at the
 theatre now and then--and depend upon it I shall be very luxurious. With
 respect to Women I think I shall be able to conquer my passions hereafter
 better than I have yet done. You will help me to talk of George next
 winter, and we will go now and then to see Fanny. Let me hear a good
 account of your health and comfort, telling me truly how you do alone.
 Remember me to all including Mr. and Mrs. Bentley.
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 LXIV.--TO THOMAS KEATS.
 
 
 Letter Findlay, August 3 [1818].
 
 Ah mio Ben.
 
 My dear Tom--We have made but poor progress lately, chiefly from bad
 weather, for my throat is in a fair way of getting quite well, so I have
 had nothing of consequence to tell you till yesterday when we went up Ben
 Nevis, the highest Mountain in Great Britain. On that account I will never
 ascend another in this empire--Skiddaw is nothing to it either in height
 or in difficulty. It is above 4300 feet from the Sea level, and
 Fortwilliam stands at the head of a Salt water Lake, consequently we took
 it completely from that level. I am heartily glad it is done--it is almost
 like a fly crawling up a wainscoat. Imagine the task of mounting ten Saint
 Pauls without the convenience of Staircases. We set out about five in the
 morning with a Guide in the Tartan and Cap, and soon arrived at the foot
 of the first ascent which we immediately began upon. After much fag and
 tug and a rest and a glass of whisky apiece we gained the top of the first
 rise and saw then a tremendous chap above us, which the guide said was
 still far from the top. After the first Rise our way lay along a heath
 valley in which there was a Loch--after about a Mile in this Valley we
 began upon the next ascent, more formidable by far than the last, and kept
 mounting with short intervals of rest until we got above all vegetation,
 among nothing but loose Stones which lasted us to the very top. The Guide
 said we had three Miles of a stony ascent--we gained the first tolerable
 level after the valley to the height of what in the Valley we had thought
 the top and saw still above us another huge crag which still the Guide
 said was not the top--to that we made with an obstinate fag, and having
 gained it there came on a Mist, so that from that part to the very top we
 walked in a Mist. The whole immense head of the Mountain is composed of
 large loose stones--thousands of acres. Before we had got halfway up we
 passed large patches of snow and near the top there is a chasm some
 hundred feet deep completely glutted with it.--Talking of chasms they are
 the finest wonder of the whole--they appear great rents in the very heart
 of the mountain though they are not, being at the side of it, but other
 huge crags arising round it give the appearance to Nevis of a shattered
 heart or Core in itself. These Chasms are 1500 feet in depth and are the
 most tremendous places I have ever seen--they turn one giddy if you choose
 to give way to it. We tumbled in large stones and set the echoes at work
 in fine style. Sometimes these chasms are tolerably clear, sometimes there
 is a misty cloud which seems to steam up and sometimes they are entirely
 smothered with clouds.
 
 After a little time the Mist cleared away but still there were large
 Clouds about attracted by old Ben to a certain distance so as to form as
 it appeared large dome curtains which kept sailing about, opening and
 shutting at intervals here and there and everywhere: so that although we
 did not see one vast wide extent of prospect all round we saw something
 perhaps finer--these cloud-veils opening with a dissolving motion and
 showing us the mountainous region beneath as through a loophole--these
 cloudy loopholes ever varying and discovering fresh prospect east, west,
 north and south. Then it was misty again, and again it was fair--then puff
 came a cold breeze of wind and bared a craggy chap we had not yet seen
 though in close neighbourhood. Every now and then we had overhead blue Sky
 clear and the sun pretty warm. I do not know whether I can give you an
 Idea of the prospect from a large Mountain top. You are on a stony plain
 which of course makes you forget you are on any but low ground--the
 horizon or rather edges of this plain being above 4000 feet above the Sea
 hide all the Country immediately beneath you, so that the next object you
 see all round next to the edges of the flat top are the Summits of
 Mountains of some distance off. As you move about on all sides you see
 more or less of the near neighbour country according as the Mountain you
 stand upon is in different parts steep or rounded--but the most new thing
 of all is the sudden leap of the eye from the extremity of what appears a
 plain into so vast a distance. On one part of the top there is a handsome
 pile of Stones done pointedly by some soldiers of artillery; I clim[b]ed
 on to them and so got a little higher than old Ben himself. It was not so
 cold as I expected--yet cold enough for a glass of Whisky now and then.
 There is not a more fickle thing than the top of a Mountain--what would a
 Lady give to change her head-dress as often and with as little
 trouble!--There are a good many red deer upon Ben Nevis--we did not see
 one--the dog we had with us kept a very sharp look out and really
 languished for a bit of a worry. I have said nothing yet of our getting on
 among the loose stones large and small sometimes on two, sometimes on
 three, sometimes four legs--sometimes two and stick, sometimes three and
 stick, then four again, then two, then a jump, so that we kept on ringing
 changes on foot, hand, stick, jump, boggle, stumble, foot, hand, foot
 (very gingerly), stick again, and then again a game at all fours. After
 all there was one Mrs. Cameron of 50 years of age and the fattest woman in
 all Inverness-shire who got up this Mountain some few years ago--true she
 had her servants--but then she had her self. She ought to have hired
 Sisyphus,--"Up the high hill he heaves a huge round--Mrs. Cameron." 'Tis
 said a little conversation took place between the mountain and the Lady.
 After taking a glass of Whisky as she was tolerably seated at ease she
 thus began--
 
 _Mrs. C._
 
   Upon my Life Sir Nevis I am pique'd
   That I have so far panted tugg'd and reek'd
   To do an honor to your old bald pate
   And now am sitting on you just to bait,
   Without your paying me one compliment.
   Alas 'tis so with all, when our intent
   Is plain, and in the eye of all Mankind
   We fair ones show a preference, too blind!
   You Gentle man immediately turn tail--
   O let me then my hapless fate bewail!
   Ungrateful Baldpate have I not disdain'd
   The pleasant Valleys--have I not madbrain'd
   Deserted all my Pickles and preserves
   My China closet too--with wretched Nerves
   To boot--say wretched ingrate have I not
   Left my soft cushion chair and caudle pot.
   'Tis true I had no corns--no! thank the fates
   My Shoemaker was always Mr. Bates.
   And if not Mr. Bates why I'm not old!
   Still dumb ungrateful Nevis--still so cold!
 
 Here the Lady took some more whisky and was putting even more to her lips
 when she dashed it to the Ground for the Mountain began to grumble--which
 continued for a few minutes before he thus began--
 
 _Ben Nevis._
 
   What whining bit of tongue and Mouth thus dares
   Disturb my slumber of a thousand years?
   Even so long my sleep has been secure--
   And to be so awaked I'll not endure.
   Oh pain--for since the Eagle's earliest scream
   I've had a damn'd confounded ugly dream,
   A Nightmare sure. What Madam was it you?
   It cannot be! My old eyes are not true!
   Red-Crag, my Spectacles! Now let me see!
   Good Heavens Lady how the gemini
   Did you get here? O I shall split my sides!
   I shall earthquake----
 
 
 _Mrs. C._
 
   Sweet Nevis do not quake, for though I love
   Your honest Countenance all things above
   Truly I should not like to be convey'd
   So far into your Bosom--gentle Maid
   Loves not too rough a treatment gentle Sir--
   Pray thee be calm and do not quake nor stir
   No not a Stone or I shall go in fits--
 
 
 _Ben Nevis._
 
   I must--I shall--I meet not such tit bits--
   I meet not such sweet creatures every day--
   By my old night cap night cap night and day
   I must have one sweet Buss--I must and shall!
   Red Crag!--What Madam can you then repent
   Of all the toil and vigour you have spent
   To see Ben Nevis and to touch his nose?
   Red Crag I say! O I must have them close!
   Red Crag, there lies beneath my furthest toe
   A vein of Sulphur--go dear Red Crag, go--
   And rub your flinty back against it--budge!
   Dear Madam I must kiss you, faith I must!
   I must Embrace you with my dearest gust!
   Block-head, d'ye hear--Block-head I'll make her feel
   There lies beneath my east leg's northern heel
   A cave of young earth dragons--well my boy
   Go thither quick and so complete my joy
   Take you a bundle of the largest pines
   And when the sun on fiercest Phosphor shines
   Fire them and ram them in the Dragon's nest
   Then will the dragons fry and fizz their best
   Until ten thousand now no bigger than
   Poor Alligators--poor things of one span--
   Will each one swell to twice ten times the size
   Of northern whale--then for the tender prize--
   The moment then--for then will Red Crag rub
   His flinty back--and I shall kiss and snub
   And press my dainty morsel to my breast.
   Block-head make haste!
                           O Muses weep the rest--
   The Lady fainted and he thought her dead
   So pulled the clouds again about his head
   And went to sleep again--soon she was rous'd
   By her affrighted servants--next day hous'd
   Safe on the lowly ground she bless'd her fate
   That fainting fit was not delayed too late.
 
 But what surprises me above all is how this Lady got down again. I felt it
 horribly. 'Twas the most vile descent--shook me all to pieces. Over leaf
 you will find a Sonnet I wrote on the top of Ben Nevis. We have just
 entered Inverness. I have three Letters from you and one from Fanny--and
 one from Dilke. I would set about crossing this all over for you but I
 will first write to Fanny and Mrs. Wylie. Then I will begin another to you
 and not before because I think it better you should have this as soon as
 possible. My Sore throat is not quite well and I intend stopping here a
 few days.
 
   Read me a lesson, Muse, and speak it loud
     Upon the top of Nevis, blind in mist!
   I look into the chasms, and a shroud
     Vapourous doth hide them,--just so much I wist
   Mankind do know of hell; I look o'erhead,
     And there is sullen mist,--even so much
   Mankind can tell of heaven; mist is spread
     Before the earth, beneath me,--even such,
   Even so vague is man's sight of himself!
     Here are the craggy stones beneath my feet,--
   Thus much I know that, a poor witless elf,
     I tread on them,--that all my eye doth meet
   Is mist and crag, not only on this height,
   But in the world of thought and mental might!
 
 Good-bye till to-morrow.
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LXV.--TO MRS. WYLIE.
 
 
 Inverness, August 6 [1818].
 
 My dear Madam--It was a great regret to me that I should leave all my
 friends, just at the moment when I might have helped to soften away the
 time for them. I wanted not to leave my brother Tom, but more especially,
 believe me, I should like to have remained near you, were it but for an
 atom of consolation after parting with so dear a daughter. My brother
 George has ever been more than a brother to me; he has been my greatest
 friend, and I can never forget the sacrifice you have made for his
 happiness. As I walk along the Mountains here I am full of these things,
 and lay in wait, as it were, for the pleasure of seeing you immediately on
 my return to town. I wish, above all things, to say a word of Comfort to
 you, but I know not how. It is impossible to prove that black is white; it
 is impossible to make out that sorrow is joy, or joy is sorrow.
 
 Tom tells me that you called on Mr. Haslam, with a newspaper giving an
 account of a gentleman in a Fur cap falling over a precipice in
 Kirkcudbrightshire. If it was me, I did it in a dream, or in some magic
 interval between the first and second cup of tea; which is nothing
 extraordinary when we hear that Mahomet, in getting out of Bed, upset a
 jug of water, and, whilst it was falling, took a fortnight's trip, as it
 seemed, to Heaven; yet was back in time to save one drop of water being
 spilt. As for Fur caps, I do not remember one beside my own, except at
 Carlisle: this was a very good Fur cap I met in High Street, and I daresay
 was the unfortunate one. I daresay that the fates, seeing but two Fur caps
 in the north, thought it too extraordinary, and so threw the dies which of
 them should be drowned. The lot fell upon Jones: I daresay his name was
 Jones. All I hope is that the gaunt Ladies said not a word about hanging;
 if they did I shall repent that I was not half-drowned in Kirkcudbright.
 Stop! let me see!--being half-drowned by falling from a precipice, is a
 very romantic affair: why should I not take it to myself? How glorious to
 be introduced in a drawing-room to a Lady who reads Novels, with "Mr.
 So-and-so--Miss So-and-so; Miss So-and-so, this is Mr. So-and-so, who fell
 off a precipice and was half-drowned." Now I refer to you, whether I
 should lose so fine an opportunity of making my fortune. No romance lady
 could resist me--none. Being run under a Waggon--side-lamed in a
 playhouse, Apoplectic through Brandy--and a thousand other tolerably
 decent things for badness, would be nothing, but being tumbled over a
 precipice into the sea--oh! it would make my fortune--especially if you
 could contrive to hint, from this bulletin's authority, that I was not
 upset on my own account, but that I dashed into the waves after Jessy of
 Dumblane, and pulled her out by the hair. But that, alas! she was dead, or
 she would have made me happy with her hand--however in this you may use
 your own discretion. But I must leave joking, and seriously aver, that I
 have been very romantic indeed among these Mountains and Lakes. I have got
 wet through, day after day--eaten oat-cake, and drank Whisky--walked up to
 my knees in Bog--got a sore throat--gone to see Icolmkill and Staffa; met
 with wholesome food just here and there as it happened--went up Ben Nevis,
 and--_N.B._, came down again. Sometimes when I am rather tired I lean
 rather languishingly on a rock, and long for some famous Beauty to get
 down from her Palfrey in passing, approach me, with--her saddle-bags, and
 give me--a dozen or two capital roastbeef Sandwiches.
 
 When I come into a large town, you know there is no putting one's Knapsack
 into one's fob, so the people stare. We have been taken for
 Spectacle-vendors, Razor-sellers, Jewellers, travelling linendrapers,
 Spies, Excisemen, and many things I have no idea of. When I asked for
 letters at Port Patrick, the man asked what regiment? I have had a peep
 also at little Ireland. Tell Henry I have not camped quite on the bare
 Earth yet, but nearly as bad, in walking through Mull, for the Shepherds'
 huts you can scarcely breathe in, for the Smoke which they seem to
 endeavour to preserve for smoking on a large scale. Besides riding about
 400, we have walked above 600 Miles, and may therefore reckon ourselves as
 set out.
 
 I assure you, my dear Madam, that one of the greatest pleasures I shall
 have on my return, will be seeing you, and that I shall ever be
 
 Yours, with the greatest respect and sincerity,
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXVI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Hampstead, August 18 [1818].
 
 My dear Fanny--I am afraid you will think me very negligent in not having
 answered your Letter--I see it is dated June 12. I did not arrive at
 Inverness till the 8th of this Month so I am very much concerned at your
 being disappointed so long a time. I did not intend to have returned to
 London so soon but have a bad sore throat from a cold I caught in the
 island of Mull: therefore I thought it best to get home as soon as
 possible, and went on board the Smack from Cromarty. We had a nine days'
 passage and were landed at London Bridge yesterday. I shall have a good
 deal to tell you about Scotland--I would begin here but I have a
 confounded toothache. Tom has not been getting better since I left London
 and for the last fortnight has been worse than ever--he has been getting a
 little better for these two or three days. I shall ask Mr. Abbey to let me
 bring you to Hampstead. If Mr. A. should see this Letter tell him that he
 still must if he pleases forward the Post Bill to Perth as I have
 empowered my fellow traveller to receive it. I have a few Scotch pebbles
 for you from the Island of Icolmkill--I am afraid they are rather
 shabby--I did not go near the Mountain of Cairn Gorm. I do not know the
 Name of George's ship--the Name of the Port he has gone to is Philadelphia
 whence he will travel to the Settlement across the Country--I will tell
 you all about this when I see you. The Title of my last Book is
 Endymion--you shall have one soon.--I would not advise you to play on the
 Flageolet--however I will get you one if you please. I will speak to Mr.
 Abbey on what you say concerning school. I am sorry for your poor Canary.
 You shall have another volume of my first Book. My toothache keeps on so
 that I cannot write with any pleasure--all I can say now is that your
 Letter is a very nice one without fault and that you will hear from or
 see in a few days if his throat will let him,
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 LXVII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Hampstead, Tuesday [August 25, 1818].
 
 My dear Fanny--I have just written to Mr. Abbey to ask him to let you come
 and see poor Tom who has lately been much worse. He is better at
 present--sends his Love to you and wishes much to see you--I hope he will
 shortly--I have not been able to come to Walthamstow on his account as
 well as a little Indisposition of my own. I have asked Mr. A. to write
 me--if he does not mention anything of it to you, I will tell you what
 reasons he has though I do not think he will make any objection. Write me
 what you want with a Flageolet and I will get one ready for you by the
 time you come.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LXVIII.--TO JANE REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Well Walk, September 1st [1818].
 
 My dear Jane--Certainly your kind note would rather refresh than trouble
 me, and so much the more would your coming if as you say, it could be done
 without agitating my Brother too much. Receive on your Hearth our deepest
 thanks for your Solicitude concerning us.
 
 I am glad John is not hurt, but gone safe into Devonshire--I shall be in
 great expectation of his Letter--but the promise of it in so anxious and
 friendly a way I prize more than a hundred. I shall be in town to-day on
 some business with my guardian "as was" with scarce a hope of being able
 to call on you. For these two last days Tom has been more cheerful: you
 shall hear again soon how he will be.
 
 Remember us particularly to your Mother.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXIX.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 [Hampstead, September 21 1818.]
 
 My dear Dilke--According to the Wentworth place Bulletin you have left
 Brighton much improved: therefore now a few lines will be more of a
 pleasure than a bore. I have things to say to you, and would fain begin
 upon them in this fourth line: but I have a Mind too well regulated to
 proceed upon anything without due preliminary remarks.--You may perhaps
 have observed that in the simple process of eating radishes I never begin
 at the root but constantly dip the little green head in the salt--that in
 the Game of Whist if I have an ace I constantly play it first. So how can
 I with any face begin without a dissertation on letter-writing? Yet when I
 consider that a sheet of paper contains room only for three pages and a
 half, how can I do justice to such a pregnant subject? However, as you
 have seen the history of the world stamped as it were by a diminishing
 glass in the form of a chronological Map, so will I "with retractile
 claws" draw this into the form of a table--whereby it will occupy merely
 the remainder of this first page--
 
      Folio--Parsons, Lawyers, Statesmen, Physicians out of
      place--ut--Eustace--Thornton--out of practice or on their travels.
 
      Foolscap--1. Superfine--Rich or noble poets--ut Byron. 2. common ut
      egomet.
 
      Quarto--Projectors, Patentees, Presidents, Potato growers.
 
      Bath--Boarding schools, and suburbans in general.
 
      Gilt edge--Dandies in general, male, female, and literary.
 
      Octavo or tears--All who make use of a lascivious seal.
 
      Duodec.--May be found for the most part on Milliners' and
      Dressmakers' Parlour tables.
 
      Strip--At the Playhouse-doors, or anywhere.
 
      Slip--Being but a variation.
 
      Snip--So called from its size being disguised by a twist.
 
 I suppose you will have heard that Hazlitt has on foot a prosecution
 against Blackwood. I dined with him a few days since at Hessey's--there
 was not a word said about it, though I understand he is excessively vexed.
 Reynolds, by what I hear, is almost over-happy, and Rice is in town. I
 have not seen him, nor shall I for some time, as my throat has become
 worse after getting well, and I am determined to stop at home till I am
 quite well. I was going to Town to-morrow with Mrs. D. but I thought it
 best to ask her excuse this morning. I wish I could say Tom was any
 better. His identity presses upon me so all day that I am obliged to go
 out--and although I intended to have given some time to study alone, I am
 obliged to write and plunge into abstract images to ease myself of his
 countenance, his voice, and feebleness--so that I live now in a continual
 fever. It must be poisonous to life, although I feel well. Imagine "the
 hateful siege of contraries"--if I think of fame, of poetry, it seems a
 crime to me, and yet I must do so or suffer. I am sorry to give you
 pain--I am almost resolved to burn this--but I really have not
 self-possession and magnanimity enough to manage the thing
 otherwise--after all it may be a nervousness proceeding from the Mercury.
 
 Bailey I hear is gaining his spirits, and he will yet be what I once
 thought impossible, a cheerful Man--I think he is not quite so much spoken
 of in Little Britain. I forgot to ask Mrs. Dilke if she had anything she
 wanted to say immediately to you. This morning look'd so unpromising that
 I did not think she would have gone--but I find she has, on sending for
 some volumes of Gibbon. I was in a little funk yesterday, for I sent in an
 unseal'd note of sham abuse, until I recollected, from what I heard
 Charles say, that the servant could neither read nor write--not even to
 her Mother as Charles observed. I have just had a Letter from Reynolds--he
 is going on gloriously. The following is a translation of a line of
 Ronsard--
 
   Love pour'd her beauty into my warm veins.
 
 You have passed your Romance, and I never gave in to it, or else I think
 this line a feast for one of your Lovers. How goes it with Brown?
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXX.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, about September 22, 1818.]
 
 My dear Reynolds--Believe me I have rather rejoiced at your happiness than
 fretted at your silence. Indeed I am grieved on your account that I am not
 at the same time happy--But I conjure you to think at Present of nothing
 but pleasure--"Gather the rose, etc."--gorge the honey of life. I pity you
 as much that it cannot last for ever, as I do myself now drinking bitters.
 Give yourself up to it--you cannot help it--and I have a Consolation in
 thinking so. I never was in love--Yet the voice and shape of a Woman has
 haunted me these two days[80]--at such a time, when the relief, the
 feverous relief of Poetry seems a much less crime--This morning Poetry has
 conquered--I have relapsed into those abstractions which are my only
 life--I feel escaped from a new strange and threatening sorrow--And I am
 thankful for it--There is an awful warmth about my heart like a load of
 Immortality.
 
 Poor Tom--that woman--and Poetry were ringing changes in my senses--Now I
 am in comparison happy--I am sensible this will distress you--you must
 forgive me. Had I known you would have set out so soon I could have sent
 you the 'Pot of Basil' for I had copied it out ready.--Here is a free
 translation of a Sonnet of Ronsard, which I think will please you--I have
 the loan of his works--they have great Beauties.
 
   Nature withheld Cassandra in the skies,
     For more adornment, a full thousand years;
   She took their cream of Beauty's fairest dyes,
     And shap'd and tinted her above all Peers:
   Meanwhile Love kept her dearly with his wings,
     And underneath their shadow fill'd her eyes
   With such a richness that the cloudy Kings
     Of high Olympus utter'd slavish sighs.
   When from the Heavens I saw her first descend,
     My heart took fire, and only burning pains,
   They were my pleasures--they my Life's sad end;
     Love pour'd her beauty into my warm veins.
       *        *          *        *        *
       *        *          *        *        *
 
 I had not the original by me when I wrote it, and did not recollect the
 purport of the last lines.
 
 I should have seen Rice ere this--but I am confined by Sawrey's mandate in
 the house now, and have as yet only gone out in fear of the damp
 night.--You know what an undangerous matter it is. I shall soon be quite
 recovered--Your offer I shall remember as though it had even now taken
 place in fact--I think it cannot be. Tom is not up yet--I cannot say he is
 better. I have not heard from George.
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, October 9, 1818.]
 
 My dear Fanny--Poor Tom is about the same as when you saw him last;
 perhaps weaker--were it not for that I should have been over to pay you a
 visit these fine days. I got to the stage half an hour before it set out
 and counted the buns and tarts in a Pastry-cook's window and was just
 beginning with the Jellies. There was no one in the Coach who had a Mind
 to eat me like Mr. Sham-deaf. I shall be punctual in enquiring about next
 Thursday--
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 LXXII.--TO JAMES AUGUSTUS HESSEY.
 
 
 [Hampstead, October 9, 1818.]
 
 My dear Hessey--You are very good in sending me the letters from the
 Chronicle--and I am very bad in not acknowledging such a kindness
 sooner--pray forgive me. It has so chanced that I have had that paper
 every day--I have seen to-day's. I cannot but feel indebted to those
 Gentlemen who have taken my part--As for the rest, I begin to get a little
 acquainted with my own strength and weakness.--Praise or blame has but a
 momentary effect on the man whose love of beauty in the abstract makes him
 a severe critic on his own Works. My own domestic criticism has given me
 pain without comparison beyond what Blackwood or the Quarterly could
 possibly inflict--and also when I feel I am right, no external praise can
 give me such a glow as my own solitary reperception and ratification of
 what is fine. J. S. is perfectly right in regard to the slip-shod
 Endymion.[81] That it is so is no fault of mine. No!--though it may sound
 a little paradoxical. It is as good as I had power to make it--by
 myself--Had I been nervous about its being a perfect piece, and with that
 view asked advice, and trembled over every page, it would not have been
 written; for it is not in my nature to fumble--I will write
 independently.--I have written independently _without Judgment_. I may
 write independently, and _with Judgment_, hereafter. The Genius of Poetry
 must work out its own salvation in a man: It cannot be matured by law and
 precept, but by sensation and watchfulness in itself--That which is
 creative must create itself--In Endymion, I leaped headlong into the sea,
 and thereby have become better acquainted with the Soundings, the
 quicksands, and the rocks, than if I had stayed upon the green shore, and
 piped a silly pipe, and took tea and comfortable advice. I was never
 afraid of failure; for I would sooner fail than not be among the
 greatest--But I am nigh getting into a rant. So, with remembrances to
 Taylor and Woodhouse etc. I am
 
 Yours very sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXIII.--TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, October 13 or 14, 1818.]
 
 My dear George--There was a part in your Letter which gave me a great deal
 of pain, that where you lament not receiving Letters from England. I
 intended to have written immediately on my return from Scotland (which was
 two Months earlier than I had intended on account of my own as well as
 Tom's health) but then I was told by Mrs. W. that you had said you would
 not wish any one to write till we had heard from you. This I thought odd
 and now I see that it could not have been so; yet at the time I suffered
 my unreflecting head to be satisfied, and went on in that sort of abstract
 careless and restless Life with which you are well acquainted. This
 sentence should it give you any uneasiness do not let it last for before I
 finish it will be explained away to your satisfaction--
 
 I am grieved to say I am not sorry you had not Letters at Philadelphia;
 you could have had no good news of Tom and I have been withheld on his
 account from beginning these many days; I could not bring myself to say
 the truth, that he is no better but much worse--However it must be told;
 and you must my dear Brother and Sister take example from me and bear up
 against any Calamity for my sake as I do for yours. Our's are ties which
 independent of their own Sentiment are sent us by providence to prevent
 the deleterious effects of one great solitary grief. I have Fanny and I
 have you--three people whose Happiness to me is sacred--and it does annul
 that selfish sorrow which I should otherwise fall into, living as I do
 with poor Tom who looks upon me as his only comfort--the tears will come
 into your Eyes--let them--and embrace each other--thank heaven for what
 happiness you have, and after thinking a moment or two that you suffer in
 common with all Mankind hold it not a sin to regain your cheerfulness--
 
 I will relieve you of one uneasiness of overleaf: I returned I said on
 account of my health--I am now well from a bad sore throat which came of
 bog trotting in the Island of Mull--of which you shall hear by the copies
 I shall make from my Scotch Letters--
 
 Your content in each other is a delight to me which I cannot express--the
 Moon is now shining full and brilliant--she is the same to me in Matter,
 what you are to me in Spirit. If you were here my dear Sister I could not
 pronounce the words which I can write to you from a distance: I have a
 tenderness for you, and an admiration which I feel to be as great and more
 chaste than I can have for any woman in the world. You will mention
 Fanny--her character is not formed, her identity does not press upon me as
 yours does. I hope from the bottom of my heart that I may one day feel as
 much for her as I do for you--I know not how it is, but I have never made
 any acquaintance of my own--nearly all through your medium my dear
 Brother--through you I know not only a Sister but a glorious human being.
 And now I am talking of those to whom you have made me known I cannot
 forbear mentioning Haslam as a most kind and obliging and constant friend.
 His behaviour to Tom during my absence and since my return has endeared
 him to me for ever--besides his anxiety about you. To-morrow I shall call
 on your Mother and exchange information with her. On Tom's account I have
 not been able to pass so much time with her as I would otherwise have
 done--I have seen her but twice--once I dined with her and Charles--She
 was well, in good spirits, and I kept her laughing at my bad jokes. We
 went to tea at Mrs. Millar's, and in going were particularly struck with
 the light and shade through the Gate way at the Horse Guards. I intend to
 write you such Volumes that it will be impossible for me to keep any order
 or method in what I write: that will come first which is uppermost in my
 Mind, not that which is uppermost in my heart--besides I should wish to
 give you a picture of our Lives here whenever by a touch I can do it; even
 as you must see by the last sentence our walk past Whitehall all in good
 health and spirits--this I am certain of, because I felt so much pleasure
 from the simple idea of your playing a game at Cricket. At Mrs. Millar's I
 saw Henry quite well--there was Miss Keasle--and the good-natured Miss
 Waldegrave--Mrs. Millar began a long story and you know it is her
 Daughter's way to help her on as though her tongue were ill of the gout.
 Mrs. M. certainly tells a story as though she had been taught her Alphabet
 in Crutched Friars. Dilke has been very unwell; I found him very ailing on
 my return--he was under Medical care for some time, and then went to the
 Sea Side whence he has returned well. Poor little Mrs. D. has had another
 gall-stone attack; she was well ere I returned--she is now at Brighton.
 Dilke was greatly pleased to hear from you, and will write a letter for me
 to enclose--He seems greatly desirous of hearing from you of the
 settlement itself--
 
 
 [October 14 or 15.]
 
 I came by ship from Inverness, and was nine days at Sea without being
 sick--a little Qualm now and then put me in mind of you--however as soon
 as you touch the shore all the horrors of Sickness are soon forgotten, as
 was the case with a Lady on board who could not hold her head up all the
 way. We had not been in the Thames an hour before her tongue began to some
 tune; paying off as it was fit she should all old scores. I was the only
 Englishman on board. There was a downright Scotchman who hearing that
 there had been a bad crop of Potatoes in England had brought some
 triumphant specimens from Scotland--these he exhibited with national pride
 to all the Lightermen and Watermen from the Nore to the Bridge. I fed upon
 beef all the way; not being able to eat the thick Porridge which the
 Ladies managed to manage with large awkward horn spoons into the bargain.
 Severn has had a narrow escape of his Life from a Typhus fever: he is now
 gaining strength--Reynolds has returned from a six weeks' enjoyment in
 Devonshire--he is well, and persuades me to publish my pot of Basil as an
 answer to the attacks made on me in Blackwood's Magazine and the Quarterly
 Review. There have been two Letters in my defence in the Chronicle and one
 in the Examiner, copied from the Alfred Exeter Paper, and written by
 Reynolds. I do not know who wrote those in the Chronicle. This is a mere
 matter of the moment--I think I shall be among the English Poets after my
 death. Even as a Matter of present interest the attempt to crush me in the
 Quarterly has only brought me more into notice, and it is a common
 expression among book men "I wonder the Quarterly should cut its own
 throat."
 
 It does me not the least harm in Society to make me appear little and
 ridiculous: I know when a man is superior to me and give him all due
 respect--he will be the last to laugh at me and as for the rest I feel
 that I make an impression upon them which insures me personal respect
 while I am in sight whatever they may say when my back is turned. Poor
 Haydon's eyes will not suffer him to proceed with his picture--he has been
 in the Country--I have seen him but once since my return. I hurry matters
 together here because I do not know when the Mail sails--I shall enquire
 to-morrow, and then shall know whether to be particular or general in my
 letter--You shall have at least two sheets a day till it does sail whether
 it be three days or a fortnight--and then I will begin a fresh one for the
 next Month. The Miss Reynoldses are very kind to me, but they have lately
 displeased me much, and in this way--Now I am coming the Richardson. On my
 return the first day I called they were in a sort of taking or bustle
 about a Cousin of theirs who having fallen out with her Grandpapa in a
 serious manner was invited by Mrs. R. to take Asylum in her house. She is
 an east indian and ought to be her Grandfather's Heir.[82] At the time I
 called Mrs. R. was in conference with her up stairs, and the young Ladies
 were warm in her praises down stairs, calling her genteel, interesting and
 a thousand other pretty things to which I gave no heed, not being partial
 to 9 days' wonders--Now all is completely changed--they hate her, and from
 what I hear she is not without faults--of a real kind: but she has others
 which are more apt to make women of inferior charms hate her. She is not a
 Cleopatra, but she is at least a Charmian. She has a rich Eastern look;
 she has fine eyes and fine manners. When she comes into a room she makes
 an impression the same as the Beauty of a Leopardess. She is too fine and
 too conscious of herself to repulse any Man who may address her--from
 habit she thinks that nothing _particular_. I always find myself more at
 ease with such a woman; the picture before me always gives me a life and
 animation which I cannot possibly feel with anything inferior. I am at
 such times too much occupied in admiring to be awkward or in a tremble. I
 forget myself entirely because I live in her. You will by this time think
 I am in love with her; so before I go any further I will tell you I am
 not--she kept me awake one Night as a tune of Mozart's might do. I speak
 of the thing as a pastime and an amusement, than which I can feel none
 deeper than a conversation with an imperial woman, the very "yes" and
 "no" of whose Lips is to me a Banquet. I don't cry to take the moon home
 with me in my Pocket nor do I fret to leave her behind me. I like her and
 her like because one has no _sensations_--what we both are is taken for
 granted. You will suppose I have by this had much talk with her--no such
 thing--there are the Miss Reynoldses on the look out--They think I don't
 admire her because I did not stare at her.
 
 They call her a flirt to me--What a want of knowledge! She walks across a
 room in such a manner that a Man is drawn towards her with a magnetic
 Power. This they call flirting! they do not know things. They do not know
 what a Woman is. I believe though she has faults--the same as Charmian and
 Cleopatra might have had. Yet she is a fine thing speaking in a worldly
 way: for there are two distinct tempers of mind in which we judge of
 things--the worldly, theatrical and pantomimical; and the unearthly,
 spiritual and ethereal--in the former Buonaparte, Lord Byron and this
 Charmian hold the first place in our Minds; in the latter, John Howard,
 Bishop Hooker rocking his child's cradle and you my dear Sister are the
 conquering feelings. As a Man in the world I love the rich talk of a
 Charmian; as an eternal Being I love the thought of you. I should like her
 to ruin me, and I should like you to save me. Do not think, my dear
 Brother, from this that my Passions are headlong, or likely to be ever of
 any pain to you--
 
   "I am free from Men of Pleasure's cares,
   By dint of feelings far more deep than theirs."
 
 This is Lord Byron, and is one of the finest things he has said. I have no
 town talk for you, as I have not been much among people--as for Politics
 they are in my opinion only sleepy because they will soon be too wide
 awake. Perhaps not--for the long and continued Peace of England itself has
 given us notions of personal safety which are likely to prevent the
 re-establishment of our national Honesty. There is, of a truth, nothing
 manly or sterling in any part of the Government. There are many Madmen in
 the Country I have no doubt, who would like to be beheaded on tower Hill
 merely for the sake of eclat, there are many Men like Hunt who from a
 principle of taste would like to see things go on better, there are many
 like Sir F. Burdett who like to sit at the head of political dinners,--but
 there are none prepared to suffer in obscurity for their Country--The
 motives of our worst men are Interest and of our best Vanity. We have no
 Milton, no Algernon Sidney--Governors in these days lose the title of Man
 in exchange for that of Diplomat and Minister. We breathe in a sort of
 Officinal Atmosphere--All the departments of Government have strayed far
 from Simplicity which is the greatest of Strength there is as much
 difference in this respect between the present Government and Oliver
 Cromwell's as there is between the 12 Tables of Rome and the volumes of
 Civil Law which were digested by Justinian. A Man now entitled Chancellor
 has the same honour paid to him whether he be a Hog or a Lord Bacon. No
 sensation is created by Greatness but by the number of Orders a Man has at
 his Button holes. Notwithstanding the part which the Liberals take in the
 Cause of Napoleon, I cannot but think he has done more harm to the life of
 Liberty than any one else could have done: not that the divine right
 Gentlemen have done or intend to do any good--no they have taken a Lesson
 of him, and will do all the further harm he would have done without any of
 the good. The worst thing he has done is, that he has taught them how to
 organise their monstrous armies. The Emperor Alexander it is said intends
 to divide his Empire as did Diocletian--creating two Czars besides
 himself, and continuing the supreme Monarch of the whole. Should he do
 this and they for a series of Years keep peaceable among themselves Russia
 may spread her conquest even to China--I think it a very likely thing that
 China itself may fall, Turkey certainly will. Meanwhile European north
 Russia will hold its horns against the rest of Europe, intriguing
 constantly with France. Dilke, whom you know to be a Godwin perfectibility
 Man, pleases himself with the idea that America will be the country to
 take up the human intellect where England leaves off--I differ there with
 him greatly--A country like the United States, whose greatest Men are
 Franklins and Washingtons will never do that. They are great Men
 doubtless, but how are they to be compared to those our countrymen Milton
 and the two Sidneys? The one is a philosophical Quaker full of mean and
 thrifty maxims, the other sold the very Charger who had taken him through
 all his Battles. Those Americans are great, but they are not sublime
 Man--the humanity of the United States can never reach the sublime.
 Birkbeck's mind is too much in the American style--you must endeavour to
 infuse a little Spirit of another sort into the settlement, always with
 great caution, for thereby you may do your descendants more good than you
 may imagine. If I had a prayer to make for any great good, next to Tom's
 recovery, it should be that one of your Children should be the first
 American Poet. I have a great mind to make a prophecy, and they say
 prophecies work out their own fulfilment--
 
   'Tis the witching time of night,
   Orbed is the moon and bright,
   And the Stars they glisten, glisten,
   Seeming with bright eyes to listen.
   For what listen they?
   For a song and for a charm,
   See they glisten in alarm
   And the Moon is waxing warm
   To hear what I shall say.
   Moon keep wide thy golden ears
   Hearken Stars and hearken Spheres
   Hearken thou eternal Sky
   I sing an infant's Lullaby,
   O pretty Lullaby!
   Listen, Listen, listen, listen
   Glisten, glisten, glisten, glisten
   And hear my Lullaby!
   Though the Rushes that will make
   Its cradle still are in the lake,
   Though the linen that will be
   Its swathe, is on the cotton tree,
   Though the woollen that will keep
   It warm, is on the silly sheep;
   Listen Starlight, listen, listen
   Glisten, Glisten, glisten, glisten
   And hear my Lullaby!
   Child! I see thee! Child, I've found thee
   Midst of the quiet all around thee!
   Child, I see thee! Child, I spy thee
   And thy mother sweet is nigh thee!--
   Child, I know thee! Child no more
   But a Poet _ever_more
   See, See the Lyre, The Lyre
   In a flame of fire
   Upon the little cradle's top
   Flaring, flaring, flaring
   Past the eyesight's bearing--
   Awake it from its sleep,
   And see if it can keep
   Its eyes upon the blaze--
   Amaze, Amaze!
   It stares, it stares, it stares
   It dares what no one dares
   It lifts its little hand into the flame
   Unharm'd, and on the strings
   Paddles a little tune and sings
   With dumb endeavour sweetly!
   Bard art thou completely!
   Little Child
   O' the western wild,
   Bard art thou completely!--
   Sweetly, with dumb endeavour--
   A Poet now or never!
   Little Child
   O' the western wild
   A Poet now or never!
 
 
 [October 16.]
 
 This is Friday, I know not what day of the Month--I will enquire
 to-morrow, for it is fit you should know the time I am writing. I went to
 Town yesterday, and calling at Mrs. Millar's was told that your Mother
 would not be found at home--I met Henry as I turned the corner--I had no
 leisure to return, so I left the letters with him. He was looking very
 well. Poor Tom is no better to-night--I am afraid to ask him what Message
 I shall send from him. And here I could go on complaining of my Misery,
 but I will keep myself cheerful for your Sakes. With a great deal of
 trouble I have succeeded in getting Fanny to Hampstead. She has been
 several times. Mr. Lewis has been very kind to Tom all the summer, there
 has scarce a day passed but he has visited him, and not one day without
 bringing or sending some fruit of the nicest kind. He has been very
 assiduous in his enquiries after you--It would give the old Gentleman a
 great deal of pleasure if you would send him a Sheet enclosed in the next
 parcel to me, after you receive this--how long it will be first--Why did I
 not write to Philadelphia? Really I am sorry for that neglect. I wish to
 go on writing ad infinitum to you--I wish for interesting matter and a pen
 as swift as the wind--But the fact is I go so little into the Crowd now
 that I have nothing fresh and fresh every day to speculate upon except my
 own Whims and Theories. I have been but once to Haydon's, once to Hunt's,
 once to Rice's, once to Hessey's. I have not seen Taylor, I have not been
 to the Theatre. Now if I had been many times to all these and was still in
 the habit of going I could on my return at night have each day something
 new to tell you of without any stop--But now I have such a dearth that
 when I get to the end of this sentence and to the bottom of this page I
 must wait till I can find something interesting to you before I begin
 another. After all it is not much matter what it may be about, for the
 very words from such a distance penned by this hand will be grateful to
 you--even though I were to copy out the tale of Mother Hubbard or Little
 Red Riding Hood.
 
 
 [Later.]
 
 I have been over to Dilke's this evening--there with Brown we have been
 talking of different and indifferent Matters--of Euclid, of Metaphysics,
 of the Bible, of Shakspeare, of the horrid System and consequences of the
 fagging at great schools. I know not yet how large a parcel I can send--I
 mean by way of Letters--I hope there can be no objection to my dowling up
 a quire made into a small compass. That is the manner in which I shall
 write. I shall send you more than Letters--I mean a tale--which I must
 begin on account of the activity of my Mind; of its inability to remain at
 rest. It must be prose and not very exciting. I must do this because in
 the way I am at present situated I have too many interruptions to a train
 of feeling to be able to write Poetry. So I shall write this Tale, and if
 I think it worth while get a duplicate made before I send it off to you.
 
 
 [October 21.]
 
 This is a fresh beginning the 21st October. Charles and Henry were with us
 on Sunday, and they brought me your Letter to your Mother--we agreed to
 get a Packet off to you as soon as possible. I shall dine with your Mother
 to-morrow, when they have promised to have their Letters ready. I shall
 send as soon as possible without thinking of the little you may have from
 me in the first parcel, as I intend, as I said before, to begin another
 Letter of more regular information. Here I want to communicate so largely
 in a little time that I am puzzled where to direct my attention. Haslam
 has promised to let me know from Capper and Hazlewood. For want of
 something better I shall proceed to give you some extracts from my Scotch
 Letters--Yet now I think on it why not send you the letters themselves--I
 have three of them at present--I believe Haydon has two which I will get
 in time. I dined with your Mother and Henry at Mrs. Millar's on Thursday,
 when they gave me their Letters. Charles's I have not yet--he has promised
 to send it. The thought of sending my Scotch Letters has determined me to
 enclose a few more which I have received and which will give you the best
 cue to how I am going on, better than you could otherwise know. Your
 Mother was well, and I was sorry I could not stop later. I called on Hunt
 yesterday--it has been always my fate to meet Ollier there--On Thursday I
 walked with Hazlitt as far as Covent Garden: he was going to play
 Racquets. I think Tom has been rather better these few last days--he has
 been less nervous. I expect Reynolds to-morrow.
 
 
 [Later, about October 25.]
 
 Since I wrote thus far I have met with that same Lady again, whom I saw at
 Hastings and whom I met when we were going to the English Opera. It was in
 a street which goes from Bedford Row to Lamb's Conduit Street.--I passed
 her and turned back: she seemed glad of it--glad to see me, and not
 offended at my passing her before. We walked on towards Islington, where
 we called on a friend of hers who keeps a Boarding School. She has always
 been an enigma to me--she has been in a Room with you and Reynolds, and
 wishes we should be acquainted without any of our common acquaintance
 knowing it. As we went along, sometimes through shabby, sometimes through
 decent Streets, I had my guessing at work, not knowing what it would be,
 and prepared to meet any surprise. First it ended at this House at
 Islington: on parting from which I pressed to attend her home. She
 consented, and then again my thoughts were at work what it might lead to,
 though now they had received a sort of genteel hint from the Boarding
 School. Our Walk ended in 34 Gloucester Street, Queen Square--not exactly
 so, for we went upstairs into her sitting-room, a very tasty sort of place
 with Books, Pictures, a bronze Statue of Buonaparte, Music, aeolian Harp, a
 Parrot, a Linnet, a Case of choice Liqueurs, etc. etc. She behaved in the
 kindest manner--made me take home a Grouse for Tom's dinner. Asked for my
 address for the purpose of sending more game.... I expect to pass some
 pleasant hours with her now and then: in which I feel I shall be of
 service to her in matters of knowledge and taste: if I can I will.... She
 and your George are the only women a peu pres de mon age whom I would be
 content to know for their mind and friendship alone.--I shall in a short
 time write you as far as I know how I intend to pass my Life--I cannot
 think of those things now Tom is so unwell and weak. Notwithstanding your
 Happiness and your recommendation I hope I shall never marry. Though the
 most beautiful Creature were waiting for me at the end of a Journey or a
 Walk; though the Carpet were of Silk, the Curtains of the morning Clouds;
 the chairs and Sofa stuffed with Cygnet's down; the food Manna, the Wine
 beyond Claret, the Window opening on Winander mere, I should not feel--or
 rather my Happiness would not be so fine, as my Solitude is sublime. Then
 instead of what I have described, there is a sublimity to welcome me
 home--The roaring of the wind is my wife and the Stars through the window
 pane are my Children. The mighty abstract Idea I have of Beauty in all
 things stifles the more divided and minute domestic happiness--an amiable
 wife and sweet Children I contemplate as a part of that Beauty, but I must
 have a thousand of those beautiful particles to fill up my heart. I feel
 more and more every day, as my imagination strengthens, that I do not live
 in this world alone but in a thousand worlds--No sooner am I alone than
 shapes of epic greatness are stationed around me, and serve my Spirit the
 office which is equivalent to a King's bodyguard--then "Tragedy with
 sceptred pall comes sweeping by." According to my state of mind I am with
 Achilles shouting in the Trenches, or with Theocritus in the Vales of
 Sicily. Or I throw my whole being into Troilus, and repeating those lines,
 "I wander like a lost Soul upon the stygian Banks staying for waftage," I
 melt into the air with a voluptuousness so delicate that I am content to
 be alone. These things, combined with the opinion I have of the generality
 of women--who appear to me as children to whom I would rather give a sugar
 Plum than my time, form a barrier against Matrimony which I rejoice in.
 
 I have written this that you might see I have my share of the highest
 pleasures, and that though I may choose to pass my days alone I shall be
 no Solitary. You see there is nothing spleenical in all this. The only
 thing that can ever affect me personally for more than one short passing
 day, is any doubt about my powers for poetry--I seldom have any, and I
 look with hope to the nighing time when I shall have none. I am as happy
 as a Man can be--that is, in myself I should be happy if Tom was well, and
 I knew you were passing pleasant days. Then I should be most
 enviable--with the yearning Passion I have for the beautiful, connected
 and made one with the ambition of my intellect. Think of my Pleasure in
 Solitude in comparison of my commerce with the world--there I am a
 child--there they do not know me, not even my most intimate
 acquaintance--I give into their feelings as though I were refraining from
 irritating a little child. Some think me middling, others silly, others
 foolish--every one thinks he sees my weak side against my will, when in
 truth it is with my will--I am content to be thought all this because I
 have in my own breast so great a resource. This is one great reason why
 they like me so; because they can all show to advantage in a room and
 eclipse from a certain tact one who is reckoned to be a good Poet. I hope
 I am not here playing tricks 'to make the angels weep': I think not: for I
 have not the least contempt for my species, and though it may sound
 paradoxical, my greatest elevations of soul leave me every time more
 humbled--Enough of this--though in your Love for me you will not think it
 enough.
 
 
 [Later, October 29 or 31.]
 
 Haslam has been here this morning and has taken all the Letters except
 this sheet, which I shall send him by the Twopenny, as he will put the
 Parcel in the Boston post Bag by the advice of Capper and Hazlewood, who
 assure him of the safety and expedition that way--the Parcel will be
 forwarded to Warder and thence to you all the same. There will not be a
 Philadelphia ship for these six weeks--by that time I shall have another
 Letter to you. Mind you I mark this Letter A. By the time you will receive
 this you will have I trust passed through the greatest of your fatigues.
 As it was with your Sea Sickness I shall not hear of them till they are
 past. Do not set to your occupation with too great an anxiety--take it
 calmly--and let your health be the prime consideration. I hope you will
 have a Son, and it is one of my first wishes to have him in my Arms--which
 I will do please God before he cuts one double tooth. Tom is rather more
 easy than he has been: but is still so nervous that I cannot speak to him
 of these Matters--indeed it is the care I have had to keep his Mind aloof
 from feelings too acute that has made this Letter so short a one--I did
 not like to write before him a Letter he knew was to reach your hands--I
 cannot even now ask him for any Message--his heart speaks to you. Be as
 happy as you can. Think of me, and for my sake be cheerful.
 
 Believe me, my dear Brother and sister, Your anxious and affectionate
 Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 This day is my Birth day.
 
 All our friends have been anxious in their enquiries, and all send their
 remembrances.
 
 
 
 
 LXXIV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Hampstead, Friday Morn [October 16, 1818].
 
 My dear Fanny--You must not condemn me for not being punctual to Thursday,
 for I really did not know whether it would not affect poor Tom too much to
 see you. You know how it hurt him to part with you the last time. At all
 events you shall hear from me; and if Tom keeps pretty well to-morrow, I
 will see Mr. Abbey the next day, and endeavour to settle that you shall be
 with us on Tuesday or Wednesday. I have good news from George--He has
 landed safely with our Sister--they are both in good health--their
 prospects are good--and they are by this time nighing to their journey's
 end--you shall hear the particulars soon.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 Tom's love to you.
 
 
 
 
 LXXV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, October 26, 1818.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I called on Mr. Abbey in the beginning of last Week: when
 he seemed averse to letting you come again from having heard that you had
 been to other places besides Well Walk. I do not mean to say you did
 wrongly in speaking of it, for there should rightly be no objection to
 such things: but you know with what People we are obliged in the course of
 Childhood to associate, whose conduct forces us into duplicity and
 falsehood to them. To the worst of People we should be openhearted: but it
 is as well as things are to be prudent in making any communication to any
 one, that may throw an impediment in the way of any of the little
 pleasures you may have. I do not recommend duplicity but prudence with
 such people. Perhaps I am talking too deeply for you: if you do not now,
 you will understand what I mean in the course of a few years. I think poor
 Tom is a little Better: he sends his love to you. I shall call on Mr.
 Abbey to-morrow: when I hope to settle when to see you again. Mrs. Dilke
 has been for some time at Brighton--she is expected home in a day or two.
 She will be pleased I am sure with your present. I will try for permission
 for you to remain here all Night should Mrs. D. return in time.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVI.--TO RICHARD WOODHOUSE.
 
 
 [Hampstead, October 27, 1818.]
 
 My dear Woodhouse--Your letter gave me great satisfaction, more on account
 of its friendliness than any relish of that matter in it which is
 accounted so acceptable to the "genus irritabile." The best answer I can
 give you is in a clerklike manner to make some observations on two
 principal points which seem to point like indices into the midst of the
 whole pro and con about genius, and views, and achievements, and ambition,
 et caetera.--1st. As to the poetical Character itself (I mean that sort, of
 which, if I am anything, I am a member; that sort distinguished from the
 Wordsworthian, or egotistical Sublime; which is a thing per se, and stands
 alone,) it is not itself--it has no self--It is everything and nothing--It
 has no character--it enjoys light and shade; it lives in gusto, be it foul
 or fair, high or low, rich or poor, mean or elevated--It has as much
 delight in conceiving an Iago as an Imogen. What shocks the virtuous
 philosopher delights the chameleon poet. It does no harm from its relish
 of the dark side of things, any more than from its taste for the bright
 one, because they both end in speculation. A poet is the most unpoetical
 of anything in existence, because he has no Identity--he is continually in
 for and filling some other body. The Sun,--the Moon,--the Sea, and men and
 women, who are creatures of impulse, are poetical, and have about them an
 unchangeable attribute; the poet has none, no identity--he is certainly
 the most unpoetical of all God's creatures.--If then he has no self, and
 if I am a poet, where is the wonder that I should say I would write no
 more? Might I not at that very instant have been cogitating on the
 Characters of Saturn and Ops?[83] It is a wretched thing to confess; but
 it is a very fact, that not one word I ever utter can be taken for granted
 as an opinion growing out of my identical Nature--how can it, when I have
 no Nature? When I am in a room with people, if I ever am free from
 speculating on creations of my own brain, then, not myself goes home to
 myself, but the identity of every one in the room begins to press upon me,
 so that I am in a very little time annihilated--not only among men; it
 would be the same in a nursery of Children. I know not whether I make
 myself wholly understood: I hope enough so to let you see that no
 dependence is to be placed on what I said that day.
 
 In the 2d place, I will speak of my views, and of the life I purpose to
 myself. I am ambitious of doing the world some good: if I should be
 spared, that may be the work of maturer years--in the interval I will
 assay to reach to as high a summit in poetry as the nerve bestowed upon me
 will suffer. The faint conceptions I have of poems to come bring the blood
 frequently into my forehead--All I hope is, that I may not lose all
 interest in human affairs--that the solitary Indifference I feel for
 applause, even from the finest spirits, will not blunt any acuteness of
 vision I may have. I do not think it will. I feel assured I should write
 from the mere yearning and fondness I have for the beautiful, even if my
 night's labours should be burnt every Morning, and no eye ever shine upon
 them. But even now I am perhaps not speaking from myself, but from some
 Character in whose soul I now live.
 
 I am sure however that this next sentence is from myself--I feel your
 anxiety, good opinion, and friendship, in the highest degree, and am
 
 Yours most sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, November 5, 1818.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I have seen Mr. Abbey three times about you, and have not
 been able to get his consent. He says that once more between this and the
 Holidays will be sufficient. What can I do? I should have been at
 Walthamstow several times, but I am not able to leave Tom for so long a
 time as that would take me. Poor Tom has been rather better these 4 last
 days in consequence of obtaining a little rest a nights. Write to me as
 often as you can, and believe that I would do anything to give you any
 pleasure--we must as yet wait patiently.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVIII.--TO JAMES RICE.
 
 
 Well Walk [Hampstead,] Nov{r.} 24, [1818].
 
 My dear Rice--Your amende Honorable I must call "un surcroit d'Amitie,"
 for I am not at all sensible of anything but that you were unfortunately
 engaged and I was unfortunately in a hurry. I completely understand your
 feeling in this mistake, and find in it that balance of comfort which
 remains after regretting your uneasiness. I have long made up my mind to
 take for granted the genuine-heartedness of my friends, notwithstanding
 any temporary ambiguousness in their behaviour or their tongues, nothing
 of which however I had the least scent of this morning. I say completely
 understand; for I am everlastingly getting my mind into such-like painful
 trammels--and am even at this moment suffering under them in the case of a
 friend of ours.--I will tell you two most unfortunate and parallel
 slips--it seems down-right pre-intention--A friend says to me, "Keats, I
 shall go and see Severn this week."--"Ah! (says I) you want him to take
 your Portrait."--And again, "Keats," says a friend, "when will you come to
 town again?"--"I will," says I, "let you have the MS. next week." In both
 these cases I appeared to attribute an interested motive to each of my
 friends' questions--the first made him flush, the second made him look
 angry:--and yet I am innocent in both cases; my mind leapt over every
 interval, to what I saw was per se a pleasant subject with him. You see I
 have no allowances to make--you see how far I am from supposing you could
 show me any neglect. I very much regret the long time I have been obliged
 to exile from you: for I have one or two rather pleasant occasions to
 confer upon with you. What I have heard from George is favourable--I
 expect a letter from the Settlement itself.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 I cannot give any good news of Tom.
 
 
 
 
 LXXIX.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead,] Tuesday Morn [December 1, 1818].
 
 My dear Fanny--Poor Tom has been so bad that I have delayed your visit
 hither--as it would be so painful to you both. I cannot say he is any
 better this morning--he is in a very dangerous state--I have scarce any
 hopes of him. Keep up your spirits for me my dear Fanny--repose entirely
 in
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 LXXX.--TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead,[84] about Dec{r.} 18, 1818.]
 
 My dear Brother and Sister--You will have been prepared before this
 reaches you for the worst news you could have, nay, if Haslam's letter
 arrives in proper time, I have a consolation in thinking that the first
 shock will be past before you receive this. The last days of poor Tom were
 of the most distressing nature; but his last moments were not so painful,
 and his very last was without a pang. I will not enter into any parsonic
 comments on death--yet the common observations of the commonest people on
 death are as true as their proverbs. I have scarce a doubt of immortality
 of some nature or other--neither had Tom. My friends have been exceedingly
 kind to me every one of them--Brown detained me at his House. I suppose no
 one could have had their time made smoother than mine has been. During
 poor Tom's illness I was not able to write and since his death the task of
 beginning has been a hindrance to me. Within this last Week I have been
 everywhere--and I will tell you as nearly as possible how all go on. With
 Dilke and Brown I am quite thick--with Brown indeed I am going to
 domesticate--that is, we shall keep house together. I shall have the front
 parlour and he the back one, by which I shall avoid the noise of Bentley's
 Children--and be the better able to go on with my Studies--which have been
 greatly interrupted lately, so that I have not the shadow of an idea of a
 book in my head, and my pen seems to have grown too gouty for sense. How
 are you going on now? The goings on of the world makes me dizzy--There you
 are with Birkbeck--here I am with Brown--sometimes I fancy an immense
 separation, and sometimes as at present, a direct communication of Spirit
 with you. That will be one of the grandeurs of immortality--There will be
 no space, and consequently the only commerce between spirits will be by
 their intelligence of each other--when they will completely understand
 each other, while we in this world merely comprehend each other in
 different degrees--the higher the degree of good so higher is our Love and
 friendship. I have been so little used to writing lately that I am afraid
 you will not smoke my meaning so I will give an example--Suppose Brown or
 Haslam or any one whom I understand in the next degree to what I do you,
 were in America, they would be so much the farther from me in proportion
 as their identity was less impressed upon me. Now the reason why I do not
 feel at the present moment so far from you is that I remember your Ways
 and Manners and actions; I know your manner of thinking, your manner of
 feeling: I know what shape your joy or your sorrow would take; I know the
 manner of your walking, standing, sauntering, sitting down, laughing,
 punning, and every action so truly that you seem near to me. You will
 remember me in the same manner--and the more when I tell you that I shall
 read a passage of Shakspeare every Sunday at ten o'Clock--you read one at
 the same time, and we shall be as near each other as blind bodies can be
 in the same room.
 
 I saw your Mother the day before yesterday, and intend now frequently to
 pass half a day with her--she seem'd tolerably well. I called in Henrietta
 Street and so was speaking with your Mother about Miss Millar--we had a
 chat about Heiresses--she told me I think of 7 or eight dying Swains.
 Charles was not at home. I think I have heard a little more talk about
 Miss Keasle--all I know of her is she had a new sort of shoe on of bright
 leather like our Knapsacks. Miss Millar gave me one of her confounded
 pinches. _N.B._ did not like it. Mrs. Dilke went with me to see Fanny last
 week, and Haslam went with me last Sunday. She was well--she gets a little
 plumper and had a little Colour. On Sunday I brought from her a present of
 facescreens and a work-bag for Mrs. D.--they were really very pretty. From
 Walthamstow we walked to Bethnal green--where I felt so tired from my long
 walk that I was obliged to go to Bed at ten. Mr. and Mrs. Keasle were
 there. Haslam has been excessively kind, and his anxiety about you is
 great; I never meet him but we have some chat thereon. He is always doing
 me some good turn--he gave me this thin paper[85] for the purpose of
 writing to you. I have been passing an hour this morning with Mr.
 Lewis--he wants news of you very much. Haydon was here yesterday--he
 amused us much by speaking of young Hoppner who went with Captain Ross on
 a voyage of discovery to the Poles. The Ship was sometimes entirely
 surrounded with vast mountains and crags of ice, and in a few Minutes not
 a particle was to be seen all round the Horizon. Once they met with so
 vast a Mass that they gave themselves over for lost; their last resource
 was in meeting it with the Bowsprit, which they did, and split it asunder
 and glided through it as it parted, for a great distance--one Mile and
 more. Their eyes were so fatigued with the eternal dazzle and whiteness
 that they lay down on their backs upon deck to relieve their sight on the
 blue sky. Hoppner describes his dreadful weariness at the continual
 day--the sun ever moving in a circle round above their heads--so pressing
 upon him that he could not rid himself of the sensation even in the dark
 Hold of the Ship. The Esquimaux are described as the most wretched of
 Beings--they float from their summer to their winter residences and back
 again like white Bears on the ice floats. They seem never to have washed,
 and so when their features move the red skin shows beneath the cracking
 peel of dirt. They had no notion of any inhabitants in the World but
 themselves. The sailors who had not seen a Star for some time, when they
 came again southwards on the hailing of the first revision of one, all ran
 upon deck with feelings of the most joyful nature. Haydon's eyes will not
 suffer him to proceed with his Picture--his Physician tells him he must
 remain two months more, inactive. Hunt keeps on in his old way--I am
 completely tired of it all. He has lately publish'd a Pocket Book called
 the literary Pocket-Book--full of the most sickening stuff you can
 imagine. Reynolds is well; he has become an Edinburgh Reviewer. I have not
 heard from Bailey. Rice I have seen very little of lately--and I am very
 sorry for it. The Miss R's. are all as usual. Archer above all people
 called on me one day--he wanted some information by my means, from Hunt
 and Haydon, concerning some Man they knew. I got him what he wanted, but
 know none of the whys and wherefores. Poor Kirkman left Wentworth Place
 one evening about half-past eight and was stopped, beaten and robbed of
 his Watch in Pond Street. I saw him a few days since; he had not recovered
 from his bruises. I called on Hazlitt the day I went to Romney Street--I
 gave John Hunt extracts from your letters--he has taken no notice. I have
 seen Lamb lately--Brown and I were taken by Hunt to Novello's--there we
 were devastated and excruciated with bad and repeated puns--Brown don't
 want to go again. We went the other evening to see Brutus a new Tragedy by
 Howard Payne, an American--Kean was excellent--the play was very bad. It
 is the first time I have been since I went with you to the Lyceum.
 
 Mrs. Brawne who took Brown's house for the Summer, still resides in
 Hampstead. She is a very nice woman, and her daughter senior is I think
 beautiful and elegant, graceful, silly, fashionable and strange. We have a
 little tiff now and then--and she behaves a little better, or I must have
 sheered off.[86] I find by a sidelong report from your Mother that I am to
 be invited to Miss Millar's birthday dance. Shall I dance with Miss
 Waldegrave? Eh! I shall be obliged to shirk a good many there. I shall be
 the only Dandy there--and indeed I merely comply with the invitation that
 the party may not be entirely destitute of a specimen of that race. I
 shall appear in a complete dress of purple, Hat and all--with a list of
 the beauties I have conquered embroidered round my Calves.
 
 
 Thursday [December 24].
 
 This morning is so very fine, I should have walked over to Walthamstow if
 I had thought of it yesterday. What are you doing this morning? Have you a
 clear hard frost as we have? How do you come on with the gun? Have you
 shot a Buffalo? Have you met with any Pheasants? My Thoughts are very
 frequently in a foreign Country--I live more out of England than in it.
 The Mountains of Tartary are a favourite lounge, if I happen to miss the
 Alleghany ridge, or have no whim for Savoy. There must be great pleasure
 in pursuing game--pointing your gun--no, it won't do--now, no--rabbit
 it--now bang--smoke and feathers--where is it? Shall you be able to get a
 good pointer or so? Have you seen Mr. Trimmer? He is an acquaintance of
 Peachey's. Now I am not addressing myself to G. minor, and yet I am--for
 you are one. Have you some warm furs? By your next Letters I shall expect
 to hear exactly how you go on--smother nothing--let us have all; fair and
 foul, all plain. Will the little bairn have made his entrance before you
 have this? Kiss it for me, and when it can first know a cheese from a
 Caterpillar show it my picture twice a Week. You will be glad to hear that
 Gifford's attack upon me has done me service--it has got my Book among
 several _sets_--Nor must I forget to mention once more what I suppose
 Haslam has told you, the present of a L25 note I had anonymously sent me.
 I have many things to tell you--the best way will be to make copies of my
 correspondence; and I must not forget the Sonnet I received with the Note.
 Last Week I received the following from Woodhouse whom you must
 recollect:--
 
      "My dear Keats--I send enclosed a Letter, which when read take the
      trouble to return to me. The History of its reaching me is this. My
      Cousin, Miss Frogley of Hounslow, borrowed my copy of _Endymion_ for
      a specified time. Before she had time to look into it, she and my
      friend Mr. Hy. Neville of Esher, who was house Surgeon to the late
      Princess Charlotte, insisted upon having it to read for a day or two,
      and undertook to make my Cousin's peace with me on account of the
      extra delay. Neville told me that one of the Misses Porter (of
      romance Celebrity) had seen it on his table, dipped into it, and
      expressed a wish to read it. I desired he should keep it as long and
      lend it to as many as he pleased, provided it was not allowed to
      slumber on any one's shelf. I learned subsequently from Miss Frogley
      that these Ladies had requested of Mr. Neville, if he was acquainted
      with the Author, the Pleasure of an introduction. About a week back
      the enclosed was transmitted by Mr. Neville to my Cousin, as a
      species of Apology for keeping her so long without the Book, and she
      sent it to me, knowing that it would give me Pleasure--I forward it
      to you for somewhat the same reason, but principally because it gives
      me the opportunity of naming to you (which it would have been
      fruitless to do before) the opening there is for an introduction to a
      class of society from which you may possibly derive advantage, as
      well as qualification, if you think proper to avail yourself of it.
      In such a case I should be very happy to further your Wishes. But do
      just as you please. The whole is entirely _entre nous_.--
 
      Yours, etc.,
 
      R. W."
 
 Well--now this is Miss Porter's Letter to Neville--
 
      "Dear Sir--As my Mother is sending a Messenger to Esher, I cannot but
      make the same the bearer of my regrets for not having had the
      pleasure of seeing you the morning you called at the gate. I had
      given orders to be denied, I was so very unwell with my still
      adhesive cold; but had I known it was you I should have taken off the
      interdict for a few minutes, to say how very much I am delighted with
      _Endymion_. I had just finished the Poem and have done as you
      permitted, lent it to Miss Fitzgerald. I regret you are not
      personally acquainted with the Author, for I should have been happy
      to have acknowledged to him, through the advantage of your
      communication, the very rare delight my sister and myself have
      enjoyed from the first fruits of Genius. I hope the ill-natured
      Review will not have damaged" (or damped) "such true Parnassian
      fire--it ought not, for when Life is granted, etc."
 
 --and so she goes on. Now I feel more obliged than flattered by this--so
 obliged that I will not at present give you an extravaganza of a Lady
 Romancer. I will be introduced to them if it be merely for the pleasure of
 writing to you about it--I shall certainly see a new race of People. I
 shall more certainly have no time for them.
 
 Hunt has asked me to meet Tom Moore some day--so you shall hear of him.
 The Night we went to Novello's there was a complete set to of Mozart and
 punning. I was so completely tired of it that if I were to follow my own
 inclinations I should never meet any one of that set again, not even Hunt,
 who is certainly a pleasant fellow in the main when you are with him--but
 in reality he is vain, egotistical, and disgusting in matters of taste
 and in morals. He understands many a beautiful thing; but then, instead
 of giving other minds credit for the same degree of perception as he
 himself professes--he begins an explanation in such a curious manner that
 our taste and self-love is offended continually. Hunt does one harm by
 making fine things petty, and beautiful things hateful. Through him I am
 indifferent to Mozart, I care not for white Busts--and many a glorious
 thing when associated with him becomes a nothing. This distorts one's
 mind--makes one's thoughts bizarre--perplexes one in the standard of
 Beauty. Martin is very much irritated against Blackwood for printing some
 Letters in his Magazine which were Martin's property--he always found
 excuses for Blackwood till he himself was injured, and now he is enraged.
 I have been several times thinking whether or not I should send you the
 Examiners, as Birkbeck no doubt has all the good periodical
 Publications--I will save them at all events. I must not forget to mention
 how attentive and useful Mrs. Bentley has been--I am very sorry to leave
 her--but I must, and I hope she will not be much a loser by it. Bentley is
 very well--he has just brought me a clothes'-basket of Books. Brown has
 gone to town to-day to take his Nephews who are on a visit here to see the
 Lions. I am passing a Quiet day--which I have not done for a long
 while--and if I do continue so, I feel I must again begin with my
 poetry--for if I am not in action mind or Body I am in pain--and from that
 I suffer greatly by going into parties where from the rules of society and
 a natural pride I am obliged to smother my Spirit and look like an
 Idiot--because I feel my impulses given way to would too much amaze them.
 I live under an everlasting restraint--never relieved except when I am
 composing--so I will write away.
 
 
 Friday [December 25].
 
 I think you knew before you left England that my next subject would be
 "the fall of Hyperion." I went on a little with it last night, but it
 will take some time to get into the vein again. I will not give you any
 extracts because I wish the whole to make an impression. I have however a
 few Poems which you will like, and I will copy out on the next sheet. I
 shall dine with Haydon on Sunday, and go over to Walthamstow on Monday if
 the frost hold. I think also of going into Hampshire this Christmas to Mr.
 Snook's[87]--they say I shall be very much amused--But I don't know--I
 think I am in too huge a Mind for study--I must do it--I must wait at home
 and let those who wish come to see me. I cannot always be (how do you
 spell it?) trapsing. Here I must tell you that I have not been able to
 keep the journal or write the Tale I promised--now I shall be able to do
 so. I will write to Haslam this morning to know when the Packet sails, and
 till it does I will write something every day--After that my journal shall
 go on like clockwork, and you must not complain of its dulness--for what I
 wish is to write a quantity to you--knowing well that dulness itself will
 from me be interesting to you--You may conceive how this not having been
 done has weighed upon me. I shall be able to judge from your next what
 sort of information will be of most service or amusement to you. Perhaps
 as you were fond of giving me sketches of character you may like a little
 picnic of scandal even across the Atlantic. But now I must speak
 particularly to you, my dear Sister--for I know you love a little quizzing
 better than a great bit of apple dumpling. Do you know Uncle Redhall? He
 is a little Man with an innocent powdered upright head, he lisps with a
 protruded under lip--he has two Nieces, each one would weigh three of
 him--one for height and the other for breadth--he knew Bartolozzi. He gave
 a supper, and ranged his bottles of wine all up the Kitchen and cellar
 stairs--quite ignorant of what might be drunk--It might have been a good
 joke to pour on the sly bottle after bottle into a washing tub, and roar
 for more--If you were to trip him up it would discompose a Pigtail and
 bring his under lip nearer to his nose. He never had the good luck to lose
 a silk Handkerchief in a Crowd, and therefore has only one topic of
 conversation--Bartolozzi. Shall I give you Miss Brawne? She is about my
 height--with a fine style of countenance of the lengthened sort--she wants
 sentiment in every feature--she manages to make her hair look well--her
 nostrils are fine--though a little painful--her mouth is bad and good--her
 Profile is better than her full-face which indeed is not full but pale and
 thin without showing any bone. Her shape is very graceful and so are her
 movements--her Arms are good her hands baddish--her feet tolerable. She is
 not seventeen--but she is ignorant--monstrous in her behaviour, flying out
 in all directions--calling people such names that I was forced lately to
 make use of the term _Minx_--this is I think not from any innate vice, but
 from a penchant she has for acting stylishly--I am however tired of such
 style and shall decline any more of it. She had a friend to visit her
 lately--you have known plenty such--her face is raw as if she was standing
 out in a frost; her lips raw and seem always ready for a Pullet--she plays
 the Music without one sensation but the feel of the ivory at her fingers.
 She is a downright Miss without one set off--We hated her and smoked her
 and baited her and I think drove her away. Miss B. thinks her a Paragon of
 fashion, and says she is the only woman she would change persons with.
 What a stupe--She is superior as a Rose to a Dandelion. When we went to
 bed Brown observed as he put out the Taper what a very ugly old woman that
 Miss Robinson would make--at which I must have groaned aloud for I'm sure
 ten minutes. I have not seen the thing Kingston again--George will
 describe him to you--I shall insinuate some of these Creatures into a
 Comedy some day--and perhaps have Hunt among them--
 
 Scene, a little Parlour. _Enter_ Hunt--Gattie--Hazlitt--Mrs.
 Novello--Ollier. _Gattie._ Ha! Hunt, got into your new house? Ha! Mrs.
 Novello: seen Altam and his Wife?--_Mrs. N._ Yes (with a grin), it's Mr.
 Hunt's, isn't it?--_Gattie._ Hunt's? no, ha! Mr. Ollier, I congratulate
 you upon the highest compliment I ever heard paid to the Book. Mr.
 Hazlitt, I hope you are well.--_Hazlitt._ Yes Sir, no Sir.--_Mr. Hunt_ (at
 the Music), "La Biondina," etc. Hazlitt, did you ever hear this?--"La
 Biondina," etc.--_Hazlitt._ O no Sir--I never.--_Ollier._ Do, Hunt, give
 it us over again--divine.--_Gattie._ Divino--Hunt, when does your
 Pocket-Book come out?--_Hunt._ "What is this absorbs me quite?" O we are
 spinning on a little, we shall floridise soon I hope. Such a thing was
 very much wanting--people think of nothing but money getting--now for me I
 am rather inclined to the liberal side of things. I am reckoned lax in my
 Christian principles, etc. etc. etc.
 
 
 [December 29.]
 
 It is some days since I wrote the last page--and what I have been about
 since I have no Idea. I dined at Haslam's on Sunday--with Haydon
 yesterday, and saw Fanny in the morning; she was well. Just now I took out
 my poem to go on with it, but the thought of my writing so little to you
 came upon me and I could not get on--so I have began at random and I have
 not a word to say--and yet my thoughts are so full of you that I can do
 nothing else. I shall be confined at Hampstead a few days on account of a
 sore throat--the first thing I do will be to visit your Mother again. The
 last time I saw Henry he show'd me his first engraving, which I thought
 capital. Mr. Lewis called this morning and brought some American Papers--I
 have not look'd into them--I think we ought to have heard of you before
 this--I am in daily expectation of Letters--Nil desperandum. Mrs. Abbey
 wishes to take Fanny from School--I shall strive all I can against that.
 There has happened a great Misfortune in the Drewe Family--old Drewe has
 been dead some time; and lately George Drewe expired in a fit--on which
 account Reynolds has gone into Devonshire. He dined a few days since at
 Horace Twisse's with Liston and Charles Kemble. I see very little of him
 now, as I seldom go to Little Britain because the _Ennui_ always seizes me
 there, and John Reynolds is very dull at home. Nor have I seen Rice. How
 you are now going on is a Mystery to me--I hope a few days will clear it
 up.
 
 
 [December 30.]
 
 I never know the day of the Month. It is very fine here to-day, though I
 expect a Thundercloud, or rather a snow cloud, in less than an hour. I am
 at present alone at Wentworth Place--Brown being at Chichester and Mr. and
 Mrs. Dilke making a little stay in Town. I know not what I should do
 without a sunshiny morning now and then--it clears up one's spirits. Dilke
 and I frequently have some chat about you. I have now and then some doubt,
 but he seems to have a great confidence. I think there will soon be
 perceptible a change in the fashionable slang literature of the day--it
 seems to me that Reviews have had their day--that the public have been
 surfeited--there will soon be some new folly to keep the Parlours in
 talk--What it is I care not. We have seen three literary Kings in our
 Time--Scott, Byron, and then the Scotch novels. All now appears to be
 dead--or I may mistake, literary Bodies may still keep up the Bustle which
 I do not hear. Haydon show'd me a letter he had received from
 Tripoli--Ritchie was well and in good Spirits, among Camels, Turbans, Palm
 Trees, and Sands. You may remember I promised to send him an Endymion
 which I did not--however he has one--you have one. One is in the Wilds of
 America--the other is on a Camel's back in the plains of Egypt. I am
 looking into a Book of Dubois's--he has written directions to the
 Players--one of them is very good. "In singing never mind the
 music--observe what time you please. It would be a pretty degradation
 indeed if you were obliged to confine your genius to the dull regularity
 of a fiddler--horse hair and cat's guts--no, let him keep _your_ time and
 play _your_ tune--_dodge him_." I will now copy out the Letter and Sonnet
 I have spoken of. The outside cover was thus directed, "Messrs. Taylor and
 Hessey, (Booksellers), No. 93 Fleet Street, London," and it contained
 this:
 
      'Messrs. Taylor and Hessey are requested to forward the enclosed
      letter by some _safe_ mode of conveyance to the Author of Endymion,
      who is not known at Teignmouth: or if they have not his address, they
      will return the letter by post, directed as below, within a
      _fortnight_, "Mr. P. Fenbank, P. O., Teignmouth." 9th Novr. 1818.'
 
 In this sheet was enclosed the following, with a superscription--'Mr. John
 Keats, Teignmouth.' Then came Sonnet to John Keats--which I would not copy
 for any in the world but you--who know that I scout "mild light and
 loveliness" or any such nonsense in myself.
 
   Star of high promise!--not to this dark age
     Do thy mild light and loveliness belong;
     For it is blind, intolerant, and wrong;
   Dead to empyreal soarings, and the rage
   Of scoffing spirits bitter war doth wage
     With all that bold integrity of song.
     Yet thy clear beam shall shine through ages strong
   To ripest times a light and heritage.
   And there breathe now who dote upon thy fame,
     Whom thy wild numbers wrap beyond their being,
   Who love the freedom of thy lays--their aim
     Above the scope of a dull tribe unseeing--
   And there is one whose hand will never scant
   From his poor store of fruits all _thou_ canst want.
 
   November 1818.        turn over.
 
 I turn'd over and found a L25 note. Now this appears to me all very
 proper--if I had refused it I should have behaved in a very bragadochio
 dunderheaded manner--and yet the present galls me a little, and I do not
 know whether I shall not return it if I ever meet with the donor after,
 whom to no purpose I have written. I have your Miniature on the Table
 George the great--it's very like--though not quite about the upper lip. I
 wish we had a better of your little George. I must not forget to tell you
 that a few days since I went with Dilke a shooting on the heath and shot a
 Tomtit. There were as many guns abroad as Birds. I intended to have been
 at Chichester this Wednesday--but on account of this sore throat I wrote
 him (Brown) my excuse yesterday.
 
 
 Thursday [December 31].
 
 (I will date when I finish.)--I received a Note from Haslam
 yesterday--asking if my letter is ready--now this is only the second
 sheet--notwithstanding all my promises. But you must reflect what
 hindrances I have had. However on sealing this I shall have nothing to
 prevent my proceeding in a gradual journal, which will increase in a Month
 to a considerable size. I will insert any little pieces I may
 write--though I will not give any extracts from my large poem which is
 scarce began. I want to hear very much whether Poetry and literature in
 general has gained or lost interest with you--and what sort of writing is
 of the highest gust with you now. With what sensation do you read
 Fielding?--and do not Hogarth's pictures seem an old thing to you? Yet you
 are very little more removed from general association than I am--recollect
 that no Man can live but in one society at a time--his enjoyment in the
 different states of human society must depend upon the Powers of his
 Mind--that is you can imagine a Roman triumph or an Olympic game as well
 as I can. We with our bodily eyes see but the fashion and Manners of one
 country for one age--and then we die. Now to me manners and customs long
 since passed whether among the Babylonians or the Bactrians are as real,
 or even more real than those among which I now live--My thoughts have
 turned lately this way--The more we know the more inadequacy we find in
 the world to satisfy us--this is an old observation; but I have made up
 my Mind never to take anything for granted--but even to examine the truth
 of the commonest proverbs--This however is true. Mrs. Tighe and Beattie
 once delighted me--now I see through them and can find nothing in them but
 weakness, and yet how many they still delight! Perhaps a superior being
 may look upon Shakspeare in the same light--is it possible? No--This same
 inadequacy is discovered (forgive me, little George, you know I don't mean
 to put you in the mess) in Women with few exceptions--the Dress Maker, the
 blue Stocking, and the most charming sentimentalist differ but in a slight
 degree and are equally smokeable. But I'll go no further--I may be
 speaking sacrilegiously--and on my word I have thought so little that I
 have not one opinion upon anything except in matters of taste--I never can
 feel certain of any truth but from a clear perception of its Beauty--and I
 find myself very young minded even in that perceptive power--which I hope
 will increase. A year ago I could not understand in the slightest degree
 Raphael's cartoons--now I begin to read them a little--And how did I learn
 to do so? By seeing something done in quite an opposite spirit--I mean a
 picture of Guido's in which all the Saints, instead of that heroic
 simplicity and unaffected grandeur which they inherit from Raphael, had
 each of them both in countenance and gesture all the canting, solemn,
 melodramatic mawkishness of Mackenzie's father Nicholas. When I was last
 at Haydon's I looked over a Book of Prints taken from the fresco of the
 Church at Milan, the name of which I forget--in it are comprised Specimens
 of the first and second age of art in Italy. I do not think I ever had a
 greater treat out of Shakspeare. Full of Romance and the most tender
 feeling--magnificence of draperies beyond any I ever saw, not excepting
 Raphael's. But Grotesque to a curious pitch--yet still making up a fine
 whole--even finer to me than more accomplish'd works--as there was left so
 much room for Imagination. I have not heard one of this last course of
 Hazlitt's lectures. They were upon 'Wit and Humour,' 'the English comic
 writers.'
 
 
 Saturday, Jan{y.} 2nd [1819].
 
 Yesterday Mr. and Mrs. D. and myself dined at Mrs. Brawne's--nothing
 particular passed. I never intend hereafter to spend any time with Ladies
 unless they are handsome--you lose time to no purpose. For that reason I
 shall beg leave to decline going again to Redall's or Butler's or any
 Squad where a fine feature cannot be mustered among them all--and where
 all the evening's amusement consists in saying 'your good health, _your_
 good health, and YOUR good health--and (O I beg your pardon) yours, Miss
 ----,' and such thing not even dull enough to keep one awake--With respect
 to amiable speaking I can read--let my eyes be fed or I'll never go out to
 dinner anywhere. Perhaps you may have heard of the dinner given to Thos.
 Moore in Dublin, because I have the account here by me in the Philadelphia
 democratic paper. The most pleasant thing that occurred was the speech Mr.
 Tom made on his Father's health being drank. I am afraid a great part of
 my Letters are filled up with promises and what I will do rather than any
 great deal written--but here I say once for all--that circumstances
 prevented me from keeping my promise in my last, but now I affirm that as
 there will be nothing to hinder me I will keep a journal for you. That I
 have not yet done so you would forgive if you knew how many hours I have
 been repenting of my neglect. For I have no thought pervading me so
 constantly and frequently as that of you--my Poem cannot frequently drive
 it away--you will retard it much more than you could by taking up my time
 if you were in England. I never forget you except after seeing now and
 then some beautiful woman--but that is a fever--the thought of you both is
 a passion with me, but for the most part a calm one. I asked Dilke for a
 few lines for you--he has promised them--I shall send what I have written
 to Haslam on Monday Morning--what I can get into another sheet to-morrow
 I will--There are one or two little poems you might like. I have given up
 snuff very nearly quite--Dilke has promised to sit with me this evening, I
 wish he would come this minute for I want a pinch of snuff very much just
 now--I have none though in my own snuff box. My sore throat is much better
 to-day--I think I might venture on a pinch. Here are the Poems--they will
 explain themselves--as all poems should do without any comment--
 
   Ever let the Fancy roam,
   Pleasure never is at home.
   At a touch sweet pleasure melteth
   Like to bubbles when rain pelteth:
   Then let winged fancy wander
   Towards heaven still spread beyond her--
   Open wide the mind's cage door,
   She'll dart forth and cloudward soar.
   O sweet Fancy, let her loose!
   Summer's joys are spoilt by use,
   And the enjoying of the spring
   Fades as doth its blossoming:
   Autumn's red-lipped fruitage too
   Blushing through the mist and dew,
   Cloys with kissing. What do then?
   Sit thee in an ingle when
   The sear faggot blazes bright,
   Spirit of a winter night:
   When the soundless earth is muffled,
   And the caked snow is shuffled
   From the Ploughboy's heavy shoon:
   When the night doth meet the moon
   In a dark conspiracy
   To banish vesper from the sky.
   Sit thee then and send abroad
   With a Mind self-overaw'd
   Fancy high-commission'd; send her,--
   She'll have vassals to attend her--
   She will bring thee, spite of frost,
   Beauties that the Earth has lost;
   She will bring thee all together
   All delights of summer weather;
   All the faery buds of May,
   On spring turf or scented spray;
   All the heaped Autumn's wealth
   With a still mysterious stealth;
   She will mix these pleasures up
   Like three fit wines in a cup
   And thou shalt quaff it--Thou shalt hear
   Instant harvest carols clear,
   Bustle of the reaped corn
   Sweet Birds antheming the Morn;
   And in the same moment hark
   To the early April lark,
   And the rooks with busy caw
   Foraging for sticks and straw.
   Thou shalt at one glance behold
   The daisy and the marigold;
   White plumed lilies and the first
   Hedgerow primrose that hath burst;
   Shaded Hyacinth alway
   Sapphire Queen of the Mid-may;
   And every leaf and every flower
   Pearled with the same soft shower.
   Thou shalt see the fieldmouse creep
   Meagre from its celled sleep,
   And the snake all winter shrank
   Cast its skin on sunny bank;
   Freckled nest eggs shalt thou see
   Hatching in the hawthorn tree;
   When the hen-bird's wing doth rest
   Quiet on its mossy nest;
   Then the hurry and alarm
   When the Beehive casts its swarm--
   Acorns ripe down scattering
   While the autumn breezes sing,
   For the same sleek throated mouse
   To store up in its winter house.
     O, sweet Fancy, let her loose!
   Every joy is spoilt by use:
   Every pleasure, every joy--
   Not a Mistress but doth cloy.
   Where's the cheek that doth not fade,
   Too much gaz'd at? Where's the Maid
   Whose lip mature is ever new?
   Where's the eye, however blue,
   Doth not weary? Where's the face
   One would meet in every place?
   Where's the voice however soft
   One would hear too oft and oft?
   At a touch sweet pleasure melteth
   Like to bubbles when rain pelteth.
   Let then winged fancy find
   Thee a Mistress to thy mind.
   Dulcet-eyed as Ceres' daughter
   Ere the God of torment taught her
   How to frown and how to chide:
   With a waist and with a side
   White as Hebe's when her Zone
   Slipp'd its golden clasp, and down
   Fell her Kirtle to her feet
   While she held the goblet sweet,
   And Jove grew languid--Mistress fair!
   Thou shalt have that tressed hair
   Adonis tangled all for spite;
   And the mouth he would not kiss,
   And the treasure he would miss;
   And the hand he would not press
   And the warmth he would distress.
     O the Ravishment--the Bliss!
   Fancy has her there she is--
   Never fulsome, ever new,
   There she steps! and tell me who
   Has a Mistress so divine?
   Be the palate ne'er so fine
   She cannot sicken. Break the Mesh
   Of the Fancy's silken leash;
   Where she's tether'd to the heart.
   Quickly break her prison string
   And such joys as these she'll bring,
   Let the winged fancy roam,
   Pleasure never is at home.
 
 I did not think this had been so long a Poem. I have another not so
 long--but as it will more conveniently be copied on the other side I will
 just put down here some observations on Caleb Williams by Hazlitt--I meant
 to say St. Leon, for although he has mentioned all the Novels of Godwin
 very freely I do not quote them, but this only on account of its being a
 specimen of his usual abrupt manner, and fiery laconicism. He says of St.
 Leon--
 
      "He is a limb torn off society. In possession of eternal youth and
      beauty he can feel no love; surrounded, tantalised, and tormented
      with riches, he can do no good. The faces of Men pass before him as
      in a speculum; but he is attached to them by no common tie of
      sympathy or suffering. He is thrown back into himself and his own
      thoughts. He lives in the solitude of his own breast--without wife
      or child or friend or Enemy in the world. _This is the solitude of
      the soul, not of woods or trees or mountains_--but the desert of
      society--the waste and oblivion of the heart. He is himself alone.
      His existence is purely intellectual, and is therefore intolerable to
      one who has felt the rapture of affection, or the anguish of woe."
 
 As I am about it I might as well give you his character of Godwin as a
 Romancer:--
 
      "Whoever else is, it is pretty clear that the author of Caleb
      Williams is not the author of Waverley. Nothing can be more distinct
      or excellent in their several ways than these two writers. If the one
      owes almost everything to external observations and traditional
      character, the other owes everything to internal conception and
      contemplation of the possible workings of the human Mind. There is
      little knowledge of the world, little variety, neither an eye for the
      picturesque nor a talent for the humorous in Caleb Williams, for
      instance, but you cannot doubt for a moment of the originality of the
      work and the force of the conception. The impression made upon the
      reader is the exact measure of the strength of the author's genius.
      For the effect both in Caleb Williams and St. Leon is entirely made
      out, not by facts nor dates, by blackletter, or magazine learning, by
      transcript nor record, but by intense and patient study of the human
      heart, and by an imagination projecting itself into certain
      situations, and capable of working up its imaginary feelings to the
      height of reality."
 
 This appears to me quite correct--Now I will copy the other Poem--it is on
 the double immortality of Poets--
 
   Bards of Passion and of Mirth
   Ye have left your souls on earth--
   Have ye souls in heaven too,
   Double liv'd in regions new?
   Yes--and those of heaven commune
   With the spheres of Sun and Moon;
   With the noise of fountains wondrous
   And the parle of voices thund'rous;
   With the Whisper of heaven's trees,
   And one another, in soft ease
   Seated on elysian Lawns
   Browsed by none but Dian's fawns;
   Underneath large bluebells tented,
   Where the daisies are rose scented,
   And the rose herself has got
   Perfume that on Earth is not.
   Where the nightingale doth sing
   Not a senseless, tranced thing;
   But melodious truth divine,
   Philosophic numbers fine;
   Tales and golden histories
   Of Heaven and its Mysteries.
   Thus ye live on Earth, and then
   On the Earth ye live again;
   And the souls ye left behind you
   Teach us here the way to find you,
   Where your other souls are joying
   Never slumber'd, never cloying.
   Here your earth born souls still speak
   To mortals of the little week
   They must sojourn with their cares;
   Of their sorrows and delights
   Of their Passions and their spites;
   Of their glory and their shame--
   What doth strengthen and what maim.
   Thus ye teach us every day
   Wisdom though fled far away.
     Bards of Passion and of Mirth,
   Ye have left your Souls on Earth!
   Ye have souls in heaven too,
   Double liv'd in Regions new!
 
 These are specimens of a sort of rondeau which I think I shall become
 partial to--because you have one idea amplified with greater ease and more
 delight and freedom than in the sonnet. It is my intention to wait a few
 years before I publish any minor poems--and then I hope to have a volume
 of some worth--and which those people will relish who cannot bear the
 burthen of a long poem. In my journal I intend to copy the poems I write
 the days they are written--There is just room, I see, in this page to copy
 a little thing I wrote off to some Music as it was playing--
 
   I had a dove and the sweet dove died,
   And I have thought it died of grieving:
   O what could it mourn for? it was tied
   With a silken thread of my own hand's weaving.
   Sweet little red-feet why did you die?
   Why would you leave me--sweet dove why?
   You lived alone on the forest tree.
   Why pretty thing could you not live with me?
   I kissed you oft and I gave you white peas.
   Why not live sweetly as in the green trees?
 
 
 Sunday [January 3].
 
 I have been dining with Dilke to-day--He is up to his Ears in Walpole's
 letters. Mr. Manker is there, and I have come round to see if I can
 conjure up anything for you. Kirkman came down to see me this morning--his
 family has been very badly off lately. He told me of a villainous trick of
 his Uncle William in Newgate Street, who became sole Creditor to his
 father under pretence of serving him, and put an execution on his own
 Sister's goods. He went in to the family at Portsmouth; conversed with
 them, went out and sent in the Sherriff's officer. He tells me too of
 abominable behaviour of Archer to Caroline Mathew--Archer has lived nearly
 at the Mathews these two years; he has been amusing Caroline--and now he
 has written a Letter to Mrs. M. declining, on pretence of inability to
 support a wife as he would wish, all thoughts of marriage. What is the
 worst is Caroline is 27 years old. It is an abominable matter. He has
 called upon me twice lately--I was out both times. What can it be
 for?--There is a letter to-day in the Examiner to the Electors of
 Westminster on Mr. Hobhouse's account. In it there is a good character of
 Cobbett--I have not the paper by me or I would copy it. I do not think I
 have mentioned the discovery of an African Kingdom--the account is much
 the same as the first accounts of Mexico--all magnificence--There is a
 Book being written about it. I will read it and give you the cream in my
 next. The romance we have heard upon it runs thus: They have window frames
 of gold--100,000 infantry--human sacrifices. The Gentleman who is the
 Adventurer has his wife with him--she, I am told, is a beautiful little
 sylphid woman--her husband was to have been sacrificed to their Gods and
 was led through a Chamber filled with different instruments of torture
 with privilege to choose what death he would die, without their having a
 thought of his aversion to such a death, they considering it a supreme
 distinction. However he was let off, and became a favourite with the King,
 who at last openly patronised him, though at first on account of the
 Jealousy of his Ministers he was wont to hold conversations with his
 Majesty in the dark middle of the night. All this sounds a little
 Bluebeardish--but I hope it is true. There is another thing I must mention
 of the momentous kind;--but I must mind my periods in it--Mrs. Dilke has
 two Cats--a Mother and a Daughter--now the Mother is a tabby and the
 daughter a black and white like the spotted child. Now it appears to me,
 for the doors of both houses are opened frequently, so that there is a
 complete thoroughfare for both Cats (there being no board up to the
 contrary), they may one and several of them come into my room ad libitum.
 But no--the Tabby only comes--whether from sympathy for Ann the Maid or me
 I cannot tell--or whether Brown has left behind him any atmospheric spirit
 of Maidenhood I cannot tell. The Cat is not an old Maid herself--her
 daughter is a proof of it--I have questioned her--I have look'd at the
 lines of her paw--I have felt her pulse--to no purpose. Why should the
 _old_ Cat come to me? I ask myself--and myself has not a word to answer.
 It may come to light some day; if it does you shall hear of it.
 
 Kirkman this morning promised to write a few lines to you and send them to
 Haslam. I do not think I have anything to say in the Business way. You
 will let me know what you would wish done with your property in
 England--what things you would wish sent out--But I am quite in the dark
 about what you are doing--If I do not hear soon I shall put on my wings
 and be after you. I will in my next, and after I have seen your next
 letter, tell you my own particular idea of America. Your next letter will
 be the key by which I shall open your hearts and see what spaces want
 filling with any particular information--Whether the affairs of Europe are
 more or less interesting to you--whether you would like to hear of the
 Theatres--of the bear Garden--of the Boxers--the Painters, the
 Lectures--the Dress--The progress of Dandyism--The Progress of
 Courtship--or the fate of Mary Millar--being a full, true, and tres
 particular account of Miss M.'s ten Suitors--How the first tried the
 effect of swearing; the second of stammering; the third of
 whispering;--the fourth of sonnets--the fifth of Spanish leather
 boots;--the sixth of flattering her body--the seventh of flattering her
 mind--the eighth of flattering himself--the ninth stuck to the Mother--the
 tenth kissed the Chambermaid and told her to tell her Mistress--But he was
 soon discharged, his reading led him into an error; he could not sport the
 Sir Lucius to any advantage. And now for this time I bid you good-bye--I
 have been thinking of these sheets so long that I appear in closing them
 to take my leave of you--but that is not it--I shall immediately as I send
 this off begin my journal--when some days I shall write no more than 10
 lines and others 10 times as much. Mrs. Dilke is knocking at the wall for
 Tea is ready--I will tell you what sort of a tea it is and then bid you
 Good-bye.
 
 
 [January 4.]
 
 This is Monday morning--nothing particular happened yesterday evening,
 except that when the tray came up Mrs. Dilke and I had a battle with
 celery stalks--she sends her love to you. I shall close this and send it
 immediately to Haslam--remaining ever, My dearest brother and sister,
 
 Your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXI.--TO RICHARD WOODHOUSE.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Friday Morn [December 18, 1818].
 
 My dear Woodhouse--I am greatly obliged to you. I must needs feel
 flattered by making an impression on a set of ladies. I should be content
 to do so by meretricious romance verse, if they alone, and not men, were
 to judge. I should like very much to know those ladies--though look here,
 Woodhouse--I have a new leaf to turn over: I must work; I must read; I
 must write. I am unable to afford time for new acquaintances. I am
 scarcely able to do my duty to those I have. Leave the matter to chance.
 But do not forget to give my remembrances to your cousin.
 
 Yours most sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXII.--TO MRS. REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Tuesd. [December 22, 1818].
 
 My dear Mrs. Reynolds--When I left you yesterday, 'twas with the
 conviction that you thought I had received no previous invitation for
 Christmas day: the truth is I had, and had accepted it under the
 conviction that I should be in Hampshire at the time: else believe me I
 should not have done so, but kept in Mind my old friends. I will not speak
 of the proportion of pleasure I may receive at different Houses--that
 never enters my head--you may take for a truth that I would have given up
 even what I did see to be a greater pleasure, for the sake of old
 acquaintanceship--time is nothing--two years are as long as twenty.
 
 Yours faithfully
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXIII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Tuesday [December 22, 1818].
 
 My dear Haydon--Upon my Soul I never felt your going out of the room at
 all--and believe me I never rhodomontade anywhere but in your Company--my
 general Life in Society is silence. I feel in myself all the vices of a
 Poet, irritability, love of effect and admiration--and influenced by such
 devils I may at times say more ridiculous things than I am aware of--but I
 will put a stop to that in a manner I have long resolved upon--I will buy
 a gold ring and put it on my finger--and from that time a Man of superior
 head shall never have occasion to pity me, or one of inferior Nunskull to
 chuckle at me. I am certainly more for greatness in a shade than in the
 open day--I am speaking as a mortal--I should say I value more the
 privilege of seeing great things in loneliness than the fame of a Prophet.
 Yet here I am sinning--so I will turn to a thing I have thought on more--I
 mean your means till your picture be finished: not only now but for this
 year and half have I thought of it. Believe me Haydon I have that sort of
 fire in my heart that would sacrifice everything I have to your service--I
 speak without any reserve--I know you would do so for me--I open my heart
 to you in a few words. I will do this sooner than you shall be distressed:
 but let me be the last stay--Ask the rich lovers of Art first--I'll tell
 you why--I have a little money which may enable me to study, and to travel
 for three or four years. I never expect to get anything by my Books: and
 moreover I wish to avoid publishing--I admire Human Nature but I do not
 like _Men_. I should like to compose things honourable to Man--but not
 fingerable over by _Men_. So I am anxious to exist without troubling the
 printer's devil or drawing upon Men's or Women's admiration--in which
 great solitude I hope God will give me strength to rejoice. Try the long
 purses--but do not sell your drawings or I shall consider it a breach of
 friendship. I am sorry I was not at home when Salmon called. Do write and
 let me know all your present whys and wherefores.
 
 Yours most faithfully
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXIV.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, [December 24, 1818].
 
 My dear Taylor--Can you lend me L30 for a short time? Ten I want for
 myself--and twenty for a friend--which will be repaid me by the middle of
 next month. I shall go to Chichester on Wednesday and perhaps stay a
 fortnight--I am afraid I shall not be able to dine with you before I
 return. Remember me to Woodhouse.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXV.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, [December 27, 1818].
 
 My dear Haydon--I had an engagement to-day--and it is so fine a morning
 that I cannot put it off--I will be with you to-morrow--when we will thank
 the Gods, though you have bad eyes and I am idle.
 
 I regret more than anything the not being able to dine with you to-day. I
 have had several movements that way--but then I should disappoint one who
 has been my true friend. I will be with you to-morrow morning and stop all
 day--we will hate the profane vulgar and make us Wings.
 
 God bless you.
 
 J. KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXVI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Wednesday [December 30, 1818].
 
 My dear Fanny--I am confined at Hampstead with a sore throat; but I do not
 expect it will keep me above two or three days. I intended to have been in
 Town yesterday but feel obliged to be careful a little while. I am in
 general so careless of these trifles, that they tease me for Months, when
 a few days' care is all that is necessary. I shall not neglect any chance
 of an endeavour to let you return to School--nor to procure you a Visit to
 Mrs. Dilke's which I have great fears about. Write me if you can find
 time--and also get a few lines ready for George as the Post sails next
 Wednesday.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXVII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Monday Aft. [January 4, 1819].
 
 My dear Haydon--I have been out this morning, and did not therefore see
 your note till this minute, or I would have gone to town directly--it is
 now too late for to-day. I will be in town early to-morrow, and trust I
 shall be able to lend you assistance noon or night. I was struck with the
 improvement in the architectural part of your Picture--and, now I think on
 it, I cannot help wondering you should have had it so poor, especially
 after the Solomon. Excuse this dry bones of a note: for though my pen may
 grow cold, I should be sorry my Life should freeze--
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXVIII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, [between January 7 and 14, 1819].
 
 My dear Haydon--We are very unlucky--I should have stopped to dine with
 you, but I knew I should not have been able to leave you in time for my
 plaguy sore throat; which is getting well.
 
 I shall have a little trouble in procuring the Money and a great ordeal to
 go through--no trouble indeed to any one else--or ordeal either. I mean I
 shall have to go to town some thrice, and stand in the Bank an hour or
 two--to me worse than anything in Dante--I should have less chance with
 the people around me than Orpheus had with the Stones. I have been writing
 a little now and then lately: but nothing to speak of--being discontented
 and as it were moulting. Yet I do not think I shall ever come to the rope
 or the Pistol, for after a day or two's melancholy, although I smoke more
 and more my own insufficiency--I see by little and little more of what is
 to be done, and how it is to be done, should I ever be able to do it. On
 my soul, there should be some reward for that continual _agonie
 ennuyeuse_. I was thinking of going into Hampshire for a few days. I have
 been delaying it longer than I intended. You shall see me soon; and do not
 be at all anxious, for _this_ time I really will do, what I never did
 before in my life, business in good time, and properly.--With respect to
 the Bond--it may be a satisfaction to you to let me have it: but as you
 love me do not let there be any mention of interest, although we are
 mortal men--and bind ourselves for fear of death.
 
 Yours for ever
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXIX.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, [January 1819].
 
 My dear Haydon--My throat has not suffered me yet to expose myself to the
 night air: however I have been to town in the day time--have had several
 interviews with my guardian--have written him rather a plain-spoken
 Letter--which has had its effect; and he now seems inclined to put no
 stumbling-block in my way: so that I see a good prospect of performing my
 promise. What I should have lent you ere this if I could have got it, was
 belonging to poor Tom--and the difficulty is whether I am to inherit it
 before my Sister is of age; a period of six years. Should it be so I must
 incontinently take to Corduroy Trousers. But I am nearly confident 'tis
 all a Bam. I shall see you soon--but do let me have a line to-day or
 to-morrow concerning your health and spirits.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XC.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, [January 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--I send this to Walthamstow for fear you should not be at
 Pancras Lane when I call to-morrow--before going into Hampshire for a few
 days--I will not be more I assure you--You may think how disappointed I
 am in not being able to see you more and spend more time with you than I
 do--but how can it be helped? The thought is a continual vexation to
 me--and often hinders me from reading and composing--Write to me as often
 as you can--and believe me,
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 XCI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Feb{y.} [11, 1819]. Thursday.
 
 My dear Fanny--Your Letter to me at Bedhampton hurt me very much,--What
 objection can there be to your receiving a Letter from me? At Bedhampton I
 was unwell and did not go out of the Garden Gate but twice or thrice
 during the fortnight I was there--Since I came back I have been taking
 care of myself--I have been obliged to do so, and am now in hopes that by
 this care I shall get rid of a sore throat which has haunted me at
 intervals nearly a twelvemonth. I had always a presentiment of not being
 able to succeed in persuading Mr. Abbey to let you remain longer at
 School--I am very sorry that he will not consent. I recommend you to keep
 up all that you know and to learn more by yourself however little. The
 time will come when you will be more pleased with Life--look forward to
 that time and, though it may appear a trifle be careful not to let the
 idle and retired Life you lead fix any awkward habit or behaviour on
 you--whether you sit or walk endeavour to let it be in a seemly and if
 possible a graceful manner. We have been very little together: but you
 have not the less been with me in thought. You have no one in the world
 besides me who would sacrifice anything for you--I feel myself the only
 Protector you have. In all your little troubles think of me with the
 thought that there is at least one person in England who if he could would
 help you out of them--I live in hopes of being able to make you happy.--I
 should not perhaps write in this manner, if it were not for the fear of
 not being able to see you often or long together. I am in hopes Mr. Abbey
 will not object any more to your receiving a letter now and then from me.
 How unreasonable! I want a few more lines from you for George--there are
 some young Men, acquaintances of a Schoolfellow of mine, going out to
 Birkbeck's at the latter end of this Month--I am in expectation every day
 of hearing from George--I begin to fear his last letters miscarried. I
 shall be in town to-morrow--if you should not be in town, I shall send
 this little parcel by the Walthamstow Coach--I think you will like
 Goldsmith--Write me soon--
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 Mrs. Dilke has not been very well--she is gone a walk to town to-day for
 exercise.
 
 
 
 
 XCII.--TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS.
 
 
 Sunday Morn{g.} February 14, [1819].
 
 My dear Brother and Sister--How is it that we have not heard from you from
 the Settlement yet? The letters must surely have miscarried. I am in
 expectation every day. Peachey wrote me a few days ago, saying some more
 acquaintances of his were preparing to set out for Birkbeck; therefore, I
 shall take the opportunity of sending you what I can muster in a sheet or
 two. I am still at Wentworth Place--indeed, I have kept indoors lately,
 resolved if possible to rid myself of my sore throat; consequently I have
 not been to see your Mother since my return from Chichester; but my
 absence from her has been a great weight upon me. I say since my return
 from Chichester--I believe I told you I was going thither. I was nearly a
 fortnight at Mr. John Snook's and a few days at old Mr. Dilke's. Nothing
 worth speaking of happened at either place. I took down some thin paper
 and wrote on it a little poem called St. Agnes's Eve, which you shall have
 as it is when I have finished the blank part of the rest for you. I went
 out twice at Chichester to dowager Card parties. I see very little now,
 and very few persons, being almost tired of men and things. Brown and
 Dilke are very kind and considerate towards me. The Miss R.'s have been
 stopping next door lately, but are very dull. Miss Brawne and I have every
 now and then a chat and a tiff. Brown and Dilke are walking round their
 garden, hands in pockets, making observations. The literary world I know
 nothing about. There is a poem from Rogers dead born; and another satire
 is expected from Byron, called "Don Giovanni." Yesterday I went to town
 for the first time for these three weeks. I met people from all parts and
 of all sets--Mr. Towers, one of the Holts, Mr. Dominie Williams, Mr.
 Woodhouse, Mrs. Hazlitt and son, Mrs. Webb, and Mrs. Septimus Brown. Mr.
 Woodhouse was looking up at a book window in Newgate Street, and, being
 short-sighted, twisted his muscles into so queer a stage that I stood by
 in doubt whether it was him or his brother, if he has one, and turning
 round, saw Mrs. Hazlitt, with that little Nero, her son. Woodhouse, on his
 features subsiding, proved to be Woodhouse, and not his brother. I have
 had a little business with Mr. Abbey from time to time; he has behaved to
 me with a little Brusquerie: this hurt me a little, especially when I knew
 him to be the only man in England who dared to say a thing to me I did not
 approve of without its being resented, or at least noticed--so I wrote him
 about it, and have made an alteration in my favour--I expect from this to
 see more of Fanny, who has been quite shut out from me. I see Cobbett has
 been attacking the Settlement, but I cannot tell what to believe, and
 shall be all out at elbows till I hear from you. I am invited to Miss
 Millar's birthday dance on the 19th--I am nearly sure I shall not be able
 to go. A dance would injure my throat very much. I see very little of
 Reynolds. Hunt, I hear, is going on very badly--I mean in money matters.
 I shall not be surprised to hear of the worst. Haydon too, in consequence
 of his eyes, is out at elbows. I live as prudently as it is possible for
 me to do. I have not seen Haslam lately. I have not seen Richards for this
 half year, Rice for three months, or Charles Cowden Clarke for God knows
 when.
 
 When I last called in Henrietta Street[88] Miss Millar was very unwell,
 and Miss Waldegrave as staid and self-possessed as usual. Henry was well.
 There are two new tragedies--one by the apostate Maw, and one by Miss Jane
 Porter. Next week I am going to stop at Taylor's for a few days, when I
 will see them both and tell you what they are. Mr. and Mrs. Bentley are
 well, and all the young carrots. I said nothing of consequence passed at
 Snook's--no more than this--that I like the family very much. Mr. and Mrs.
 Snook were very kind We used to have a little religion and politics
 together almost every evening,--and sometimes about you. He proposed
 writing out for me his experience in farming, for me to send to you. If I
 should have an opportunity of talking to him about it, I will get all I
 can at all events; but you may say in your answer to this what value you
 place upon such information. I have not seen Mr. Lewis lately, for I have
 shrank from going up the hill. Mr. Lewis went a few mornings ago to town
 with Mrs. Brawne. They talked about me, and I heard that Mr. L. said a
 thing I am not at all contented with. Says he, "O, he is quite the little
 poet." Now this is abominable--You might as well say Buonaparte is quite
 the little soldier. You see what it is to be under six foot and not a
 lord. There is a long fuzz to-day in the Examiner about a young man who
 delighted a young woman with a valentine--I think it must be Ollier's.
 Brown and I are thinking of passing the summer at Brussels--If we do, we
 shall go about the first of May. We--_i.e._ Brown and I--sit opposite one
 another all day authorizing (_N.B._, an "s" instead of a "z" would give a
 different meaning). He is at present writing a story of an old woman who
 lived in a forest, and to whom the Devil or one of his aides-de-feu came
 one night very late and in disguise. The old dame sets before him pudding
 after pudding--mess after mess--which he devours, and moreover casts his
 eyes up at a side of Bacon hanging over his head, and at the same time
 asks if her Cat is a Rabbit. On going he leaves her three pips of Eve's
 Apple, and somehow she, having lived a virgin all her life, begins to
 repent of it, and wished herself beautiful enough to make all the world
 and even the other world fall in love with her. So it happens, she sets
 out from her smoky cottage in magnificent apparel.--The first City she
 enters, every one falls in love with her, from the Prince to the
 Blacksmith. A young gentleman on his way to the Church to be married
 leaves his unfortunate Bride and follows this nonsuch--A whole regiment of
 soldiers are smitten at once and follow her--A whole convent of Monks in
 Corpus Christi procession join the soldiers.--The mayor and corporation
 follow the same road--Old and young, deaf and dumb,--all but the
 blind,--are smitten, and form an immense concourse of people, who----what
 Brown will do with them I know not. The devil himself falls in love with
 her, flies away with her to a desert place, in consequence of which she
 lays an infinite number of eggs--the eggs being hatched from time to time,
 fill the world with many nuisances, such as John Knox, George Fox, Johanna
 Southcote, and Gifford.
 
 There have been within a fortnight eight failures of the highest
 consequence in London. Brown went a few evenings since to Davenport's, and
 on his coming in he talked about bad news in the city with such a face I
 began to think of a national bankruptcy. I did not feel much surprised and
 was rather disappointed. Carlisle, a bookseller on the Hone principle, has
 been issuing pamphlets from his shop in Fleet Street called the Deist. He
 was conveyed to Newgate last Thursday; he intends making his own defence.
 I was surprised to hear from Taylor the amount of money of the
 bookseller's last sale. What think you of L25,000? He sold 4000 copies of
 Lord Byron. I am sitting opposite the Shakspeare I brought from the Isle
 of Wight--and I never look at him but the silk tassels on it give me as
 much pleasure as the face of the poet itself.[89]
 
 In my next packet, as this is one by the way, I shall send you the Pot of
 Basil, St. Agnes Eve, and if I should have finished it, a little thing
 called the Eve of St. Mark. You see what fine Mother Radcliff names I
 have--it is not my fault--I do not search for them. I have not gone on
 with Hyperion--for to tell the truth I have not been in great cue for
 writing lately--I must wait for the spring to rouse me up a little. The
 only time I went out from Bedhampton was to see a chapel
 consecrated--Brown, I, and John Snook the boy, went in a chaise behind a
 leaden horse. Brown drove, but the horse did not mind him. This chapel is
 built by a Mr. Way, a great Jew converter, who in that line has spent one
 hundred thousand pounds. He maintains a great number of poor Jews--_Of
 course his communion plate was stolen_. He spoke to the clerk about
 it--The clerk said he was very sorry, adding, "_I dare shay, your honour,
 it's among ush_."
 
 The chapel is built in Mr. Way's park. The consecration was not amusing.
 There were numbers of carriages--and his house crammed with clergy--They
 sanctified the Chapel, and it being a wet day, consecrated the
 burial-ground through the vestry window. I begin to hate parsons; they did
 not make me love them that day when I saw them in their proper colours. A
 parson is a Lamb in a drawing-room, and a Lion in a vestry. The notions of
 Society will not permit a parson to give way to his temper in any
 shape--So he festers in himself--his features get a peculiar, diabolical,
 self-sufficient, iron stupid expression. He is continually acting--his
 mind is against every man, and every man's mind is against him--He is a
 hypocrite to the Believer and a coward to the unbeliever--He must be
 either a knave or an idiot--and there is no man so much to be pitied as an
 idiot parson. The soldier who is cheated into an Esprit du Corps by a red
 coat, a band, and colours, for the purpose of nothing, is not half so
 pitiable as the parson who is led by the nose by the Bench of Bishops and
 is smothered in absurdities--a poor necessary subaltern of the Church.
 
 
 Friday, Feb{y.} 18.
 
 The day before yesterday I went to Romney Street--your Mother was not at
 home--but I have just written her that I shall see her on Wednesday. I
 call'd on Mr. Lewis this morning--he is very well--and tells me not to be
 uneasy about Letters, the chances being so arbitrary. He is going on as
 usual among his favourite democrat papers. We had a chat as usual about
 Cobbett and the Westminster electors. Dilke has lately been very much
 harrassed about the manner of educating his son--he at length decided for
 a public school--and then he did not know what school--he at last has
 decided for Westminster; and as Charley is to be a day boy, Dilke will
 remove to Westminster. We lead very quiet lives here--Dilke is at present
 in Greek histories and antiquities, and talks of nothing but the electors
 of Westminster and the retreat of the ten-thousand. I never drink now
 above three glasses of wine--and never any spirits and water. Though by
 the bye, the other day Woodhouse took me to his coffee house and ordered a
 Bottle of Claret--now I like Claret, whenever I can have Claret I must
 drink it,--'tis the only palate affair that I am at all sensual in. Would
 it not be a good speck to send you some vine roots--could it be done? I'll
 enquire--If you could make some wine like Claret to drink on summer
 evenings in an arbour! For really 'tis so fine--it fills one's mouth with
 a gushing freshness--then goes down cool and feverless--then you do not
 feel it quarrelling with your liver--no, it is rather a Peacemaker, and
 lies as quiet as it did in the grape; then it is as fragrant as the Queen
 Bee, and the more ethereal Part of it mounts into the brain, not
 assaulting the cerebral apartments like a bully in a bad-house looking for
 his trull and hurrying from door to door bouncing against the wainstcoat,
 but rather walks like Aladdin about his own enchanted palace so gently
 that you do not feel his step. Other wines of a heavy and spirituous
 nature transform a Man to a Silenus: this makes him a Hermes--and gives a
 Woman the soul and immortality of Ariadne, for whom Bacchus always kept a
 good cellar of claret--and even of that he could never persuade her to
 take above two cups. I said this same claret is the only palate-passion I
 have--I forgot game--I must plead guilty to the breast of a Partridge, the
 back of a hare, the backbone of a grouse, the wing and side of a Pheasant
 and a Woodcock _passim_. Talking of game (I wish I could make it), the
 Lady whom I met at Hastings and of whom I said something in my last I
 think has lately made me many presents of game, and enabled me to make as
 many. She made me take home a Pheasant the other day, which I gave to Mrs.
 Dilke; on which to-morrow Rice, Reynolds and the Wentworthians will dine
 next door. The next I intend for your Mother. These moderate sheets of
 paper are much more pleasant to write upon than those large thin sheets
 which I hope you by this time have received--though that can't be, now I
 think of it. I have not said in any Letter yet a word about my affairs--in
 a word I am in no despair about them--my poem has not at all succeeded; in
 the course of a year or so I think I shall try the public again--in a
 selfish point of view I should suffer my pride and my contempt of public
 opinion to hold me silent--but for yours and Fanny's sake I will pluck up
 a spirit and try again. I have no doubt of success in a course of years if
 I persevere--but it must be patience, for the Reviews have enervated and
 made indolent men's minds--few think for themselves. These Reviews too are
 getting more and more powerful, especially the Quarterly--they are like a
 superstition which the more it prostrates the Crowd and the longer it
 continues the more powerful it becomes just in proportion to their
 increasing weakness. I was in hopes that when people saw, as they must do
 now, all the trickery and iniquity of these Plagues they would scout them,
 but no, they are like the spectators at the Westminster cock-pit--they
 like the battle and do not care who wins or who loses. Brown is going on
 this morning with the story of his old woman and the Devil--He makes but
 slow progress--The fact is it is a Libel on the Devil, and as that person
 is Brown's Muse, look ye, if he libels his own Muse how can he expect to
 write? Either Brown or his Muse must turn tail. Yesterday was Charley
 Dilke's birthday. Brown and I were invited to tea. During the evening
 nothing passed worth notice but a little conversation between Mrs. Dilke
 and Mrs. Brawne. The subject was the Watchman. It was ten o'clock, and
 Mrs. Brawne, who lived during the summer in Brown's house and now lives in
 the Road, recognised her old Watchman's voice, and said that he came as
 far as her now. "Indeed," said Mrs. D., "does he turn the Corner?" There
 have been some Letters passed between me and Haslam but I have not seen
 him lately. The day before yesterday--which I made a day of Business--I
 called upon him--he was out as usual. Brown has been walking up and down
 the room a-breeding--now at this moment he is being delivered of a
 couplet, and I daresay will be as well as can be expected. Gracious--he
 has twins!
 
 I have a long story to tell you about Bailey--I will say first the
 circumstances as plainly and as well as I can remember, and then I will
 make my comment. You know that Bailey was very much cut up about a little
 Jilt in the country somewhere. I thought he was in a dying state about it
 when at Oxford with him: little supposing, as I have since heard, that he
 was at that very time making impatient Love to Marian Reynolds--and guess
 my astonishment at hearing after this that he had been trying at Miss
 Martin. So Matters have been--So Matters stood--when he got ordained and
 went to a Curacy near Carlisle, where the family of the Gleigs reside.
 There his susceptible heart was conquered by Miss Gleig--and thereby all
 his connections in town have been annulled--both male and female. I do not
 now remember clearly the facts--These however I know--He showed his
 correspondence with Marian to Gleig, returned all her Letters and asked
 for his own--he also wrote very abrupt Letters to Mrs. Reynolds. I do not
 know any more of the Martin affair than I have written above. No doubt his
 conduct has been very bad. The great thing to be considered is--whether it
 is want of delicacy and principle or want of knowledge and polite
 experience. And again weakness--yes, that is it; and the want of a
 Wife--yes, that is it; and then Marian made great Bones of him although
 her Mother and sister have teased her very much about it. Her conduct has
 been very upright throughout the whole affair--She liked Bailey as a
 Brother but not as a Husband--especially as he used to woo her with the
 Bible and Jeremy Taylor under his arm--they walked in no grove but Jeremy
 Taylor's. Marian's obstinacy is some excuse, but his so quickly taking to
 Miss Gleig can have no excuse--except that of a Ploughman who wants a
 wife. The thing which sways me more against him than anything else is
 Rice's conduct on the occasion; Rice would not make an immature resolve:
 he was ardent in his friendship for Bailey, he examined the whole for and
 against minutely; and he has abandoned Bailey entirely. All this I am not
 supposed by the Reynoldses to have any hint of. It will be a good lesson
 to the Mother and Daughters--nothing would serve but Bailey. If you
 mentioned the word Tea-pot some one of them came out with an a propros
 about Bailey--noble fellow--fine fellow! was always in their mouths--This
 may teach them that the man who ridicules romance is the most romantic of
 Men--that he who abuses women and slights them loves them the most--that
 he who talks of roasting a Man alive would not do it when it came to the
 push--and above all, that they are very shallow people who take everything
 literally. A Man's life of any worth is a continual allegory, and very few
 eyes can see the Mystery of his life--a life like the scriptures,
 figurative--which such people can no more make out than they can the
 Hebrew Bible. Lord Byron cuts a figure but he is not figurative--Shakspeare
 led a life of Allegory: his works are the comments on it--
 
 
 March 12, Friday.
 
 I went to town yesterday chiefly for the purpose of seeing some young Men
 who were to take some Letters for us to you--through the medium of
 Peachey. I was surprised and disappointed at hearing they had changed
 their minds, and did not purpose going so far as Birkbeck's. I was much
 disappointed, for I had counted upon seeing some persons who were to see
 you--and upon your seeing some who had seen me. I have not only lost this
 opportunity, but the sail of the Post-Packet to New York or Philadelphia,
 by which last your Brothers have sent some Letters. The weather in town
 yesterday was so stifling that I could not remain there though I wanted
 much to see Kean in Hotspur. I have by me at present Hazlitt's Letter to
 Gifford--perhaps you would like an extract or two from the high-seasoned
 parts. It begins thus:
 
      "Sir, you have an ugly trick of saying what is not true of any one
      you do not like; and it will be the object of this Letter to cure you
      of it. You say what you please of others; it is time you were told
      what you are. In doing this give me leave to borrow the familiarity
      of your style:--for the fidelity of the picture I shall be
      answerable. You are a little person but a considerable cat's paw; and
      so far worthy of notice. Your clandestine connection with persons
      high in office constantly influences your opinions and alone gives
      importance to them. You are the government critic, a character nicely
      differing from that of a government spy--the invisible link which
      connects literature with the Police."
 
 Again:
 
      "Your employers, Mr. Gifford, do not pay their hirelings for
      nothing--for condescending to notice weak and wicked sophistry; for
      pointing out to contempt what excites no admiration; for cautiously
      selecting a few specimens of bad taste and bad grammar where nothing
      else is to be found. They want your invisible pertness, your
      mercenary malice, your impenetrable dulness, your bare-faced
      impudence, your pragmatical self-sufficiency, your hypocritical zeal,
      your pious frauds to stand in the gap of their Prejudices and
      pretensions to fly-blow and taint public opinion, to defeat
      independent efforts, to apply not the touch of the scorpion but the
      touch of the Torpedo to youthful hopes, to crawl and leave the slimy
      track of sophistry and lies over every work that does not dedicate
      its sweet leaves to some Luminary of the treasury bench, or is not
      fostered in the hotbed of corruption. This is your office; 'this is
      what is look'd for at your hands, and this you do not baulk'--to
      sacrifice what little honesty and prostitute what little intellect
      you possess to any dirty job you are commission'd to execute. 'They
      keep you as an ape does an apple in the corner of his jaw, first
      mouth'd to be at last swallow'd.' You are by appointment literary
      toadeater to greatness and taster to the court. You have a natural
      aversion to whatever differs from your own pretensions, and an
      acquired one for what gives offence to your superiors. Your vanity
      panders to your interest, and your malice truckles only to your love
      of Power. If your instructive or premeditated abuse of your enviable
      trust were found wanting in a single instance; if you were to make a
      single slip in getting up your select committee of enquiry and green
      bag report of the state of Letters, your occupation would be gone.
      You would never after obtain a squeeze of the hand from acquaintance,
      or a smile from a Punk of Quality. The great and powerful whom you
      call wise and good do not like to have the privacy of their self-love
      startled by the obtrusive and unmanageable claims of Literature and
      Philosophy, except through the intervention of people like you, whom,
      if they have common penetration, they soon find out to be without any
      superiority of intellect; or if they do not, whom they can despise
      for their meanness of soul. You 'have the office opposite to Saint
      Peter.' You keep a corner in the public mind for foul prejudice and
      corrupt power to knot and gender in; you volunteer your services to
      people of quality to ease scruples of mind and qualms of conscience;
      you lay the flattering unction of venal prose and laurell'd verse to
      their souls. You persuade them that there is neither purity of
      morals, nor depth of understanding except in themselves and their
      hangers-on; and would prevent the unhallow'd names of Liberty and
      humanity from ever being whispered in ears polite! You, sir, do you
      not all this? I cry you mercy then: I took you for the Editor of the
      Quarterly Review."
 
 This is the sort of feu de joie he keeps up. There is another extract or
 two--one especially which I will copy to-morrow--for the candles are burnt
 down and I am using the wax taper--which has a long snuff on it--the fire
 is at its last click--I am sitting with my back to it with one foot rather
 askew upon the rug and the other with the heel a little elevated from the
 carpet--I am writing this on the Maid's Tragedy, which I have read since
 tea with great pleasure--Besides this volume of Beaumont and Fletcher,
 there are on the table two volumes of Chaucer and a new work of Tom
 Moore's, called Tom Cribb's Memorial to Congress--nothing in it. These are
 trifles--but I require nothing so much of you but that you will give one a
 like description of yourselves, however it may be when you are writing to
 me. Could I see the same thing done of any great Man long since dead it
 would be a great delight: as to know in what position Shakspeare sat when
 he began "To be or not to be"--such things become interesting from
 distance of time or place. I hope you are both now in that sweet sleep
 which no two beings deserve more than you do--I must fancy so--and please
 myself in the fancy of speaking a prayer and a blessing over you and your
 lives--God bless you--I whisper good-night in your ears, and you will
 dream of me.
 
 
 March 13, Saturday.
 
 I have written to Fanny this morning and received a note from Haslam. I
 was to have dined with him to-morrow: he gives me a bad account of his
 Father, who has not been in Town for five weeks, and is not well enough
 for company. Haslam is well--and from the prosperous state of some love
 affair he does not mind the double tides he has to work. I have been a
 Walk past west end--and was going to call at Mr. Monkhouse's--but I did
 not, not being in the humour. I know not why Poetry and I have been so
 distant lately; I must make some advances soon or she will cut me
 entirely. Hazlitt has this fine Passage in his Letter: Gifford in his
 Review of Hazlitt's characters of Shakspeare's plays attacks the
 Coriolanus critique. He says that Hazlitt has slandered Shakspeare in
 saying that he had a leaning to the arbitrary side of the question.
 Hazlitt thus defends himself,
 
      "My words are, 'Coriolanus is a storehouse of political commonplaces.
      The Arguments for and against aristocracy and democracy on the
      Privileges of the few and the claims of the many, on Liberty and
      slavery, power and the abuse of it, peace and war, are here very ably
      handled, with the spirit of a Poet and the acuteness of a
      Philosopher. Shakspeare himself seems to have had a leaning to the
      arbitrary side of the question, perhaps from some feeling of contempt
      for his own origin, and to have spared no occasion of bating the
      rabble. What he says of them is very true; what he says of their
      betters is also very true, though he dwells less upon it.' I then
      proceed to account for this by showing how it is that 'the cause of
      the people is but little calculated for a subject for poetry; or that
      the language of Poetry naturally falls in with the language of
      power.' I affirm, Sir, that Poetry, that the imagination generally
      speaking, delights in power, in strong excitement, as well as in
      truth, in good, in right, whereas pure reason and the moral sense
      approve only of the true and good. I proceed to show that this
      general love or tendency to immediate excitement or theatrical
      effect, no matter how produced, gives a Bias to the imagination often
      consistent with the greatest good, that in Poetry it triumphs over
      principle, and bribes the passions to make a sacrifice of common
      humanity. You say that it does not, that there is no such original
      Sin in Poetry, that it makes no such sacrifice or unworthy compromise
      between poetical effect and the still small voice of reason. And how
      do you prove that there is no such principle giving a bias to the
      imagination and a false colouring to poetry? Why, by asking in reply
      to the instances where this principle operates, and where no other
      can with much modesty and simplicity--'But are these the only topics
      that afford delight in Poetry, etc.?' No; but these objects do afford
      delight in poetry, and they afford it in proportion to their strong
      and often tragical effect, and not in proportion to the good
      produced, or their desireableness in a moral point of view. Do we
      read with more pleasure of the ravages of a beast of prey than of the
      Shepherd's pipe upon the Mountain? No; but we do read with pleasure
      of the ravages of a beast of prey, and we do so on the principle I
      have stated, namely, from the sense of power abstracted from the
      sense of good; and it is the same principle that makes us read with
      admiration and reconciles us in fact to the triumphant progress of
      the conquerors and mighty Hunters of mankind, who come to stop the
      Shepherd's Pipe upon the Mountains and sweep away his listening
      flock. Do you mean to deny that there is anything imposing to the
      imagination in power, in grandeur, in outward show, in the
      accumulation of individual wealth and luxury, at the expense of equal
      justice and the common weal? Do you deny that there is anything in
      the 'Pride, Pomp, and Circumstance of glorious war, that makes
      ambition virtue' in the eyes of admiring multitudes? Is this a new
      theory of the pleasures of the imagination, which says that the
      pleasures of the imagination do not take rise solely in the
      calculation of the understanding? Is it a paradox of my creating that
      'one murder makes a villain millions a Hero'? or is it not true that
      here, as in other cases, the enormity of the evil overpowers and
      makes a convert of the imagination by its very magnitude? You
      contradict my reasoning because you know nothing of the question, and
      you think that no one has a right to understand what you do not. My
      offence against purity in the passage alluded to, 'which contains the
      concentrated venom of my malignity,' is that I have admitted that
      there are tyrants and slaves abroad in the world; and you would hush
      the matter up and pretend that there is no such thing in order that
      there may be nothing else. Further, I have explained the cause, the
      subtle sophistry of the human mind, that tolerates and pampers the
      evil in order to guard against its approaches; you would conceal the
      cause in order to prevent the cure, and to leave the proud flesh
      about the heart to harden and ossify into one impenetrable mass of
      selfishness and hypocrisy, that we may not 'sympathise in the
      distresses of suffering virtue' in any case in which they come in
      competition with the fictitious wants and 'imputed weaknesses of the
      great.' You ask, 'Are we gratified by the cruelties of Domitian or
      Nero?' No, not we--they were too petty and cowardly to strike the
      imagination at a distance; but the Roman senate tolerated them,
      addressed their perpetrators, exalted them into gods, the fathers of
      the people, they had pimps and scribblers of all sorts in their pay,
      their Senecas, etc., till a turbulent rabble, thinking there were no
      injuries to Society greater than the endurance of unlimited and
      wanton oppression, put an end to the farce and abated the sin as well
      as they could. Had you and I lived in those times we should have been
      what we are now, I 'a sour malcontent,' and you 'a sweet courtier.'"
 
 The manner in which this is managed: the force and innate power with which
 it yeasts and works up itself--the feeling for the costume of society; is
 in a style of genius. He hath a demon, as he himself says of Lord Byron.
 We are to have a party this evening. The Davenports from Church Row--I
 don't think you know anything of them--they have paid me a good deal of
 attention. I like Davenport himself. The names of the rest are Miss
 Barnes, Miss Winter with the Children.
 
 
 [Later, March 17 or 18.]
 
 On Monday we had to dinner Severn and Cawthorn, the Bookseller and
 print-virtuoso; in the evening Severn went home to paint, and we other
 three went to the play, to see Sheil's new tragedy ycleped Evadne. In the
 morning Severn and I took a turn round the Museum--There is a Sphinx there
 of a giant size, and most voluptuous Egyptian expression, I had not seen
 it before. The play was bad even in comparison with 1818, the Augustan age
 of the Drama, "comme on sait," as Voltaire says--the whole was made up of
 a virtuous young woman, an indignant brother, a suspecting lover, a
 libertine prince, a gratuitous villain, a street in Naples, a Cypress
 grove, lilies and roses, virtue and vice, a bloody sword, a spangled
 jacket, one Lady Olivia, one Miss O'Neil alias Evadne, alias Bellamira,
 alias--Alias--Yea, and I say unto you a greater than Elias--There was
 Abbot, and talking of Abbot his name puts me in mind of a spelling-book
 lesson, descriptive of the whole Dramatis personae--Abbot--Abbess--Actor--
 Actress--The play is a fine amusement, as a friend of mine once said to
 me--"Do what you will," says he, "a poor gentleman who wants a guinea,
 cannot spend his two shillings better than at the playhouse." The
 pantomime was excellent, I had seen it before and I enjoyed it again. Your
 Mother and I had some talk about Miss H.---- Says I, will Henry have that
 Miss ----, a lath with a boddice, she who has been fine drawn--fit for
 nothing but to cut up into Cribbage pins, to the tune of 15.2; one who is
 all muslin; all feathers and bone; once in travelling she was made use of
 as a lynch pin; I hope he will not have her, though it is no uncommon
 thing to be _smitten with a staff_; though she might be very useful as his
 walking-stick, his fishing-rod, his tooth-pik, his hat-stick (she runs so
 much in his head)--let him turn farmer, she would cut into hurdles; let
 him write poetry, she would be his turn-style. Her gown is like a flag on
 a pole; she would do for him if he turn freemason; I hope she will prove a
 flag of truce; when she sits languishing with her one foot on a stool, and
 one elbow on the table, and her head inclined, she looks like the sign of
 the crooked billet--or the frontispiece to Cinderella, or a tea-paper
 wood-cut of Mother Shipton at her studies; she is a make-believe--She is
 bona _s_ide a thin young 'oman--But this is mere talk of a
 fellow-creature; yet pardie I would not that Henry have her--Non volo ut
 eam possideat, nam, for, it would be a bam, for it would be a sham--
 
 Don't think I am writing a petition to the Governors of St. Luke--no, that
 would be in another style. May it please your Worships; forasmuch as the
 undersigned has committed, transferred, given up, made over, consigned,
 and aberrated himself, to the art and mystery of poetry; forasmuch as he
 hath cut, rebuffed, affronted, huffed, and shirked, and taken stint at,
 all other employments, arts, mysteries, and occupations, honest, middling,
 and dishonest; forasmuch as he hath at sundry times and in divers places,
 told truth unto the men of this generation, and eke to the women;
 moreover, forasmuch as he hath kept a pair of boots that did not fit, and
 doth not admire Sheil's play, Leigh Hunt, Tom Moore, Bob Southey, and Mr.
 Rogers; and does admire Wm. Hazlitt; moreoverer for as more as he liketh
 half of Wordsworth, and none of Crabbe; moreover-est for as most as he
 hath written this page of penmanship--he prayeth your Worships to give him
 a lodging--Witnessed by Rd. Abbey and Co., cum familiaribus et
 consanguineis (signed) Count de Cockaigne.
 
 The nothing of the day is a machine called the velocipede. It is a wheel
 carriage to ride cock-horse upon, sitting astride and pushing it along
 with the toes, a rudder wheel in hand--they will go seven miles an hour--A
 handsome gelding will come to eight guineas; however they will soon be
 cheaper, unless the army takes to them. I look back upon the last month, I
 find nothing to write about; indeed I do not recollect anything particular
 in it. It's all alike; we keep on breathing. The only amusement is a
 little scandal, of however fine a shape, a laugh at a pun--and then after
 all we wonder how we could enjoy the scandal, or laugh at the pun.
 
 I have been at different times turning it in my head whether I should go
 to Edinburgh and study for a physician; I am afraid I should not take
 kindly to it; I am sure I could not take fees--and yet I should like to do
 so; it's not worse than writing poems, and hanging them up to be fly-blown
 on the Review shambles. Everybody is in his own mess. Here is the parson
 at Hampstead quarrelling with all the world, he is in the wrong by this
 same token; when the black cloth was put up in the Church for the Queen's
 mourning, he asked the workmen to hang it the wrong side outwards, that it
 might be better when taken down, it being his perquisite--Parsons will
 always keep up their character, but as it is said there are some animals
 the ancients knew which we do not, let us hope our posterity will miss the
 black badger with tri-cornered hat; Who knows but some Reviewer of Buffon
 or Pliny may put an account of the parson in the Appendix; No one will
 then believe it any more than we believe in the Phoenix. I think we may
 class the lawyer in the same natural history of Monsters; a green bag will
 hold as much as a lawn sleeve. The only difference is that one is fustian
 and the other flimsy; I am not unwilling to read Church history at present
 and have Milner's in my eye; his is reckoned a very good one.
 
 
 18th September 1819.
 
 [In looking over some of my papers I found the above specimen of my
 carelessness. It is a sheet you ought to have had long ago--my letter must
 have appeared very unconnected, but as I number the sheets you must have
 discovered how the mistake happened. How many things have happened since I
 wrote it--How have I acted contrary to my resolves. The interval between
 writing this sheet and the day I put this supplement to it, has been
 completely filled with generous and most friendly actions of Brown towards
 me. How frequently I forget to speak of things which I think of and feel
 most. 'Tis very singular, the idea about Buffon above has been taken up by
 Hunt in the Examiner, in some papers which he calls "A Preter-natural
 History."][90]
 
 
 Friday 19th March.
 
 This morning I have been reading "the False One." Shameful to say, I was
 in bed at ten--I mean this morning. The Blackwood Reviewers have committed
 themselves in a scandalous heresy--they have been putting up Hogg, the
 Ettrick Shepherd, against Burns: the senseless villains! The Scotch cannot
 manage themselves at all, they want imagination, and that is why they are
 so fond of Hogg, who has a little of it. This morning I am in a sort of
 temper, indolent and supremely careless--I long after a Stanza or two of
 Thomson's Castle of Indolence--my passions are all asleep, from my having
 slumbered till nearly eleven, and weakened the animal fibre all over me,
 to a delightful sensation, about three degrees on this side of faintness.
 If I had teeth of pearl and the breath of lilies I should call it
 languor, but as I am[B] I must call it laziness. In this state of
 effeminacy the fibres of the brain are relaxed in common with the rest of
 the body, and to such a happy degree that pleasure has no show of
 enticement and pain no unbearable power. Neither Poetry, nor Ambition, nor
 Love have any alertness of countenance as they pass by me; they seem
 rather like figures on a Greek vase--a Man and two women whom no one but
 myself could distinguish in their disguisement.[91] This is the only
 happiness, and is a rare instance of the advantage of the body
 overpowering the Mind. I have this moment received a note from Haslam, in
 which he expects the death of his Father, who has been for some time in a
 state of insensibility; his mother bears up he says very well--I shall go
 to town to-morrow to see him. This is the world--thus we cannot expect to
 give way many hours to pleasure. Circumstances are like Clouds continually
 gathering and bursting--While we are laughing, the seed of some trouble is
 put into the wide arable land of events--while we are laughing it sprouts
 it grows and suddenly bears a poison fruit which we must pluck. Even so we
 have leisure to reason on the misfortunes of our friends; our own touch us
 too nearly for words. Very few men have ever arrived at a complete
 disinterestedness of Mind: very few have been influenced by a pure desire
 of the benefit of others,--in the greater part of the Benefactors to
 Humanity some meretricious motive has sullied their greatness--some
 melodramatic scenery has fascinated them. From the manner in which I feel
 Haslam's misfortune I perceive how far I am from any humble standard of
 disinterestedness. Yet this feeling ought to be carried to its highest
 pitch, as there is no fear of its ever injuring society--which it would
 do, I fear, pushed to an extremity. For in wild nature the Hawk would lose
 his Breakfast of Robins and the Robin his of Worms--The Lion must starve
 as well as the swallow. The greater part of Men make their way with the
 same instinctiveness, the same unwandering eye from their purposes, the
 same animal eagerness as the Hawk. The Hawk wants a Mate, so does the
 Man--look at them both, they set about it and procure one in the same
 manner. They want both a nest and they both set about one in the same
 manner--they get their food in the same manner. The noble animal Man for
 his amusement smokes his pipe--the Hawk balances about the Clouds--that is
 the only difference of their leisures. This it is that makes the Amusement
 of Life--to a speculative Mind--I go among the Fields and catch a glimpse
 of a Stoat or a fieldmouse peeping out of the withered grass--the creature
 hath a purpose, and its eyes are bright with it. I go amongst the
 buildings of a city and I see a Man hurrying along--to what? the Creature
 has a purpose and his eyes are bright with it. But then, as Wordsworth
 says, "we have all one human heart----" There is an electric fire in human
 nature tending to purify--so that among these human creatures there is
 continually some birth of new heroism. The pity is that we must wonder at
 it, as we should at finding a pearl in rubbish. I have no doubt that
 thousands of people never heard of have had hearts completely
 disinterested: I can remember but two--Socrates and Jesus--Their histories
 evince it. What I heard a little time ago, Taylor observe with respect to
 Socrates, may be said of Jesus--That he was so great a man that though he
 transmitted no writing of his own to posterity, we have his Mind and his
 sayings and his greatness handed to us by others. It is to be lamented
 that the history of the latter was written and revised by Men interested
 in the pious frauds of Religion. Yet through all this I see his splendour.
 Even here, though I myself am pursuing the same instinctive course as the
 veriest human animal you can think of, I am, however young, writing at
 random, straining at particles of light in the midst of a great darkness,
 without knowing the bearing of any one assertion, of any one opinion. Yet
 may I not in this be free from sin? May there not be superior beings
 amused with any graceful, though instinctive, attitude my mind may fall
 into as I am entertained with the alertness of a Stoat or the anxiety of a
 Deer? Though a quarrel in the Streets is a thing to be hated, the energies
 displayed in it are fine; the commonest Man shows a grace in his quarrel.
 By a superior Being our reasonings may take the same tone--though
 erroneous they may be fine. This is the very thing in which consists
 Poetry, and if so it is not so fine a thing as philosophy--For the same
 reason that an eagle is not so fine a thing as a truth. Give me this
 credit--Do you not think I strive--to know myself? Give me this credit,
 and you will not think that on my own account I repeat Milton's lines--
 
   "How charming is divine Philosophy,
   Not harsh and crabbed, as dull fools suppose,
   But musical as is Apollo's lute."
 
 No--not for myself--feeling grateful as I do to have got into a state of
 mind to relish them properly. Nothing ever becomes real till it is
 experienced--Even a Proverb is no proverb to you till your Life has
 illustrated it. I am ever afraid that your anxiety for me will lead you to
 fear for the violence of my temperament continually smothered down: for
 that reason I did not intend to have sent you the following sonnet--but
 look over the two last pages and ask yourselves whether I have not that in
 me which will bear the buffets of the world. It will be the best comment
 on my sonnet; it will show you that it was written with no Agony but that
 of ignorance; with no thirst of anything but Knowledge when pushed to the
 point though the first steps to it were through my human passions--they
 went away and I wrote with my Mind--and perhaps I must confess a little
 bit of my heart--
 
   Why did I laugh to-night? No voice will tell:
     No God, no Deamon of severe response
   Deigns to reply from heaven or from Hell.--
     Then to my human heart I turn at once--
   Heart! thou and I are here sad and alone;
     Say, wherefore did I laugh? O mortal pain!
   O Darkness! Darkness! ever must I moan,
     To question Heaven and Hell and Heart in vain!
   Why did I laugh? I know this being's lease,
     My fancy to its utmost blisses spreads:
   Yet could I on this very midnight cease,[92]
     And the world's gaudy ensigns see in shreds;
   Verse, fame and Beauty are intense indeed
   But Death intenser--Death is Life's high meed.
 
 I went to bed and enjoyed an uninterrupted sleep. Sane I went to bed and
 sane I arose.
 
 
 [April 15.]
 
 This is the 15th of April--you see what a time it is since I wrote; all
 that time I have been day by day expecting Letters from you. I write quite
 in the dark. In the hopes of a Letter daily I have deferred that I might
 write in the light. I was in town yesterday, and at Taylor's heard that
 young Birkbeck had been in Town and was to set forward in six or seven
 days--so I shall dedicate that time to making up this parcel ready for
 him. I wish I could hear from you to make me "whole and general as the
 casing air."[93] A few days after the 19th of April[94] I received a note
 from Haslam containing the news of his father's death. The Family has all
 been well. Haslam has his father's situation. The Framptons have behaved
 well to him. The day before yesterday I went to a rout at Sawrey's--it was
 made pleasant by Reynolds being there and our getting into conversation
 with one of the most beautiful Girls I ever saw--She gave a remarkable
 prettiness to all those commonplaces which most women who talk must
 utter--I liked Mrs. Sawrey very well. The Sunday before last your Brothers
 were to come by a long invitation--so long that for the time I forgot it
 when I promised Mrs. Brawne to dine with her on the same day. On
 recollecting my engagement with your Brothers I immediately excused myself
 with Mrs. Brawne, but she would not hear of it, and insisted on my
 bringing my friends with me. So we all dined at Mrs. Brawne's. I have been
 to Mrs. Bentley's this morning, and put all the letters to and from you
 and poor Tom and me.[95] I found some of the correspondence between him
 and that degraded Wells and Amena. It is a wretched business; I do not
 know the rights of it, but what I do know would, I am sure, affect you so
 much that I am in two minds whether I will tell you anything about it. And
 yet I do not see why--for anything, though it be unpleasant, that calls to
 mind those we still love has a compensation in itself for the pain it
 occasions--so very likely to-morrow I may set about copying the whole of
 what I have about it: with no sort of a Richardson self-satisfaction--I
 hate it to a sickness--and I am afraid more from indolence of mind than
 anything else. I wonder how people exist with all their worries. I have
 not been to Westminster but once lately, and that was to see Dilke in his
 new Lodgings--I think of living somewhere in the neighbourhood myself.
 Your mother was well by your Brothers' account. I shall see her perhaps
 to-morrow--yes I shall. We have had the Boys[96] here lately--they make a
 bit of a racket--I shall not be sorry when they go. I found also this
 morning, in a note from George to you and my dear sister a lock of your
 hair which I shall this moment put in the miniature case. A few days ago
 Hunt dined here and Brown invited Davenport to meet him, Davenport from a
 sense of weakness thought it incumbent on him to show off--and pursuant
 to that never ceased talking and boring all day till I was completely
 fagged out. Brown grew melancholy--but Hunt perceiving what a
 complimentary tendency all this had bore it remarkably well--Brown
 grumbled about it for two or three days. I went with Hunt to Sir John
 Leicester's gallery; there I saw Northcote--Hilton--Bewick, and many more
 of great and Little note. Haydon's picture is of very little progress this
 year--He talks about finishing it next year. Wordsworth is going to
 publish a Poem called Peter Bell--what a perverse fellow it is! Why will
 he talk about Peter Bells--I was told not to tell--but to you it will not
 be telling--Reynolds hearing that said Peter Bell was coming out, took it
 into his head to write a skit upon it called Peter Bell. He did it as soon
 as thought on, it is to be published this morning, and comes out before
 the real Peter Bell, with this admirable motto from the "Bold Stroke for a
 Wife" "I am the real Simon Pure." It would be just as well to trounce Lord
 Byron in the same manner. I am still at a stand in versifying--I cannot do
 it yet with any pleasure--I mean, however, to look round on my resources
 and means, and see what I can do without poetry--To that end I shall live
 in Westminster--I have no doubt of making by some means a little to help
 on, or I shall be left in the Lurch--with the burden of a little
 Pride--However I look in time. The Dilkes like their Lodgings at
 Westminster tolerably well. I cannot help thinking what a shame it is that
 poor Dilke should give up his comfortable house and garden for his Son,
 whom he will certainly ruin with too much care. The boy has nothing in his
 ears all day but himself and the importance of his education. Dilke has
 continually in his mouth "My Boy." This is what spoils princes: it may
 have the same effect with Commoners. Mrs. Dilke has been very well
 lately--But what a shameful thing it is that for that obstinate Boy Dilke
 should stifle himself in Town Lodgings and wear out his Life by his
 continual apprehension of his Boy's fate in Westminster school, with the
 rest of the Boys and the Masters. Every one has some wear and tear. One
 would think Dilke ought to be quiet and happy--but no--this one Boy makes
 his face pale, his society silent and his vigilance jealous--He would I
 have no doubt quarrel with any one who snubb'd his Boy--With all this he
 has no notion how to manage him. O what a farce is our greatest cares! Yet
 one must be in the pother for the sake of Clothes food and Lodging. There
 has been a squabble between Kean and Mr. Bucke--There are faults on both
 sides--on Bucke's the faults are positive to the Question: Kean's fault is
 a want of genteel knowledge and high Policy. The former writes knavishly
 foolish, and the other silly bombast. It was about a Tragedy written by
 said Mr. Bucke which, it appears, Mr. Kean kick'd at--it was so bad--After
 a little struggle of Mr. Bucke's against Kean, Drury Lane had the Policy
 to bring it out and Kean the impolicy not to appear in it. It was damn'd.
 The people in the Pit had a favourite call on the night of "Buck, Buck,
 rise up" and "Buck, Buck, how many horns do I hold up." Kotzebue the
 German Dramatist and traitor to his country was murdered lately by a young
 student whose name I forget--he stabbed himself immediately after crying
 out Germany! Germany! I was unfortunate to miss Richards the only time I
 have been for many months to see him.
 
 Shall I treat you with a little extempore?--
 
   When they were come into the Faery's Court
   They rang--no one at home--all gone to sport
   And dance and kiss and love as faerys do
   For Faries be as humans lovers true.
   Amid the woods they were so lone and wild,
   Where even the Robin feels himself exil'd,
   And where the very brooks, as if afraid,
   Hurry along to some less magic shade.
   'No one at home!' the fretful princess cry'd;
   'And all for nothing such a dreary ride,
   And all for nothing my new diamond cross;
   No one to see my Persian feathers toss,
   No one to see my Ape, my Dwarf, my Fool,
   Or how I pace my Otaheitan mule.
   Ape, Dwarf, and Fool, why stand you gaping there,
   Burst the door open, quick--or I declare
   I'll switch you soundly and in pieces tear.'
   The Dwarf began to tremble, and the Ape
   Star'd at the Fool, the Fool was all agape,
   The Princess grasp'd her switch, but just in time
   The dwarf with piteous face began to rhyme.
   'O mighty Princess, did you ne'er hear tell
   What your poor servants know but too too well?
   Know you the three great crimes in faery land?
   The first, alas! poor Dwarf, I understand,
   I made a whipstock of a faery's wand;
   The next is snoring in their company;
   The next, the last, the direst of the three,
   Is making free when they are not at home.
   I was a Prince--a baby prince--my doom,
   You see, I made a whipstock of a wand,
   My top has henceforth slept in faery land.
   He was a Prince, the Fool, a grown-up Prince,
   But he has never been a King's son since
   He fell a snoring at a faery Ball.
   Your poor Ape was a Prince, and he poor thing
   Picklock'd a faery's boudoir--now no king
   But ape--so pray your highness stay awhile,
   'Tis sooth indeed, we know it to our sorrow--
   Persist and _you_ may be an ape to-morrow.'
   While the Dwarf spake the Princess, all for spite,
   Peel'd the brown hazel twig to lilly white,
   Clench'd her small teeth, and held her lips apart,
   Try'd to look unconcern'd with beating heart.
   They saw her highness had made up her mind,
   A-quavering like the reeds before the wind--
   And they had had it, but O happy chance
   The Ape for very fear began to dance
   And grinn'd as all his ugliness did ache--
   She staid her vixen fingers for his sake,
   He was so very ugly: then she took
   Her pocket-mirror and began to look
   First at herself and then at him, and then
   She smil'd at her own beauteous face again.
   Yet for all this--for all her pretty face--
   She took it in her head to see the place.
   Women gain little from experience
   Either in Lovers, husbands, or expense.
   The more their beauty the more fortune too--
   Beauty before the wide world never knew--
   So each fair reasons--tho' it oft miscarries.
   She thought _her_ pretty face would please the fairies.
   'My darling Ape I won't whip you to-day,
   Give me the Picklock sirrah and go play.'
   They all three wept but counsel was as vain
   As crying cup biddy to drops of rain.
   Yet lingering by did the sad Ape forth draw
   The Picklock from the Pocket in his Jaw.
   The Princess took it, and dismounting straight
   Tripp'd in blue silver'd slippers to the gate
   And touch'd the wards, the Door full courteously
   Opened--she enter'd with her servants three.
   Again it clos'd and there was nothing seen
   But the Mule grazing on the herbage green.
 
 End of Canto XII.
 
 
 Canto the XIII.
 
   The Mule no sooner saw himself alone
   Than he prick'd up his Ears--and said 'well done;
   At least unhappy Prince I may be free--
   No more a Princess shall side-saddle me.
   O King of Otaheite--tho' a Mule,
     Aye, every inch a King'--tho' 'Fortune's fool,'
   Well done--for by what Mr. Dwarfy said
   I would not give a sixpence for her head.'
   Even as he spake he trotted in high glee
   To the knotty side of an old Pollard tree,
   And rubb'd his sides against the mossed bark
   Till his Girths burst and left him naked stark
   Except his Bridle--how get rid of that
   Buckled and tied with many a twist and plait.
   At last it struck him to pretend to sleep,
   And then the thievish Monkies down would creep
   And filch the unpleasant trammels quite away.
   No sooner thought of than adown he lay,
   Shamm'd a good snore--the Monkey-men descended,
   And whom they thought to injure they befriended.
   They hung his Bridle on a topmost bough
   And off he went run, trot, or anyhow--
 
 Brown is gone to bed--and I am tired of rhyming--there is a north wind
 blowing playing young gooseberry with the trees--I don't care so it helps
 even with a side wind a Letter to me--for I cannot put faith in any
 reports I hear of the Settlement; some are good and some bad. Last
 Sunday I took a Walk towards Highgate and in the lane that winds by the
 side of Lord Mansfield's park I met Mr. Green our Demonstrator at
 Guy's in conversation with Coleridge--I joined them, after enquiring
 by a look whether it would be agreeable--I walked with him at his
 alderman-after-dinner pace for near two miles I suppose. In those two
 Miles he broached a thousand things--let me see if I can give you a
 list--Nightingales--Poetry--on Poetical Sensation--Metaphysics--Different
 genera and species of Dreams--Nightmare--a dream accompanied by a sense of
 touch--single and double touch--a dream related--First and second
 consciousness--the difference explained between will and Volition--so say
 metaphysicians from a want of smoking the second consciousness--Monsters--
 the Kraken--Mermaids--Southey believes in them--Southey's belief too much
 diluted--a Ghost story--Good morning--I heard his voice as he came towards
 me--I heard it as he moved away--I had heard it all the interval--if it
 may be called so. He was civil enough to ask me to call on him at
 Highgate. Good-night!
 
 
 [Later, April 16 or 17.]
 
 It looks so much like rain I shall not go to town to-day: but put it off
 till to-morrow. Brown this morning is writing some Spenserian stanzas
 against Mrs., Miss Brawne and me; so I shall amuse myself with him a
 little: in the manner of Spenser--
 
   He is to weet a melancholy Carle
   Thin in the waist, with bushy head of hair
   As hath the seeded thistle when in parle
   It holds the Zephyr, ere it sendeth fair
   Its light balloons into the summer air
   Thereto his beard had not begun to bloom
   No brush had touch'd his chin or razor sheer
   No care had touch'd his cheek with mortal doom,
     But new he was and bright as scarf from Persian loom.
 
   Ne cared he for wine, or half-and-half
   Ne cared he for fish or flesh or fowl,
   And sauces held he worthless as the chaff
   He 'sdeign'd the swineherd at the wassail bowl
   Ne with lewd ribbalds sat he cheek by jowl
   Ne with sly Lemans in the scorner's chair
   But after water-brooks this Pilgrim's soul
   Panted, and all his food was woodland air
     Though he would ofttimes feast on gilliflowers rare--
 
   The slang of cities in no wise he knew
   _Tipping the wink_ to him was heathen Greek;
   He sipp'd no olden Tom or ruin blue
   Or nantz or cherry brandy drunk full meek
   By many a Damsel hoarse and rouge of cheek
   Nor did he know each aged Watchman's beat--
   Nor in obscured purlieus would he seek
   For curled Jewesses, with ankles neat
     Who as they walk abroad make tinkling with their feet.
 
 This character would ensure him a situation in the establishment of
 patient Griselda. The servant has come for the little Browns this
 morning--they have been a toothache to me which I shall enjoy the riddance
 of--Their little voices are like wasps' stings--Sometimes am I all wound
 with Browns.[97] We had a claret feast some little while ago. There were
 Dilke, Reynolds, Skinner, Mancur, John Brown, Martin, Brown and I. We all
 got a little tipsy--but pleasantly so--I enjoy Claret to a degree.
 
 
 [Later, April 18 or 19.]
 
 I have been looking over the correspondence of the pretended Amena and
 Wells this evening--I now see the whole cruel deception. I think Wells
 must have had an accomplice in it--Amena's letters are in a Man's language
 and in a Man's hand imitating a woman's. The instigations to this
 diabolical scheme were vanity, and the love of intrigue. It was no
 thoughtless hoax--but a cruel deception on a sanguine Temperament, with
 every show of friendship. I do not think death too bad for the villain.
 The world would look upon it in a different light should I expose
 it--they would call it a frolic--so I must be wary--but I consider it my
 duty to be prudently revengeful. I will hang over his head like a sword by
 a hair. I will be opium to his vanity--if I cannot injure his
 interests--He is a rat and he shall have ratsbane to his vanity--I will
 harm him all I possibly can--I have no doubt I shall be able to do so--Let
 us leave him to his misery alone, except when we can throw in a little
 more. The fifth canto of Dante pleases me more and more--it is that one in
 which he meets with Paolo and Francesca. I had passed many days in rather
 a low state of mind, and in the midst of them I dreamt of being in that
 region of Hell. The dream was one of the most delightful enjoyments I ever
 had in my life. I floated about the whirling atmosphere, as it is
 described, with a beautiful figure, to whose lips mine were joined as it
 seemed for an age--and in the midst of all this cold and darkness I was
 warm--even flowery tree-tops sprung up, and we rested on them, sometimes
 with the lightness of a cloud, till the wind blew us away again. I tried a
 sonnet upon it--there are fourteen lines, but nothing of what I felt in
 it--O that I could dream it every night--
 
   As Hermes once took to his feathers light
   When lulled Argus, baffled, swoon'd and slept,
   So on a delphic reed my idle spright
   So play'd, so charm'd, so conquer'd, so bereft
   The Dragon world of all its hundred eyes;
   And seeing it asleep, so fled away;--
   Not to pure Ida with its snow-cold skies,
   Nor unto Tempe where Jove grieved that day;
   But to that second circle of sad Hell
   Where in the gust, the whirlwind, and the flaw
   Of Rain and hailstones, lovers need not tell
   Their sorrows. Pale were the sweet lips I saw,
   Pale were the lips I kiss'd, and fair the form
   I floated with about that melancholy storm.
 
 I want very very much a little of your wit, my dear Sister--a Letter or
 two of yours just to bandy back a pun or two across the Atlantic, and send
 a quibble over the Floridas. Now you have by this time crumpled up your
 large Bonnet, what do you wear--a cap? do you put your hair in papers of a
 night? do you pay the Miss Birkbecks a morning visit--have you any tea? or
 do you milk-and-water with them--What place of Worship do you go to--the
 Quakers, the Moravians, the Unitarians, or the Methodists? Are there any
 flowers in bloom you like--any beautiful heaths--any streets full of
 Corset Makers? What sort of shoes have you to fit those pretty feet of
 yours? Do you desire Compliments to one another? Do you ride on Horseback?
 What do you have for breakfast, dinner, and supper? without mentioning
 lunch and bever,[98] and wet and snack--and a bit to stay one's stomach?
 Do you get any Spirits--now you might easily distill some whiskey--and
 going into the woods, set up a whiskey shop for the Monkeys--Do you and
 the Miss Birkbecks get groggy on anything--a little so-soish so as to be
 obliged to be seen home with a Lantern? You may perhaps have a game at
 puss in the corner--Ladies are warranted to play at this game though they
 have not whiskers. Have you a fiddle in the Settlement--or at any rate a
 Jew's harp--which will play in spite of one's teeth--When you have nothing
 else to do for a whole day I tell you how you may employ it--First get up
 and when you are dressed, as it would be pretty early with a high wind in
 the woods, give George a cold Pig with my Compliments. Then you may
 saunter into the nearest coffee-house, and after taking a dram and a look
 at the Chronicle--go and frighten the wild boars upon the strength--you
 may as well bring one home for breakfast, serving up the hoofs garnished
 with bristles and a grunt or two to accompany the singing of the
 kettle--then if George is not up give him a colder Pig always with my
 Compliments--When you are both set down to breakfast I advise you to eat
 your full share, but leave off immediately on feeling yourself inclined
 to anything on the other side of the puffy--avoid that, for it does not
 become young women--After you have eaten your breakfast keep your eye upon
 dinner--it is the safest way--You should keep a Hawk's eye over your
 dinner and keep hovering over it till due time then pounce taking care not
 to break any plates. While you are hovering with your dinner in prospect
 you may do a thousand things--put a hedgehog into George's hat--pour a
 little water into his rifle--soak his boots in a pail of water--cut his
 jacket round into shreds like a Roman kilt or the back of my grandmother's
 stays--Sew _off_ his buttons--
 
 
 [Later, April 21 or 22.]
 
 Yesterday I could not write a line I was so fatigued, for the day before I
 went to town in the morning, called on your Mother, and returned in time
 for a few friends we had to dinner. These were Taylor, Woodhouse,
 Reynolds: we began cards at about 9 o'clock, and the night coming on, and
 continuing dark and rainy, they could not think of returning to town--So
 we played at Cards till very daylight--and yesterday I was not worth a
 sixpence. Your Mother was very well but anxious for a Letter. We had half
 an hour's talk and no more, for I was obliged to be home. Mrs. and Miss
 Millar were well, and so was Miss Waldegrave. I have asked your Brothers
 here for next Sunday. When Reynolds was here on Monday he asked me to give
 Hunt a hint to take notice of his Peter Bell in the Examiner--the best
 thing I can do is to write a little notice of it myself, which I will do
 here, and copy out if it should suit my Purpose--
 
 _Peter Bell._ There have been lately advertised two Books both Peter Bell
 by name; what stuff the one was made of might be seen by the motto--"I am
 the real Simon Pure." This false Florimel has hurried from the press and
 obtruded herself into public notice, while for aught we know the real one
 may be still wandering about the woods and mountains. Let us hope she may
 soon appear and make good her right to the magic girdle. The
 Pamphleteering Archimage, we can perceive, has rather a splenetic love
 than a downright hatred to real Florimels--if indeed they had been so
 christened--or had even a pretention to play at bob cherry with Barbara
 Lewthwaite: but he has a fixed aversion to those three rhyming Graces
 Alice Fell, Susan Gale and Betty Foy; and now at length especially to
 Peter Bell--fit Apollo. It may be seen from one or two Passages in this
 little skit, that the writer of it has felt the finer parts of Mr.
 Wordsworth, and perhaps expatiated with his more remote and sublimer muse.
 This as far as it relates to Peter Bell is unlucky. The more he may love
 the sad embroidery of the Excursion, the more he will hate the coarse
 Samplers of Betty Foy and Alice Fell; and as they come from the same hand,
 the better will he be able to imitate that which can be imitated, to wit
 Peter Bell--as far as can be imagined from the obstinate Name. We repeat,
 it is very unlucky--this real Simon Pure is in parts the very Man--there
 is a pernicious likeness in the scenery, a 'pestilent humour' in the
 rhymes, and an inveterate cadence in some of the Stanzas, that must be
 lamented. If we are one part amused with this we are three parts sorry
 that an appreciator of Wordsworth should show so much temper at this
 really provoking name of Peter Bell--![99]
 
 This will do well enough--I have copied it and enclosed it to Hunt. You
 will call it a little politic--seeing I keep clear of all parties. I say
 something for and against both parties--and suit it to the tune of the
 Examiner--I meant to say I do not unsuit it--and I believe I think what I
 say, nay I am sure I do--I and my conscience are in luck to-day--which is
 an excellent thing. The other night I went to the Play with Rice,
 Reynolds, and Martin--we saw a new dull and half-damn'd opera call'd the
 'Heart of Midlothian,' that was on Saturday--I stopt at Taylor's on
 Sunday with Woodhouse--and passed a quiet sort of pleasant day. I have
 been very much pleased with the Panorama of the Ship at the North
 Pole--with the icebergs, the Mountains, the Bears, the Wolves--the seals,
 the Penguins--and a large whale floating back above water--it is
 impossible to describe the place--
 
 
 Wednesday Evening [April 28].
 
 LA BELLE DAME SANS MERCI
 
   O what can ail thee Knight at arms
     Alone and palely loitering?
   The sedge has withered from the Lake
     And no birds sing!
 
   O what can ail thee Knight at arms
     So haggard, and so woe-begone?
   The squirrel's granary is full
     And the harvest's done.
 
   I see a lily on thy brow,
     With anguish moist and fever dew,
   And on thy cheek a fading rose
     Fast Withereth too--
 
   I met a Lady in the Meads
     Full beautiful, a faery's child--
   Her hair was long, her foot was light
     And her eyes were wild--
 
   I made a Garland for her head,
     And bracelets too, and fragrant Zone
   She look'd at me as she did love
     And made sweet moan--
 
   I set her on my pacing steed
     And nothing else saw all day long,
   For sidelong would she bend and sing
     A faery's song--
 
   She found me roots of relish sweet
     And honey wild and manna dew
   And sure in language strange she said
     I love thee true--
 
   She took me to her elfin grot
     And there she wept and sigh'd full sore,
   And there I shut her wild, wild eyes
     With kisses four--
 
   And there she lulled me asleep,
     And there I dream'd Ah Woe betide!
   The latest dream I ever dreamt
     On the cold hill side.
 
   I saw pale Kings and Princes too
     Pale warriors death-pale were they all
   They cried--La belle dame sans merci
     Thee hath in thrall.
 
   I saw their starv'd lips in the gloam
     With horrid warning gaped wide,
   And I awoke, and found me here
     On the cold hill's side.
 
   And this is why I sojourn here
     Alone and palely loitering;
   Though the sedge is withered from the Lake
     And no birds sing.[100]...
 
 Why four kisses--you will say--why four, because I wish to restrain the
 headlong impetuosity of my Muse--she would have fain said "score" without
 hurting the rhyme--but we must temper the Imagination, as the Critics say,
 with Judgment. I was obliged to choose an even number, that both eyes
 might have fair play, and to speak truly I think two a piece quite
 sufficient. Suppose I had said seven there would have been three and a
 half a piece--a very awkward affair, and well got out of on my side--
 
 
 [Later.]
 
 CHORUS OF FAIRIES. 4--FIRE, AIR, EARTH, AND WATER--SALAMANDER, ZEPHYR,
 DUSKETHA, BREAMA.
 
   _Sal._   Happy happy glowing fire!
   _Zep._   Fragrant air, delicious light!
   _Dusk._  Let me to my glooms retire.
   _Bream._ I to greenweed rivers bright.
 
 _Salam._
 
   Happy, happy glowing fire!
   Dazzling bowers of soft retire,
   Ever let my nourish'd wing,
   Like a bat's still wandering,
   Faintly fan your fiery spaces
   Spirit sole in deadly places,
   In unhaunted roar and blaze
   Open eyes that never daze
   Let me see the myriad shapes
   Of Men and Beasts and Fish and apes,
   Portray'd in many a fiery den,
   And wrought by spumy bitumen
   On the deep intenser roof,
   Arched every way aloof.
   Let me breathe upon my skies,
   And anger their live tapestries;
   Free from cold and every care,
   Of chilly rain and shivering air.
 
 _Zephyr._
 
   Spright of fire--away away!
   Or your very roundelay
   Will sear my plumage newly budded
   From its quilled sheath and studded
   With the self-same dews that fell
   On the May-grown Asphodel.
   Spright of fire away away!
 
 _Breama._
 
   Spright of fire away away!
   Zephyr blue-eyed faery turn,
   And see my cool sedge-shaded urn,
   Where it rests its mossy brim
   Mid water-mint and cresses dim;
   And the flowers, in sweet troubles,
   Lift their eyes above the bubbles,
   Like our Queen when she would please
   To sleep, and Oberon will tease--
   Love me blue-eyed Faery true
   Soothly I am sick for you.
 
 _Zephyr._
 
   Gentle Breama! by the first
   Violet young nature nurst,
   I will bathe myself with thee,
   So you sometime follow me
   To my home far far in west,
   Far beyond the search and quest
   Of the golden-browed sun.
   Come with me, o'er tops of trees,
   To my fragrant Palaces,
   Where they ever-floating are
   Beneath the cherish of a star
   Call'd Vesper--who with silver veil
   Ever Hides his brilliance pale,
   Ever gently drows'd doth keep
   Twilight of the Fays to sleep.
   Fear not that your watery hair
   Will thirst in drouthy ringlets there--
   Clouds of stored summer rains
   Thou shalt taste before the stains
   Of the mountain soil they take,
   And too unlucent for thee make.
   I love thee, Crystal faery true
   Sooth I am as sick for you--
 
 _Salam._
 
   Out ye agueish Faeries out!
   Chilly Lovers, what a rout
   Keep ye with your frozen breath
   Colder than the mortal death--
   Adder-eyed Dusketha speak,
   Shall we leave them and go seek
   In the Earth's wide Entrails old
   Couches warm as their's is cold?
   O for a fiery gloom and thee,
   Dusketha, so enchantingly
   Freckle-wing'd and lizard-sided!
 
 _Dusketha._
 
   By thee Spright will I be guided
   I care not for cold or heat
   Frost and Flame or sparks or sleet
   To my essence are the same--
   But I honour more the flame--
   Spright of fire I follow thee
   Wheresoever it may be;
   To the torrid spouts and fountains,
   Underneath earth-quaked mountains
   Or at thy supreme desire,
   Touch the very pulse of fire
   With my bare unlidded eyes.
 
 _Salam._
 
   Sweet Dusketha! Paradise!
   Off ye icy Spirits fly!
   Frosty creatures of the Sky!
 
 _Dusketha._
 
   Breathe upon them fiery Spright!
 
 _Zephyr, Breama (to each other)._
 
   Away Away to our delight!
 
 _Salam._
 
   Go feed on icicles while we
   Bedded in tongued-flames will be.
 
 _Dusketha._
 
   Lead me to those fev'rous glooms,
   Spright of fire--
 
 _Breama._
 
                         Me to the blooms
   Blue-eyed Zephyr of those flowers
   Far in the west where the May cloud lours;
   And the beams of still Vesper, where winds are all whist
   Are shed through the rain and the milder mist,
   And twilight your floating bowers--
 
 I have been reading lately two very different books, Robertson's America
 and Voltaire's Siecle de Louis XIV. It is like walking arm and arm between
 Pizarro and the great-little Monarch. In how lamentable a case do we see
 the great body of the people in both instances; in the first, where Men
 might seem to inherit quiet of Mind from unsophisticated senses; from
 uncontamination of civilisation, and especially from their being, as it
 were, estranged from the mutual helps of Society and its mutual
 injuries--and thereby more immediately under the Protection of
 Providence--even there they had mortal pains to bear as bad, or even worse
 than Bailiffs, Debts, and Poverties of civilised Life. The whole appears
 to resolve into this--that Man is originally a poor forked creature
 subject to the same mischances as the beasts of the forest, destined to
 hardships and disquietude of some kind or other. If he improves by
 degrees his bodily accommodations and comforts--at each stage, at each
 ascent there are waiting for him a fresh set of annoyances--he is mortal,
 and there is still a heaven with its Stars above his head. The most
 interesting question that can come before us is, How far by the
 persevering endeavours of a seldom appearing Socrates Mankind may be made
 happy--I can imagine such happiness carried to an extreme, but what must
 it end in?--Death--and who could in such a case bear with death? The whole
 troubles of life, which are now frittered away in a series of years, would
 then be accumulated for the last days of a being who instead of hailing
 its approach would leave this world as Eve left Paradise. But in truth I
 do not at all believe in this sort of perfectibility--the nature of the
 world will not admit of it--the inhabitants of the world will correspond
 to itself. Let the fish Philosophise the ice away from the Rivers in
 winter time, and they shall be at continual play in the tepid delight of
 summer. Look at the Poles and at the Sands of Africa, whirlpools and
 volcanoes--Let men exterminate them and I will say that they may arrive at
 earthly Happiness. The point at which Man may arrive is as far as the
 parallel state in inanimate nature, and no further. For instance suppose a
 rose to have sensation, it blooms on a beautiful morning, it enjoys
 itself, but then comes a cold wind, a hot sun--it cannot escape it, it
 cannot destroy its annoyances--they are as native to the world as itself:
 no more can man be happy in spite, the worldly elements will prey upon his
 nature. The common cognomen of this world among the misguided and
 superstitious is "a vale of tears," from which we are to be redeemed by a
 certain arbitrary interposition of God and taken to Heaven--What a little
 circumscribed straightened notion! Call the world if you please "The vale
 of Soul-making." Then you will find out the use of the world (I am
 speaking now in the highest terms for human nature admitting it to be
 immortal which I will here take for granted for the purpose of showing a
 thought which has struck me concerning it) I say '_Soul-making_'--Soul as
 distinguished from an Intelligence. There may be intelligences or sparks
 of the divinity in millions--but they are not Souls till they acquire
 identities, till each one is personally itself. Intelligences are atoms of
 perception--they know and they see and they are pure, in short they are
 God--how then are Souls to be made? How then are these sparks which are
 God to have identity given them--so as ever to possess a bliss peculiar to
 each one's individual existence? How, but by the medium of a world like
 this? This point I sincerely wish to consider because I think it a grander
 system of salvation than the Christian religion--or rather it is a system
 of Spirit-creation--This is effected by three grand materials acting the
 one upon the other for a series of years--These three Materials are the
 _Intelligence_--the _human heart_ (as distinguished from intelligence or
 Mind), and the _World_ or _Elemental space_ suited for the proper action
 of _Mind and Heart_ on each other for the purpose of forming the _Soul_ or
 _Intelligence destined to possess the sense of Identity_. I can scarcely
 express what I but dimly perceive--and yet I think I perceive it--that you
 may judge the more clearly I will put it in the most homely form possible.
 I will call the _world_ a School instituted for the purpose of teaching
 little children to read--I will call the _human heart_ the _horn Book_
 used in that School--and I will call the _Child able to read, the Soul_
 made from that _School_ and its _horn book_. Do you not see how necessary
 a World of Pains and troubles is to school an Intelligence and make it a
 soul? A Place where the heart must feel and suffer in a thousand diverse
 ways. Not merely is the Heart a Hornbook, It is the Mind's Bible, it is
 the Mind's experience, it is the text from which the Mind or Intelligence
 sucks its identity. As various as the Lives of Men are--so various become
 their souls, and thus does God make individual beings, Souls, Identical
 Souls of the sparks of his own essence. This appears to me a faint sketch
 of a system of Salvation which does not offend our reason and humanity--I
 am convinced that many difficulties which Christians labour under would
 vanish before it--there is one which even now strikes me--the salvation of
 Children. In them the spark or intelligence returns to God without any
 identity--it having had no time to learn of and be altered by the
 heart--or seat of the human Passions. It is pretty generally suspected
 that the Christian scheme has been copied from the ancient Persian and
 Greek Philosophers. Why may they not have made this simple thing even more
 simple for common apprehension by introducing Mediators and Personages, in
 the same manner as in the heathen mythology abstractions are personified?
 Seriously I think it probable that this system of Soul-making may have
 been the Parent of all the more palpable and personal schemes of
 Redemption among the Zoroastrians the Christians and the Hindoos. For as
 one part of the human species must have their carved Jupiter; so another
 part must have the palpable and named Mediator and Saviour, their Christ,
 their Oromanes, and their Vishnu. If what I have said should not be plain
 enough, as I fear it may not be, I will put you in the place where I began
 in this series of thoughts--I mean I began by seeing how man was formed by
 circumstances--and what are circumstances but touchstones of his heart?
 and what are touchstones but provings of his heart, but fortifiers or
 alterers of his nature? and what is his altered nature but his Soul?--and
 what was his Soul before it came into the world and had these provings and
 alterations and perfectionings?--An intelligence without Identity--and how
 is this Identity to be made? Through the medium of the Heart? and how is
 the heart to become this Medium but in a world of Circumstances?
 
 There now I think what with Poetry and Theology, you may thank your stars
 that my pen is not very long-winded. Yesterday I received two Letters from
 your Mother and Henry, which I shall send by young Birkbeck with this.
 
 
 Friday, April 30.
 
 Brown has been here rummaging up some of my old sins--that is to say
 sonnets. I do not think you remember them, so I will copy them out, as
 well as two or three lately written. I have just written one on
 Fame--which Brown is transcribing and he has his book and mine. I must
 employ myself perhaps in a sonnet on the same subject--
 
 ON FAME
 
 _You cannot eat your cake and have it too._--Proverb.
 
   How fever'd is that Man who cannot look
     Upon his mortal days with temperate blood
   Who vexes all the leaves of his Life's book
     And robs his fair name of its maidenhood.
   It is as if the rose should pluck herself
     Or the ripe plum finger its misty bloom,
   As if a clear Lake meddling with itself
     Should cloud its clearness with a muddy gloom.
   But the rose leaves herself upon the Briar
   For winds to kiss and grateful Bees to feed,
   And the ripe plum still wears its dim attire,
   The undisturbed Lake has crystal space--
   Why then should man, teasing the world for grace
   Spoil his salvation by a fierce miscreed?
 
 ANOTHER ON FAME
 
   Fame like a wayward girl will still be coy
     To those who woo her with too slavish knees
   But makes surrender to some thoughtless boy
     And dotes the more upon a heart at ease--
   She is a Gipsy will not speak to those
     Who have not learnt to be content without her,
   A Jilt whose ear was never whisper'd close,
     Who think they scandal her who talk about her--
   A very Gipsy is she Nilus born,
   Sister-in-law to jealous Potiphar--
   Ye lovesick Bards, repay her scorn for scorn,
   Ye lovelorn Artists, madmen that ye are,
   Make your best bow to her and bid adieu,
   Then if she likes it she will follow you.
 
 TO SLEEP
 
   O soft embalmer of the still midnight
     Shutting with careful fingers and benign
   Our gloom-pleased eyes embowered from the light
     Enshaded in forgetfulness divine--
   O soothest sleep, if so it please thee close
     In midst of this thine hymn my willing eyes,
   Or wait the amen, ere thy poppy throws
     Around my bed its dewy Charities.
   Then save me or the passed day will shine
   Upon my pillow breeding many woes.
   Save me from curious conscience that still lords
   Its strength for darkness, burrowing like a Mole--
   Turn the key deftly in the oiled wards,
   And seal the hushed Casket of my soul.
 
 The following Poem--the last I have written--is the first and the only one
 with which I have taken even moderate pains. I have for the most part
 dash'd off my lines in a hurry. This I have done leisurely--I think it
 reads the more richly for it, and will I hope encourage me to write other
 things in even a more peaceable and healthy spirit. You must recollect
 that Psyche was not embodied as a goddess before the time of Apuleius the
 Platonist who lived after the Augustan age, and consequently the Goddess
 was never worshipped or sacrificed to with any of the ancient fervour--and
 perhaps never thought of in the old religion--I am more orthodox than to
 let a heathen Goddess be so neglected--
 
 ODE TO PSYCHE
 
   O Goddess hear these tuneless numbers, wrung
     By sweet enforcement and remembrance dear,
   And pardon that thy secrets should be sung
     Even into thine own soft-conched ear!
   Surely I dreamt to-day; or did I see
     The winged Psyche, with awaked eyes?
   I wandered in a forest thoughtlessly,
     And on the sudden, fainting with surprise,
   Saw two fair Creatures couched side by side
     In deepest grass, beneath the whisp'ring fan
   Of leaves and trembled blossoms, where there ran
     A Brooklet scarce espied
   'Mid hush'd, cool-rooted flowers, fragrant-eyed,
     Blue, freckle pink, and budded Syrian
   They lay, calm-breathing on the bedded grass;
     Their arms embraced and their pinions too;
   Their lips touch'd not, but had not bid adieu,
   As if disjoined by soft-handed slumber,
   And ready still past kisses to outnumber
   At tender dawn of aurorian love.
     The winged boy I knew:
   But who wast thou O happy happy dove?
     His Psyche true?
   O latest born, and loveliest vision far
     Of all Olympus' faded Hierarchy!
   Fairer than Phoebe's sapphire-region'd star,
     Or Vesper amorous glow-worm of the sky;
   Fairer than these though Temple thou hadst none,
     Nor Altar heap'd with flowers;
   Nor virgin-choir to make delicious moan
     Upon the midnight hours;
   No voice, no lute, no pipe no incense sweet
     From chain-swung Censer teeming--
   No shrine, no grove, no Oracle, no heat
     Of pale mouth'd Prophet dreaming!
 
   O Bloomiest! though too late for antique vows;
     Too, too late for the fond believing Lyre,
   When holy were the haunted forest boughs,
     Holy the Air, the water and the fire;
   Yet even in these days so far retir'd
     From happy Pieties, thy lucent fans,
   Fluttering among the faint Olympians,
     I see, and sing by my own eyes inspired.
   O let me be thy Choir and make a moan
     Upon the midnight hours;
   Thy voice, thy lute, thy pipe, thy incense sweet
     From swinged Censer teeming;
   Thy Shrine, thy Grove, thy Oracle, thy heat
     Of pale-mouth'd Prophet dreaming!
   Yes, I will be thy Priest and build a fane
     In some untrodden region of my Mind,
   Where branched thoughts, new grown with pleasant pain
     Instead of pines shall murmur in the wind.
   Far, far around shall those dark cluster'd trees
     Fledge the wild-ridged mountains steep by steep;
   And there by Zephyrs streams and birds and bees
     The moss-lain Dryads shall be lulled to sleep.
   And in the midst of this wide-quietness
     A rosy Sanctuary will I dress
   With the wreath'd trellis of a working brain;
     With buds and bells and stars without a name;
   With all the gardener-fancy e'er could feign,
     Who breeding flowers will never breed the same--
   And there shall be for thee all soft delight
     That shadowy thought can win;
   A bright torch and a casement ope at night
     To let the warm Love in.
 
   Here endethe ye Ode to Psyche.
 
 Incipit altera Sonneta
 
 I have been endeavouring to discover a better Sonnet Stanza than we have.
 The legitimate does not suit the language over well from the pouncing
 rhymes--the other kind appears too elegiac--and the couplet at the end of
 it has seldom a pleasing effect--I do not pretend to have succeeded--it
 will explain itself.
 
   If by dull rhymes our English must be chained,
   And, like Andromeda, the sonnet sweet
   Fetter'd, in spite of pained Loveliness;
   Let us find out, if we must be constrain'd,
   Sandals more interwoven and complete
   To fit the naked foot of poesy;
   Let us inspect the lyre, and weigh the stress
   Of every chord, and see what may be gain'd
   By ear industrious, and attention meet;
   Misers of sound and syllable, no less
   Than Midas of his coinage, let us be
   Jealous of dead leaves in the bay wreath crown,
   So, if we may not let the muse be free,
   She will be bound with Garlands of her own.
 
 
 [May 3.]
 
 This is the third of May, and everything is in delightful forwardness; the
 violets are not withered before the peeping of the first rose. You must
 let me know everything--how parcels go and come, what papers you have,
 and what newspapers you want, and other things. God bless you, my dear
 brother and sister.
 
 Your ever affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XCIII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place. Saturday Morn.
 
 [_Postmark_, February 27, 1819.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I intended to have not failed to do as you requested, and
 write you as you say once a fortnight. On looking to your letter I find
 there is no date; and not knowing how long it is since I received it I do
 not precisely know how great a sinner I am. I am getting quite well, and
 Mrs. Dilke is getting on pretty well. You must pay no attention to Mrs.
 Abbey's unfeeling and ignorant gabble. You can't stop an old woman's
 crying more than you can a Child's. The old woman is the greatest nuisance
 because she is too old for the rod. Many people live opposite a
 Blacksmith's till they cannot hear the hammer. I have been in Town for two
 or three days and came back last night. I have been a little concerned at
 not hearing from George--I continue in daily expectation. Keep on reading
 and play as much on the music and the grassplot as you can. I should like
 to take possession of those Grassplots for a Month or so; and send Mrs. A.
 to Town to count coffee berries instead of currant Bunches, for I want you
 to teach me a few common dancing steps--and I would buy a Watch box to
 practise them in by myself. I think I had better always pay the postage of
 these Letters. I shall send you another book the first time I am in Town
 early enough to book it with one of the morning Walthamstow Coaches. You
 did not say a word about your Chillblains. Write me directly and let me
 know about them--Your Letter shall be answered like an echo.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 XCIV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, March 13 [1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--I have been employed lately in writing to George--I do not
 send him very short letters, but keep on day after day. There were some
 young Men I think I told you of who were going to the Settlement: they
 have changed their minds, and I am disappointed in my expectation of
 sending Letters by them.--I went lately to the only dance I have been to
 these twelve months or shall go to for twelve months again--it was to our
 Brother in law's cousin's--She gave a dance for her Birthday and I went
 for the sake of Mrs. Wylie. I am waiting every day to hear from George--I
 trust there is no harm in the silence: other people are in the same
 expectation as we are. On looking at your seal I cannot tell whether it is
 done or not with a Tassie--it seems to me to be paste. As I went through
 Leicester Square lately I was going to call and buy you some, but not
 knowing but you might have some I would not run the chance of buying
 duplicates. Tell me if you have any or if you would like any--and whether
 you would rather have motto ones like that with which I seal this letter;
 or heads of great Men such as Shakspeare, Milton, etc.--or fancy pieces of
 Art; such as Fame, Adonis, etc.--those gentry you read of at the end of
 the English Dictionary. Tell me also if you want any particular Book; or
 Pencils, or drawing paper--anything but live stock. Though I will not now
 be very severe on it, remembering how fond I used to be of Goldfinches,
 Tomtits, Minnows, Mice, Ticklebacks, Dace, Cock salmons and all the whole
 tribe of the Bushes and the Brooks: but verily they are better in the
 Trees and the water--though I must confess even now a partiality for a
 handsome Globe of gold-fish--then I would have it hold 10 pails of water
 and be fed continually fresh through a cool pipe with another pipe to let
 through the floor--well ventilated they would preserve all their beautiful
 silver and Crimson. Then I would put it before a handsome painted window
 and shade it all round with myrtles and Japonicas. I should like the
 window to open onto the Lake of Geneva--and there I'd sit and read all day
 like the picture of somebody reading. The weather now and then begins to
 feel like spring; and therefore I have begun my walks on the heath again.
 Mrs. Dilke is getting better than she has been as she has at length taken
 a Physician's advice. She ever and anon asks after you and always bids me
 remember her in my Letters to you. She is going to leave Hampstead for the
 sake of educating their son Charles at the Westminster School. We (Mr.
 Brown and I) shall leave in the beginning of May; I do not know what I
 shall do or where be all the next summer. Mrs. Reynolds has had a sick
 house; but they are all well now. You see what news I can send you I
 do--we all live one day like the other as well as you do--the only
 difference is being sick and well--with the variations of single and
 double knocks, and the story of a dreadful fire in the Newspapers. I
 mentioned Mr. Brown's name--yet I do not think I ever said a word about
 him to you. He is a friend of mine of two years' standing, with whom I
 walked through Scotland: who has been very kind to me in many things when
 I most wanted his assistance and with whom I keep house till the first of
 May--you will know him some day. The name of the young Man who came with
 me is William Haslam.
 
 Ever your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XCV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [_Postmark_, Hampstead, March 24, 1819.]
 
 My dear Fanny--It is impossible for me to call on you to-day--for I have
 particular Business at the other end of the Town this morning, and must be
 back to Hampstead with all speed to keep a long agreed on appointment.
 To-morrow I shall see you.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 XCVI.--TO JOSEPH SEVERN.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Monday Aft. [March 29? 1819].
 
 My dear Severn--Your note gave me some pain, not on my own account, but on
 yours. Of course I should never suffer any petty vanity of mine to hinder
 you in any wise; and therefore I should say "put the miniature in the
 exhibition" if only myself was to be hurt. But, will it not hurt you? What
 good can it do to any future picture. Even a large picture is lost in that
 canting place--what a drop of water in the ocean is a Miniature. Those who
 might chance to see it for the most part if they had ever heard of either
 of us and know what we were and of what years would laugh at the puff of
 the one and the vanity of the other. I am however in these matters a very
 bad judge--and would advise you to act in a way that appears to yourself
 the best for your interest. As your "Hermia and Helena" is finished send
 that without the prologue of a Miniature. I shall see you soon, if you do
 not pay me a visit sooner--there's a Bull for you.
 
 Yours ever sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 XCVII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [April 13, 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--I have been expecting a Letter from you about what the
 Parson said to your answers. I have thought also of writing to you often,
 and I am sorry to confess that my neglect of it has been but a small
 instance of my idleness of late--which has been growing upon me, so that
 it will require a great shake to get rid of it. I have written nothing and
 almost read nothing--but I must turn over a new leaf. One most
 discouraging thing hinders me--we have no news yet from George--so that I
 cannot with any confidence continue the Letter I have been preparing for
 him. Many are in the same state with us and many have heard from the
 Settlement. They must be well however: and we must consider this silence
 as good news. I ordered some bulbous roots for you at the Gardener's, and
 they sent me some, but they were all in bud--and could not be sent--so I
 put them in our Garden. There are some beautiful heaths now in bloom in
 Pots--either heaths or some seasonable plants I will send you
 instead--perhaps some that are not yet in bloom that you may see them come
 out. To-morrow night I am going to a rout, a thing I am not at all in love
 with. Mr. Dilke and his Family have left Hampstead--I shall dine with them
 to-day in Westminster where I think I told you they were going to reside
 for the sake of sending their son Charles to the Westminster School. I
 think I mentioned the Death of Mr. Haslam's Father. Yesterday week the two
 Mr. Wylies dined with me. I hope you have good store of double violets--I
 think they are the Princesses of flowers, and in a shower of rain, almost
 as fine as barley sugar drops are to a schoolboy's tongue. I suppose this
 fine weather the lambs' tails give a frisk or two extraordinary--when a
 boy would cry huzza and a Girl O my! a little Lamb frisks its tail. I have
 not been lately through Leicester Square--the first time I do I will
 remember your Seals. I have thought it best to live in Town this Summer,
 chiefly for the sake of books, which cannot be had with any comfort in the
 Country--besides my Scotch journey gave me a dose of the Picturesque with
 which I ought to be contented for some time. Westminster is the place I
 have pitched upon--the City or any place very confined would soon turn me
 pale and thin--which is to be avoided. You must make up your mind to get
 stout this summer--indeed I have an idea we shall both be corpulent old
 folks with triple chins and stumpy thumbs.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 XCVIII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Tuesday [April 13, 1819].
 
 My dear Haydon--When I offered you assistance I thought I had it in my
 hand; I thought I had nothing to do but to do. The difficulties I met with
 arose from the alertness and suspicion of Abbey: and especially from the
 affairs being still in a Lawyer's hand--who has been draining our Property
 for the last six years of every charge he could make. I cannot do two
 things at once, and thus this affair has stopped my pursuits in every
 way--from the first prospect I had of difficulty. I assure you I have
 harassed myself ten times more than if I alone had been concerned in so
 much gain or loss. I have also ever told you the exact particulars as well
 as and as literally as any hopes or fear could translate them: for it was
 only by parcels that I found all those petty obstacles which for my own
 sake should not exist a moment--and yet why not--for from my own
 imprudence and neglect all my accounts are entirely in my Guardian's
 Power. This has taught me a Lesson. Hereafter I will be more correct. I
 find myself possessed of much less than I thought for and now if I had all
 on the table all I could do would be to take from it a moderate two years'
 subsistence and lend you the rest; but I cannot say how soon I could
 become possessed of it. This would be no sacrifice nor any matter worth
 thinking of--much less than parting as I have more than once done with
 little sums which might have gradually formed a library to my taste. These
 sums amount together to nearly L200, which I have but a chance of ever
 being repaid or paid at a very distant period. I am humble enough to put
 this in writing from the sense I have of your struggling situation and the
 great desire that you should do me the justice to credit me the
 unostentatious and willing state of my nerves on all such occasions. It
 has not been my fault. I am doubly hurt at the slightly reproachful tone
 of your note and at the occasion of it,--for it must be some other
 disappointment; you seem'd so sure of some important help when I last saw
 you--now you have maimed me again; I was whole, I had began reading
 again--when your note came I was engaged in a Book. I dread as much as a
 Plague the idle fever of two months more without any fruit. I will walk
 over the first fine day: then see what aspect your affairs have taken, and
 if they should continue gloomy walk into the City to Abbey and get his
 consent for I am persuaded that to me alone he will not concede a jot.
 
 
 
 
 XCIX.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Saturday.
 
 [April 17, 1819?]
 
 My dear Fanny--If it were but six o'Clock in the morning I would set off
 to see you to-day: if I should do so now I could not stop long enough for
 a how d'ye do--it is so long a walk through Hornsey and Tottenham--and as
 for Stage Coaching it besides that it is very expensive it is like going
 into the Boxes by way of the pit. I cannot go out on Sunday--but if on
 Monday it should promise as fair as to-day I will put on a pair of loose
 easy palatable boots and me rendre chez vous. I continue increasing my
 letter to George to send it by one of Birkbeck's sons who is going out
 soon--so if you will let me have a few more lines, they will be in time. I
 am glad you got on so well with Mons{r.} le Cure. Is he a nice
 clergyman?--a great deal depends upon a cock'd hat and powder--not
 gunpowder, lord love us, but lady-meal, violet-smooth, dainty-scented,
 lilly-white, feather-soft, wigsby-dressing, coat-collar-spoiling,
 whisker-reaching, pig-tail-loving, swans-down-puffing, parson-sweetening
 powder. I shall call in passing at the Tottenham nursery and see if I can
 find some seasonable plants for you. That is the nearest place--or by our
 la'kin or lady kin, that is by the virgin Mary's kindred, is there not a
 twig-manufacturer in Walthamstow? Mr. and Mrs. Dilke are coming to dine
 with us to-day. They will enjoy the country after Westminster. O there is
 nothing like fine weather, and health, and Books, and a fine country, and
 a contented Mind, and diligent habit of reading and thinking, and an
 amulet against the ennui--and, please heaven, a little claret wine cool
 out of a cellar a mile deep--with a few or a good many ratafia cakes--a
 rocky basin to bathe in, a strawberry bed to say your prayers to Flora in,
 a pad nag to go you ten miles or so; two or three sensible people to chat
 with; two or three spiteful folks to spar with; two or three odd fishes to
 laugh at and two or three numskulls to argue with--instead of using dumb
 bells on a rainy day--
 
   Two or three Posies
   With two or three simples--
   Two or three Noses
   With two or three pimples--
   Two or three wise men
   And two or three ninny's--
   Two or three purses
   And two or three guineas--
   Two or three raps
   At two or three doors--
   Two or three naps
   Of two or three hours--
   Two or three Cats
   And two or three mice--
   Two or three sprats
   At a very great price--
   Two or three sandies
   And two or three tabbies--
   Two or three dandies
   And two Mrs.----          mum
   Two or three Smiles
   And two or three frowns--
   Two or three Miles
   To two or three towns--
   Two or three pegs
   For two or three bonnets--
   Two or three dove eggs
   To hatch into sonnets--
   Good-bye I've an appointment--can't
     stop pon word--good-bye--now
       don't get up--open the door my-
         self--good-bye--see ye Monday.
 
 J. K.
 
 
 
 
 C.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, May 13, 1819.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I have a Letter from George at last--and it contains,
 considering all things, good news--I have been with it to-day to Mrs.
 Wylie's, with whom I have left it. I shall have it again as soon as
 possible and then I will walk over and read it to you. They are quite well
 and settled tolerably in comfort after a great deal of fatigue and harass.
 They had the good chance to meet at Louisville with a Schoolfellow of
 ours. You may expect me within three days. I am writing to-night several
 notes concerning this to many of my friends. Good-night! God bless you.
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, May 26, 1819.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I have been looking for a fine day to pass at Walthamstow:
 there has not been one Morning (except Sunday and then I was obliged to
 stay at home) that I could depend upon. I have I am sorry to say had an
 accident with the Letter--I sent it to Haslam and he returned it torn into
 a thousand pieces. So I shall be obliged to tell you all I can remember
 from Memory. You would have heard from me before this but that I was in
 continual expectation of a fine Morning--I want also to speak to you
 concerning myself. Mind I do not purpose to quit England, as George has
 done; but I am afraid I shall be forced to take a voyage or two. However
 we will not think of that for some Months. Should it be a fine morning
 to-morrow you will see me.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [June 9, 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--I shall be with you next Monday at the farthest. I could
 not keep my promise of seeing you again in a week because I am in so
 unsettled a state of mind about what I am to do--I have given up the Idea
 of the Indiaman; I cannot resolve to give up my favorite studies: so I
 purpose to retire into the Country and set my Mind at work once more. A
 Friend of Mine who has an ill state of health called on me yesterday and
 proposed to spend a little time with him at the back of the Isle of Wight
 where he said we might live very cheaply. I agreed to his proposal. I have
 taken a great dislike to Town--I never go there--some one is always
 calling on me and as we have spare beds they often stop a couple of days.
 I have written lately to some acquaintances in Devonshire concerning a
 cheap Lodging and they have been very kind in letting me know all I
 wanted. They have described a pleasant place which I think I shall
 eventually retire to. How came you on with my young Master Yorkshire Man?
 Did not Mrs. A. sport her Carriage and one? They really surprised me with
 super civility--how did Mrs. A. manage it? How is the old tadpole gardener
 and little Master next door? it is to be hop'd they will both die some of
 these days. Not having been to Town I have not heard whether Mr. A.
 purposes to retire from business. Do let me know if you have heard
 anything more about it. If he should not I shall be very disappointed. If
 any one deserves to be put to his shifts it is that Hodgkinson--as for the
 other he would live a long time upon his fat and be none the worse for a
 good long lent. How came miledi to give one Lisbon wine--had she drained
 the Gooseberry? Truly I cannot delay making another visit--asked to take
 Lunch, whether I will have ale, wine, take sugar,--objection to
 green--like cream--thin bread and butter--another cup--agreeable--enough
 sugar--little more cream--too weak--12 shillin etc. etc. etc.--Lord I must
 come again. We are just going to Dinner I must must[101] with this to the
 Post----
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CIII.--TO JAMES ELMES.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Hampstead [June 12, 1819].
 
 Sir--I did not see your Note till this Saturday evening, or I should have
 answered it sooner--However as it happens I have but just received the
 Book which contains the only copy of the verses in question.[102] I have
 asked for it repeatedly ever since I promised Mr. Haydon and could not
 help the delay; which I regret. The verses can be struck out in no time,
 and will I hope be quite in time. If you think it at all necessary a proof
 may be forwarded; but as I shall transcribe it fairly perhaps there may be
 no need.
 
 I am, Sir, your obed{t} Serv{t}
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CIV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, [June 14, 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--I cannot be with you to-day for two reasons--1{ly} I have
 my sore-throat coming again to prevent my walking. 2{ly} I do not happen
 just at present to be flush of silver so that I might ride. To-morrow I am
 engaged--but the day after you shall see me. Mr. Brown is waiting for me
 as we are going to Town together, so good-bye.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [June 16, 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--Still I cannot afford to spend money by Coachhire and still
 my throat is not well enough to warrant my walking. I went yesterday to
 ask Mr. Abbey for some money; but I could not on account of a Letter he
 showed me from my Aunt's solicitor. You do not understand the business. I
 trust it will not in the end be detrimental to you. I am going to try the
 Press once more, and to that end shall retire to live cheaply in the
 country and compose myself and verses as well as I can. I have very good
 friends ready to help me--and I am the more bound to be careful of the
 money they lend me. It will all be well in the course of a year I hope. I
 am confident of it, so do not let it trouble you at all. Mr. Abbey showed
 me a Letter he had received from George containing the news of the birth
 of a Niece for us--and all doing well--he said he would take it to you--so
 I suppose to-day you will see it. I was preparing to enquire for a
 situation with an apothecary, but Mr. Brown persuades me to try the press
 once more; so I will with all my industry and ability. Mr. Rice a friend
 of mine in ill health has proposed retiring to the back of the Isle of
 Wight--which I hope will be cheap in the summer--I am sure it will in the
 winter. Thence you shall frequently hear from me and in the Letters I will
 copy those lines I may write which will be most pleasing to you in the
 confidence you will show them to no one. I have not run quite aground yet
 I hope, having written this morning to several people to whom I have lent
 money requesting repayment. I shall henceforth shake off my indolent fits,
 and among other reformation be more diligent in writing to you, and mind
 you always answer me. I shall be obliged to go out of town on Saturday and
 shall have no money till to-morrow, so I am very sorry to think I shall
 not be able to come to Walthamstow. The Head Mr. Severn did of me is now
 too dear, but here inclosed is a very capital Profile done by Mr. Brown. I
 will write again on Monday or Tuesday--Mr. and Mrs. Dilke are well.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CVI.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Wentworth Place.
 
 Thursday Morning [June 17, 1819].
 
 My dear Haydon--I know you will not be prepared for this, because your
 Pocket must needs be very low having been at ebb tide so long: but what
 can I do? mine is lower. I was the day before yesterday much in want of
 Money: but some news I had yesterday has driven me into necessity. I went
 to Abbey's for some Cash, and he put into my hand a letter from my Aunt's
 Solicitor containing the pleasant information that she was about to file a
 Bill in Chancery against us. Now in case of a defeat Abbey will be very
 undeservedly in the wrong box; so I could not ask him for any more money,
 nor can I till the affair is decided; and if it goes against him I must in
 conscience make over to him what little he may have remaining. My purpose
 is now to make one more attempt in the Press--if that fail, "ye hear no
 more of me" as Chaucer says. Brown has lent me some money for the present.
 Do borrow or beg somehow what you can for me. Do not suppose I am at all
 uncomfortable about the matter in any other way than as it forces me to
 apply to the needy. I could not send you those lines, for I could not get
 the only copy of them before last Saturday evening. I sent them Mr. Elmes
 on Monday. I saw Monkhouse on Sunday--he told me you were getting on with
 the Picture. I would have come over to you to-day, but I am fully
 employed.
 
 Yours ever sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CVII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Shanklin, Isle of Wight, Tuesday, July 6.
 
 My dear Fanny--I have just received another Letter from George--full of as
 good news as we can expect. I cannot inclose it to you as I could wish
 because it contains matters of Business to which I must for a Week to come
 have an immediate reference. I think I told you the purpose for which I
 retired to this place--to try the fortune of my Pen once more, and indeed
 I have some confidence in my success: but in every event, believe me my
 dear sister, I shall be sufficiently comfortable, as, if I cannot lead
 that life of competence and society I should wish, I have enough knowledge
 of my gallipots to ensure me an employment and maintenance. The Place I am
 in now I visited once before and a very pretty place it is were it not for
 the bad weather. Our window looks over house-tops and Cliffs onto the Sea,
 so that when the Ships sail past the Cottage chimneys you may take them
 for weathercocks. We have Hill and Dale, forest and Mead, and plenty of
 Lobsters. I was on the Portsmouth Coach the Sunday before last in that
 heavy shower--and I may say I went to Portsmouth by water--I got a little
 cold, and as it always flies to my throat I am a little out of sorts that
 way. There were on the Coach with me some common French people but very
 well behaved--there was a woman amongst them to whom the poor Men in
 ragged coats were more gallant than ever I saw gentleman to Lady at a
 Ball. When we got down to walk up hill--one of them pick'd a rose, and on
 remounting gave it to the woman with "Ma'mselle voila une belle rose!" I
 am so hard at work that perhaps I should not have written to you for a day
 or two if George's Letter had not diverted my attention to the interests
 and pleasure of those I love--and ever believe that when I do not behave
 punctually it is from a very necessary occupation, and that my silence is
 no proof of my not thinking of you, or that I want more than a gentle
 fillip to bring your image with every claim before me. You have never seen
 mountains, or I might tell you that the hill at Steephill is I think
 almost of as much consequence as Mount Rydal on Lake Winander. Bonchurch
 too is a very delightful Place--as I can see by the Cottages, all
 romantic--covered with creepers and honeysuckles, with roses and
 eglantines peeping in at the windows. Fit abodes for the People I guess
 live in them, romantic old maids fond of novels, or soldiers' widows with
 a pretty jointure--or any body's widows or aunts or anythings given to
 Poetry and a Piano-forte--as far as in 'em lies--as people say. If I could
 play upon the Guitar I might make my fortune with an old song--and get two
 blessings at once--a Lady's heart and the Rheumatism. But I am almost
 afraid to peep at those little windows--for a pretty window should show a
 pretty face, and as the world goes chances are against me. I am living
 with a very good fellow indeed, a Mr. Rice.--He is unfortunately labouring
 under a complaint which has for some years been a burthen to him. This is
 a pain to me. He has a greater tact in speaking to people of the village
 than I have, and in those matters is a great amusement as well as good
 friend to me. He bought a ham the other day for says he "Keats, I don't
 think a Ham is a wrong thing to have in a house." Write to me, Shanklin,
 Isle of Wight, as soon as you can; for a Letter is a great treat to me
 here--believing me ever,
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CVIII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 _Extract from a letter dated_ Shanklin, n{r} Ryde, Isle of Wight,
 
 Sunday, 12th [for 11th] July, 1819.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 You will be glad to hear, under my own hand (though Rice says we are like
 Sauntering Jack and Idle Joe), how diligent I have been, and am being. I
 have finished the Act, and in the interval of beginning the 2{d} have
 proceeded pretty well with Lamia, finishing the 1{st} part which consists
 of about 400 lines. I have great hopes of success, because I make use of
 my Judgment more deliberately than I have yet done; but in case of failure
 with the world, I shall find my content. And here (as I know you have my
 good at heart as much as a Brother), I can only repeat to you what I have
 said to George--that however I should like to enjoy what the competencies
 of life procure, I am in no wise dashed at a different prospect. I have
 spent too many thoughtful days and moralised through too many nights for
 that, and fruitless would they be indeed, if they did not by degrees make
 me look upon the affairs of the world with a healthy deliberation. I have
 of late been moulting: not for fresh feathers and wings: they are gone,
 and in their stead I hope to have a pair of patient sublunary legs. I have
 altered, not from a Chrysalis into a butterfly, but the contrary; having
 two little loopholes, whence I may look out into the stage of the world:
 and that world on our coming here I almost forgot. The first time I sat
 down to write, I could scarcely believe in the necessity for so doing. It
 struck me as a great oddity--Yet the very corn which is now so beautiful,
 as if it had only took to ripening yesterday, is for the market; so, why
 should I be delicate?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 CIX.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 Shanklin, Saturday Evening [July 31, 1819].
 
 My dear Dilke--I will not make my diligence an excuse for not writing to
 you sooner--because I consider idleness a much better plea. A Man in the
 hurry of business of any sort is expected and ought to be expected to look
 to everything--his mind is in a whirl, and what matters it what whirl? But
 to require a Letter of a Man lost in idleness is the utmost cruelty; you
 cut the thread of his existence, you beat, you pummel him, you sell his
 goods and chattels, you put him in prison; you impale him; you crucify
 him. If I had not put pen to paper since I saw you this would be to me a
 vi et armis taking up before the Judge; but having got over my darling
 lounging habits a little, it is with scarcely any pain I come to this
 dating from Shanklin and Dear Dilke. The Isle of Wight is but so so, etc.
 Rice and I passed rather a dull time of it. I hope he will not repent
 coming with me. He was unwell, and I was not in very good health: and I am
 afraid we made each other worse by acting upon each other's spirits. We
 would grow as melancholy as need be. I confess I cannot bear a sick person
 in a House, especially alone--it weighs upon me day and night--and more so
 when perhaps the Case is irretrievable. Indeed I think Rice is in a
 dangerous state. I have had a Letter from him which speaks favourably of
 his health at present. Brown and I are pretty well harnessed again to our
 dog-cart. I mean the Tragedy, which goes on sinkingly. We are thinking of
 introducing an Elephant, but have not historical reference within reach to
 determine us as to Otho's Menagerie. When Brown first mentioned this I
 took it for a joke; however he brings such plausible reasons, and
 discourses so eloquently on the dramatic effect that I am giving it a
 serious consideration. The Art of Poetry is not sufficient for us, and if
 we get on in that as well as we do in painting, we shall by next winter
 crush the Reviews and the Royal Academy. Indeed, if Brown would take a
 little of my advice, he could not fail to be first palette of his day. But
 odd as it may appear, he says plainly that he cannot see any force in my
 plea of putting skies in the background, and leaving Indian ink out of an
 ash tree. The other day he was sketching Shanklin Church, and as I saw how
 the business was going on, I challenged him to a trial of skill--he lent
 me Pencil and Paper--we keep the Sketches to contend for the Prize at the
 Gallery. I will not say whose I think best--but really I do not think
 Brown's done to the top of the Art.
 
 A word or two on the Isle of Wight. I have been no further than Steephill.
 If I may guess, I should say that there is no finer part in the Island
 than from this Place to Steephill. I do not hesitate to say it is fine.
 Bonchurch is the best. But I have been so many finer walks, with a
 background of lake and mountain instead of the sea, that I am not much
 touch'd with it, though I credit it for all the Surprise I should have
 felt if it had taken my cockney maidenhead. But I may call myself an old
 Stager in the picturesque, and unless it be something very large and
 overpowering, I cannot receive any extraordinary relish.
 
 I am sorry to hear that Charles is so much oppress'd at Westminster,
 though I am sure it will be the finest touchstone for his Metal in the
 world. His troubles will grow day by day less, as his age and strength
 increase. The very first Battle he wins will lift him from the Tribe of
 Manasseh. I do not know how I should feel were I a Father--but I hope I
 should strive with all my Power not to let the present trouble me. When
 your Boy shall be twenty, ask him about his childish troubles and he will
 have no more memory of them than you have of yours. Brown tells me Mrs.
 Dilke sets off to-day for Chichester. I am glad--I was going to say she
 had a fine day--but there has been a great Thunder cloud muttering over
 Hampshire all day--I hope she is now at supper with a good appetite.
 
 So Reynolds's Piece succeeded--that is all well. Papers have with thanks
 been duly received. We leave this place on the 13th, and will let you know
 where we may be a few days after--Brown says he will write when the fit
 comes on him. If you will stand law expenses I'll beat him into one before
 his time. When I come to town I shall have a little talk with you about
 Brown and one Jenny Jacobs. Open daylight! he don't care. I am afraid
 there will be some more feet for little stockings--[_of Keats's making_.
 (_I mean the feet._)[103]] Brown here tried at a piece of Wit but it
 failed him, as you see, though long a brewing.--[_this is a 2{d} lie._]
 Men should never despair--you see he has tried again and succeeded to a
 miracle.--He wants to try again, but as I have a right to an inside place
 in my own Letter--I take possession.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CX.--TO BENJAMIN BAILEY.
 
 
 [_Fragment (outside sheet) of a letter addressed to Bailey at St.
 Andrews._ Winchester, August 15, 1819.]
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 We removed to Winchester for the convenience of a library, and find it an
 exceeding pleasant town, enriched with a beautiful Cathedral, and
 surrounded by a fresh-looking country. We are in tolerably good and cheap
 lodgings--Within these two months I have written 1500 lines, most of
 which, besides many more of prior composition, you will probably see by
 next winter. I have written 2 tales, one from Boccaccio, called the Pot of
 Basil, and another called St. Agnes's Eve, on a popular Superstition, and
 a 3{rd} called Lamia (half finished). I have also been writing parts of my
 "Hyperion," and completed 4 Acts of a tragedy. It was the opinion of most
 of my friends that I should never be able to write a scene. I will
 endeavour to wipe away the prejudice--I sincerely hope you will be pleased
 when my labours, since we last saw each other, shall reach you. One of my
 Ambitions is to make as great a revolution in modern dramatic writing as
 Kean has done in acting. Another to upset the drawling of the
 blue-stocking literary world--if in the Course of a few years I do these
 two things, I ought to die content, and my friends should drink a dozen of
 claret on my tomb. I am convinced more and more every day that (excepting
 the human friend philosopher), a fine writer is the most genuine being in
 the world. Shakspeare and the Paradise lost every day become greater
 wonders to me. I look upon fine phrases like a lover. I was glad to see by
 a passage of one of Brown's letters, some time ago, from the North that
 you were in such good spirits. Since that you have been married, and in
 congratulating you I wish you every continuance of them. Present my
 respects to Mrs. Bailey. This sounds oddly to me, and I daresay I do it
 awkwardly enough: but I suppose by this time it is nothing new to you.
 Brown's remembrances to you. As far as I know, we shall remain at
 Winchester for a goodish while.
 
 Ever your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXI.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Winchester, Monday morn [August 23, 1819].
 
 My dear Taylor-- ... Brown and I have together been engaged (this I should
 wish to remain secret) on a Tragedy which I have just finished and from
 which we hope to share moderate profits.... I feel every confidence that,
 if I choose, I may be a popular writer. That I will never be; but for all
 that I will get a livelihood. I equally dislike the favour of the public
 with the love of a woman. They are both a cloying treacle to the wings of
 Independence. I shall ever consider them (People) as debtors to me for
 verses, not myself to them for admiration--which I can do without. I have
 of late been indulging my spleen by composing a preface AT them: after all
 resolving never to write a preface at all. "There are so many verses,"
 would I have said to them, "give so much means for me to buy pleasure
 with, as a relief to my hours of labour"--You will observe at the end of
 this if you put down the letter, "How a solitary life engenders pride and
 egotism!" True--I know it does: but this pride and egotism will enable me
 to write finer things than anything else could--so I will indulge it. Just
 so much as I am humbled by the genius above my grasp am I exalted and
 look with hate and contempt upon the literary world.--A drummer-boy who
 holds out his hand familiarly to a field Marshal,--that drummer-boy with
 me is the good word and favour of the public. Who could wish to be among
 the common-place crowd of the little famous--who are each individually
 lost in a throng made up of themselves? Is this worth louting or playing
 the hypocrite for? To beg suffrages for a seat on the benches of a
 myriad-aristocracy in letters? This is not wise.--I am not a wise
 man--'Tis pride--I will give you a definition of a proud man--He is a man
 who has neither Vanity nor Wisdom--One filled with hatreds cannot be vain,
 neither can he be wise. Pardon me for hammering instead of writing.
 Remember me to Woodhouse Hessey and all in Percy Street.
 
 Ever yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Winchester, August 25 [1819].
 
 My dear Reynolds--By this post I write to Rice, who will tell you why we
 have left Shanklin; and how we like this place. I have indeed scarcely
 anything else to say, leading so monotonous a life, except I was to give
 you a history of sensations, and day-nightmares. You would not find me at
 all unhappy in it, as all my thoughts and feelings which are of the
 selfish nature, home speculations, every day continue to make me more
 iron--I am convinced more and more, every day, that fine writing is, next
 to fine doing, the top thing in the world; the Paradise Lost becomes a
 greater wonder. The more I know what my diligence may in time probably
 effect, the more does my heart distend with Pride and Obstinacy--I feel it
 in my power to become a popular writer--I feel it in my power to refuse
 the poisonous suffrage of a public. My own being which I know to be
 becomes of more consequence to me than the crowds of Shadows in the shape
 of men and women that inhabit a kingdom. The soul is a world of itself,
 and has enough to do in its own home. Those whom I know already, and who
 have grown as it were a part of myself, I could not do without: but for
 the rest of mankind, they are as much a dream to me as Milton's
 Hierarchies. I think if I had a free and healthy and lasting organisation
 of heart, and lungs as strong as an ox's so as to be able to bear unhurt
 the shock of extreme thought and sensation without weariness, I could pass
 my life very nearly alone though it should last eighty years. But I feel
 my body too weak to support me to the height, I am obliged continually to
 check myself, and be nothing. It would be vain for me to endeavour after a
 more reasonable manner of writing to you. I have nothing to speak of but
 myself, and what can I say but what I feel? If you should have any reason
 to regret this state of excitement in me, I will turn the tide of your
 feelings in the right Channel, by mentioning that it is the only state for
 the best sort of Poetry--that is all I care for, all I live for. Forgive
 me for not filling up the whole sheet; Letters become so irksome to me,
 that the next time I leave London I shall petition them all to be spared
 me. To give me credit for constancy, and at the same time waive letter
 writing will be the highest indulgence I can think of.
 
 Ever your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXIII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Winchester, August 28 [1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--You must forgive me for suffering so long a space to elapse
 between the dates of my letters. It is more than a fortnight since I left
 Shanklin chiefly for the purpose of being near a tolerable Library, which
 after all is not to be found in this place. However we like it very much:
 it is the pleasantest Town I ever was in, and has the most recommendations
 of any. There is a fine Cathedral which to me is always a source of
 amusement, part of it built 1400 years ago; and the more modern by a
 magnificent Man, you may have read of in our History, called William of
 Wickham. The whole town is beautifully wooded. From the Hill at the
 eastern extremity you see a prospect of Streets, and old Buildings mixed
 up with Trees. Then there are the most beautiful streams about I ever
 saw--full of Trout. There is the Foundation of St. Croix about half a mile
 in the fields--a charity greatly abused. We have a Collegiate School, a
 Roman catholic School; a chapel ditto and a Nunnery! And what improves it
 all is, the fashionable inhabitants are all gone to Southampton. We are
 quiet--except a fiddle that now and then goes like a gimlet through my
 Ears--our Landlady's son not being quite a Proficient. I have still been
 hard at work, having completed a Tragedy I think I spoke of to you. But
 there I fear all my labour will be thrown away for the present, as I hear
 Mr. Kean is going to America. For all I can guess I shall remain here till
 the middle of October--when Mr. Brown will return to his house at
 Hampstead; whither I shall return with him. I some time since sent the
 Letter I told you I had received from George to Haslam with a request to
 let you and Mrs. Wylie see it: he sent it back to me for very insufficient
 reasons without doing so; and I was so irritated by it that I would not
 send it travelling about by the post any more: besides the postage is very
 expensive. I know Mrs. Wylie will think this a great neglect. I am sorry
 to say my temper gets the better of me--I will not send it again. Some
 correspondence I have had with Mr. Abbey about George's affairs--and I
 must confess he has behaved very kindly to me as far as the wording of his
 Letter went. Have you heard any further mention of his retiring from
 Business? I am anxious to hear whether Hodgkinson, whose name I cannot
 bear to write, will in any likelihood be thrown upon himself. The
 delightful Weather we have had for two Months is the highest gratification
 I could receive--no chill'd red noses--no shivering--but fair atmosphere
 to think in--a clean towel mark'd with the mangle and a basin of clear
 Water to drench one's face with ten times a day: no need of much
 exercise--a Mile a day being quite sufficient. My greatest regret is that
 I have not been well enough to bathe though I have been two Months by the
 seaside and live now close to delicious bathing--Still I enjoy the
 Weather--I adore fine Weather as the greatest blessing I can have. Give me
 Books, fruit, French wine and fine weather and a little music out of
 doors, played by somebody I do not know--not pay the price of one's time
 for a jig--but a little chance music: and I can pass a summer very quietly
 without caring much about Fat Louis, fat Regent or the Duke of Wellington.
 Why have you not written to me? Because you were in expectation of
 George's Letter and so waited? Mr. Brown is copying out our Tragedy of
 Otho the Great in a superb style--better than it deserves--there as I said
 is labour in vain for the present. I had hoped to give Kean another
 opportunity to shine. What can we do now? There is not another actor of
 Tragedy in all London or Europe. The Covent Garden Company is execrable.
 Young is the best among them and he is a ranting coxcombical tasteless
 Actor--a Disgust, a Nausea--and yet the very best after Kean. What a set
 of barren asses are actors! I should like now to promenade round your
 Gardens--apple-tasting--pear-tasting--plum-judging--apricot-nibbling--
 peach-scrunching--nectarine-sucking and Melon-carving. I have also a great
 feeling for antiquated cherries full of sugar cracks--and a white currant
 tree kept for company. I admire lolling on a lawn by a water lilied pond
 to eat white currants and see gold-fish: and go to the Fair in the Evening
 if I'm good. There is not hope for that--one is sure to get into some mess
 before evening. Have these hot days I brag of so much been well or ill for
 your health? Let me hear soon.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXIV.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Winchester, September 1, 1819.
 
 My dear Taylor--Brown and I have been employed for these 3 weeks past from
 time to time in writing to our different friends--a dead silence is our
 only answer--we wait morning after morning. Tuesday is the day for the
 Examiner to arrive, this is the 2d Tuesday which has been barren even of a
 newspaper--Men should be in imitation of spirits "responsive to each
 other's note." Instead of that I pipe and no one hath danced. We have been
 cursing like Mandeville and Lisle--With this I shall send by the same post
 a 3d letter to a friend of mine, who though it is of consequence has
 neither answered right or left. We have been much in want of news from the
 Theatres, having heard that Kean is going to America--but no--not a word.
 Why I should come on you with all these complaints I cannot explain to
 myself, especially as I suspect you must be in the country. Do answer me
 soon for I really must know something. I must steer myself by the rudder
 of Information....
 
 Ever yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXV.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Winchester, September 5 [1819].
 
 My dear Taylor--This morning I received yours of the 2d, and with it a
 letter from Hessey enclosing a Bank post Bill of L30, an ample sum I
 assure you--more I had no thought of.--You should not have delayed so long
 in Fleet St.--leading an inactive life as you did was breathing poison:
 you will find the country air do more for you than you expect. But it must
 be proper country air. You must choose a spot. What sort of a place is
 Retford? You should have a dry, gravelly, barren, elevated country, open
 to the currents of air, and such a place is generally furnished with the
 finest springs--The neighbourhood of a rich enclosed fulsome manured
 arable land, especially in a valley and almost as bad on a flat, would be
 almost as bad as the smoke of Fleet St.--Such a place as this was
 Shanklin, only open to the south-east, and surrounded by hills in every
 other direction. From this south-east came the damps of the sea; which,
 having no egress, the air would for days together take on an unhealthy
 idiosyncrasy altogether enervating and weakening as a city smoke--I felt
 it very much. Since I have been here at Winchester I have been improving
 in health--it is not so confined--and there is on one side of the City a
 dry chalky down, where the air is worth Sixpence a pint. So if you do not
 get better at Retford, do not impute it to your own weakness before you
 have well considered the Nature of the air and soil--especially as Autumn
 is encroaching--for the Autumn fog over a rich land is like the steam from
 cabbage water. What makes the great difference between valesmen,
 flatlandmen and mountaineers? The cultivation of the earth in a great
 measure--Our health temperament and disposition are taken more
 (notwithstanding the contradiction of the history of Cain and Abel) from
 the air we breathe, than is generally imagined. See the difference between
 a Peasant and a Butcher.--I am convinced a great cause of it is the
 difference of the air they breathe: the one takes _his_ mingled with the
 fume of slaughter, the other from the dank exhalement from the glebe; the
 teeming damp that comes up from the plough-furrow is of great effect in
 taming the fierceness of a strong man--more than his labour--Let him be
 mowing furze upon a mountain, and at the day's end his thoughts will run
 upon a..axe[104] if he ever had handled one; let him leave the plough, and
 he will think quietly of his supper. Agriculture is the tamer of men--the
 steam from the earth is like drinking their Mother's milk--it enervates
 their nature--this appears a great cause of the imbecility of the Chinese:
 and if this sort of atmosphere is a mitigation to the energy of a strong
 man, how much more must it injure a weak one unoccupied unexercised--For
 what is the cause of so many men maintaining a good state in Cities, but
 occupation--An idle man, a man who is not sensitively alive to
 self-interest in a city cannot continue long in good health. This is
 easily explained--If you were to walk leisurely through an unwholesome
 path in the fens, with a little horror of them, you would be sure to have
 your ague. But let Macbeth cross the same path, with the dagger in the air
 leading him on, and he would never have an ague or anything like it--You
 should give these things a serious consideration. Notts, I believe, is a
 flat county--You should be on the slope of one of the dry barren hills in
 Somersetshire. I am convinced there is as harmful air to be breathed in
 the country as in town. I am greatly obliged to you for your letter.
 Perhaps, if you had had strength and spirits enough, you would have felt
 offended by my offering a note of hand, or rather expressed it. However, I
 am sure you will give me credit for not in anywise mistrusting you: or
 imagining that you would take advantage of any power I might give you over
 me. No--It proceeded from my serious resolve not to be a gratuitous
 borrower, from a great desire to be correct in money matters, to have in
 my desk the Chronicles of them to refer to, and know my worldly
 non-estate: besides in case of my death such documents would be but just,
 if merely as memorials of the friendly turns I had done to me--Had I known
 of your illness I should not have written in such fiery phrase in my first
 letter. I hope that shortly you will be able to bear six times as much.
 Brown likes the tragedy very much: But he is not a fit judge of it, as I
 have only acted as midwife to his plot; and of course he will be fond of
 his child. I do not think I can make you any extracts without spoiling the
 effect of the whole when you come to read it--I hope you will then not
 think my labour mis-spent. Since I finished it, I have finished Lamia, and
 am now occupied in revising St. Agnes's Eve, and studying Italian.
 Ariosto I find as diffuse, in parts, as Spenser--I understand completely
 the difference between them. I will cross the letter with some lines from
 Lamia. Brown's kindest remembrances to you--and I am ever your most
 sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
   A haunting Music sole perhaps and lone
   Supportress of the fairy roof made moan
   Throughout as fearful the whole charm might fade.
   Fresh Carved Cedar mimicking a glade
   Of Palm and Plantain met from either side
   In the high midst in honour of the Bride--
   Two Palms, and then two plantains and so on
   From either side their stems branch'd one to one
   All down the aisled place--and beneath all
   There ran a stream of lamps straight on from wall to wall.
   So canopied lay an untasted feast
   Teeming a perfume. Lamia regal drest
   Silverly paced about and as she went
   Mission'd her viewless servants to enrich
   The splendid finish of each nook and niche--
   Between the tree stems wainscoated at first
   Came jasper panels--then anon there burst
   Forth creeping imagery of slighter trees
   And with the larger wove in small intricacies--
   And so till she was sated--then came down
   Soft lighting on her head a brilliant crown
   Wreath'd turban-wise of tender wannish fire
   And sprinkled o'er with stars like Ariadne's tiar,
   Approving all--she faded at self will
   And shut the Chamber up close hush'd and still;
   Complete, and ready, for the revels rude
   When dreadful Guests would come to spoil her solitude
   The day came soon and all the gossip-rout--
   O senseless Lycius[105] ...
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 This is a good sample of the story. Brown is gone to Chichester
 a-visiting--I shall be alone here for 3 weeks, expecting accounts of your
 health.
 
 
 
 
 CXVI.--TO GEORGE AND GEORGIANA KEATS.
 
 
 Winchester, September [17, 1819], Friday.
 
 My dear George--I was closely employed in reading and composition in this
 place, whither I had come from Shanklin for the convenience of a library,
 when I received your last dated 24th July. You will have seen by the short
 letter I wrote from Shanklin how matters stand between us and Mr.
 Jennings. They had not at all moved, and I knew no way of overcoming the
 inveterate obstinacy of our affairs. On receiving your last, I immediately
 took a place in the same night's coach for London. Mr. Abbey behaved
 extremely well to me, appointed Monday evening at seven to meet me, and
 observed that he should drink tea at that hour. I gave him the enclosed
 note and showed him the last leaf of yours to me. He really appeared
 anxious about it, and promised he would forward your money as quickly as
 possible. I think I mentioned that Walton was dead.... He will apply to
 Mr. Gliddon the partner, endeavour to get rid of Mrs. Jennings' claim, and
 be expeditious. He has received an answer from my letter to Fry. That is
 something. We are certainly in a very low estate--I say we, for I am in
 such a situation, that were it not for the assistance of Brown and Taylor,
 I must be as badly off as a man can be. I could not raise any sum by the
 promise of any poem, no, not by the mortgage of my intellect. We must wait
 a little while. I really have hopes of success. I have finished a tragedy,
 which if it succeeds will enable me to sell what I may have in manuscript
 to a good advantage. I have passed my time in reading, writing, and
 fretting--the last I intend to give up, and stick to the other two. They
 are the only chances of benefit to us. Your wants will be a fresh spur to
 me. I assure you you shall more than share what I can get whilst I am
 still young. The time may come when age will make me more selfish. I have
 not been well treated by the world, and yet I have, capitally well. I do
 not know a person to whom so many purse-strings would fly open as to me,
 if I could possibly take advantage of them, which I cannot do, for none of
 the owners of these purses are rich. Your present situation I will not
 suffer myself to dwell upon. When misfortunes are so real, we are glad
 enough to escape them and the thought of them. I cannot help thinking Mr.
 Audubon a dishonest man. Why did he make you believe that he was a man of
 property? How is it that his circumstances have altered so suddenly? In
 truth, I do not believe you fit to deal with the world, or at least the
 American world. But, good God! who can avoid these chances? You have done
 your best. Take matters as coolly as you can; and confidently expecting
 help from England, act as if no help were nigh. Mine, I am sure, is a
 tolerable tragedy; it would have been a bank to me, if just as I had
 finished it, I had not heard of Kean's resolution to go to America. That
 was the worst news I could have had. There is no actor can do the
 principal character besides Kean. At Covent Garden there is a great chance
 of its being damm'd. Were it to succeed even there it would lift me out of
 the mire; I mean the mire of a bad reputation which is continually rising
 against me. My name with the literary fashionables is vulgar. I am a
 weaver-boy to them. A tragedy would lift me out of this mess, and mess it
 is as far as regards our pockets. But be not cast down any more than I am;
 I feel that I can bear real ills better than imaginary ones. Whenever I
 find myself growing vapourish, I rouse myself, wash, and put on a clean
 shirt, brush my hair and clothes, tie my shoestrings neatly, and in fact
 adonise as I were going out. Then, all clean and comfortable, I sit down
 to write. This I find the greatest relief. Besides I am becoming
 accustomed to the privations of the pleasures of sense. In the midst of
 the world I live like a hermit. I have forgot how to lay plans for the
 enjoyment of any pleasure. I feel I can bear anything,--any misery, even
 imprisonment, so long as I have neither wife nor child. Perhaps you will
 say yours are your only comfort; they must be. I returned to Winchester
 the day before yesterday, and am now here alone, for Brown, some days
 before I left, went to Bedhampton, and there he will be for the next
 fortnight. The term of his house will be up in the middle of next month
 when we shall return to Hampstead. On Sunday, I dined with your mother and
 Hen and Charles in Henrietta Street. Mrs. and Miss Millar were in the
 country. Charles had been but a few days returned from Paris. I daresay
 you will have letters expressing the motives of his journey. Mrs. Wylie
 and Miss Waldegrave seem as quiet as two mice there alone. I did not show
 your last. I thought it better not, for better times will certainly come,
 and why should they be unhappy in the meantime? On Monday morning I went
 to Walthamstow. Fanny looked better than I had seen her for some time. She
 complains of not hearing from you, appealing to me as if it were half my
 fault. I had been so long in retirement that London appeared a very odd
 place. I could not make out I had so many acquaintances, and it was a
 whole day before I could feel among men. I had another strange sensation.
 There was not one house I felt any pleasure to call at. Reynolds was in
 the country, and, saving himself, I am prejudiced against all that family.
 Dilke and his wife and child were in the country. Taylor was at
 Nottingham. I was out, and everybody was out. I walked about the streets
 as in a strange land. Rice was the only one at home. I passed some time
 with him. I know him better since we have lived a month together in the
 Isle of Wight. He is the most sensible and even wise man I know. He has a
 few John Bull prejudices, but they improve him. His illness is at times
 alarming. We are great friends, and there is no one I like to pass a day
 with better. Martin called in to bid him good-bye before he set out for
 Dublin. If you would like to hear one of his jokes, here is one which, at
 the time, we laughed at a good deal: A Miss ----, with three young ladies,
 one of them Martin's sister, had come a-gadding in the Isle of Wight and
 took for a few days a cottage opposite ours. We dined with them one day,
 and as I was saying they had fish. Miss ---- said she thought _they tasted
 of the boat_. "No" says Martin, very seriously, "they haven't been kept
 long enough." I saw Haslam. He is very much occupied with love and
 business, being one of Mr. Saunders' executors and lover to a young woman.
 He showed me her picture by Severn. I think she is, though not very
 cunning, too cunning for him. Nothing strikes me so forcibly with a sense
 of the ridiculous as love. A man in love I do think cuts the sorriest
 figure in the world; queer, when I know a poor fool to be really in pain
 about it, I could burst out laughing in his face. His pathetic visage
 becomes irresistible. Not that I take Haslam as a pattern for lovers; he
 is a very worthy man and a good friend. His love is very amusing.
 Somewhere in the Spectator is related an account of a man inviting a party
 of stutterers and squinters to his table. It would please me more to
 scrape together a party of lovers--not to dinner, but to tea. There would
 be no fighting as among knights of old.
 
   Pensive they sit, and roll their languid eyes,
   Nibble their toast and cool their tea with sighs;
   Or else forget the purpose of the night,
   Forget their tea, forget their appetite.
   See, with cross'd arms they sit--Ah! hapless crew,
   The fire is going out and no one rings
   For coals, and therefore no coals Betty brings.
   A fly is in the milk-pot. Must he die
   Circled by a humane society?
   No, no; there, Mr. Werter takes his spoon,
   Inserts it, dips the handle, and lo! soon
   The little straggler, sav'd from perils dark,
   Across the tea-board draws a long wet mark.
   Romeo! Arise take snuffers by the handle,
   There's a large cauliflower in each candle.
   A winding sheet--ah, me! I must away
   To No. 7, just beyond the circus gay.
   Alas, my friend, your coat sits very well;
   Where may your Taylor live? I may not tell.
   O pardon me. I'm absent now and then.
   Where _might_ my Taylor live? I say again
   I cannot tell. Let me no more be teased;
   He lives in Wapping, might live where he pleased.
 
 You see, I cannot get on without writing, as boys do at school, a few
 nonsense verses. I begin them, and before I have written six the whim has
 passed--if there is anything deserving so respectable a name in them. I
 shall put in a bit of information anywhere, just as it strikes me. Mr.
 Abbey is to write to me as soon as he can bring matters to bear, and then
 I am to go to town and tell him the means of forwarding to you through
 Capper and Hazlewood. I wonder I did not put this before. I shall go on
 to-morrow; it is so fine now I must take a bit of a walk.
 
 
 Saturday [September 18].
 
 With my inconstant disposition it is no wonder that this morning, amid all
 our bad times and misfortunes, I should feel so alert and well-spirited.
 At this moment you are perhaps in a very different state of mind. It is
 because my hopes are ever paramount to my despair. I have been reading
 over a part of a short poem I have composed lately, called Lamia, and I am
 certain there is that sort of fire in it that must take hold of people
 some way. Give them either pleasant or unpleasant sensation--what they
 want is a sensation of some sort. I wish I could pitch the key of your
 spirits as high as mine is; but your organ-loft is beyond the reach of my
 voice.
 
 I admire the exact admeasurement of my niece in your mother's letter--O!
 the little span-long elf. I am not in the least a judge of the proper
 weight and size of an infant. Never trouble yourselves about that. She is
 sure to be a fine woman. Let her have only delicate nails both on hands
 and feet, and both as small as a May-fly's, who will live you his life on
 a 3 square inch of oak-leaf; and nails she must have, quite different from
 the market-women here, who plough into butter and make a quarter pound
 taste of it. I intend to write a letter to your wife, and there I may say
 more on this little plump subject--I hope she's plump. Still harping on my
 daughter. This Winchester is a place tolerably well suited to me. There is
 a fine cathedral, a college, a Roman Catholic chapel, a Methodist do., and
 Independent do.; and there is not one loom, or anything like manufacturing
 beyond bread and butter, in the whole city. There are a number of rich
 Catholics in the place. It is a respectable, ancient, aristocratic place,
 and moreover it contains a nunnery. Our set are by no means so hail fellow
 well met on literary subjects as we were wont to be. Reynolds has turn'd
 to the law. By the bye, he brought out a little piece at the Lyceum call'd
 One, Two, Three, Four: by Advertisement. It met with complete success. The
 meaning of this odd title is explained when I tell you the principal actor
 is a mimic, who takes off four of our best performers in the course of the
 farce. Our stage is loaded with mimics. I did not see the piece, being out
 of town the whole time it was in progress. Dilke is entirely swallowed up
 in his boy. It is really lamentable to what a pitch he carries a sort of
 parental mania. I had a letter from him at Shanklin. He went on, a word or
 two about the Isle of Wight, which is a bit of hobby horse of his, but he
 soon deviated to his boy. "I am sitting," says he, "at the window
 expecting my boy from ----." I suppose I told you somewhere that he lives
 in Westminster, and his boy goes to school there, where he gets beaten,
 and every bruise he has, and I daresay deserves, is very bitter to Dilke.
 The place I am speaking of puts me in mind of a circumstance which
 occurred lately at Dilke's. I think it very rich and dramatic and quite
 illustrative of the little quiet fun that he will enjoy sometimes. First I
 must tell you that their house is at the corner of Great Smith Street, so
 that some of the windows look into one street, and the back windows into
 another round the corner. Dilke had some old people to dinner--I know not
 who, but there were two old ladies among them. Brown was there--they had
 known him from a child. Brown is very pleasant with old women, and on
 that day it seems behaved himself so winningly that they became hand and
 glove together, and a little complimentary. Brown was obliged to depart
 early. He bid them good-bye and passed into the passage. No sooner was his
 back turned than the old women began lauding him. When Brown had reached
 the street door, and was just going, Dilke threw up the window and called:
 "Brown! Brown! They say you look younger than ever you did!" Brown went
 on, and had just turned the corner into the other street when Dilke
 appeared at the back window, crying: "Brown! Brown! By God, they say
 you're handsome!" You see what a many words it requires to give any
 identity to a thing I could have told you in half a minute.
 
 I have been reading lately Burton's Anatomy of Melancholy, and I think you
 will be very much amused with a page I here copy for you. I call it a Feu
 de Joie round the batteries of Fort St. Hyphen-de-Phrase on the birthday
 of the Digamma. The whole alphabet was drawn up in a phalanx on the corner
 of an old dictionary, band playing, "Amo, amas," etc.
 
      "Every lover admires his mistriss, though she be very deformed of
      herself, ill-favoured, wrinkled, pimpled, pale, red, yellow, tan'd,
      tallow-faced, have a swoln juglers platter face, or a thin, lean,
      chitty face, have clouds in her face, be crooked, dry, bald,
      goggle-ey'd, blear-ey'd or with staring eys, she looks like a squis'd
      cat, hold her head still awry, heavy, dull, hollow-mouthed, Persean
      hook-nosed, have a sharp Jose nose, a red nose, China flat, great
      nose, _nare simo patuloque_, a nose like a promontory, gubber-tushed,
      rotten teeth, black, uneven, brown teeth, beetle browed, a witches
      beard, her breath stink all over the room, her nose drop winter and
      summer with a Bavarian poke under her chin, a sharp chin, lave eared,
      with a long cranes neck, which stands awry too, _pendulis mammis, her
      dugs like two double jugs_, or else no dugs in the other extream,
      bloody faln fingers, she have filthy long unpaired nails, scabbed
      hands or wrists, a tan'd skin, a rotten carkass, crooked back, she
      stoops, is lame, splea-footed, _as slender in the middle as a cow in
      the waste_, gowty legs, her ankles hang over her shooes, her feet
      stink, she breed lice, a mere changeling, a very monster, an aufe
      imperfect, her whole complexion savours, an harsh voyce, incondite
      gesture, vile gait, a vast virago, or an ugly tit, a slug, a fat
      fustilugs, a truss, a long lean rawbone, a skeleton, a sneaker (_si
      qua latent meliora puta_), and to thy judgment looks like a Mard in a
      lanthorn, whom thou couldst not fancy for a world, but hatest,
      lothest, and wouldst have spit in her face, or blow thy nose in her
      bosome, _remedium amoris_ to another man, a dowdy, a slut, a scold, a
      nasty, rank, rammy, filthy, beastly quean, dishonest peradventure,
      obscene, base, beggerly, rude, foolish, untaught, peevish, Irus'
      daughter, Thersite's sister, Grobian's schollar; if he love her once,
      he admires her for all this, he takes no notice of any such errors,
      or imperfections of body or minde."
 
 There's a dose for you. Fire!! I would give my favourite leg to have
 written this as a speech in a play. With what effect could Matthews
 pop-gun it at the pit! This I think will amuse you more than so much
 poetry. Of that I do not like to copy any, as I am afraid it is too mal a
 propos for you at present; and yet I will send you some, for by the time
 you receive it, things in England may have taken a different turn. When I
 left Mr. Abbey on Monday evening, I walked up Cheapside, but returned to
 put some letters in the post, and met him again in Bucklesbury. We walked
 together through the Poultry as far as the baker's shop he has some
 concern in--He spoke of it in such a way to me, I thought he wanted me to
 make an offer to assist him in it. I do believe if I could be a hatter I
 might be one. He seems anxious about me. He began blowing up Lord Byron
 while I was sitting with him: "However, may be the fellow says true now
 and then," at which he took up a magazine, and read me some extracts from
 Don Juan (Lord Byron's last flash poem), and particularly one against
 literary ambition. I do think I must be well spoken of among sets, for
 Hodgkinson is more than polite, and the coffee German endeavoured to be
 very close to me the other night at Covent Garden, where I went at half
 price before I tumbled into bed. Every one, however distant an
 acquaintance, behaves in the most conciliating manner to me. You will see
 I speak of this as a matter of interest. On the next sheet I will give you
 a little politics.
 
 In every age there has been in England, for two or three centuries,
 subjects of great popular interest on the carpet, so that however great
 the uproar, one can scarcely prophecy any material change in the
 Government, for as loud disturbances have agitated the country many times.
 All civilised countries become gradually more enlightened, and there
 should be a continual change for the better. Look at this country at
 present, and remember it when it was even thought impious to doubt the
 justice of a trial by combat. From that time there has been a gradual
 change. Three great changes have been in progress: first for the better,
 next for the worse, and a third for the better once more. The first was
 the gradual annihilation of the tyranny of the nobles, when kings found it
 their interest to conciliate the common people, elevate them, and be just
 to them. Just when baronial power ceased, and before standing armies were
 so dangerous, taxes were few, kings were lifted by the people over the
 heads of their nobles, and those people held a rod over kings. The change
 for the worse in Europe was again this: the obligation of kings to the
 multitude began to be forgotten. Custom had made noblemen the humble
 servants of kings. Then kings turned to the nobles as the adorners of
 their power, the slaves of it, and from the people as creatures
 continually endeavouring to check them. Then in every kingdom there was a
 long struggle of kings to destroy all popular privileges. The English were
 the only people in Europe who made a grand kick at this. They were slaves
 to Henry VIII, but were freemen under William III at the time the French
 were abject slaves under Louis XIV. The example of England, and the
 liberal writers of France and England, sowed the seed of opposition to
 this tyranny, and it was swelling in the ground till it burst out in the
 French Revolution. That has had an unlucky termination. It put a stop to
 the rapid progress of free sentiments in England, and gave our Court hopes
 of turning back to the despotism of the eighteenth century. They have made
 a handle of this event in every way to undermine our freedom. They spread
 a horrid superstition against all innovation and improvement. The present
 struggle in England of the people is to destroy this superstition. What
 has roused them to do it is their distresses. Perhaps, on this account,
 the present distresses of this nation are a fortunate thing though so
 horrid in their experience. You will see I mean that the French Revolution
 put a temporary stop to this third change--the change for the better--Now
 it is in progress again, and I think it is an effectual one. This is no
 contest between Whig and Tory, but between right and wrong. There is
 scarcely a grain of party spirit now in England. Right and wrong
 considered by each man abstractedly, is the fashion. I know very little of
 these things. I am convinced, however, that apparently small causes make
 great alterations. There are little signs whereby we may know how matters
 are going on. This makes the business of Carlisle the bookseller of great
 amount in my mind. He has been selling deistical pamphlets, republished
 Tom Paine, and many other works held in superstitious horror. He even has
 been selling, for some time, immense numbers of a work called The Deist,
 which comes out in weekly numbers. For this conduct he, I think, has had
 about a dozen indictments issued against him, for which he has found bail
 to the amount of many thousand pounds. After all, they are afraid to
 prosecute. They are afraid of his defence; it would be published in all
 the papers all over the empire. They shudder at this. The trials would
 light a flame they could not extinguish. Do you not think this of great
 import? You will hear by the papers of the proceedings at Manchester, and
 Hunt's triumphal entry into London. It would take me a whole day and a
 quire of paper to give you anything like detail. I will merely mention
 that it is calculated that 30,000 people were in the streets waiting for
 him. The whole distance from the Angel at Islington to the Crown and
 Anchor was lined with multitudes.
 
 As I passed Colnaghi's window I saw a profile portrait of Sandt, the
 destroyer of Kotzebue. His very look must interest every one in his
 favour. I suppose they have represented him in his college dress. He seems
 to me like a young Abelard--a fine mouth, cheek bones (and this is no
 joke) full of sentiment, a fine, unvulgar nose, and plump temples.
 
 On looking over some letters I found the one I wrote, intended for you,
 from the foot of Helvellyn to Liverpool; but you had sailed, and therefore
 it was returned to me. It contained, among other nonsense, an acrostic of
 my sister's name--and a pretty long name it is. I wrote it in a great
 hurry which you will see. Indeed I would not copy it if I thought it would
 ever be seen by any but yourselves.
 
   Give me your patience, sister, while I frame
   Exact in capitals your golden name,
   Or sue the fair Apollo, and he will
   Rouse from his heavy slumber and instil
   Great love in me for thee and Poesy.
   Imagine not that greatest mastery
   And kingdom over all the realms of verse
   Nears more to Heaven in aught than when we nurse
   And surety give to love and brotherhood.
 
   Anthropopagi in Othello's mood;
   Ulysses storm'd, and his enchanted belt
   Glowed with the Muse: but they are never felt
   Unbosom'd so, and so eternal made,
   Such tender incense in their laurel shade
   To all the recent sisters of the Nine,
   As this poor offering to you, sister mine.
 
   Kind sister! aye, this third name says you are;
   Enchanted has it been the Lord knows where;
   And may its taste to you, like good old wine,
   Take you to real happiness, and give
   Sons, daughters, and a home like honied hive.
 
   Foot of Helvellyn, June 27.
 
 I sent you in my first packet some of my Scotch letters. I find I have one
 kept back, which was written in the most interesting part of our tour, and
 will copy part of it in the hope you will not find it unamusing. I would
 give now anything for Richardson's power of making mountains of molehills.
 
 
 Incipit epistola caledoniensa--
 
 "Dunancullen."
 
 (I did not know the day of the month, for I find I have not added it.
 Brown must have been asleep). "Just after my last had gone to the post"
 (before I go any further, I must premise that I would send the identical
 letter, instead of taking the trouble to copy it; I do not do so, for it
 would spoil my notion of the neat manner in which I intend to fold these
 three genteel sheets. The original is written on coarse paper, and the
 soft one would ride in the post bag very uneasy. Perhaps there might be a
 quarrel)[106]
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I ought to make a large "?" here, but I had better take the opportunity of
 telling you I have got rid of my haunting sore throat, and conduct myself
 in a manner not to catch another.
 
 You speak of Lord Byron and me. There is this great difference between us:
 he describes what he sees--I describe what I imagine. Mine is the hardest
 task; now see the immense difference. The Edinburgh Reviewers are afraid
 to touch upon my poem. They do not know what to make of it; they do not
 like to condemn it, and they will not praise it for fear. They are as shy
 of it as I should be of wearing a Quaker's hat. The fact is, they have no
 real taste. They dare not compromise their judgments on so puzzling a
 question. If on my next publication they should praise me, and so lug in
 Endymion, I will address them in a manner they will not at all relish. The
 cowardliness of the Edinburgh is more than the abuse of the Quarterly.
 
 
 Monday [September 20].
 
 This day is a grand day for Winchester. They elect the mayor. It was
 indeed high time the place should have some sort of excitement. There was
 nothing going on--all asleep. Not an old maid's sedan returning from a
 card party; and if any old women have got tipsy at christenings, they have
 not exposed themselves in the street. The first night, though, of our
 arrival here there was a slight uproar took place at about ten of the
 clock. We heard distinctly a noise patting down the street, as of a
 walking-cane of the good old dowager breed; and a little minute after we
 heard a less voice observe, "What a noise the ferril made--it must be
 loose." Brown wanted to call the constables, but I observed it was only a
 little breeze, and would soon pass over. The side streets here are
 excessively maiden-lady-like; the door-steps always fresh from the
 flannel. The knockers have a very staid, serious, nay almost awful
 quietness about them. I never saw so quiet a collection of lions' and
 rams' heads. The doors most part black, with a little brass handle just
 above the keyhole, so that you may easily shut yourself out of your own
 house. He! He! There is none of your Lady Bellaston ringing and rapping
 here; no thundering Jupiter-footmen, no opera-treble tattoos, but a modest
 lifting up of the knocker by a set of little wee old fingers that peep
 through the gray mittens, and a dying fall thereof. The great beauty of
 poetry is that it makes everything in every place interesting. The
 palatine Venice and the abbotine Winchester are equally interesting. Some
 time since I began a poem called "The Eve of St. Mark," quite in the
 spirit of town quietude. I think I will give you the sensation of walking
 about an old country town in a coolish evening. I know not whether I
 shall ever finish it; I will give it as far as I have gone. Ut tibi
 placeat--
 
 THE EVE OF ST. MARK.
 
   Upon a Sabbath-day it fell;
   Twice holy was the Sabbath-bell,
   That call'd the folk to evening prayer;
   The city streets were clean and fair
   From wholesome drench of April rains;
   And, when on western window panes,
   The chilly sunset faintly told
   Of unmatured green vallies cold,
   Of the green thorny bloomless hedge,
   Of rivers new with spring-tide sedge,
   Of primroses by shelter'd rills,
   And daisies on the aguish hills.
   Twice holy was the Sabbath-bell:
   The silent streets were crowded well
   With staid and pious companies,
   Warm from their fireside orat'ries;
   And moving, with demurest air,
   To even-song, and vesper prayer.
   Each arched porch, and entry low,
   Was fill'd with patient folk and slow,
   With whispers hush, and shuffling feet,
   While play'd the organ loud and sweet.
 
   The bells had ceas'd, the prayers begun,
   And Bertha had not yet half done
   A curious volume, patch'd and torn,
   That all day long, from earliest morn,
   Had taken captive her two eyes,
   Among its golden broideries;
   Perplex'd her with a thousand things,--
   The stars of Heaven, and angels' wings,
   Martyrs in a fiery blaze,
   Azure saints and silver rays,
   Moses' breastplate, and the seven
   Candlesticks John saw in Heaven,
   The winged Lion of St. Mark,
   And the Covenantal Ark,
   With its many mysteries,
   Cherubim and golden mice.
   Bertha was a maiden fair,
   Dwelling in the old Minster-square;
   From her fireside she could see,
   Sidelong, its rich antiquity,
   Far as the Bishop's garden-wall,
   Where sycamores and elm-trees tall,
   Full-leav'd the forest had outstript,
   By no sharp north-wind ever nipt,
   So shelter'd by the mighty pile.
   Bertha arose, and read awhile,
   With forehead 'gainst the window-pane.
   Again she try'd, and then again,
   Until the dusk eve left her dark
   Upon the legend of St. Mark.
   From plaited lawn-frill, fine and thin,
   She lifted up her soft warm chin,
   With aching neck and swimming eyes,
   And dazed with saintly imageries.
 
   All was gloom, and silent all,
   Save now and then the still footfall
   Of one returning homewards late,
   Past the echoing minster-gate.
   The clamorous daws, that all the day
   Above tree-tops and towers play,
   Pair by pair had gone to rest,
   Each in ancient belfry-nest,
   Where asleep they fall betimes,
   To music and the drowsy chimes.
 
   All was silent, all was gloom,
   Abroad and in the homely room:
   Down she sat, poor cheated soul!
   And struck a lamp from the dismal coal;
   Lean'd forward, with bright drooping hair
   And slant book, full against the glare.
   Her shadow, in uneasy guise,
   Hover'd about, a giant size,
   On ceiling-beam and old oak chair,
   The parrot's cage, and panel square;
   And the warm angled winter-screen,
   On which were many monsters seen,
   Call'd doves of Siam, Lima mice,
   And legless birds of Paradise,
   Macaw and tender Avadavat,
   And silken-furr'd Angora cat.
   Untir'd she read, her shadow still
   Glower'd about, as it would fill
   The room with wildest forms and shades,
   As though some ghostly queen of spades
   Had come to mock behind her back,
   And dance, and ruffle her garments black,
   Untir'd she read the legend page,
   Of holy Mark, from youth to age,
   On land, on sea, in pagan chains,
   Rejoicing for his many pains.
   Sometimes the learned eremite,
   With golden star, or dagger bright,
   Referr'd to pious poesies
   Written in smallest crow-quill size
   Beneath the text; and thus the rhyme
   Was parcelled out from time to time:
   "... Als writith he of swevenis,
   Man han beforne they wake in bliss,
   Whanne that hir friendes thinke him bound
   In crimped shroude farre under grounde;
   And how a litling child mote be
   A saint er its nativitie,
   Gif that the modre (God her blesse!)
   Kepen in solitarinesse,
   And kissen devoute the holy croce.
   Of Goddes love, and Sathan's force,--
   He writith; and thinges many mo
   Of swiche thinges I may not show
   Bot I must tellen verilie
   Somdel of Sainte Cicilie,
   And chieflie what he auctorethe
   Of Sainte Markis life and dethe;"
 
   At length her constant eyelids come
   Upon the fervent martyrdom;
   Then lastly to his holy shrine,
   Exalt amid the tapers' shine
   At Venice,--
 
 I hope you will like this for all its carelessness. I must take an
 opportunity here to observe that though I am writing _to_ you, I am all
 the while writing _at_ your wife. This explanation will account for my
 speaking sometimes hoity-toity-ishly, whereas if you were alone, I should
 sport a little more sober sadness. I am like a squinty gentleman, who,
 saying soft things to one lady ogles another, or what is as bad, in
 arguing with a person on his left hand, appeals with his eyes to one on
 the right. His vision is elastic; he bends it to a certain object, but
 having a patent spring it flies off. Writing has this disadvantage of
 speaking--one cannot write a wink, or a nod, or a grin, or a purse of the
 lips, or a _smile--O law!_ One cannot put one's finger to one's nose, or
 yerk ye in the ribs, or lay hold of your button in writing; but in all the
 most lively and titterly parts of my letter you must not fail to imagine
 me, as the epic poets say, now here, now there; now with one foot pointed
 at the ceiling, now with another; now with my pen on my ear, now with my
 elbow in my mouth. O, my friends, you lose the action, and attitude is
 everything, as Fuseli said when he took up his leg like a musket to shoot
 a swallow just darting behind his shoulder. And yet does not the word
 "mum" go for one's finger beside the nose? I hope it does. I have to make
 use of the word "mum" before I tell you that Severn has got a little
 baby--all his own, let us hope. He told Brown he had given up painting,
 and had turned modeller. I hope sincerely 'tis not a party concern--that
 no Mr. ---- or ---- is the real Pinxit and Severn the poor Sculpsit to
 this work of art. You know he has long studied in the life Academy.
 "Haydon--yes," your wife will say, "Here is a sum total account of Haydon
 again. I wonder your brother don't put a monthly bulletin in the
 Philadelphia papers about him. I won't hear--no. Skip down to the bottom,
 and there are some more of his verses--skip (lullaby-by) them too."--"No,
 let's go regularly through."--"I won't hear a word about Haydon--bless the
 child, how rioty she is--there, go on there."
 
 Now, pray go on here, for I have a few words to say about Haydon. Before
 this chancery threat had cut off every legitimate supply of cash from me,
 I had a little at my disposal. Haydon being very much in want, I lent him
 L30 of it. Now in this see-saw game of life, I got nearest to the ground,
 and this chancery business rivetted me there, so that I was sitting in
 that uneasy position where the seat slants so abominably. I applied to him
 for payment. He could not. That was no wonder; but Goodman Delver, where
 was the wonder then? Why marry in this: he did not seem to care much about
 it, and let me go without my money with almost nonchalance, when he ought
 to have sold his drawings to supply me. I shall perhaps still be
 acquainted with him, but for friendship, that is at an end. Brown has been
 my friend in this. He got him to sign a bond, payable at three months.
 Haslam has assisted me with the return of part of the money you lent him.
 
 Hunt--"there," says your wife, "there's another of those dull folk! Not a
 syllable about my friends? Well, Hunt--What about Hunt? You little thing,
 see how she bites my finger! My! is not this a tooth?" Well when you have
 done with the tooth, read on. Not a syllable about your friends! Here are
 some syllables. As far as I could smoke things on the Sunday before last,
 thus matters stood in Henrietta Street. Henry was a greater blade then
 ever I remember to have seen him. He had on a very nice coat, a becoming
 waistcoat, and buff trousers. I think his face has lost a little of the
 Spanish-brown, but no flesh. He carved some beef exactly to suit my
 appetite, as if I had been measured for it. As I stood looking out of the
 window with Charles, after dinner, quizzing the passengers,--at which I am
 sorry to say he is too apt,--I observed that this young son of a gun's
 whiskers had begun to curl and curl, little twists and twists, all down
 the sides of his face, getting properly thickest on the angles of the
 visage. He certainly will have a notable pair of whiskers. "How shiny your
 gown is in front," says Charles. "Why don't you see? 'tis an apron," says
 Henry; whereat I scrutinised, and behold your mother had a purple stuff
 gown on, and over it an apron of the same colour, being the same cloth
 that was used for the lining. And furthermore to account for the shining,
 it was the first day of wearing. I guessed as much of the gown--but that
 is entre nous. Charles likes England better than France. They've got a
 fat, smiling, fair cook as ever you saw; she is a little lame, but that
 improves her; it makes her go more swimmingly. When I asked "Is Mrs. Wylie
 within?" she gave me such a large five-and-thirty-year-old smile, it made
 me look round upon the fourth stair--it might have been the fifth; but
 that's a puzzle. I shall never be able, if I were to set myself a
 recollecting for a year, to recollect. I think I remember two or three
 specks in her teeth, but I really can't say exactly. Your mother said
 something about Miss Keasle--what that was is quite a riddle to me now,
 whether she had got fatter or thinner, or broader or longer, straiter, or
 had taken to the zigzags--whether she had taken to or had left off asses'
 milk. That, by the bye, she ought never to touch. How much better it would
 be to put her out to nurse with the wise woman of Brentford. I can say no
 more on so spare a subject. Miss Millar now is a different morsel, if one
 knew how to divide and subdivide, theme her out into sections and
 subsections, lay a little on every part of her body as it is divided, in
 common with all her fellow-creatures, in Moor's Almanack. But, alas, I
 have not heard a word about her, no cue to begin upon: there was indeed a
 buzz about her and her mother's being at old Mrs. So and So's, _who was
 like to die_, as the Jews say. But I dare say, keeping up their dialect,
 _she was not like to die_. I must tell you a good thing Reynolds _did_.
 'Twas the best thing he ever _said_. You know at taking leave of a party
 at a doorway, sometimes a man dallies and foolishes and gets awkward, and
 does not know how to make off to advantage. Good-bye--well, good-bye--and
 yet he does not go; good-bye, and so on,--well, good bless you--you know
 what I mean. Now Reynolds was in this predicament, and got out of it in a
 very witty way. He was leaving us at Hampstead. He delayed, and we were
 pressing at him, and even said "be off," at which he put the tails of his
 coat between his legs and sneak'd off as nigh like a spaniel as could be.
 He went with flying colours. This is very clever. I must, being upon the
 subject, tell you another good thing of him. He began, for the service it
 might be of to him in the law, to learn French; he had lessons at the
 cheap rate of 2s. 6d. per fag, and observed to Brown, "Gad," says he, "the
 man sells his lessons so cheap he must have stolen 'em." You have heard of
 Hook, the farce writer. Horace Smith said to one who asked him if he knew
 Hook, "Oh yes, Hook and I are very intimate." There's a page of wit for
 you, to put John Bunyan's emblems out of countenance.
 
 
 Tuesday [September 21].
 
 You see I keep adding a sheet daily till I send the packet off, which I
 shall not do for a few days, as I am inclined to write a good deal; for
 there can be nothing so remembrancing and enchaining as a good long
 letter, be it composed of what it may. From the time you left me our
 friends say I have altered completely--am not the same person. Perhaps in
 this letter I am, for in a letter one takes up one's existence from the
 time we last met. I daresay you have altered also--every man does--our
 bodies every seven years are completely material'd. Seven years ago it was
 not this hand that clinched itself against Hammond. We are like the relict
 garments of a saint--the same and not the same, for the careful monks
 patch it and patch it till there's not a thread of the original garment
 left, and still they show it for St. Anthony's shirt. This is the reason
 why men who have been bosom friends, on being separated for any number of
 years meet coldly, neither of them knowing why. The fact is they are both
 altered.
 
 Men who live together have a silent moulding and influencing power over
 each other. They interassimilate. 'Tis an uneasy thought, that in seven
 years the same hands cannot greet each other again. All this may be
 obviated by a wilful and dramatic exercise of our minds towards each
 other. Some think I have lost that poetic ardour and fire 'tis said I once
 had--the fact is, perhaps I have; but, instead of that, I hope I shall
 substitute a more thoughtful and quiet power. I am more frequently now
 contented to read and think, but now and then haunted with ambitious
 thoughts. Quieter in my pulse, improved in my digestion, exerting myself
 against vexing speculations, scarcely content to write the best verses for
 the fever they leave behind. I want to compose without this fever. I hope
 I one day shall. You would scarcely imagine I could live alone so
 comfortably. "Kepen in solitarinesse." I told Anne, the servant here, the
 other day, to say I was not at home if any one should call. I am not
 certain how I should endure loneliness and bad weather together. Now the
 time is beautiful. I take a walk every day for an hour before dinner, and
 this is generally my walk: I go out the back gate, across one street into
 the cathedral yard, which is always interesting; there I pass under the
 trees along a paved path, pass the beautiful front of the cathedral, turn
 to the left under a stone doorway,--then I am on the other side of the
 building,--which leaving behind me, I pass on through two college-like
 squares, seemingly built for the dwelling-place of deans and prebendaries,
 garnished with grass and shaded with trees; then I pass through one of the
 old city gates, and then you are in one college street, through which I
 pass, and at the end thereof crossing some meadows, and at last a country
 alley of gardens, I arrive, that is my worship arrives, at the foundation
 of St. Cross, which is a very interesting old place, both for its gothic
 tower and alms square and for the appropriation of its rich rents to a
 relation of the Bishop of Winchester. Then I pass across St. Cross meadows
 till you come to the most beautifully clear river--now this is only one
 mile of my walk. I will spare you the other two till after supper, when
 they would do you more good. You must avoid going the first mile best
 after dinner--
 
 
 [Wednesday, September 22.]
 
 I could almost advise you to put by this nonsense until you are lifted out
 of your difficulties; but when you come to this part, feel with
 confidence what I now feel, that though there can be no stop put to
 troubles we are inheritors of, there can be, and must be, an end to
 immediate difficulties. Rest in the confidence that I will not omit any
 exertion to benefit you by some means or other--If I cannot remit you
 hundreds, I will tens, and if not that, ones. Let the next year be managed
 by you as well as possible--the next month, I mean, for I trust you will
 soon receive Abbey's remittance. What he can send you will not be a
 sufficient capital to ensure you any command in America. What he has of
 mine I have nearly anticipated by debts, so I would advise you not to sink
 it, but to live upon it, in hopes of my being able to increase it. To this
 end I will devote whatever I may gain for a few years to come, at which
 period I must begin to think of a security of my own comforts, when quiet
 will become more pleasant to me than the world. Still, I would have you
 doubt my success. 'Tis at present the cast of a die with me. You say,
 "These things will be a great torment to me." I shall not suffer them to
 be so. I shall only exert myself the more, while the seriousness of their
 nature will prevent me from nursing up imaginary griefs. I have not had
 the blue devils once since I received your last. I am advised not to
 publish till it is seen whether the tragedy will or not succeed. Should
 it, a few months may see me in the way of acquiring property. Should it
 not, it will be a drawback, and I shall have to perform a longer literary
 pilgrimage. You will perceive that it is quite out of my interest to come
 to America. What could I do there? How could I employ myself out of reach
 of libraries? You do not mention the name of the gentleman who assists
 you. 'Tis an extraordinary thing. How could you do without that
 assistance? I will not trust myself with brooding over this. The following
 is an extract from a letter of Reynolds to me:--
 
 "I am glad to hear you are getting on so well with your writings. I hope
 you are not neglecting the revision of your poems for the press, from
 which I expect more than you do."
 
 The first thought that struck me on reading your last was to mortgage a
 poem to Murray, but on more consideration, I made up my mind not to do so;
 my reputation is very low; he would not have negotiated my bill of
 intellect, or given me a very small sum. I should have bound myself down
 for some time. 'Tis best to meet present misfortunes; not for a momentary
 good to sacrifice great benefits which one's own untrammell'd and free
 industry may bring one in the end. In all this do never think of me as in
 any way unhappy: I shall not be so. I have a great pleasure in thinking of
 my responsibility to you, and shall do myself the greatest luxury if I can
 succeed in any way so as to be of assistance to you. We shall look back
 upon these times, even before our eyes are at all dim--I am convinced of
 it. But be careful of those Americans. I could almost advise you to come,
 whenever you have the sum of L500, to England. Those Americans will, I am
 afraid, still fleece you. If ever you think of such a thing, you must bear
 in mind the very different state of society here,--the immense
 difficulties of the times, the great sum required per annum to maintain
 yourself in any decency. In fact the whole is with Providence. I know not
 how to advise you but by advising you to advise with yourself. In your
 next tell me at large your thoughts about America--what chance there is of
 succeeding there, for it appears to me you have as yet been somehow
 deceived. I cannot help thinking Mr. Audubon has deceived you. I shall not
 like the sight of him. I shall endeavour to avoid seeing him. You see how
 puzzled I am. I have no meridian to fix you to, being the slave of what is
 to happen. I think I may bid you finally remain in good hopes, and not
 tease yourself with my changes and variations of mind. If I say nothing
 decisive in any one particular part of my letter, you may glean the truth
 from the whole pretty correctly. You may wonder why I had not put your
 affairs with Abbey in train on receiving your letter before last, to which
 there will reach you a short answer dated from Shanklin. I did write and
 speak to Abbey, but to no purpose. Your last, with the enclosed note, has
 appealed home to him. He will not see the necessity of a thing till he is
 hit in the mouth. 'Twill be effectual.
 
 I am sorry to mix up foolish and serious things together, but in writing
 so much I am obliged to do so, and I hope sincerely the tenor of your mind
 will maintain itself better. In the course of a few months I shall be as
 good an Italian scholar as I am a French one. I am reading Ariosto at
 present, not managing more than six or eight stanzas at a time. When I
 have done this language, so as to be able to read it tolerably well, I
 shall set myself to get complete in Latin, and there my learning must
 stop. I do not think of returning upon Greek. I would not go even so far
 if I were not persuaded of the power the knowledge of any language gives
 one. The fact is I like to be acquainted with foreign languages. It is,
 besides, a nice way of filling up intervals, etc. Also the reading of
 Dante is well worth the while; and in Latin there is a fund of curious
 literature of the Middle Ages, the works of many great men--Aretino and
 Sannazaro and Machiavelli. I shall never become attached to a foreign
 idiom, so as to put it into my writings. The Paradise Lost, though so fine
 in itself, is a corruption of our language. It should be kept as it
 is--unique, a curiosity, a beautiful and grand curiosity, the most
 remarkable production of the world; a northern dialect accommodating
 itself to Greek and Latin inversions and intonations. The purest English,
 I think--or what ought to be purest--is Chatterton's. The language had
 existed long enough to be entirely uncorrupted of Chaucer's Gallicisms,
 and still the old words are used. Chatterton's language is entirely
 northern. I prefer the native music of it to Milton's, cut by feet. I have
 but lately stood on my guard against Milton. Life to him would be death
 to me. Miltonic verse cannot be written, but is the verse of art. I wish
 to devote myself to another verse alone.
 
 
 Friday [September 24].
 
 I have been obliged to intermit your letter for two days (this being
 Friday morning), from having had to attend to other correspondence. Brown,
 who was at Bedhampton, went thence to Chichester, and I am still directing
 my letters Bedhampton. There arose a misunderstanding about them. I began
 to suspect my letters had been stopped from curiosity. However, yesterday
 Brown had four letters from me all in a lump, and the matter is cleared
 up. Brown complained very much in his letter to me of yesterday of the
 great alteration the disposition of Dilke has undergone. He thinks of
 nothing but political justice and his boy. Now, the first political duty a
 man ought to have a mind to is the happiness of his friends. I wrote Brown
 a comment on the subject, wherein I explained what I thought of Dilke's
 character, which resolved itself into this conclusion, that Dilke was a
 man who cannot feel he has a personal identity unless he has made up his
 mind about everything. The only means of strengthening one's intellect is
 to make up one's mind about nothing--to let the mind be a thoroughfare for
 all thoughts, not a select party. The genus is not scarce in population;
 all the stubborn arguers you meet with are of the same brood. They never
 begin upon a subject they have not pre-resolved on. They want to hammer
 their nail into you, and if you have the point, still they think you
 wrong. Dilke will never come at a truth as long as he lives, because he is
 always trying at it. He is a Godwin Methodist.
 
 I must not forget to mention that your mother show'd me the lock of
 hair--'tis of a very dark colour for so young a creature. Then it is two
 feet in length. I shall not stand a barley corn higher. That's not fair;
 one ought to go on growing as well as others. At the end of this sheet I
 shall stop for the present and send it off. You may expect another letter
 immediately after it. As I never know the day of the month but by chance,
 I put here that this is the 24th September.
 
 I would wish you here to stop your ears, for I have a word or two to say
 to your wife.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 My dear Sister--In the first place I must quarrel with you for sending me
 such a shabby piece of paper, though that is in some degree made up for by
 the beautiful impression of the seal. You should like to know what I was
 doing the first of May. Let me see--I cannot recollect. I have all the
 Examiners ready to send--they will be a great treat to you when they reach
 you. I shall pack them up when my business with Abbey has come to a good
 conclusion, and the remittance is on the road to you. I have dealt round
 your best wishes like a pack of cards, but being always given to cheat
 myself, I have turned up ace. You see I am making game of you. I see you
 are not all happy in that America. England, however, would not be over
 happy for you if you were here. Perhaps 'twould be better to be teased
 here than there. I must preach patience to you both. No step hasty or
 injurious to you must be taken. You say let one large sheet be all to me.
 You will find more than that in different parts of this packet for you.
 Certainly, I have been caught in rains. A catch in the rain occasioned my
 last sore throat; but as for red-haired girls, upon my word, I do not
 recollect ever having seen one. Are you quizzing me or Miss Waldegrave
 when you talk of promenading? As for pun-making, I wish it was as good a
 trade as pin-making. There is very little business of that sort going on
 now. We struck for wages, like the Manchester weavers, but to no purpose.
 So we are all out of employ. I am more lucky than some, you see, by having
 an opportunity of exporting a few--getting into a little foreign trade,
 which is a comfortable thing. I wish one could get change for a pun in
 silver currency. I would give three and a half any night to get into Drury
 pit, but they won't ring at all. No more will notes you will say; but
 notes are different things, though they make together a pun-note as the
 term goes. If I were your son, I shouldn't mind you, though you rapt me
 with the scissors. But, Lord! I should be out of favour when the little un
 be comm'd. You have made an uncle of me, you have, and I don't know what
 to make of myself. I suppose next there will be a nevey. You say in my
 last, write directly. I have not received your letter above ten days. The
 thought of your little girl puts me in mind of a thing I heard a Mr. Lamb
 say. A child in arms was passing by towards its mother, in the nurse's
 arms. Lamb took hold of the long clothes, saying: "Where, God bless me,
 where does it leave off?"
 
 
 Saturday [September 25].
 
 If you would prefer a joke or two to anything else, I have two for you,
 fresh hatched, just ris, as the bakers' wives say by the rolls. The first
 I played off on Brown; the second I played on myself. Brown, when he left
 me, "Keats," says he, "my good fellow" (staggering upon his left heel and
 fetching an irregular pirouette with his right); "Keats," says he
 (depressing his left eyebrow and elevating his right one), though by the
 way at the moment I did not know which was the right one; "Keats," says he
 (still in the same posture, but furthermore both his hands in his
 waistcoat pockets and putting out his stomach), "Keats--my--go-o-ood
 fell-o-o-ooh," says he (interlarding his exclamation with certain
 ventriloquial parentheses),--no, this is all a lie--He was as sober as a
 judge, when a judge happens to be sober, and said: "Keats, if any letters
 come for me, do not forward them, but open them and give me the marrow of
 them in a few words." At the time I wrote my first to him no letter had
 arrived. I thought I would invent one, and as I had not time to
 manufacture a long one, I dabbed off a short one, and that was the reason
 of the joke succeeding beyond my expectations. Brown let his house to a
 Mr. Benjamin--a Jew. Now, the water which furnishes the house is in a
 tank, sided with a composition of lime, and the lime impregnates the water
 unpleasantly. Taking advantage of this circumstance, I pretended that Mr.
 Benjamin had written the following short note--
 
      Sir--By drinking your damn'd tank water I have got the gravel. What
      reparation can you make to me and my family?
 
      NATHAN BENJAMIN.
 
 By a fortunate hit, I hit upon his right--heathen name--his right
 pronomen. Brown in consequence, it appears, wrote to the surprised Mr.
 Benjamin the following--
 
      Sir--I cannot offer you any remuneration until your gravel shall have
      formed itself into a stone--when I will cut you with pleasure.
 
      C. BROWN.
 
 This of Brown's Mr. Benjamin has answered, insisting on an explanation of
 this singular circumstance. B. says: "When I read your letter and his
 following, I roared; and in came Mr. Snook, who on reading them seem'd
 likely to burst the hoops of his fat sides." So the joke has told well.
 
 Now for the one I played on myself. I must first give you the scene and
 the dramatis personae. There are an old major and his youngish wife here in
 the next apartments to me. His bedroom door opens at an angle with my
 sitting-room door. Yesterday I was reading as demurely as a parish clerk,
 when I heard a rap at the door. I got up and opened it; no one was to be
 seen. I listened, and heard some one in the major's room. Not content with
 this, I went upstairs and down, looked in the cupboards and watch'd. At
 last I set myself to read again, not quite so demurely, when there came a
 louder rap. I was determined to find out who it was. I looked out; the
 staircases were all silent. "This must be the major's wife," said I. "At
 all events I will see the truth." So I rapt me at the major's door and
 went in, to the utter surprise and confusion of the lady, who was in
 reality there. After a little explanation, which I can no more describe
 than fly, I made my retreat from her, convinced of my mistake. She is to
 all appearance a silly body, and is really surprised about it. She must
 have been, for I have discovered that a little girl in the house was the
 rapper. I assure you she has nearly made me sneeze. If the lady tells
 tits, I shall put a very grave and moral face on the matter with the old
 gentleman, and make his little boy a present of a humming top.
 
 
 [Monday, September 27.]
 
 My dear George--This Monday morning, the 27th, I have received your last,
 dated 12th July. You say you have not heard from England for three months.
 Then my letter from Shanklin, written, I think, at the end of June, has
 not reach'd you. You shall not have cause to think I neglect you. I have
 kept this back a little time in expectation of hearing from Mr. Abbey. You
 will say I might have remained in town to be Abbey's messenger in these
 affairs. That I offered him, but he in his answer convinced me that he was
 anxious to bring the business to an issue. He observed, that by being
 himself the agent in the whole, people might be more expeditious. You say
 you have not heard for three months, and yet your letters have the tone of
 knowing how our affairs are situated, by which I conjecture I acquainted
 you with them in a letter previous to the Shanklin one. That I may not
 have done. To be certain, I will here state that it is in consequence of
 Mrs. Jennings threatening a chancery suit that you have been kept from the
 receipt of monies, and myself deprived of any help from Abbey. I am glad
 you say you keep up your spirits. I hope you make a true statement on
 that score. Still keep them up, for we are all young. I can only repeat
 here that you shall hear from me again immediately. Notwithstanding this
 bad intelligence, I have experienced some pleasure in receiving so
 correctly two letters from you, as it gives me, if I may so say, a distant
 idea of proximity. This last improves upon my little niece--kiss her for
 me. Do not fret yourself about the delay of money on account of my
 immediate opportunity being lost, for in a new country whoever has money
 must have an opportunity of employing it in many ways. The report runs now
 more in favour of Kean stopping in England. If he should, I have confident
 hopes of our tragedy. If he invokes the hot-blooded character of
 Ludolph,--and he is the only actor that can do it,--he will add to his own
 fame and improve my fortune. I will give you a half-dozen lines of it
 before I part as a specimen--
 
   Not as a swordsman would I pardon crave,
   But as a son: the bronz'd Centurion,
   Long-toil'd in foreign wars, and whose high deeds
   Are shaded in a forest of tall spears,
   Known only to his troop, hath greater plea
   Of favour with my sire than I can have.
 
 Believe me, my dear brother and sister, your affectionate and anxious
 Brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXVII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 Winchester, September 22, 1819.
 
 My dear Reynolds--I was very glad to hear from Woodhouse that you would
 meet in the country. I hope you will pass some pleasant time together.
 Which I wish to make pleasanter by a brace of letters, very highly to be
 estimated, as really I have had very bad luck with this sort of game this
 season. I "kepen in solitarinesse," for Brown has gone a-visiting. I am
 surprised myself at the pleasure I live alone in. I can give you no news
 of the place here, or any other idea of it but what I have to this effect
 written to George. Yesterday I say to him was a grand day for Winchester.
 They elected a Mayor. It was indeed high time the place should receive
 some sort of excitement. There was nothing going on: all asleep: not an
 old maid's sedan returning from a card party: and if any old woman got
 tipsy at Christenings they did not expose it in the streets. The first
 night though of our arrival here, there was a slight uproar took place at
 about 10 o' the Clock. We heard distinctly a noise pattering down the High
 Street as of a walking cane of the good old Dowager breed; and a little
 minute after we heard a less voice observe "What a noise the ferril
 made--it must be loose." Brown wanted to call the constables, but I
 observed 'twas only a little breeze and would soon pass over.--The side
 streets here are excessively maiden-lady-like: the door-steps always fresh
 from the flannel. The knockers have a staid serious, nay almost awful
 quietness about them. I never saw so quiet a collection of Lions' and
 Rams' heads. The doors are most part black, with a little brass handle
 just above the keyhole, so that in Winchester a man may very quietly shut
 himself out of his own house. How beautiful the season is now--How fine
 the air. A temperate sharpness about it. Really, without joking, chaste
 weather--Dian skies--I never liked stubble-fields so much as now--Aye
 better than the chilly green of the Spring. Somehow, a stubble-field looks
 warm--in the same way that some pictures look warm. This struck me so much
 in my Sunday's walk that I composed upon it.[107]
 
 I hope you are better employed than in gaping after weather. I have been
 at different times so happy as not to know what weather it was--No I will
 not copy a parcel of verses. I always somehow associate Chatterton with
 autumn. He is the purest writer in the English Language. He has no French
 idiom or particles, like Chaucer--'tis genuine English Idiom in English
 words. I have given up Hyperion--there were too many Miltonic inversions
 in it--Miltonic verse cannot be written but in an artful, or, rather,
 artist's humour. I wish to give myself up to other sensations. English
 ought to be kept up. It may be interesting to you to pick out some lines
 from Hyperion, and put a mark x to the false beauty proceeding from art,
 and one || to the true voice of feeling. Upon my soul 'twas imagination--I
 cannot make the distinction--Every now and then there is a Miltonic
 intonation--But I cannot make the division properly. The fact is, I must
 take a walk: for I am writing a long letter to George: and have been
 employed at it all the morning. You will ask, have I heard from George. I
 am sorry to say not the best news--I hope for better. This is the reason,
 among others, that if I write to you it must be in such a scrap-like way.
 I have no meridian to date interests from, or measure circumstances--
 To-night I am all in a mist; I scarcely know what's what--But you knowing
 my unsteady and vagarish disposition, will guess that all this turmoil
 will be settled by to-morrow morning. It strikes me to-night that I have
 led a very odd sort of life for the two or three last years--Here and
 there--no anchor--I am glad of it.--If you can get a peep at Babbicombe
 before you leave the country, do.--I think it the finest place I have
 seen, or is to be seen, in the South. There is a Cottage there I took warm
 water at, that made up for the tea. I have lately shirk'd some friends of
 ours, and I advise you to do the same, I mean the blue-devils--I am never
 at home to them. You need not fear them while you remain in
 Devonshire--there will be some of the family waiting for you at the Coach
 office--but go by another Coach.
 
 I shall beg leave to have a third opinion in the first discussion you
 have with Woodhouse--just half-way, between both. You know I will not give
 up my argument--In my walk to-day I stoop'd under a railing that lay
 across my path, and asked myself "Why I did not get over." "Because,"
 answered I, "no one wanted to force you under." I would give a guinea to
 be a reasonable man--good sound sense--a says what he thinks and does what
 he says man--and did not take snuff. They say men near death, however mad
 they may have been, come to their senses--I hope I shall here in this
 letter--there is a decent space to be very sensible in--many a good
 proverb has been in less--nay, I have heard of the statutes at large being
 changed into the Statutes at Small and printed for a watch paper.
 
 Your sisters, by this time, must have got the Devonshire "ees"--short
 ees--you know 'em--they are the prettiest ees in the language. O how I
 admire the middle-sized delicate Devonshire girls of about fifteen. There
 was one at an Inn door holding a quartern of brandy--the very thought of
 her kept me warm a whole stage--and a 16 miler too--"You'll pardon me for
 being jocular."
 
 Ever your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXVIII.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 Winchester, Wednesday Eve.
 
 [September 22, 1819.]
 
 My dear Dilke--Whatever I take to for the time I cannot leave off in a
 hurry; letter writing is the go now; I have consumed a quire at least. You
 must give me credit, now, for a free Letter when it is in reality an
 interested one, on two points, the one requestive, the other verging to
 the pros and cons. As I expect they will lead me to seeing and conferring
 with you in a short time, I shall not enter at all upon a letter I have
 lately received from George, of not the most comfortable intelligence: but
 proceed to these two points, which if you can theme out into sections and
 subsections, for my edification, you will oblige me. The first I shall
 begin upon, the other will follow like a tail to a Comet. I have written
 to Brown on the subject, and can but go over the same ground with you in a
 very short time, it not being more in length than the ordinary paces
 between the Wickets. It concerns a resolution I have taken to endeavour to
 acquire something by temporary writing in periodical works. You must agree
 with me how unwise it is to keep feeding upon hopes, which depending so
 much on the state of temper and imagination, appear gloomy or bright, near
 or afar off, just as it happens. Now an act has three parts--to act, to
 do, and to perform--I mean I should _do_ something for my immediate
 welfare. Even if I am swept away like a spider from a drawing-room, I am
 determined to spin--homespun anything for sale. Yea, I will traffic.
 Anything but Mortgage my Brain to Blackwood. I am determined not to lie
 like a dead lump. If Reynolds had not taken to the law, would he not be
 earning something? Why cannot I. You may say I want tact--that is easily
 acquired. You may be up to the slang of a cock pit in three battles. It is
 fortunate I have not before this been tempted to venture on the common. I
 should a year or two ago have spoken my mind on every subject with the
 utmost simplicity. I hope I have learned a little better and am confident
 I shall be able to cheat as well as any literary Jew of the Market and
 shine up an article on anything without much knowledge of the subject, aye
 like an orange. I would willingly have recourse to other means. I cannot;
 I am fit for nothing but literature. Wait for the issue of this Tragedy?
 No--there cannot be greater uncertainties east, west, north, and south
 than concerning dramatic composition. How many months must I wait! Had I
 not better begin to look about me now? If better events supersede this
 necessity what harm will be done? I have no trust whatever on Poetry. I
 don't wonder at it--the marvel is to me how people read so much of it. I
 think you will see the reasonableness of my plan. To forward it I purpose
 living in cheap Lodging in Town, that I may be in the reach of books and
 information, of which there is here a plentiful lack. If I can find any
 place tolerably comfortable I will settle myself and fag till I can afford
 to buy Pleasure--which if I never can afford I must go without. Talking of
 Pleasure, this moment I was writing with one hand, and with the other
 holding to my Mouth a Nectarine--good God how fine. It went down soft,
 pulpy, slushy, oozy--all its delicious embonpoint melted down my throat
 like a large beatified Strawberry. I shall certainly breed. Now I come to
 my request. Should you like me for a neighbour again? Come, plump it out,
 I won't blush. I should also be in the neighbourhood of Mrs. Wylie, which
 I should be glad of, though that of course does not influence me.
 Therefore will you look about Marsham, or Rodney Street for a couple of
 rooms for me. Rooms like the gallant's legs in Massinger's time, "as good
 as the times allow, Sir." I have written to-day to Reynolds, and to
 Woodhouse. Do you know him? He is a Friend of Taylor's at whom Brown has
 taken one of his funny odd dislikes. I'm sure he's wrong, because
 Woodhouse likes my Poetry--conclusive. I ask your opinion and yet I must
 say to you as to him, Brown, that if you have anything to say against it I
 shall be as obstinate and heady as a Radical. By the Examiner coming in
 your handwriting you must be in Town. They have put me into spirits.
 Notwithstanding my aristocratic temper I cannot help being very much
 pleased with the present public proceedings. I hope sincerely I shall be
 able to put a Mite of help to the Liberal side of the Question before I
 die. If you should have left Town again (for your Holidays cannot be up
 yet) let me know when this is forwarded to you. A most extraordinary
 mischance has befallen two letters I wrote Brown--one from London whither
 I was obliged to go on business for George; the other from this place
 since my return. I can't make it out. I am excessively sorry for it. I
 shall hear from Brown and from you almost together, for I have sent him a
 Letter to-day: you must positively agree with me or by the delicate toe
 nails of the virgin I will not open your Letters. If they are as David
 says "suspicious looking letters" I won't open them. If St. John had been
 half as cunning he might have seen the revelations comfortably in his own
 room, without giving angels the trouble of breaking open seals. Remember
 me to Mrs. D. and the West-monasteranian and believe me
 
 Ever your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXIX.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 Winchester, September 23, 1819.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Now I am going to enter on the subject of self. It is quite time I should
 set myself doing something, and live no longer upon hopes. I have never
 yet exerted myself. I am getting into an idle-minded, vicious way of life,
 almost content to live upon others. In no period of my life have I acted
 with any self-will but in throwing up the apothecary profession. That I do
 not repent of. Look at Reynolds, if he was not in the law, he would be
 acquiring, by his abilities, something towards his support. My occupation
 is entirely literary: I will do so, too. I will write, on the liberal side
 of the question, for whoever will pay me. I have not known yet what it is
 to be diligent. I purpose living in town in a cheap lodging, and
 endeavouring, for a beginning, to get the theatricals of some paper. When
 I can afford to compose deliberate poems, I will. I shall be in
 expectation of an answer to this. Look on my side of the question. I am
 convinced I am right. Suppose the tragedy should succeed,--there will be
 no harm done. And here I will take an opportunity of making a remark or
 two on our friendship, and on all your good offices to me. I have a
 natural timidity of mind in these matters; liking better to take the
 feeling between us for granted, than to speak of it. But, good God! what a
 short while you have known me! I feel it a sort of duty thus to
 recapitulate, however unpleasant it may be to you. You have been living
 for others more than any man I know. This is a vexation to me, because it
 has been depriving you, in the very prime of your life, of pleasures which
 it was your duty to procure. As I am speaking in general terms, this may
 appear nonsense; you perhaps will not understand it; but if you can go
 over, day by day, any month of the last year, you will know what I mean.
 On the whole however this is a subject that I cannot express myself
 upon--I speculate upon it frequently; and believe me the end of my
 speculations is always an anxiety for your happiness. This anxiety will
 not be one of the least incitements to the plan I purpose pursuing. I had
 got into a habit of mind of looking towards you as a help in all
 difficulties--This very habit would be the parent of idleness and
 difficulties. You will see it is a duty I owe myself to break the neck of
 it. I do nothing for my subsistence--make no exertion--At the end of
 another year you shall applaud me, not for verses, but for conduct. While
 I have some immediate cash, I had better settle myself quietly, and fag on
 as others do. I shall apply to Hazlitt, who knows the market as well as
 any one, for something to bring me in a few pounds as soon as possible. I
 shall not suffer my pride to hinder me. The whisper may go round; I shall
 not hear it. If I can get an article in the Edinburgh, I will. One must
 not be delicate--Nor let this disturb you longer than a moment. I look
 forward with a good hope that we shall one day be passing free,
 untrammelled, unanxious time together. That can never be if I continue a
 dead lump. I shall be expecting anxiously an answer from you. If it does
 not arrive in a few days this will have miscarried, and I shall come
 straight to ---- before I go to town, which you I am sure will agree had
 better be done while I still have some ready cash. By the middle of
 October I shall expect you in London. We will then set at the theatres. If
 you have anything to gainsay, I shall be even as the deaf adder which
 stoppeth her ears.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 CXX.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 Winchester, September 23, 1819.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Do not suffer me to disturb you unpleasantly: I do not mean that you
 should not suffer me to occupy your thoughts, but to occupy them
 pleasantly; for I assure you I am as far from being unhappy as possible.
 Imaginary grievances have always been more my torment than real ones--You
 know this well--Real ones will never have any other effect upon me than to
 stimulate me to get out of or avoid them. This is easily accounted
 for--Our imaginary woes are conjured up by our passions, and are fostered
 by passionate feeling: our real ones come of themselves, and are opposed
 by an abstract exertion of mind. Real grievances are displacers of
 passion. The imaginary nail a man down for a sufferer, as on a cross; the
 real spur him up into an agent. I wish, at one view, you would see my
 heart towards you. 'Tis only from a high tone of feeling that I can put
 that word upon paper--out of poetry. I ought to have waited for your
 answer to my last before I wrote this. I felt however compelled to make a
 rejoinder to yours. I had written to Dilke on the subject of my last, I
 scarcely know whether I shall send my letter now. I think he would approve
 of my plan; it is so evident. Nay, I am convinced, out and out, that by
 prosing for a while in periodical works I may maintain myself decently.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 CXXI.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 Winchester, Friday, October 1 [1819].
 
 My dear Dilke--For sundry reasons, which I will explain to you when I come
 to Town, I have to request you will do me a great favour as I must call it
 knowing how great a Bore it is. That your imagination may not have time to
 take too great an alarm I state immediately that I want you to hire me a
 couple of rooms (a Sitting Room and bed room for myself alone) in
 Westminster. Quietness and cheapness are the essentials: but as I shall
 with Brown be returned by next Friday you cannot in that space have
 sufficient time to make any choice selection, and need not be very
 particular as I can when on the spot suit myself at leisure. Brown bids me
 remind you not to send the Examiners after the third. Tell Mrs. D. I am
 obliged to her for the late ones which I see are directed in her hand.
 Excuse this mere business letter for I assure you I have not a syllable at
 hand on any subject in the world.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Winchester, Sunday Morn [October 3, 1819].
 
 My dear Haydon--Certainly I might: but a few Months pass away before we
 are aware. I have a great aversion to letter writing, which grows more and
 more upon me; and a greater to summon up circumstances before me of an
 unpleasant nature. I was not willing to trouble you with them. Could I
 have dated from my Palace of Milan you would have heard from me. Not even
 now will I mention a word of my affairs--only that "I Rab am here" but
 shall not be here more than a Week more, as I purpose to settle in Town
 and work my way with the rest. I hope I shall never be so silly as to
 injure my health and industry for the future by speaking, writing or
 fretting about my non-estate. I have no quarrel, I assure you, of so
 weighty a nature, with the world, on my own account as I have on yours. I
 have done nothing--except for the amusement of a few people who refine
 upon their feelings till anything in the un-understandable way will go
 down with them--people predisposed for sentiment. I have no cause to
 complain because I am certain anything really fine will in these days be
 felt. I have no doubt that if I had written Othello I should have been
 cheered by as good a mob as Hunt. So would you be now if the operation of
 painting was as universal as that of Writing. It is not: and therefore it
 did behove men I could mention among whom I must place Sir George Beaumont
 to have lifted you up above sordid cares. That this has not been done is a
 disgrace to the country. I know very little of Painting, yet your pictures
 follow me into the Country. When I am tired of reading I often think them
 over and as often condemn the spirit of modern Connoisseurs. Upon the
 whole, indeed, you have no complaint to make, being able to say what so
 few Men can, "I have succeeded." On sitting down to write a few lines to
 you these are the uppermost in my mind, and, however I may be beating
 about the arctic while your spirit has passed the line, you may lay to a
 minute and consider I am earnest as far as I can see. Though at this
 present "I have great dispositions to write" I feel every day more and
 more content to read. Books are becoming more interesting and valuable to
 me. I may say I could not live without them. If in the course of a
 fortnight you can procure me a ticket to the British Museum I will make a
 better use of it than I did in the first instance. I shall go on with
 patience in the confidence that if I ever do anything worth remembering
 the Reviewers will no more be able to stumble-block me than the Royal
 Academy could you. They have the same quarrel with you that the Scotch
 nobles had with Wallace. The fame they have lost through you is no joke to
 them. Had it not been for you Fuseli would have been not as he is major
 but maximus domo. What Reviewers can put a hindrance to must be--a
 nothing--or mediocre which is worse. I am sorry to say that since I saw
 you I have been guilty of a practical joke upon Brown which has had all
 the success of an innocent Wildfire among people. Some day in the next
 week you shall hear it from me by word of Mouth. I have not seen the
 portentous Book which was skummer'd at you just as I left town. It may be
 light enough to serve you as a Cork Jacket and save you for a while the
 trouble of swimming. I heard the Man went raking and rummaging about like
 any Richardson. That and the Memoirs of Menage are the first I shall be
 at. From Sr. G. B.'s, Lord Ms[108] and particularly Sr. John Leicesters
 good lord deliver us. I shall expect to see your Picture plumped out like
 a ripe Peach--you would not be very willing to give me a slice of it. I
 came to this place in the hopes of meeting with a Library but was
 disappointed. The High Street is as quiet as a Lamb. The knockers are
 dieted to three raps per diem. The walks about are interesting from the
 many old Buildings and archways. The view of the High Street through the
 Gate of the City in the beautiful September evening light has amused me
 frequently. The bad singing of the Cathedral I do not care to smoke--being
 by myself I am not very coy in my taste. At St. Cross there is an
 interesting picture of Albert Duerer's--who living in such war-like times
 perhaps was forced to paint in his Gauntlets--so we must make all
 allowances.
 
 I am, my dear Haydon, Yours ever
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Brown has a few words to say to you and will cross this.
 
 
 
 
 CXXIII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place[109] [October 16, 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--My Conscience is always reproaching me for neglecting you
 for so long a time. I have been returned from Winchester this fortnight,
 and as yet I have not seen you. I have no excuse to offer--I should have
 no excuse. I shall expect to see you the next time I call on Mr. A. about
 George's affairs which perplex me a great deal--I should have to-day gone
 to see if you were in town--but as I am in an industrious humour (which is
 so necessary to my livelihood for the future) I am loath to break through
 it though it be merely for one day, for when I am inclined I can do a
 great deal in a day--I am more fond of pleasure than study (many men have
 prefer'd the latter) but I have become resolved to know something which
 you will credit when I tell you I have left off animal food that my brains
 may never henceforth be in a greater mist than is theirs by nature--I took
 lodgings in Westminster for the purpose of being in the reach of Books,
 but am now returned to Hampstead being induced to it by the habit I have
 acquired in this room I am now in and also from the pleasure of being free
 from paying any petty attentions to a diminutive house-keeping. Mr. Brown
 has been my great friend for some time--without him I should have been
 in, perhaps, personal distress--as I know you love me though I do not
 deserve it, I am sure you will take pleasure in being a friend to Mr.
 Brown even before you know him.--My lodgings for two or three days were
 close in the neighbourhood of Mrs. Dilke who never sees me but she
 enquires after you--I have had letters from George lately which do not
 contain, as I think I told you in my last, the best news--I have hopes for
 the best--I trust in a good termination to his affairs which you please
 God will soon hear of--It is better you should not be teased with the
 particulars. The whole amount of the ill news is that his mercantile
 speculations have not had success in consequence of the general depression
 of trade in the whole province of Kentucky and indeed all America.--I have
 a couple of shells for you you will call pretty.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXXIV.--TO JOSEPH SEVERN.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Wednesday
 
 [October 27? 1819].
 
 Dear Severn--Either your joke about staying at home is a very old one or I
 really call'd. I don't remember doing so. I am glad to hear you have
 finish'd the Picture and am more anxious to see it than I have time to
 spare: for I have been so very lax, unemployed, unmeridian'd, and
 objectless these two months that I even grudge indulging (and that is no
 great indulgence considering the Lecture is not over till 9 and the
 lecture room seven miles from Wentworth Place) myself by going to
 Hazlitt's Lecture. If you have hours to the amount of a brace of dozens to
 throw away you may sleep nine of them here in your little Crib and chat
 the rest. When your Picture is up and in a good light I shall make a point
 of meeting you at the Academy if you will let me know when. If you should
 be at the Lecture to-morrow evening I shall see you--and congratulate you
 heartily--Haslam I know "is very Beadle to an amorous sigh."
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXV.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Hampstead,
 
 November 17 [1819].
 
 My dear Taylor--I have come to a determination not to publish anything I
 have now ready written: but, for all that, to publish a poem before long,
 and that I hope to make a fine one. As the marvellous is the most
 enticing, and the surest guarantee of harmonious numbers, I have been
 endeavouring to persuade myself to untether Fancy, and to let her manage
 for herself.[110] I and myself cannot agree about this at all. Wonders are
 no wonders to me. I am more at home amongst men and women. I would rather
 read Chaucer than Ariosto. The little dramatic skill I may as yet have,
 however badly it might show in a drama, would, I think, be sufficient for
 a poem. I wish to diffuse the colouring of St. Agnes's Eve throughout a
 poem in which character and sentiment would be the figures to such
 drapery. Two or three such poems, if God should spare me, written in the
 course of the next six years, would be a famous Gradus ad Parnassum
 altissimum--I mean they would nerve me up to the writing of a few fine
 plays--my greatest ambition, when I do feel ambitious. I am sorry to say
 that is very seldom. The subject we have once or twice talked of appears a
 promising one--The Earl of Leicester's history. I am this morning reading
 Holinshed's "Elizabeth." You had some books a while ago, you promised to
 send me, illustrative of my subject. If you can lay hold of them, or any
 others which may be serviceable to me, I know you will encourage my
 low-spirited muse by sending them, or rather by letting me know where our
 errand-cart man shall call with my little box. I will endeavour to set
 myself selfishly at work on this poem that is to be.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXVI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wednesday Morn--[November 17, 1819].
 
 My dear Fanny--I received your letter yesterday Evening and will obey it
 to-morrow. I would come to-day--but I have been to Town so frequently on
 George's Business it makes me wish to employ to-day at Hampstead. So I say
 Thursday without fail. I have no news at all entertaining--and if I had I
 should not have time to tell them as I wish to send this by the morning
 Post.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CXXVII.--TO JOSEPH SEVERN.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Monday Morn--
 
 [December 6? 1819].
 
 My dear Severn--I am very sorry that on Tuesday I have an appointment in
 the City of an undeferable nature; and Brown on the same day has some
 business at Guildhall. I have not been able to figure your manner of
 executing the Cave of despair,[111] therefore it will be at any rate a
 novelty and surprise to me--I trust on the right side. I shall call upon
 you some morning shortly, early enough to catch you before you can get
 out--when we will proceed to the Academy. I think you must be suited with
 a good painting light in your Bay window. I wish you to return the
 Compliment by going with me to see a Poem I have hung up for the Prize in
 the Lecture Room of the Surry Institution. I have many Rivals, the most
 threatening are An Ode to Lord Castlereagh, and a new series of Hymns for
 the New, new Jerusalem Chapel. (You had best put me into your Cave of
 despair.)
 
 Ever yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXVIII.--TO JAMES RICE.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [December 1819].
 
 My dear Rice--As I want the coat on my back mended, I would be obliged if
 you would send me the one Brown left at your house by the Bearer--During
 your late contest I had regular reports of you, how that your time was
 completely taken up and your health improving--I shall call in the course
 of a few days, and see whether your promotion has made any difference in
 your Behaviour to us. I suppose Reynolds has given you an account of Brown
 and Elliston. As he has not rejected our Tragedy, I shall not venture to
 call him directly a fool; but as he wishes to put it off till next season,
 I cannot help thinking him little better than a knave.--That it will not
 be acted this season is yet uncertain. Perhaps we may give it another
 furbish and try it at Covent Garden. 'Twould do one's heart good to see
 Macready in Ludolph. If you do not see me soon it will be from the humour
 of writing, which I have had for three days continuing. I must say to the
 Muses what the maid says to the Man--"Take me while the fit is on me."...
 
 Ever yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXIX.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Monday Morn--
 
 [December 20, 1819.]
 
 My dear Fanny--When I saw you last, you ask'd me whether you should see me
 again before Christmas. You would have seen me if I had been quite well. I
 have not, though not unwell enough to have prevented me--not indeed at
 all--but fearful lest the weather should affect my throat which on
 exertion or cold continually threatens me.--By the advice of my Doctor I
 have had a warm great Coat made and have ordered some thick shoes--so
 furnish'd I shall be with you if it holds a little fine before Christmas
 day.--I have been very busy since I saw you, especially the last Week, and
 shall be for some time, in preparing some Poems to come out in the Spring,
 and also in brightening the interest of our Tragedy.--Of the Tragedy I can
 give you but news semigood. It is accepted at Drury Lane with a promise of
 coming out next season: as that will be too long a delay we have
 determined to get Elliston to bring it out this Season or to transfer it
 to Covent Garden. This Elliston will not like, as we have every motive to
 believe that Kean has perceived how suitable the principal Character will
 be for him. My hopes of success in the literary world are now better than
 ever. Mr. Abbey, on my calling on him lately, appeared anxious that I
 should apply myself to something else--He mentioned Tea Brokerage. I
 supposed he might perhaps mean to give me the Brokerage of his concern
 which might be executed with little trouble and a good profit; and
 therefore said I should have no objection to it, especially as at the same
 time it occurred to me that I might make over the business to George--I
 questioned him about it a few days after. His mind takes odd turns. When I
 became a Suitor he became coy. He did not seem so much inclined to serve
 me. He described what I should have to do in the progress of business. It
 will not suit me. I have given it up. I have not heard again from George,
 which rather disappoints me, as I wish to hear before I make any fresh
 remittance of his property. I received a note from Mrs. Dilke a few days
 ago inviting me to dine with her on Xmas day which I shall do. Mr. Brown
 and I go on in our old dog trot of Breakfast, dinner (not tea, for we have
 left that off), supper, Sleep, Confab, stirring the fire and reading.
 Whilst I was in the Country last Summer, Mrs. Bentley tells me, a woman
 in mourning call'd on me,--and talk'd something of an aunt of ours--I am
 so careless a fellow I did not enquire, but will particularly: On Tuesday
 I am going to hear some Schoolboys Speechify on breaking up day--I'll lay
 you a pocket piece we shall have "My name is Norval." I have not yet
 look'd for the Letter you mention'd as it is mix'd up in a box full of
 papers--you must tell me, if you can recollect, the subject of it. This
 moment Bentley brought a Letter from George for me to deliver to Mrs.
 Wylie--I shall see her and it before I see you. The Direction was in his
 best hand written with a good Pen and sealed with a Tassie's Shakspeare
 such as I gave you--We judge of people's hearts by their Countenances; may
 we not judge of Letters in the same way?--if so, the Letter does not
 contain unpleasant news--Good or bad spirits have an effect on the
 handwriting. This direction is at least unnervous and healthy. Our Sister
 is also well, or George would have made strange work with Ks and Ws. The
 little Baby is well or he would have formed precious vowels and
 Consonants--He sent off the Letter in a hurry, or the mail bag was rather
 a warm berth, or he has worn out his Seal, for the Shakspeare's head is
 flattened a little. This is close muggy weather as they say at the Ale
 houses.
 
 I am ever, my dear Sister, yours affectionately
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXX.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Wednesday.
 
 [December 22, 1819.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I wrote to you a Letter directed Walthamstow the day before
 yesterday wherein I promised to see you before Christmas day. I am sorry
 to say I have been and continue rather unwell, and therefore shall not be
 able to promise certainly. I have not seen Mrs. Wylie's Letter. Excuse my
 dear Fanny this very shabby note.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXI.--TO GEORGIANA KEATS.
 
 
 Thursday, January 13, 1820.
 
 My dear Sister--By the time you receive this your trouble will be over. I
 wish you knew they were half over. I mean that George is safe in England
 and in good health.[112] To write to you by him is almost like following
 one's own letter in the mail. That it may not be quite so, I will leave
 common intelligence out of the question, and write wide of him as I can. I
 fear I must be dull, having had no good-natured flip from Fortune's finger
 since I saw you, and no sideway comfort in the success of my friends. I
 could almost promise that if I had the means I would accompany George back
 to America, and pay you a visit of a few months. I should not think much
 of the time, or my absence from my books; or I have no right to think, for
 I am very idle. But then I ought to be diligent, and at least keep myself
 within the reach of materials for diligence. Diligence, that I do not mean
 to say; I should say dreaming over my books, or rather other people's
 books. George has promised to bring you to England when the five years
 have elapsed. I regret very much that I shall not be able to see you
 before that time, and even then I must hope that your affairs will be in
 so prosperous a way as to induce you to stop longer. Yours is a hardish
 fate, to be so divided among your friends and settled among a people you
 hate. You will find it improve. You have a heart that will take hold of
 your children; even George's absence will make things better. His return
 will banish what must be your greatest sorrow, and at the same time minor
 ones with it. Robinson Crusoe, when he saw himself in danger of perishing
 on the waters, looked back to his island as to the haven of his happiness,
 and on gaining it once more was more content with his solitude. We smoke
 George about his little girl. He runs the common-beaten road of every
 father, as I dare say you do of every mother: there is no child like his
 child, so original,--original forsooth! However, I take you at your words.
 I have a lively faith that yours is the very gem of all children. Ain't I
 its uncle?
 
 On Henry's marriage there was a piece of bride cake sent me. It missed its
 way. I suppose the carrier or coachman was a conjuror, and wanted it for
 his own private use. Last Sunday George and I dined at Millar's. There
 were your mother and Charles with Fool Lacon, Esq., who sent the sly,
 disinterested shawl to Miss Millar, with his own heathen name engraved in
 the middle. Charles had a silk handkerchief belonging to a Miss Grover,
 with whom he pretended to be smitten, and for her sake kept exhibiting and
 adoring the handkerchief all the evening. Fool Lacon, Esq., treated it
 with a little venturesome, trembling contumely, whereupon Charles set him
 quietly down on the floor, from where he as quietly got up. This process
 was repeated at supper time, when your mother said, "If I were you Mr.
 Lacon I would not let him do so." Fool Lacon, Esq., did not offer any
 remark. He will undoubtedly die in his bed. Your mother did not look quite
 so well on Sunday. Mrs. Henry Wylie is excessively quiet before people. I
 hope she is always so. Yesterday we dined at Taylor's, in Fleet Street.
 George left early after dinner to go to Deptford; he will make all square
 there for me. I could not go with him--I did not like the amusement.
 Haslam is a very good fellow indeed; he has been excessively anxious and
 kind to us. But is this fair? He has an innamorata at Deptford, and he has
 been wanting me for some time past to see her. This is a thing which it is
 impossible not to shirk. A man is like a magnet--he must have a repelling
 end. So how am I to see Haslam's lady and family, if I even went? for by
 the time I got to Greenwich I should have repell'd them to Blackheath, and
 by the time I got to Deptford they would be on Shooter's Hill; when I came
 to Shooter Hill they would alight at Chatham, and so on till I drove them
 into the sea, which I think might be indictable. The evening before
 yesterday we had a pianoforte hop at Dilke's. There was very little
 amusement in the room, but a Scotchman to hate. Some people, you must have
 observed, have a most unpleasant effect upon you when you see them
 speaking in profile. This Scotchman is the most accomplished fellow in
 this way I ever met with. The effect was complete. It went down like a
 dose of bitters, and I hope will improve my digestion. At Taylor's too,
 there was a Scotchman,--not quite so bad, for he was as clean as he could
 get himself. Not having succeeded in Drury Lane with our tragedy, we have
 been making some alterations, and are about to try Covent Garden. Brown
 has just done patching up the copy--as it is altered. The reliance I had
 on it was in Kean's acting. I am not afraid it will be damn'd in the
 Garden. You said in one of your letters that there was nothing but Haydon
 and Co. in mine. There can be nothing of him in this, for I never see him
 or Co. George has introduced to us an American of the name of Hart. I like
 him in a moderate way. He was at Mrs. Dilke's party--and sitting by me; we
 began talking about English and American ladies. The Miss ---- and some of
 their friends made not a very enticing row opposite us. I bade him mark
 them and form his judgment of them. I told him I hated Englishmen because
 they were the only men I knew. He does not understand this. Who would be
 Braggadochio to Johnny Bull? Johnny's house is his castle--and a precious
 dull castle it is; what a many Bull castles there are in so-and-so
 crescent! I never wish myself an unversed writer and newsmonger but when I
 write to you. I should like for a day or two to have somebody's
 knowledge--Mr. Lacon's for instance--of all the different folks of a wide
 acquaintance, to tell you about. Only let me have his knowledge of family
 minutiae and I would set them in a proper light; but, bless me, I never go
 anywhere. My pen is no more garrulous than my tongue. Any third person
 would think I was addressing myself to a lover of scandal. But we know we
 do not love scandal, but fun; and if scandal happens to be fun, that is no
 fault of ours. There were very good pickings for me in George's letters
 about the prairie settlement, if I had any taste to turn them to account
 in England. I knew a friend of Miss Andrews, yet I never mentioned her to
 him; for after I had read the letter I really did not recollect her story.
 Now I have been sitting here half an hour with my invention at work, to
 say something about your mother or Charles or Henry, but it is in vain. I
 know not what to say. Three nights since, George went with your mother to
 the play. I hope she will soon see mine acted. I do not remember ever to
 have thanked you for your tassels to my Shakspeare--there he hangs so ably
 supported opposite me. I thank you now. It is a continual memento of you.
 If you should have a boy, do not christen him John, and persuade George
 not to let his partiality for me come across. 'Tis a bad name, and goes
 against a man. If my name had been Edmund I should have been more
 fortunate.
 
 I was surprised to hear of the state of society at Louisville; it seems to
 me you are just as ridiculous there as we are here--threepenny parties,
 halfpenny dances. The best thing I have heard of is your shooting; for it
 seems you follow the gun. Give my compliments to Mrs. Audubon, and tell
 her I cannot think her either good-looking or honest. Tell Mr. Audubon
 he's a fool, and Briggs that 'tis well I was not Mr. A.
 
 
 Saturday, January 15.
 
 It is strange that George having to stop so short a time in England, I
 should not have seen him for nearly two days. He has been to Haslam's and
 does not encourage me to follow his example. He had given promise to dine
 with the same party to-morrow, but has sent an excuse which I am glad of,
 as we shall have a pleasant party with us to-morrow. We expect Charles
 here to-day. This is a beautiful day. I hope you will not quarrel with it
 if I call it an American one. The sun comes upon the snow and makes a
 prettier candy than we have on twelfth-night cakes. George is busy this
 morning in making copies of my verses. He is making one now of an "Ode to
 the Nightingale," which is like reading an account of the Black Hole at
 Calcutta on an iceberg.
 
 You will say this is a matter of course. I am glad it is--I mean that I
 should like your brothers more the more I know them. I should spend much
 more time with them if our lives were more run in parallel; but we can
 talk but on one subject--that is you.
 
 The more I know of men the more I know how to value entire liberality in
 any of them. Thank God, there are a great many who will sacrifice their
 worldly interest for a friend. I wish there were more who would sacrifice
 their passions. The worst of men are those whose self-interests are their
 passion; the next, those whose passions are their self-interest. Upon the
 whole I dislike mankind. Whatever people on the other side of the question
 may advance, they cannot deny that they are always surprised at hearing of
 a good action, and never of a bad one. I am glad you have something to
 like in America--doves. Gertrude of Wyoming and Birkbeck's book should be
 bound up together like a brace of decoy ducks--one is almost as poetical
 as the other. Precious miserable people at the prairie. I have been
 sitting in the sun whilst I wrote this till it's become quite
 oppressive--this is very odd for January. The vulcan fire is the true
 natural heat for winter. The sun has nothing to do in winter but to give a
 little glooming light much like a shade. Our Irish servant has piqued me
 this morning by saying that her father in Ireland was very much like my
 Shakspeare, only he had more colour than the engraving. You will find on
 George's return that I have not been neglecting your affairs. The delay
 was unfortunate, not faulty. Perhaps by this time you have received my
 three last letters, not one of which had reached before George sailed. I
 would give twopence to have been over the world as much as he has. I wish
 I had money enough to do nothing but travel about for years. Were you now
 in England I dare say you would be able (setting aside the pleasure you
 would have in seeing your mother) to suck out more amusement for society
 than I am able to do. To me it is all as dull here as Louisville could be.
 I am tired of the theatres. Almost all the parties I may chance to fall
 into I know by heart. I know the different styles of talk in different
 places,--what subjects will be started, how it will proceed like an acted
 play, from the first to the last act. If I go to Hunt's I run my head into
 many tunes heard before, old puns, and old music; to Haydon's worn-out
 discourses of poetry and painting. The Miss ---- I am afraid to speak to,
 for fear of some sickly reiteration of phrase or sentiment. When they were
 at the dance the other night I tried manfully to sit near and talk to
 them, but to no purpose; and if I had it would have been to no purpose
 still. My question or observation must have been an old one, and the
 rejoinder very antique indeed. At Dilke's I fall foul of politics. 'Tis
 best to remain aloof from people and like their good parts without being
 eternally troubled with the dull process of their everyday lives. When
 once a person has smoked the vapidness of the routine of society he must
 either have self-interest or the love of some sort of distinction to keep
 him in good humour with it. All I can say is that, standing at Charing
 Cross and looking east, west, north, and south, I can see nothing but
 dulness. I hope while I am young to live retired in the country. When I
 grow in years and have a right to be idle, I shall enjoy cities more. If
 the American ladies are worse than the English they must be very bad. You
 say you should like your Emily brought up here. You had better bring her
 up yourself. You know a good number of English ladies; what encomium could
 you give of half a dozen of them? The greater part seem to me downright
 American. I have known more than one Mrs. Audubon. Her affectation of
 fashion and politeness cannot transcend ours. Look at our Cheapside
 tradesmen's sons and daughters--only fit to be taken off by a plague. I
 hope now soon to come to the time when I shall never be forced to walk
 through the city and hate as I walk.
 
 
 Monday, January 17.
 
 George had a quick rejoinder to his letter of excuse to Haslam, so we had
 not his company yesterday, which I was sorry for as there was our old set.
 I know three witty people all distinct in their excellence--Rice,
 Reynolds, and Richards. Rice is the wisest, Reynolds the playfullest,
 Richards the out-o'-the-wayest. The first makes you laugh and think, the
 second makes you laugh and not think, the third puzzles your head. I
 admire the first, I enjoy the second, I stare at the third. The first is
 claret, the second ginger-beer, the third creme de Byrapymdrag. The first
 is inspired by Minerva, the second by Mercury, the third by Harlequin
 Epigram, Esq. The first is neat in his dress, the second slovenly, the
 third uncomfortable. The first speaks adagio, the second allegretto, the
 third both together. The first is Swiftean, the second Tom-Crib-ean, the
 third Shandean. And yet these three eans are not three eans but one ean.
 
 Charles came on Saturday but went early; he seems to have schemes and
 plans and wants to get off. He is quite right; I am glad to see him
 employed at business. You remember I wrote you a story about a woman named
 Alice being made young again, or some such stuff. In your next letter tell
 me whether I gave it as my own, or whether I gave it as a matter Brown was
 employed upon at the time. He read it over to George the other day, and
 George said he had heard it all before. So Brown suspects I have been
 giving you his story as my own. I should like to set him right in it by
 your evidence. George has not returned from town; when he does I shall tax
 his memory. We had a young, long, raw, lean Scotchman with us yesterday,
 called Thornton. Rice, for fun or for mistake, would persist in calling
 him Stevenson. I know three people of no wit at all, each distinct in his
 excellence--A, B, and C. A is the foolishest, B the sulkiest, C is a
 negative. A makes you yawn, B makes you hate, as for C you never see him
 at all though he were six feet high--I bear the first, I forbear the
 second, I am not certain that the third is. The first is gruel, the second
 ditch-water, the third is spilt--he ought to be wip'd up. A is inspired by
 Jack-o'-the-clock, B has been drilled by a Russian serjeant, C, they say,
 is not his mother's true child, but she bought him of the man who cries,
 Young lambs to sell.
 
 Twang-dillo-dee--This you must know is the amen to nonsense. I know a good
 many places where Amen should be scratched out, rubbed over with ponce
 made of Momus's little finger bones, and in its place Twang-dillo-dee
 written. This is the word I shall be tempted to write at the end of most
 modern poems. Every American book ought to have it. It would be a good
 distinction in society. My Lords Wellington and Castlereagh, and Canning,
 and many more, would do well to wear Twang-dillo-dee on their backs
 instead of Ribbons at their button-holes; how many people would go
 sideways along walls and quickset hedges to keep their "Twang-dillo-dee"
 out of sight, or wear large pig-tails to hide it. However there would be
 so many that the Twang-dillo-dees would keep one another in
 countenance--which Brown cannot do for me--I have fallen away lately.
 Thieves and murderers would gain rank in the world, for would any of them
 have the poorness of spirit to condescend to be a Twang-dillo-dee? "I have
 robbed many a dwelling house; I have killed many a fowl, many a goose,
 and many a Man (would such a gentleman say) but, thank Heaven, I was never
 yet a Twang-dillo-dee." Some philosophers in the moon, who spy at our
 globe as we do at theirs, say that Twang-dillo-dee is written in large
 letters on our globe of earth; they say the beginning of the "T" is just
 on the spot where London stands, London being built within the flourish;
 "wan" reaches downward and slants as far as Timbuctoo in Africa; the tail
 of the "g" goes slap across the Atlantic into the Rio della Plata; the
 remainder of the letters wrap around New Holland, and the last "e"
 terminates in land we have not yet discovered. However, I must be silent;
 these are dangerous times to libel a man in--much more a world.
 
 
 Friday 27 [for 28th January 1820].
 
 I wish you would call me names: I deserve them so much. I have only
 written two sheets for you, to carry by George, and those I forgot to
 bring to town and have therefore to forward them to Liverpool. George went
 this morning at 6 o'clock by the Liverpool coach. His being on his journey
 to you prevents my regretting his short stay. I have no news of any sort
 to tell you. Henry is wife bound in Camden Town; there is no getting him
 out. I am sorry he has not a prettier wife: indeed 'tis a shame: she is
 not half a wife. I think I could find some of her relations in Buffon, or
 Capt{n} Cook's voyages or the hie_rogue_glyphics in Moor's Almanack, or
 upon a Chinese clock door, the shepherdesses on her own mantelpiece, or in
 a _cruel_ sampler in which she may find herself worsted, or in a Dutch
 toyshop window, or one of the daughters in the ark, or any picture shop
 window. As I intend to retire into the country where there will be no sort
 of news, I shall not be able to write you very long letters. Besides I am
 afraid the postage comes to too much; which till now I have not been aware
 of.
 
 People in military bands are generally seriously occupied. None may or
 can laugh at their work but the Kettle Drum, Long Drum, Do. Triangle and
 Cymbals. Thinking you might want a rat-catcher I put your mother's old
 quaker-colour'd cat into the top of your bonnet. She's wi' kitten, so you
 may expect to find a whole family. I hope the family will not grow too
 large for its lodging. I shall send you a close written sheet on the first
 of next month, but for fear of missing the Liverpool Post I must finish
 here. God bless you and your little girl.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Sunday Morning.
 
 [February 6, 1820.]
 
 My dear Sister--I should not have sent those Letters without some notice
 if Mr. Brown had not persuaded me against it on account of an illness with
 which I was attack'd on Thursday.[113] After that I was resolved not to
 write till I should be on the mending hand; thank God, I am now so. From
 imprudently leaving off my great coat in the thaw I caught cold which flew
 to my Lungs. Every remedy that has been applied has taken the desired
 effect, and I have nothing now to do but stay within doors for some time.
 If I should be confined long I shall write to Mr. Abbey to ask permission
 for you to visit me. George has been running great chance of a similar
 attack, but I hope the sea air will be his Physician in case of
 illness--the air out at sea is always more temperate than on land--George
 mentioned, in his Letters to us, something of Mr. Abbey's regret
 concerning the silence kept up in his house. It is entirely the fault of
 his Manner. You must be careful always to wear warm clothing not only in
 frost but in a Thaw.--I have no news to tell you. The half-built houses
 opposite us stand just as they were and seem dying of old age before they
 are brought up. The grass looks very dingy, the Celery is all gone, and
 there is nothing to enliven one but a few Cabbage Stalks that seem fix'd
 on the superannuated List. Mrs. Dilke has been ill but is better. Several
 of my friends have been to see me. Mrs. Reynolds was here this morning and
 the two Mr. Wylie's. Brown has been very alert about me, though a little
 wheezy himself this weather. Everybody is ill. Yesterday evening Mr.
 Davenport, a gentleman of Hampstead, sent me an invitation to supper,
 instead of his coming to see us, having so bad a cold he could not stir
 out--so you see 'tis the weather and I am among a thousand. Whenever you
 have an inflammatory fever never mind about eating. The day on which I was
 getting ill I felt this fever to a great height, and therefore almost
 entirely abstained from food the whole day. I have no doubt experienced a
 benefit from so doing--The Papers I see are full of anecdotes of the late
 King: how he nodded to a Coal-heaver and laugh'd with a Quaker and lik'd
 boiled Leg of Mutton. Old Peter Pindar is just dead: what will the old
 King and he say to each other? Perhaps the King may confess that Peter was
 in the right, and Peter maintain himself to have been wrong. You shall
 hear from me again on Tuesday.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXIII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Tuesday Morn.
 
 [February 8, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I had a slight return of fever last night, which terminated
 favourably, and I am now tolerably well, though weak from the small
 quantity of food to which I am obliged to confine myself: I am sure a
 mouse would starve upon it. Mrs. Wylie came yesterday. I have a very
 pleasant room for a sick person. A Sofa bed is made up for me in the front
 Parlour which looks on to the grass plot as you remember Mrs. Dilke's
 does. How much more comfortable than a dull room up stairs, where one gets
 tired of the pattern of the bed curtains. Besides I see all that
 passes--for instance now, this morning--if I had been in my own room I
 should not have seen the coals brought in. On Sunday between the hours of
 twelve and one I descried a Pot boy. I conjectured it might be the one
 o'Clock beer--Old women with bobbins and red cloaks and unpresuming
 bonnets I see creeping about the heath. Gipsies after hare skins and
 silver spoons. Then goes by a fellow with a wooden clock under his arm
 that strikes a hundred and more. Then comes the old French emigrant (who
 has been very well to do in France) with his hands joined behind on his
 hips, and his face full of political schemes. Then passes Mr. David Lewis,
 a very good-natured, good-looking old gentleman who has been very kind to
 Tom and George and me. As for those fellows the Brickmakers they are
 always passing to and fro. I mus'n't forget the two old maiden Ladies in
 Well Walk who have a Lap dog between them that they are very anxious
 about. It is a corpulent Little beast whom it is necessary to coax along
 with an ivory-tipp'd cane. Carlo our Neighbour Mrs. Brawne's dog and it
 meet sometimes. Lappy thinks Carlo a devil of a fellow and so do his
 Mistresses. Well they may--he would sweep 'em all down at a run; all for
 the Joke of it. I shall desire him to peruse the fable of the Boys and the
 frogs: though he prefers the tongues and the Bones. You shall hear from me
 again the day after to-morrow.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXIV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [February 11, 1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--I am much the same as when I last wrote. I hope a little
 more verging towards improvement. Yesterday morning being very fine, I
 took a walk for a quarter of an hour in the garden and was very much
 refresh'd by it. You must consider no news, good news--if you do not hear
 from me the day after to-morrow.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Monday Morn.
 
 [February 14, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I am improving but very gradually and suspect it will be a
 long while before I shall be able to walk six miles--The Sun appears half
 inclined to shine; if he obliges us I shall take a turn in the garden this
 morning. No one from Town has visited me since my last. I have had so many
 presents of jam and jellies that they would reach side by side the length
 of the sideboard. I hope I shall be well before it is all consumed. I am
 vexed that Mr. Abbey will not allow you pocket money sufficient. He has
 not behaved well--By detaining money from me and George when we most
 wanted it he has increased our expenses. In consequence of such delay
 George was obliged to take his voyage to England which will be L150 out of
 his pocket. I enclose you a note--You shall hear from me again the day
 after to-morrow.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXVI.--TO JAMES RICE.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, February 16, 1820.
 
 My dear Rice--I have not been well enough to make any tolerable rejoinder
 to your kind letter. I will, as you advise, be very chary of my health
 and spirits. I am sorry to hear of your relapse and hypochondriac symptoms
 attending it. Let us hope for the best, as you say. I shall follow your
 example in looking to the future good rather than brooding upon the
 present ill. I have not been so worn with lengthened illnesses as you
 have, therefore cannot answer you on your own ground with respect to those
 haunting and deformed thoughts and feelings you speak of. When I have
 been, or supposed myself in health, I have had my share of them,
 especially within the last year. I may say, that for six months before I
 was taken ill I had not passed a tranquil day. Either that gloom
 overspread me, or I was suffering under some passionate feeling, or if I
 turned to versify, that acerbated the poison of either sensation. The
 beauties of nature had lost their power over me. How astonishingly (here I
 must premise that illness, as far as I can judge in so short a time, has
 relieved my mind of a load of deceptive thoughts and images, and makes me
 perceive things in a truer light),--how astonishingly does the chance of
 leaving the world impress a sense of its natural beauties upon us! Like
 poor Falstaff, though I do not "babble," I think of green fields; I muse
 with the greatest affection on every flower I have known from my
 infancy--their shapes and colours are as new to me as if I had just
 created them with a superhuman fancy. It is because they are connected
 with the most thoughtless and the happiest moments of our lives. I have
 seen foreign flowers in hothouses, of the most beautiful nature, but I do
 not care a straw for them. The simple flowers of our Spring are what I
 want to see again.
 
 Brown has left the inventive and taken to the imitative art. He is doing
 his forte, which is copying Hogarth's heads. He has just made a purchase
 of the Methodist Meeting picture, which gave me a horrid dream a few
 nights ago. I hope I shall sit under the trees with you again in some such
 place as the Isle of Wight. I do not mind a game of cards in a saw-pit or
 waggon, but if ever you catch me on a stage-coach in the winter full
 against the wind, bring me down with a brace of bullets, and I promise not
 to 'peach. Remember me to Reynolds, and say how much I should like to hear
 from him; that Brown returned immediately after he went on Sunday, and
 that I was vexed at forgetting to ask him to lunch; for as he went towards
 the gate, I saw he was fatigued and hungry.
 
 I am, my dear Rice, ever most sincerely yours
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 I have broken this open to let you know I was surprised at seeing it on
 the table this morning, thinking it had gone long ago.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXVII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [February 19, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--Being confined almost entirely to vegetable food and the
 weather being at the same time so much against me, I cannot say I have
 much improved since I wrote last. The Doctor tells me there are no
 dangerous Symptoms about me, and quietness of mind and fine weather will
 restore me. Mind my advice to be very careful to wear warm cloathing in a
 thaw. I will write again on Tuesday when I hope to send you good news.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXVIII.--TO JOHN HAMILTON REYNOLDS.
 
 
 [February 23 or 25, 1820.]
 
 My dear Reynolds--I have been improving since you saw me: my nights are
 better which I think is a very encouraging thing. You mention your cold in
 rather too slighting a manner--if you travel outside have some flannel
 against the wind--which I hope will not keep on at this rate when you are
 in the Packet boat. Should it rain do not stop upon deck though the
 Passengers should vomit themselves inside out. Keep under Hatches from all
 sort of wet.
 
 I am pretty well provided with Books at present, when you return I may
 give you a commission or two. Mr. B. C. has sent me not only his Sicilian
 Story but yesterday his Dramatic Scenes--this is very polite, and I shall
 do what I can to make him sensible I think so. I confess they teaze
 me--they are composed of amiability, the Seasons, the Leaves, the Moons,
 etc., upon which he rings (according to Hunt's expression), triple bob
 majors. However that is nothing--I think he likes poetry for its own sake,
 not his. I hope I shall soon be well enough to proceed with my faeries and
 set you about the notes on Sundays and Stray-days. If I had been well
 enough I should have liked to cross the water with you. Brown wishes you a
 pleasant voyage--Have fish for dinner at the sea ports, and don't forget a
 bottle of Claret. You will not meet with so much to hate at Brussels as at
 Paris. Remember me to all my friends. If I were well enough I would
 paraphrase an ode of Horace's for you, on your embarking in the seventy
 years ago style. The Packet will bear a comparison with a Roman galley at
 any rate.
 
 Ever yours affectionately
 
 J. KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXIX.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Thursday.
 
 [February 24, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I am sorry to hear you have been so unwell: now you are
 better, keep so. Remember to be very careful of your clothing--this
 climate requires the utmost care. There has been very little alteration in
 me lately. I am much the same as when I wrote last. When I am well enough
 to return to my old diet I shall get stronger. If my recovery should be
 delay'd long I will ask Mr. Abbey to let you visit me--keep up your
 Spirits as well as you can. You shall hear soon again from me.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXL.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 [Hampstead, March 4, 1820.]
 
 My dear Dilke--Since I saw you I have been gradually, too gradually
 perhaps, improving; and though under an interdict with respect to animal
 food, living upon pseudo victuals, Brown says I have pick'd up a little
 flesh lately. If I can keep off inflammation for the next six weeks I
 trust I shall do very well. You certainly should have been at Martin's
 dinner, for making an index is surely as dull work as engraving. Have you
 heard that the Bookseller is going to tie himself to the manger eat or not
 as he pleases. He says Rice shall have his foot on the fender
 notwithstanding. Reynolds is going to sail on the salt seas. Brown has
 been mightily progressing with his Hogarth. A damn'd melancholy picture it
 is, and during the first week of my illness it gave me a psalm-singing
 nightmare, that made me almost faint away in my sleep. I know I am better,
 for I can bear the Picture. I have experienced a specimen of great
 politeness from Mr. Barry Cornwall. He has sent me his books. Some time
 ago he had given his first publish'd book to Hunt for me; Hunt forgot to
 give it and Barry Cornwall thinking I had received it must have thought me
 a very neglectful fellow. Notwithstanding he sent me his second book and
 on my explaining that I had not received his first he sent me that also. I
 am sorry to see by Mrs. D.'s note that she has been so unwell with the
 spasms. Does she continue the Medicines that benefited her so much? I am
 afraid not. Remember me to her, and say I shall not expect her at
 Hampstead next week unless the Weather changes for the warmer. It is
 better to run no chance of a supernumerary cold in March. As for you, you
 must come. You must improve in your penmanship; your writing is like the
 speaking of a child of three years old, very understandable to its father
 but to no one else. The worst is it looks well--no, that is not the
 worst--the worst is, it is worse than Bailey's. Bailey's looks illegible
 and may perchance be read; yours looks very legible and may perchance not
 be read. I would endeavour to give you a fac-simile of your word
 Thistlewood if I were not minded on the instant that Lord Chesterfield has
 done some such thing to his son. Now I would not bathe in the same River
 with Lord C. though I had the upper hand of the stream. I am grieved that
 in writing and speaking it is necessary to make use of the same particles
 as he did. Cobbett is expected to come in. O that I had two double
 plumpers for him. The ministry are not so inimical to him but it would
 like to put him out of Coventry. Casting my eye on the other side I see a
 long word written in a most vile manner, unbecoming a Critic. You must
 recollect I have served no apprenticeship to old plays. If the only copies
 of the Greek and Latin authors had been made by you, Bailey and Haydon
 they were as good as lost. It has been said that the Character of a Man
 may be known by his handwriting--if the Character of the age may be known
 by the average goodness of said, what a slovenly age we live in. Look at
 Queen Elizabeth's Latin exercises and blush. Look at Milton's hand. I
 can't say a word for Shakspeare's.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXLI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [March 20, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--According to your desire I write to-day. It must be but a
 few lines, for I have been attack'd several times with a palpitation at
 the heart and the Doctor says I must not make the slightest exertion. I
 am much the same to-day as I have been for a week past. They say 'tis
 nothing but debility and will entirely cease on my recovery of my strength
 which is the object of my present diet. As the Doctor will not suffer me
 to write I shall ask Mr. Brown to let you hear news of me for the future
 if I should not get stronger soon. I hope I shall be well enough to come
 and see your flowers in bloom.
 
 Ever your most affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXLII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, April 1 [1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--I am getting better every day and should think myself quite
 well were I not reminded every now and then by faintness and a tightness
 in the Chest. Send your Spaniel over to Hampstead, for I think I know
 where to find a Master or Mistress for him. You may depend upon it if you
 were even to turn it loose in the common road it would soon find an owner.
 If I keep improving as I have done I shall be able to come over to you in
 the course of a few weeks. I should take the advantage of your being in
 Town but I cannot bear the City though I have already ventured as far as
 the west end for the purpose of seeing Mr. Haydon's Picture, which is just
 finished and has made its appearance. I have not heard from George yet
 since he left Liverpool. Mr. Brown wrote to him as from me the other
 day--Mr. B. wrote two Letters to Mr. Abbey concerning me--Mr. A. took no
 notice and of course Mr. B. must give up such a correspondence when as the
 man said all the Letters are on one side. I write with greater ease than I
 had thought, therefore you shall soon hear from me again.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXLIII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [April 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--Mr. Brown is waiting for me to take a walk. Mrs. Dilke is
 on a visit next door and desires her love to you. The Dog shall be taken
 care of and for his name I shall go and look in the parish register where
 he was born--I still continue on the mending hand.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXLIV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, April 12 [1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--Excuse these shabby scraps of paper I send you--and also
 from endeavouring to give you any consolation just at present, for though
 my health is tolerably well I am too nervous to enter into any discussion
 in which my heart is concerned. Wait patiently and take care of your
 health, being especially careful to keep yourself from low spirits which
 are great enemies to health. You are young and have only need of a little
 patience. I am not yet able to bear the fatigue of coming to Walthamstow,
 though I have been to Town once or twice. I have thought of taking a
 change of air. You shall hear from me immediately on my moving anywhere. I
 will ask Mrs. Dilke to pay you a visit if the weather holds fine, the
 first time I see her. The Dog is being attended to like a Prince.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CXLV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 [Hampstead, April 21, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I have been slowly improving since I wrote last. The Doctor
 assures me that there is nothing the matter with me except nervous
 irritability and a general weakness of the whole system, which has
 proceeded from my anxiety of mind of late years and the too great
 excitement of poetry. Mr. Brown is going to Scotland by the Smack, and I
 am advised for change of exercise and air to accompany him and give myself
 the chance of benefit from a Voyage. Mr. H. Wylie call'd on me yesterday
 with a letter from George to his mother: George is safe at the other side
 of the water, perhaps by this time arrived at his home. I wish you were
 coming to town that I might see you; if you should be coming write to me,
 as it is quite a trouble to get by the coaches to Walthamstow. Should you
 not come to Town I must see you before I sail, at Walthamstow. They tell
 me I must study lines and tangents and squares and angles to put a little
 Ballast into my mind. We shall be going in a fortnight and therefore you
 will see me within that space. I expected sooner, but I have not been able
 to venture to walk across the country. Now the fine Weather is come you
 will not find your time so irksome. You must be sensible how much I regret
 not being able to alleviate the unpleasantness of your situation, but
 trust my dear Fanny that better times are in wait for you.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXLVI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Thursday [May 4, 1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--I went for the first time into the City the day before
 yesterday, for before I was very disinclined to encounter the scuffle,
 more from nervousness than real illness; which notwithstanding I should
 not have suffered to conquer me if I had not made up my mind not to go to
 Scotland, but to remove to Kentish Town till Mr. Brown returns. Kentish
 Town is a mile nearer to you than Hampstead--I have been getting gradually
 better, but am not so well as to trust myself to the casualties of rain
 and sleeping out which I am liable to in visiting you. Mr. Brown goes on
 Saturday, and by that time I shall have settled in my new lodging, when I
 will certainly venture to you. You will forgive me I hope when I confess
 that I endeavour to think of you as little as possible and to let George
 dwell upon my mind but slightly. The reason being that I am afraid to
 ruminate on anything which has the shade of difficulty or melancholy in
 it, as that sort of cogitation is so pernicious to health, and it is only
 by health that I can be enabled to alleviate your situation in future. For
 some time you must do what you can of yourself for relief; and bear your
 mind up with the consciousness that your situation cannot last for ever,
 and that for the present you may console yourself against the reproaches
 of Mrs. Abbey. Whatever obligations you may have had to her you have none
 now, as she has reproached you. I do not know what property you have, but
 I will enquire into it: be sure however that beyond the obligation that a
 lodger may have to a landlord you have none to Mrs. Abbey. Let the surety
 of this make you laugh at Mrs. A.'s foolish tattle. Mrs. Dilke's Brother
 has got your Dog. She is now very well--still liable to Illness. I will
 get her to come and see you if I can make up my mind on the propriety of
 introducing a stranger into Abbey's house. Be careful to let no fretting
 injure your health as I have suffered it--health is the greatest of
 blessings--with _health_ and _hope_ we should be content to live, and so
 you will find as you grow older.
 
 I am, my dear Fanny, your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CXLVII.--TO CHARLES WENTWORTH DILKE.
 
 
 [Hampstead, May 1820].
 
 My dear Dilke--As Brown is not to be a fixture at Hampstead, I have at
 last made up my mind to send home all lent books. I should have seen you
 before this, but my mind has been at work all over the world to find out
 what to do. I have my choice of three things, or at least two,--South
 America, or Surgeon to an Indiaman, which last, I think, will be my fate.
 I shall resolve in a few days. Remember me to Mrs. D. and Charles, and
 your father and mother.
 
 Ever truly yours
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXLVIII.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 [Wesleyan Place, Kentish Town][114]
 
 June 11 [1820].
 
 My dear Taylor--In reading over the proof of St. Agnes's Eve since I left
 Fleet Street, I was struck with what appears to me an alteration in the
 seventh stanza very much for the worse. The passage I mean stands thus--
 
                       her maiden eyes incline
   Still on the floor, while many a sweeping train
   Pass by.
 
 'Twas originally written--
 
                       her maiden eyes divine
   Fix'd on the floor, saw many a sweeping train
   Pass by.
 
 My meaning is quite destroyed in the alteration. I do not use _train_ for
 _concourse of passers by_, but for _skirts_ sweeping along the floor.
 
 In the first stanza my copy reads, second line--
 
   bitter _chill_ it was,
 
 to avoid the echo _cold_ in the second line.
 
 Ever yours sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CXLIX.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 [Wesleyan Place, Kentish Town, June 1820.]
 
 My dear Brown--I have only been to ----'s once since you left, when ----
 could not find your letters. Now this is bad of me. I should, in this
 instance, conquer the great aversion to breaking up my regular habits,
 which grows upon me more and more. True, I have an excuse in the weather,
 which drives one from shelter to shelter in any little excursion. I have
 not heard from George. My book is coming out with very low hopes, though
 not spirits, on my part. This shall be my last trial; not succeeding, I
 shall try what I can do in the apothecary line. When you hear from or see
 ---- it is probable you will hear some complaints against me, which this
 notice is not intended to forestall. The fact is, I did behave badly; but
 it is to be attributed to my health, spirits, and the disadvantageous
 ground I stand on in society. I could go and accommodate matters if I were
 not too weary of the world. I know that they are more happy and
 comfortable than I am; therefore why should I trouble myself about it? I
 foresee I shall know very few people in the course of a year or two. Men
 get such different habits that they become as oil and vinegar to one
 another. Thus far I have a consciousness of having been pretty dull and
 heavy, both in subject and phrase; I might add, enigmatical. I am in the
 wrong, and the world is in the right, I have no doubt. Fact is, I have had
 so many kindnesses done me by so many people, that I am cheveaux-de-frised
 with benefits, which I must jump over or break down. I met ---- in town, a
 few days ago, who invited me to supper to meet Wordsworth, Southey, Lamb,
 Haydon, and some more; I was too careful of my health to risk being out at
 night. Talking of that, I continue to improve slowly, but I think surely.
 There is a famous exhibition in Pall-Mall of the old English portraits by
 Vandyck and Holbein, Sir Peter Lely, and the great Sir Godfrey. Pleasant
 countenances predominate; so I will mention two or three unpleasant ones.
 There is James the First, whose appearance would disgrace a "Society for
 the Suppression of Women;" so very squalid and subdued to nothing he
 looks. Then, there is old Lord Burleigh, the high-priest of economy, the
 political save-all, who has the appearance of a Pharisee just rebuffed by
 a Gospel bon-mot. Then, there is George the Second, very like an
 unintellectual Voltaire, troubled with the gout and a bad temper. Then,
 there is young Devereux, the favourite, with every appearance of as slang
 a boxer as any in the Court; his face is cast in the mould of
 blackguardism with jockey-plaster. I shall soon begin upon "Lucy Vaughan
 Lloyd."[115] I do not begin composition yet, being willing, in case of a
 relapse, to have nothing to reproach myself with. I hope the weather will
 give you the slip; let it show itself and steal out of your company. When
 I have sent off this, I shall write another to some place about fifty
 miles in advance of you.
 
 Good morning to you. Yours ever sincerely
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CL.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Friday Morn [Wesleyan Place, Kentish Town,
 
 June 26, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--I had intended to delay seeing you till a Book which I am
 now publishing was out,[116] expecting that to be the end of this week
 when I would have brought it to Walthamstow: on receiving your Letter of
 course I set myself to come to town, but was not able, for just as I was
 setting out yesterday morning a slight spitting of blood came on which
 returned rather more copiously at night. I have slept well and they tell
 me there is nothing material to fear. I will send my Book soon with a
 Letter which I have had from George who is with his family quite well.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CLI.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Mortimer Terrace,[117] Wednesday [July 5, 1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--I have had no return of the spitting of blood, and for two
 or three days have been getting a little stronger. I have no hopes of an
 entire re-establishment of my health under some months of patience. My
 Physician tells me I must contrive to pass the Winter in Italy. This is
 all very unfortunate for us--we have no recourse but patience, which I am
 now practising better than ever I thought it possible for me. I have this
 moment received a Letter from Mr. Brown, dated Dunvegan Castle, Island of
 Skye. He is very well in health and spirits. My new publication has been
 out for some days and I have directed a Copy to be bound for you, which
 you will receive shortly. No one can regret Mr. Hodgkinson's ill fortune:
 I must own illness has not made such a Saint of me as to prevent my
 rejoicing at his reverse. Keep yourself in as good hopes as possible; in
 case my illness should continue an unreasonable time many of my friends
 would I trust for my sake do all in their power to console and amuse you,
 at the least word from me--You may depend upon it that in case my strength
 returns I will do all in my power to extricate you from the Abbeys. Be
 above all things careful of your health which is the corner stone of all
 pleasure.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CLII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 [Mortimer Terrace, July 1820.]
 
 My dear Haydon--I am sorry to be obliged to try your patience a few more
 days when you will have the Book[118] sent from Town. I am glad to hear
 you are in progress with another Picture. Go on. I am afraid I shall pop
 off just when my mind is able to run alone.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLIII.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Mortimer Terrace [July 22, 1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--I have been gaining strength for some days: it would be
 well if I could at the same time say I am gaining hopes of a speedy
 recovery. My constitution has suffered very much for two or three years
 past, so as to be scarcely able to make head against illness, which the
 natural activity and impatience of my Mind renders more dangerous. It will
 at all events be a very tedious affair, and you must expect to hear very
 little alteration of any sort in me for some time. You ought to have
 received a copy of my Book ten days ago. I shall send another message to
 the Booksellers. One of the Mr. Wylie's will be here to-day or to-morrow
 when I will ask him to send you George's Letter. Writing the smallest note
 is so annoying to me that I have waited till I shall see him. Mr. Hunt
 does everything in his power to make the time pass as agreeably with me as
 possible. I read the greatest part of the day, and generally take two
 half-hour walks a-day up and down the terrace which is very much pester'd
 with cries, ballad singers, and street music. We have been so unfortunate
 for so long a time, every event has been of so depressing a nature that I
 must persuade myself to think some change will take place in the aspect of
 our affairs. I shall be upon the look out for a trump card.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CLIV.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [August 14, 1820].
 
 My dear Fanny--'Tis a long time since I received your last. An accident of
 an unpleasant nature occurred at Mr. Hunt's and prevented me from
 answering you, that is to say made me nervous. That you may not suppose it
 worse I will mention that some one of Mr. Hunt's household opened a Letter
 of mine--upon which I immediately left Mortimer Terrace, with the
 intention of taking to Mrs. Bentley's again; fortunately I am not in so
 lone a situation, but am staying a short time with Mrs. Brawne who lives
 in the house which was Mrs. Dilke's. I am excessively nervous: a person I
 am not quite used to entering the room half chokes me. 'Tis not yet
 Consumption I believe, but it would be were I to remain in this climate
 all the Winter: so I am thinking of either voyaging or travelling to
 Italy. Yesterday I received an invitation from Mr. Shelley, a Gentleman
 residing at Pisa, to spend the Winter with him: if I go I must be away in
 a month or even less. I am glad you like the Poems, you must hope with me
 that time and health will produce you some more. This is the first morning
 I have been able to sit to the paper and have many Letters to write if I
 can manage them. God bless you my dear Sister.
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN ----.
 
 
 
 
 CLV.--TO PERCY BYSSHE SHELLEY.
 
 
 [Wentworth Place, Hampstead, August 1820.]
 
 My dear Shelley--I am very much gratified that you, in a foreign country,
 and with a mind almost over-occupied, should write to me in the strain of
 the letter beside me. If I do not take advantage of your invitation, it
 will be prevented by a circumstance I have very much at heart to prophesy.
 There is no doubt that an English winter would put an end to me, and do so
 in a lingering, hateful manner. Therefore, I must either voyage or journey
 to Italy, as a soldier marches up to a battery. My nerves at present are
 the worst part of me, yet they feel soothed that, come what extreme may, I
 shall not be destined to remain in one spot long enough to take a hatred
 of any four particular bedposts. I am glad you take any pleasure in my
 poor poem, which I would willingly take the trouble to unwrite, if
 possible, did I care so much as I have done about reputation. I received a
 copy of the Cenci, as from yourself, from Hunt. There is only one part of
 it I am judge of--the poetry and dramatic effect, which by many spirits
 nowadays is considered the Mammon. A modern work, it is said, must have a
 purpose, which may be the God. An artist must serve Mammon; he must have
 "self-concentration"--selfishness, perhaps. You, I am sure, will forgive
 me for sincerely remarking that you might curb your magnanimity, and be
 more of an artist, and load every rift of your subject with ore. The
 thought of such discipline must fall like cold chains upon you, who
 perhaps never sat with your wings furled for six months together. And is
 not this extraordinary talk for the writer of Endymion, whose mind was
 like a pack of scattered cards? I am picked up and sorted to a pip. My
 imagination is a monastery, and I am its monk. I am in expectation of
 Prometheus every day. Could I have my own wish effected, you would have it
 still in manuscript, or be but now putting an end to the second act. I
 remember you advising me not to publish my first blights, on Hampstead
 Heath. I am returning advice upon your hands. Most of the poems in the
 volume I send you have been written above two years, and would never have
 been published but for hope of gain; so you see I am inclined enough to
 take your advice now. I must express once more my deep sense of your
 kindness, adding my sincere thanks and respects for Mrs. Shelley.
 
 In the hope of soon seeing you, I remain most sincerely yours
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLVI.--TO JOHN TAYLOR.
 
 
 Wentworth Place [August 14, 1820].
 
 My dear Taylor--My chest is in such a nervous state, that anything extra,
 such as speaking to an unaccustomed person, or writing a note, half
 suffocates me. This journey to Italy wakes me at daylight every morning,
 and haunts me horribly. I shall endeavour to go, though it be with the
 sensation of marching up against a battery. The first step towards it is
 to know the expense of a journey and a year's residence, which if you will
 ascertain for me, and let me know early, you will greatly serve me. I have
 more to say, but must desist, for every line I write increases the
 tightness of my chest, and I have many more to do. I am convinced that
 this sort of thing does not continue for nothing. If you can come, with
 any of our friends, do.
 
 Your sincere friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLVII.--TO BENJAMIN ROBERT HAYDON.
 
 
 Mrs. Brawne's Next door to Brown's,
 
 Wentworth Place, Hampstead,
 
 [August] 1820.
 
 My dear Haydon--I am much better this morning than I was when I wrote the
 note: that is my hopes and spirits are better which are generally at a
 very low ebb from such a protracted illness. I shall be here for a little
 time and at home all and every day. A journey to Italy is recommended me,
 which I have resolved upon and am beginning to prepare for. Hoping to see
 you shortly
 
 I remain your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLVIII.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 [Wentworth Place, August 1820.]
 
 My dear Brown--You may not have heard from ----, or ----, or in any way,
 that an attack of spitting of blood, and all its weakening consequences,
 has prevented me from writing for so long a time. I have matter now for a
 very long letter, but not news: so I must cut everything short. I shall
 make some confession, which you will be the only person, for many reasons,
 I shall trust with. A winter in England would, I have not a doubt, kill
 me; so I have resolved to go to Italy, either by sea or land. Not that I
 have any great hopes of that, for, I think, there is a core of disease in
 me not easy to pull out. I shall be obliged to set off in less than a
 month. Do not, my dear Brown, teaze yourself about me. You must fill up
 your time as well as you can, and as happily. You must think of my faults
 as lightly as you can. When I have health I will bring up the long arrear
 of letters I owe you. My book has had good success among the literary
 people, and I believe has a moderate sale. I have seen very few people we
 know. ---- has visited me more than any one. I would go to ---- and make
 some inquiries after you, if I could with any bearable sensation; but a
 person I am not quite used to causes an oppression on my chest. Last week
 I received a letter from Shelley, at Pisa, of a very kind nature, asking
 me to pass the winter with him. Hunt has behaved very kindly to me. You
 shall hear from me again shortly.
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLIX.--TO FANNY KEATS.
 
 
 Wentworth Place, Wednesday Morning.
 
 [August 23, 1820.]
 
 My dear Fanny--It will give me great Pleasure to see you here, if you can
 contrive it; though I confess I should have written instead of calling
 upon you before I set out on my journey, from the wish of avoiding
 unpleasant partings. Meantime I will just notice some parts of your
 Letter. The seal-breaking business is over blown. I think no more of it. A
 few days ago I wrote to Mr. Brown, asking him to befriend me with his
 company to Rome. His answer is not yet come, and I do not know when it
 will, not being certain how far he may be from the Post Office to which my
 communication is addressed. Let us hope he will go with me. George
 certainly ought to have written to you: his troubles, anxieties and
 fatigues are not quite a sufficient excuse. In the course of time you will
 be sure to find that this neglect, is not forgetfulness. I am sorry to
 hear you have been so ill and in such low spirits. Now you are better,
 keep so. Do not suffer your Mind to dwell on unpleasant reflections--that
 sort of thing has been the destruction of my health. Nothing is so bad as
 want of health--it makes one envy scavengers and cinder-sifters. There are
 enough real distresses and evils in wait for every one to try the most
 vigorous health. Not that I would say yours are not real--but they are
 such as to tempt you to employ your imagination on them, rather than
 endeavour to dismiss them entirely. Do not diet your mind with grief, it
 destroys the constitution; but let your chief care be of your health, and
 with that you will meet your share of Pleasure in the world--do not doubt
 it. If I return well from Italy I will turn over a new leaf for you. I
 have been improving lately, and have very good hopes of "turning a Neuk"
 and cheating the consumption. I am not well enough to write to George
 myself--Mr Haslam will do it for me, to whom I shall write to-day,
 desiring him to mention as gently as possible your complaint. I am, my
 dear Fanny,
 
 Your affectionate Brother
 
 JOHN.
 
 
 
 
 CLX.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 [Wentworth Place, August 1820.]
 
 My dear Brown--I ought to be off at the end of this week, as the cold
 winds begin to blow towards evening;--but I will wait till I have your
 answer to this. I am to be introduced, before I set out, to a Dr. Clark, a
 physician settled at Rome, who promises to befriend me in every way there.
 The sale of my book is very slow, though it has been very highly rated.
 One of the causes, I understand from different quarters, of the
 unpopularity of this new book, is the offence the ladies take at me. On
 thinking that matter over, I am certain that I have said nothing in a
 spirit to displease any woman I would care to please; but still there is a
 tendency to class women in my books with roses and sweetmeats,--they never
 see themselves dominant. I will say no more, but, waiting in anxiety for
 your answer, doff my hat, and make a purse as long as I can.
 
 Your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLXI.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 Saturday, September 28 [1820], _Maria Crowther_,
 
 Off Yarmouth, Isle of Wight.
 
 My dear Brown--The time has not yet come for a pleasant letter from me. I
 have delayed writing to you from time to time, because I felt how
 impossible it was to enliven you with one heartening hope of my recovery;
 this morning in bed the matter struck me in a different manner; I thought
 I would write "while I was in some liking," or I might become too ill to
 write at all; and then if the desire to have written should become strong
 it would be a great affliction to me. I have many more letters to write,
 and I bless my stars that I have begun, for time seems to press,--this may
 be my best opportunity. We are in a calm, and I am easy enough this
 morning. If my spirits seem too low you may in some degree impute it to
 our having been at sea a fortnight without making any way.[119] I was very
 disappointed at not meeting you at Bedhampton, and am very provoked at the
 thought of you being at Chichester to-day. I should have delighted in
 setting off for London for the sensation merely,--for what should I do
 there? I could not leave my lungs or stomach or other worse things behind
 me. I wish to write on subjects that will not agitate me much--there is
 one I must mention and have done with it. Even if my body would recover of
 itself, this would prevent it. The very thing which I want to live most
 for will be a great occasion of my death. I cannot help it. Who can help
 it? Were I in health it would make me ill, and how can I bear it in my
 state? I daresay you will be able to guess on what subject I am
 harping--you know what was my greatest pain during the first part of my
 illness at your house. I wish for death every day and night to deliver me
 from these pains, and then I wish death away, for death would destroy even
 those pains which are better than nothing. Land and sea, weakness and
 decline, are great separators, but death is the great divorcer for ever.
 When the pang of this thought has passed through my mind, I may say the
 bitterness of death is passed. I often wish for you that you might flatter
 me with the best. I think without my mentioning it for my sake you would
 be a friend to Miss Brawne when I am dead. You think she has many
 faults--but for my sake think she has not one. If there is anything you
 can do for her by word or deed I know you will do it. I am in a state at
 present in which woman merely as woman can have no more power over me than
 stocks and stones, and yet the difference of my sensations with respect to
 Miss Brawne and my sister is amazing. The one seems to absorb the other
 to a degree incredible. I seldom think of my brother and sister in
 America. The thought of leaving Miss Brawne is beyond everything
 horrible--the sense of darkness coming over me--I eternally see her figure
 eternally vanishing. Some of the phrases she was in the habit of using
 during my last nursing at Wentworth Place ring in my ears. Is there
 another life? Shall I awake and find all this a dream? There must be, we
 cannot be created for this sort of suffering. The receiving this letter is
 to be one of yours. I will say nothing about our friendship, or rather
 yours to me, more than that, as you deserve to escape, you will never be
 so unhappy as I am. I should think of--you in my last moments. I shall
 endeavour to write to Miss Brawne if possible to-day. A sudden stop to my
 life in the middle of one of these letters would be no bad thing, for it
 keeps one in a sort of fever awhile. Though fatigued with a letter longer
 than any I have written for a long while, it would be better to go on for
 ever than awake to a sense of contrary winds. We expect to put into
 Portland Roads to-night. The captain, the crew, and the passengers, are
 all ill-tempered and weary. I shall write to Dilke. I feel as if I was
 closing my last letter to you.
 
 My dear Brown, your affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 
 
 CLXII.--TO MRS. BRAWNE.
 
 
 October 24 [1820], Naples Harbour.
 
 My dear Mrs. Brawne--A few words will tell you what sort of a Passage we
 had, and what situation we are in, and few they must be on account of the
 Quarantine, our Letters being liable to be opened for the purpose of
 fumigation at the Health Office. We have to remain in the vessel ten days
 and are at present shut in a tier of ships. The sea air has been
 beneficial to me about to as great an extent as squally weather and bad
 accommodations and provisions has done harm. So I am about as I was. Give
 my Love to Fanny and tell her, if I were well there is enough in this Port
 of Naples to fill a quire of Paper--but it looks like a dream--every man
 who can row his boat and walk and talk seems a different being from
 myself. I do not feel in the world. It has been unfortunate for me that
 one of the Passengers is a young Lady in a Consumption--her imprudence has
 vexed me very much--the knowledge of her complaints--the flushings in her
 face, all her bad symptoms have preyed upon me--they would have done so
 had I been in good health. Severn now is a very good fellow but his nerves
 are too strong to be hurt by other people's illnesses--I remember poor
 Rice wore me in the same way in the Isle of Wight--I shall feel a load off
 me when the Lady vanishes out of my sight. It is impossible to describe
 exactly in what state of health I am--at this moment I am suffering from
 indigestion very much, which makes such stuff of this Letter. I would
 always wish you to think me a little worse than I really am; not being of
 a sanguine disposition I am likely to succeed. If I do not recover your
 regret will be softened--if I do your pleasure will be doubled. I dare not
 fix my Mind upon Fanny, I have not dared to think of her. The only comfort
 I have had that way has been in thinking for hours together of having the
 knife she gave me put in a silver-case--the hair in a Locket--and the
 Pocket Book in a gold net. Show her this. I dare say no more. Yet you must
 not believe I am so ill as this Letter may look, for if ever there was a
 person born without the faculty of hoping I am he. Severn is writing to
 Haslam, and I have just asked him to request Haslam to send you his
 account of my health. O what an account I could give you of the Bay of
 Naples if I could once more feel myself a Citizen of this world--I feel a
 spirit in my Brain would lay it forth pleasantly--O what a misery it is to
 have an intellect in splints! My Love again to Fanny--tell Tootts I wish I
 could pitch her a basket of grapes--and tell Sam the fellows catch here
 with a line a little fish much like an anchovy, pull them up fast.
 Remember me to Mr. and Mrs. Dilke--mention to Brown that I wrote him a
 letter at Portsmouth which I did not send and am in doubt if he ever will
 see it.
 
 My dear Mrs. Brawne, yours sincerely and affectionate
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 Good bye Fanny! God bless you.
 
 
 
 
 CLXIII.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 Naples, November 1 [1820].
 
 My dear Brown--Yesterday we were let out of quarantine, during which my
 health suffered more from bad air and the stifled cabin than it had done
 the whole voyage. The fresh air revived me a little, and I hope I am well
 enough this morning to write to you a short calm letter;--if that can be
 called one, in which I am afraid to speak of what I would fainest dwell
 upon. As I have gone thus far into it, I must go on a little;--perhaps it
 may relieve the load of WRETCHEDNESS which presses upon me. The persuasion
 that I shall see her no more will kill me. My dear Brown, I should have
 had her when I was in health, and I should have remained well. I can bear
 to die--I cannot bear to leave her. Oh, God! God! God! Every thing I have
 in my trunks that reminds me of her goes through me like a spear. The silk
 lining she put in my travelling cap scalds my head. My imagination is
 horribly vivid about her--I see her--I hear her. There is nothing in the
 world of sufficient interest to divert me from her a moment. This was the
 case when I was in England; I cannot recollect, without shuddering, the
 time that I was a prisoner at Hunt's, and used to keep my eyes fixed on
 Hampstead all day. Then there was a good hope of seeing her again--Now!--O
 that I could be buried near where she lives! I am afraid to write to
 her--to receive a letter from her--to see her handwriting would break my
 heart--even to hear of her anyhow, to see her name written, would be more
 than I can bear. My dear Brown, what am I to do? Where can I look for
 consolation or ease? If I had any chance of recovery, this passion would
 kill me. Indeed, through the whole of my illness, both at your house and
 at Kentish Town, this fever has never ceased wearing me out. When you
 write to me, which you will do immediately, write to Rome (poste
 restante)--if she is well and happy, put a mark thus +; if----
 
 Remember me to all. I will endeavour to bear my miseries patiently. A
 person in my state of health should not have such miseries to bear. Write
 a short note to my sister, saying you have heard from me. Severn is very
 well. If I were in better health I would urge your coming to Rome. I fear
 there is no one can give me any comfort. Is there any news of George? O
 that something fortunate had ever happened to me or my brothers!--then I
 might hope,--but despair is forced upon me as a habit. My dear Brown, for
 my sake be her advocate for ever. I cannot say a word about Naples; I do
 not feel at all concerned in the thousand novelties around me. I am afraid
 to write to her--I should like her to know that I do not forget her. Oh,
 Brown I have coals of fire in my breast--It surprises me that the human
 heart is capable of containing and bearing so much misery. Was I born for
 this end? God bless her, and her mother, and my sister, and George, and
 his wife, and you, and all!
 
 Your ever affectionate friend
 
 JOHN KEATS.
 
 
 [Thursday, November 2.]
 
 I was a day too early for the Courier. He sets out now. I have been more
 calm to-day, though in a half dread of not continuing so. I said nothing
 of my health; I know nothing of it; you will hear Severn's account from
 Haslam. I must leave off. You bring my thoughts too near to Fanny. God
 bless you!
 
 
 
 
 CLXIV.--TO CHARLES BROWN.
 
 
 Rome, November 30, 1820.
 
 My dear Brown--'Tis the most difficult thing in the world to me to write a
 letter. My stomach continues so bad, that I feel it worse on opening any
 book,--yet I am much better than I was in quarantine. Then I am afraid to
 encounter the pro-ing and con-ing of anything interesting to me in
 England. I have an habitual feeling of my real life having passed, and
 that I am leading a posthumous existence. God knows how it would have
 been--but it appears to me--however, I will not speak of that subject. I
 must have been at Bedhampton nearly at the time you were writing to me
 from Chichester--how unfortunate--and to pass on the river too! There was
 my star predominant! I cannot answer anything in your letter, which
 followed me from Naples to Rome, because I am afraid to look it over
 again. I am so weak (in mind) that I cannot bear the sight of any
 handwriting of a friend I love so much as I do you. Yet I ride the little
 horse, and at my worst even in quarantine, summoned up more puns, in a
 sort of desperation, in one week than in any year of my life. There is one
 thought enough to kill me; I have been well, healthy, alert, etc., walking
 with her, and now--the knowledge of contrast, feeling for light and shade,
 all that information (primitive sense) necessary for a poem, are great
 enemies to the recovery of the stomach. There, you rogue, I put you to the
 torture; but you must bring your philosophy to bear, as I do mine, really,
 or how should I be able to live? Dr. Clark is very attentive to me; he
 says, there is very little the matter with my lungs, but my stomach, he
 says, is very bad. I am well disappointed in hearing good news from
 George, for it runs in my head we shall all die young. I have not written
 to Reynolds yet, which he must think very neglectful; being anxious to
 send him a good account of my health, I have delayed it from week to
 week. If I recover, I will do all in my power to correct the mistakes made
 during sickness; and if I should not, all my faults will be forgiven.
 Severn is very well, though he leads so dull a life with me. Remember me
 to all friends, and tell Haslam I should not have left London without
 taking leave of him, but from being so low in body and mind. Write to
 George as soon as you receive this, and tell him how I am, as far as you
 can guess; and also a note to my sister--who walks about my imagination
 like a ghost--she is so like Tom. I can scarcely bid you good-bye, even in
 a letter. I always made an awkward bow.
 
 God bless you!
 
 JOHN KEATS.[120]
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 NOTE.--The first lines of all verses quoted in the letters are given here
 under the first word. An asterisk is prefixed to the names of those to
 whom letters are written, the letters themselves, as well as the addresses
 from which Keats wrote, being given under the heading "Letters."
 
 
   Abbey, Miss, 122
 
   Abbey, Mr., 52 and note, 58, 119, 123, 161, 162, 182, 185, 216, 218,
         232, 268, 271, 273, 274, 284, 290, 294, 297, 311, 313, 315, 318,
         331, 336, 347, 350, 354, 356, 359.
     Referred to as "my guardian," 267
 
   Abbey, Mrs., 51, 123, 197, 262, 271, 359
 
   Abbeys, the, 363
 
   Abbot, 231
 
   Abelard, Sandt, like a young, 300
 
   Academy, the Royal, 329
 
   Achievement, a man of, needs negative capability, 48
 
   Achilles, 21, 80, 180
 
   Adam's dream (_Paradise Lost_, Bk. viii.), compared to imagination, 41,
         42
 
   _Adonais_, xix.
 
   Adonis, 263
 
   _Adonis, Venus and_, quoted, 45
 
   _Agnes, St., Eve of_, 217, 221, 280, 288, 333, 362 note;
     an alteration in it censured, 360
 
   Agriculture, influence of, 287 _seq._
 
   "A haunting Music sole perhaps and lone," etc., 289
 
   "Ah, ken ye what I met the day," etc., 127
 
   Aladdin, 223
 
   Alcibiades, 95
 
   Alexander, the emperor, 174
 
   Alfred (Exeter Paper), the, 171
 
   Alfred, King, 15, 80
 
   Alice Fell, 249
 
   "All gentle folks who owe a grudge," etc., 137
 
   _All's Well that ends Well_, quoted, 33 and note
 
   Alston's "Uriel," 76
 
   _Altam and his Wife_, by Ollier, 197
 
   Amena (and Wells), 239, 245
 
   America, George K. goes to, 109
 
   Americans distrusted, 312
 
   _Anatomy of Melancholy_, quoted, 296, 297
 
   Andrew, Sir [Aguecheek], misquoted, 103 and note
 
   Andrews, Miss, 341
 
   _Annals of Fine Arts_, contributed to, 272, note
 
   Ann or Anne, the maid, 209, 310
 
   Anthony, St., 309
 
   Anthony, Mark, compared to Buonaparte, 17
 
   _Anthony and Cleopatra_, 95;
     quoted, 16, 17
 
   Apollo, 74, 82
 
   Apuleius, the Platonist, 259
 
   Archer, 190, 208
 
   Archimage, 249
 
   Archimago, 18
 
   Archimedes, 20
 
   Aretino, 313
 
   Ariadne, 223
 
   Ariosto, 95 note, 289, 313, 333
 
   Art, the excellence of, its intensity, 47
 
   Arthur's Seat, 136
 
   "As Hermes once took to his feathers light," 246
 
   Athenaeum, Dilke connected with, xviii.
 
   A[ubrey], Mrs. M[ary], verses to, by Mrs. Philips, 29
 
   Audubon, 291, 312, 341
 
   Audubon, Mrs., 341, 344
 
   Augustan age, 259
 
   Aunt, J. K.'s, 274. _See_ Mrs. Jennings
 
   Autograph originals of J. K.'s letters, xii. xiii.
 
   _Autumn, Ode to_, 320 and note
 
   Ayr described, 133
 
 
   B., Miss. _See_ Brown, Miss
 
   Babel, the tower of, 23, 29
 
   Bacchus, 223
 
   Bacon, Lord, 174
 
   Bagpipe, effect of, 138
 
   *Bailey, Benjamin, xii., 26, 32, 44, 52, 53, 84, 97, 102, 109, 132, 135,
         146, 164, 190, 355;
     his character, 27, 54;
     his curacy, 36;
     his appreciation of _Endymion_, 31;
     his love affairs, 224 _seq._;
     K.'s visit to him at Oxford, 19 and note
 
   Bailey, Mrs., 281
 
   Barbara Lewthwaite, 249
 
   "Bards of passion and of mirth," 206
 
   Barley, Rigs of, by Burns, 133
 
   Barnes, 111
 
   Barnes, Miss, 231
 
   Bartolozzi, 195, 196
 
   _Basil, Pot of_, 113, 166, 171, 221, 280;
     few stanzas of, written in folio Shakspeare, 101
 
   "Bathsheba," by Wilkie, 76
 
   Beattie, 201
 
   Beaumont, Sir George, 329, 330 note
 
   Beaumont and Fletcher, 228
 
   Bedhampton, visit to, 216, 219, 221
 
   _Beggar of Cumberland_, 31
 
   Bellaston, Lady, 302
 
   Benjamin, Mr., 317
 
   Bensley, 10
 
   Bentley (J. K.'s landlord), 33 note, 153, 194, 219, 337
 
   Bentley, Mrs., 33, 153, 194, 219, 239, 337, 365
 
   Bentley children, the, 33, 103 note, 188
 
   Bertrand, General, 17 note
 
   Betty Foy, 249
 
   Bewick [J.], 56, 58, 96, 240
 
   Bible, the, 177, 225, 226
 
   Birkbeck, 175, 188, 194, 217, 226, 238, 257, 268, 342
 
   Birkbeck, the Misses, 247
 
   Blackwood, 60, 164, 167, 171, 194, 234, 323
 
   Boccaccio, 101;
     tales from, 280
 
   Bonchurch described, 276, 279
 
   "Book, my" (the vol. containing _Lamia_, _Isabella_, _The Eve of St.
         Agnes_, _Hyperion_, and the _Odes_), 362, 363, 368, 370
 
   Boxer (Mrs. Dilke's dog), 26
 
   Box Hill ascended, 45
 
   Boys, the. _See_ Brown's brothers
 
   Bradshaw, Richard, 119
 
   Braggadochio, 340
 
   Brawne, Fanny, 191 and note, 218, 244;
     described, 196;
     K.'s feelings towards, 371, 372, 373, 374;
     letters to, xii. note;
     reasons for their being omitted, xvii.
 
   *Brawne, Mrs., 191, 202, 219, 224, 239, 244, 349, 365
 
   [Brawne], Sam, 373
 
   Briggs, 341
 
   Brigs of Ayr, 133
 
   Britain, Little. _See_ Reynoldses, the
 
   British Gallery seen, 76
 
   British Museum, 329
 
   Brothers. _See_ Keats, George and Tom
 
   *Brown, Charles Armitage, xviii., 26, 33, 35, 48, 56, 58, 76, 82, 98,
         119, 123, 128, 133, 136, 138, 139, 141, 145, 148, 165, 177, 191,
         194, 195 note, 196, 198, 200, 209, 218, 219, 221, 240, 243, 244,
         245, 264, 272, 273, 279, 281, 284, 286, 289, 292, 301, 306, 307,
         309, 314, 319, 323, 325, 328, 332, 333 note, 334, 336, 344, 345,
         347 and note, 348, 352, 356, 357, 358, 359, 360 note, 363, 369;
     anecdote of, 295, 296;
     as a draughtsman, 274, 351;
     and Jenny Jacobs, 279;
     a joke on, 316, 320;
     his kindness, 234;
     lends K. money, 274, 290;
     lives with K., 187 note, 188, 331 note;
     his odd dislikes, 324;
     a story by, 219, 220, 224;
     tour to Scotland with K., 110 [114-161];
     writes a tragedy with K. _See Otho the Great_
 
   Brown's brothers, 239 note, 245
 
   Brown, John, 245
 
   Brown, Mrs. Septimus, 218
 
   B[rown], Miss, 196
 
   Bucke, Mr. (dramatic author), 241
 
   Buffon, 233, 346
 
   Bunyan's _Pilgrim's Progress_, 21;
     his _Emblems_, 309
 
   Buonaparte, 20, 173, 219;
     compared to Mark Anthony, 17
 
   Burdett, Sir F., 174
 
   Burford Bridge visited, 40-45
 
   Burleigh, Lord, 361
 
   Burns, 130, 131, 132, 234;
     spoilt by the Kirk, 124;
     lines after visiting his country, 146;
     after visiting his tomb, 117;
     his misery, 134;
     his native place described, 133
 
   Burns, Mrs., 118
 
   Burton's _Anatomy of Melancholy_ quoted, 296, 297
 
   Butler, 76, 102, 202
 
   Butler, Sarah, 102
 
   Byron, 33, 106, 163, 173, 198, 221, 226, 231, 240;
     his _Don Juan_, 297;
     Fourth canto of _Childe Harold_ expected, 76;
     _Don Giovanni_ expected, 218
 
 
   Caesar, Julius, 80
 
   _Caleb Williams_, 205
 
   Caliban, 7 note, 58, 245 note
 
   Cameron, Mrs., 155 _seq._
 
   Canning, 345
 
   Canterbury, a visit to, projected, 18
 
   _Cap and Bells_, 331 note, 333 and note, 362 note
 
   Capital letters, peculiar use of, xiv.
 
   Capper, 178, 181, 294
 
   Carisbrooke visited, 6 _seq._
 
   Carlisle, Deist bookseller, 220, 299
 
   Carlisle visited, 117
 
   Cary's _Dante_, 113
 
   "Castle, The Enchanted," by Claude, 91 and note
 
   Castlereagh, 90, 345;
     An Ode to, 335
 
   _Cave of Despair_, Spenser's, a picture by Severn, 334 and note, 355
 
   Ceres, 142
 
   Chambers of Life--the infant or thoughtless Chamber, and the Chamber of
         Maiden thought, 107, 108;
     the third Chamber, 109
 
   _Champion_, The, a number written by K., 47, 49, 52;
     a sonnet by K. printed in, 8
 
   Chapman's _Homer_, 363 and note
 
   Charlemagne, 118
 
   Charles. _See_ Wylie, Charles
 
   Charles I., 7
 
   Charles II., 90
 
   Charles Stuart, a "Jacobin" song on, 148
 
   Charlotte, Princess, 192
 
   "Charmian," 165 note, 172, 173.
     _See_ Cox, Miss Charlotte
 
   Chatterton, _Endymion_, dedicated to, 97;
     Hazlitt on, 76;
     writes the purest English, 313, 321
 
   Chaucer, 18, 103, 228, 333;
     his Gallicisms, 313, 321
 
   Chesterfield, Lord, 355
 
   Chichester visited, 212, 217, 218
 
   "Chief of Organic Numbers!" etc., 62
 
   Christ Rejected (Haydon's picture), 47, 94
 
   Christianity v. _The Examiner_, 10;
     Shakspeare's, 11
 
   Christians, a query concerning, 10
 
   Christie, 44
 
   _Chronicle_, The, 46, 171, 247;
     John Scott's defence of K. in, 167
 
   Cinderella, 21, 232
 
   Circe (in _Endymion_), 99
 
   Claret, a rhapsody concerning, 222, 223
 
   Clark, Dr., 370, 376
 
   *Clarke, C. C., xvii., 10, 219;
     his influence on K., xviii.
 
   Claude's "Enchanted Castle," 91 and note
 
   Cleopatra, 125, 173
 
   Clinker, Humphrey, 52
 
   Cobbett, 208, 218, 222, 355
 
   Cockney school, 39, 60 and note
 
   Cockney, the young, xvi.
 
   Coleridge, 38, 72;
     his limitations, 48;
     his talk, 244
 
   Collins, Hazlitt on, 76
 
   Colnaghi, 300
 
   Colvin, S., allowed H. Buxton Forman to use autographs in his
         possession, xii. note;
     his life of K. in _Men of Letters_, xi., 331 note, 347 note
 
   Commonplace people, Hazlitt on, 37
 
   _Comus_, 89, 108
 
   Constable, the bookseller, 60
 
   Continent, K.'s thoughts of visiting the, 18
 
   Cook, Captain, 346
 
   Cordelia, 80
 
   _Coriolanus_, Hazlitt on, 229
 
   Corneille, 95 and note
 
   C[ornwall] B[arry], Mr., 353, 354
 
   Country, the, K.'s opinion of, 209;
     K. thinks of settling in, 4
 
   Covent Garden Tragedy [_Retribution, or the Chieftain's Daughter_], an
         article on, 49 and note
 
   Cowes visited, 7
 
   Cowper, 72;
     as a letter-writer, xiv.
 
   Cox, Miss Charlotte, 165 and note, 172 and note, 173.
     _See_ "Charmian"
 
   Crabbe, 72, 232
 
   Cripps, 32, 37, 40, 41, 44, 52, 56, 62, 71;
     introductions to Haydon, 32, 53
 
   Criticism, K.'s independence of, 167
 
   Croft, Dr., 72
 
   Cromwell, 174
 
   _Crusoe, Robinson_, 26, 338
 
   "Crystalline Brother of the belt of Heaven," etc., 46
 
   _Cumberland Beggar_, the, 31
 
 
   Dance, a Highland, described, 116
 
   Dante, 95 note, 113, 145, 214, 246, 313
 
   Davenports, the, 220, 231, 239, 348
 
   David, 25, 325
 
   "Dear Reynolds! as last night I lay in bed," etc., 91
 
   Death, K.'s thoughts of, when alone, 112
 
   _Deist, The_, 299
 
   Dennet, Miss, a Columbine, 51
 
   "Dentatus," Haydon's picture, 87
 
   Devereux, 362
 
   Devon, Duke of, 72
 
   Devonshire described, 75, 79, 80, 83, 85, 91, 95, 97, 98, 101;
     like Lydia Languish, 83
 
   Dewint, 114
 
   Dewint, Mrs., 114
 
   *Dilke, Charles Wentworth, xii. note, 9, 26, 31, 47, 48, 56, 59, 76, 81,
         128, 146, 158, 195 note, 200, 202, 203, 208, 239, 245, 266, 269,
         292, 296, 327, 340, 343, 372, 374;
     a capital friend, 51;
     takes the _Champion_, 51, 58;
     his character, 314;
     his devotion to his son, 222, 240, 241, 295;
     editor follows his dates, xiii.;
     a "Godwin Methodist," 314;
     a "Godwin perfectibility Man," 175;
     ill, 170, 348;
     neighbour to K., 187 note
 
   Dilke, Charley, 222, 224, 240, 241, 264, 279, 292, 295, 314, 360
 
   Dilke, Mrs., 4, 8, 9, 26, 31, 51, 164, 170, 183, 189, 198, 202, 209,
         210, 213, 217, 223, 224, 240, 262, 264, 269, 274, 292, 325, 328,
         332, 336, 340, 349, 354, 357, 359, 360, 365, 374;
     her brother, 359
 
   Dilke, William, 26 and note
 
   Dinah, Aunt, 6
 
   Diocletian, 174
 
   Diomed, 80
 
   Dolabella (in _Anthony and Cleopatra_), 16
 
   Don Juan, 297
 
   Drawing of K., a, 2 and note
 
   Drewe family, the, 197
 
   Drewe, George, 198
 
   Drury Lane Pantomime [_Don Giovanni_], 49 and note, 55
 
   Dryope (in _Endymion_), 78
 
   Du Bois, 47, 198
 
   Dunghill, Duchess of, 126
 
   Duns, besieged by, 19, 28
 
   Duerer, Albert, 330
 
 
   _Edinburgh Review_, the, 37, 39, 40, 113, 190, 301, 302, 326
 
   Edmund Ironside, 80
 
   Elements, the, regarded as comforters, 25
 
   _Elizabeth, Queen_, Holinshed's, 333;
     her Latin exercises, 355
 
   Elizabethans, compared with moderns, 68
 
   Ellenborough, Lord, 47
 
   Ellipsis, recommended by Haydon, 2
 
   Elliston, 335, 336
 
   Elmes, James, 272 note, 274
 
   _Emblems_, the, of Bunyan, 309
 
   _Endymion_ ["I stood tiptoe upon a little hill"], 3 note
 
   _Endymion_, 27, 34, 35, 161, 302, 366.
       _First book_ begun, 17;
       prospects of, 57;
       in the press, 63;
       readings in, 64:
       _second book_ copied, 71;
       proofs of, 72:
       _third book_, progressing, 31;
       finished, 33:
       _third and fourth books_, copied, 78:
       _fourth book_, quoted, 84;
       finished, 88.
     Alterations suggested by Taylor, 77;
     anxiety to get it printed, 78;
     appreciated by Bailey, 31;
     dedicated to Chatterton, 97;
     described, 168;
     cheque sent to author of it, 192, 199;
     engravings by Haydon for it, 57;
     referred to by K. as a pioneer, 77;
     admired by the Miss Porters, 192, 193;
     the preface to it, 88, 96, 97, 98;
     readings in, 99;
     called slipshod, 167 and note;
     the story of it told to Fanny K., 22
 
   Enfield, school at, xviii.
 
   English, Chatterton's is the purest, 313
 
   Enobarb (in _Anthony and Cleopatra_), 16
 
   Erasmus, 10, 17
 
   Esau, 68
 
   Euclid, 29, 177
 
   Eustace, 163
 
   _Evadne_, by Sheil, 231, 232
 
   Evans, Sir Hugh (in _Merry Wives_), 104 and note
 
   Eve, 103, 255
 
   "Ever let the Fancy roam," etc., 203
 
   _Examiner_, The, 17, 40, 44, 47, 51, 194, 208, 219, 234, 328;
     its defence of K., 171;
     K.'s notice of Reynolds' _Peter Bell_ in it, 248, 249;
     v. Christianity, 10
 
   _Excursion_, Wordsworth's, one of the three good things of the age, 53,
         54
 
 
   Fagging at schools, 178
 
   _Fairies, Chorus of_, 251
 
   Falstaff, 77, 351
 
   Fame, sonnets on, 258
 
   "Fame like a wayward girl will still be coy," etc., 258
 
   Family letters, xi.
 
   Fanny. _See_ Keats, Fanny
 
   "Far, far around shall those dark-crested trees," etc., 115
 
   Fazio, 72
 
   Fenbank, Mr. P., 199
 
   Fielding, 52, 200
 
   Fingal's Cave described, 150
 
   Fitzgerald, Miss, 193
 
   Fladgate, Frank, 133
 
   Flageolet, not admired, 161, 162
 
   Fleet Street household (_i.e._ Taylor's. _See_ p. 286), 54
 
   Fletcher, Mrs. Philips, compared to, 31
 
   Fletcher and Beaumont, 228
 
   Flirting, 173
 
   _Florence, A Garden of_, by Reynolds, 67 and note
 
   Florimel, 248, 249
 
   _Foliage_, by Leigh Hunt, 11 note;
     reviewed in the Quarterly, 113
 
   Forman, H. Buxton, his edition, xii.;
     letters to Fanny K. printed in this volume by his permission, xii.
         note
 
   Fortunatus's purse, 32
 
   "Four Seasons fill the measure of the year," etc., 81
 
   Framptons, the, 238
 
   Francesca, 58, 246
 
   Franklin, Benjamin, 175
 
   French dramatists, 95 and note
 
   French language inferior to English, 23
 
   Frogley, Miss, 192
 
   Fry, 290
 
   Fuseli, 306, 330
 
 
   G. minor (_see_ Wylie, Georgiana), 192
 
   Gaelic talked, 140
 
   Gattie, 197
 
   Gay, 106
 
   Genesis, 26
 
   Genius, of K. in prose writing, xi.;
     men of, have not individuality, 41
 
   George. _See_ Keats, George
 
   George, little (_see_ Wylie, Georgiana), 200, 201
 
   George II., 362
 
   _Gertrude of Wyoming_, 342
 
   Ghosts, 44
 
   Gibbon, 76
 
   Gifford, 220, 226 _seq._, 229;
     his attack on K., 192
 
   _Giovanni, Don_, by Byron, expected, 218
 
   Gipsies, 37
 
   _Gipsy, The_, of Wordsworth, 37
 
   Glasgow visited, 131, 132
 
   Glaucus (in _Endymion_), 99
 
   Gleig, xix., 35, 36, 44, 63, 82, 113;
     described, 35 note
 
   Gleig, Miss, 225
 
   Gliddon, 290
 
   Godwin, 175, 205, 206, 314;
     his _Mandeville_, 51, 286;
     his _Caleb Williams_ and _St. Leon_, 205
 
   Gray, 106;
     as a letter writer, xiv.;
     Hazlitt on, 76
 
   "Great spirits now on earth are sojourning," etc., 2
 
   Greek, K. determines to learn, 101
 
   Green, Mr., 244
 
   Griselda, 245
 
   Grover, Miss, 339
 
   Guido, 201
 
   Gyges's ring, 32
 
 
   H., Miss, 231, 232
 
   _Hamlet_, 80, 106
 
   Hammond, 309
 
   Handwriting of K., xiv.
 
   Happiness not expected, 38
 
   "Happy happy glowing fire," etc., 251
 
   _Harold, Childe_, 68
 
   Harris, Bob, 51, 58
 
   Hart, 340
 
   Haslam, 51, 56, 159, 178, 181, 187, 188, 189, 195, 197, 200, 202, 209,
         210, 219, 224, 228, 235, 264, 270, 284, 307, 342, 344, 369, 373,
         375;
     his father's death, 238, 266;
     a kind friend, 269, 339;
     his "lady and family," 340;
     in love, 293;
     "is very Beadle to an amorous sigh," 333;
     a message to, 377
 
   Hastings, Lady, met at, 179, 223
 
   *Haydon, xii. note, 2 and note, 5, 8, 9, 39, 41, 47, 54, 58, 195, 197,
         198, 201, 240, 272, 340, 343, 355, 356, 361;
     his autobiography, 50 and note;
     his "Christ" contained a portrait of K., 16;
     and is "tinted into immortality," 94;
     his "Dentatus," 87;
     on Elgin marbles, 75;
     his eyes weak, 219;
     on French dramatists, etc., 95 and note;
     his "Life and Love," 330 and note;
     loved as a brother, 15;
     his pictures one of the three glories of the age, 53, 54;
     his portrait, 6;
     quarrels with Hunt, 33, 34, 35, 56, 61;
     and with Reynolds, 55, 56;
     discovers a seal of Shakspeare, 85;
     "this glorious Haydon and all his creation," 1;
     his "Solomon," 214
 
   Hazlewood, 178, 181, 294
 
   Hazlitt, 3, 96, 101, 106, 107, 109, 111, 179, 191, 197, 205, 218, 326;
     his prosecution of Blackwood, 164;
     his essay on commonplace people, 37;
     the only good damner, 87;
     his lectures, 64, 72, 76, 332;
     his letter to Gifford quoted, 226 _seq._, 229;
     on Shakspeare, 16, 56, 58;
     his review of Southey, 10 and note, 16;
     his depth of taste, 53, 54;
     his _Round Table_, 31 and note
 
   Hazlitt, Mrs., 218
 
   _Heart of Midlothian_ (an opera), 249
 
   Heart's affections and beauty of Imagination the only certain things, 41
 
   Hebrew, the study of, advised, 24
 
   "He is to weet a melancholy Carle," etc., 244
 
   Helen, 125
 
   "Hence Burgundy, Claret, and Port," etc., 65
 
   Hengist, 90
 
   Henrietta Street. _See_ Wylies, the
 
   Henry. _See_ Wylie, Henry
 
   Herculaneum, a piece of, 83
 
   "Here all the summer could I stay," etc., 85
 
   Hermes, 223
 
   "Hermia and Helena," by Severn, 265
 
   Hesketh, Lady, xv.
 
   *Hessey, xi., 53, 100, 114, 164, 177, 184 note, 199, 282, 286
 
   Hessey, Mrs., 88
 
   Hesseys, the. _See_ Percy Street
 
   Hill, 47
 
   Hilton, 114, 240
 
   Hindoos, 257
 
   Hobhouse, 208
 
   Hodgkinson, 271, 284, 297, 363
 
   Hogarth, 107, 200, 351
 
   Hogg, 234
 
   Holbein, 361
 
   Holinshed's _Queen Elizabeth_, 333
 
   Holts, one of the, 218
 
   _Homer_, 80, 95 note, 101, 134, 144;
     Pope's, 13, 14;
     Chapman's, 363 and note
 
   Hone, 47, 51, 220
 
   Honeycomb, Mr., 28
 
   Hook, 309
 
   Hooker, Bishop, 173
 
   Hopkinses, the, 38
 
   Hoppner, 189, 190
 
   Horace, 353
 
   Houghton, Lord, xix., 289 note, 347 note;
     his Life of K., xii.
 
   "How fever'd is that Man who cannot look," etc., 258
 
   Howard, John, 173
 
   Hubbard, Mother, 177
 
   Hugh, Parson, 104 and note
 
   Humour superior to wit, 47
 
   Hunger and sleepiness, 122
 
   Hunt, Henry, his triumphal entry into London, 299, 329
 
   Hunt, John, 17, 28, 58, 67 note, 72, 191
 
   *Hunt, Leigh, xviii., 2 note, 3, 9, 49, 51, 63, 68, 72, 76, 96, 174,
         177, 179, 191, 232, 239, 240, 248, 249, 307, 343, 353, 354, 365,
         366, 374;
     attacked, 39, 113;
     "Cockney school articles" thought to be by Scott, 60 and note;
     criticises _Endymion_, 57, 58;
     his _Foliage_, 11 note;
     damned Hampstead, 87;
     his influence on K., xviii.;
     K. his _eleve_, 35;
     K. moves near to him, 360 note;
     K. stays in his house, 363 note, 364;
     his kindness, 368;
     his lock of Milton's hair, 62;
     his money difficulties, 218;
     his _Nymphs_, 11;
     his sonnet on the Nile, 72;
     his paper on Preternatural History, 234;
     his _Literary Pocket-book_, 190, 197;
     his quarrel with Haydon, 33, 34, 35, 56, 61;
     his self-delusions, 15
 
   Hunt, Mrs., 13, 51, 55
 
   _Hyperion_, 331 note, 362 note;
     begun, 194, 195;
     not continued, 221;
     continued, 280;
     given up because of its Miltonic inversions, 321
 
 
   Iago, 184
 
   Idleness, 278
 
   "If by dull rhymes our English must be chained," etc., 261
 
   "I had a dove and the sweet dove died," 207
 
   "I have examin'd and do find," etc., by Mrs. Philips, 29
 
   Imagination, 41, 42, 43, 108;
     the rudder of Poetry, 34;
     its beauty and the heart's affections alone certain, 41;
     compared to Adam's dream (_Paradise Lost_, Book viii.), 41, 42
 
   Imogen, 24, 184
 
   _Indolence, Ode on_, 235 and note;
     _The Castle of_, by Thomson, 234
 
   Invention, the Polar Star of Poetry, 34
 
   Iona [Iconkill] visited, 148, 149
 
   Ireby, 117;
     country dancing school at, 116
 
   Ireland visited, 124
 
   Irish and Scotch compared, 126, 129
 
   _Isabella_, or _The Pot of Basil_, 109, 113, 362 note
 
   Isis, K.'s boating on the, 28
 
   Italian, studied, 101, 289;
     the language full of poetry, 23
 
   Italy, xix.
 
   "It keeps eternal whisperings around," etc., 8
 
 
   Jacobs, Jenny, and Brown, 279
 
   Jacques, 68
 
   James I., 361
 
   Jane, St. _See_ Reynolds, Jane
 
   Jean, Burns', 134
 
   Jeffrey, xii., xix.
 
   Jemmy, Master. _See_ Rice, James
 
   Jennings, Mrs., 290, 318;
     referred to as "my aunt," 274
 
   _Jessy of Dumblane_, 160
 
   Jesus and Socrates, 236
 
   _Joanna, To_, by Wordsworth, 116 note
 
   John (_see_ Reynolds), 27, 33, 162
 
   John, St., 325
 
   Jonson, Ben, 247 note
 
   Journal-letters, xii.
 
   Jove better than Mercury, 75, 97
 
   Judea, 11
 
   Juliet, 24, 135
 
   Junkets, _i.e._ John Keats, 13
 
 
   Kean, 46, 48, 84, 131, 191, 226, 241, 280, 284, 285, 286, 291, 319, 336,
         340
 
   Keasle, 189
 
   Keasle, Miss, 170, 189, 308
 
   Keasle, Mrs., 189
 
   Keats, Emily (daughter of George K.), 294, 319, 339, 344, 347;
     her birth announced, 273
 
   Keats family, letters to, xi.
 
   *Keats, Fanny, xii. note, 6, 51, 58, 153, 158, 169, 177, 197, 223, 228,
         292, 371, 375, 377;
     she is kept from K. by the Abbeys, 145, 218;
     the story of _Endymion_ is related to her, 22
 
   Keats, Frances. _See_ Keats, Fanny
 
   *Keats, George, 6, 8, 9, 10, 13, 14, 17, 22, 23, 34, 38, 49, 52, 84,
         101, 109, 112, 114, 119, 132, 142, 152, 153, 161, 166, 187, 213,
         217, 263, 265, 268, 270, 273, 275, 277, 284, 285, 320, 337, 340,
         341, 343, 344, 345, 346, 347, 349, 358, 359, 361, 362, 369, 375,
         376, 377;
     his affairs troublesome, 324, 331, 336;
     he goes to America, 109, 182;
     he visits England, 328 and note;
     he returns to America, 358;
     he is more than a brother to John K., 158;
     he copies John K.'s verses, 342;
     he is devoted to his little girl, 339;
     bad news from him, 321, 322, 332;
     J. K.'s sonnet to him, 72
 
   Keats, Georgiana. _See_ Wylie, Georgiana
 
   Keats, John, his genius in prose-writing, xi.;
     his Life by Colvin, xi., 331 note;
     and by Lord Houghton, xi.;
     the characteristics of his letters, xiv. xv.;
     his character, "the young Cockney," Shakspeare in his blood, xvi., 14;
     his reticence about Fanny Brawne, xvi.;
     the influence of Haydon, Leigh Hunt, and Charles Cowden Clarke over
         him, xviii.;
     his school at Enfield, xviii.;
     his portrait, 2;
     his thoughts of settling in the country, 4;
     he writes in the _Champion_, 8, 47, 49;
     he cannot exist without poetry, 9, 165;
     "why I should be a poet," 12;
     his money troubles, 14, 19, 28;
     he reads and writes eight hours a day, but cannot compose when
         "fevered in a contrary direction," 14;
     his morbidity, 15, 38, 110, 111;
     his excitement during composition, 18;
     his thoughts of visiting the country, 18;
     he writes with energy, 23;
     he regards the elements as comforters, 25;
     he projects a romance, 32;
     he expects to be called Hunt's _eleve_, 35;
     he does not expect happiness, 38;
     his article on "Covent Garden," 49 and note;
     his views of religion, 81, 256;
     his plan of life, 94;
     he regards the public as an enemy but does not write under its shadow,
         96;
     he studies Italian, 101, 289;
     he determines to learn Greek, 101;
     his thoughts of death when alone, 112;
     is noticed in the _Edinburgh_ and _Quarterly_, 113;
     his ill-health, 122, 347-377;
     his independence of criticism, 167;
     he expects to be among the English poet after his death, 171;
     his defence by Reynolds, 171;
     his declamations against matrimony, 180;
     his pleasure in solitude, 181;
     he talks of giving up writing, 184;
     a sonnet and cheque to him, 192, 199;
     his notion of a rondeau, 207;
     his thoughts of the country, 209;
     his notice of Reynolds' _Peter Bell_, 248, 249;
     he feels himself the protector of Fanny K., 216;
     "he is quite the little poet," 219;
     his rhapsody about claret, 222, 223;
     his scorn of parsons, 221 _seq._, 233, 268;
     he talks of turning physician, 233;
     his portrait by Severn, 274;
     his change of character, 309;
     his distrust of Americans, 312;
     his feelings towards Fanny Brawne during his last illness, 371, 372
 
   *Keats, Tom, 8, 9, 11, 44, 47 note, 79, 82, 84, 85, 87, 94, 100, 112,
         135, 158, 159, 165, 169, 175, 177, 179, 180, 181, 182, 183, 185,
         215, 301 note, 349;
     his death, 187 and note;
     his illness, 43, 49, 63, 103, 161, 162, 164, 168, 186, 187;
     his belief in immortality, 188;
     his likeness to Fanny K., 397;
     his low spirits, 98;
     Wells' treatment of him, 239, 245
 
   Kelly, Mr., 124
 
   Kemble, 198
 
   Kent, Miss, 13, 51
 
   Keswick visited, 114, 115
 
   Kingston, 47, 50 and note, 53, 95, 196;
     his criticisms, 98
 
   Kirkman, 190, 208, 209;
     his uncle William, 208
 
   Kneller, Sir G., 361
 
   Knox, John, 220
 
   Kotzebue, 241, 300
 
 
   _La Belle Dame sans Merci_, 250
 
   Lacon, Fool, 339
 
   _Lady of the Lake_, 136
 
   Lakes, the, described, 114, 115
 
   Lamb, Charles, 39, 191, 316, 361;
     his practical jokes, 50
 
   _Lamia_, 277, 280, 294, 362 note;
     finished, 288;
     quoted, 289 and note
 
   Landseer, 50, 58
 
   _Laon and Cythna_, by Shelley, 48 and note
 
   Launce (in _Two Gentlemen of Verona_), 4
 
   _Lear, King_, 47, 58, 63, 80;
     a sonnet on, 59
 
   _Leech-gatherer_, the, 31
 
   Leicester, Sir John, 240
 
   Lely, Sir Peter, 361
 
   _Leon, St._, by Godwin, 205
 
   Letters, those to Fanny Brawne omitted, xvii.;
     frivolous classification of, 106, 163;
     characteristics of K.'s, xv.;
     Dated from, Burford Bridge, 40-44;
     Carisbrooke, 6;
     Carlisle, 116;
     Donaghadee, 124;
     Featherstone Buildings, 48;
     Fleet Street (Wells'), 71;
     Hampstead (Well Walk), 33-40, 46, 53-67, 71-78, 109-114, 161-187;
     Hampstead (Wentworth Place), 187-273, 331-359;
     Keswick, 114;
     London, 1-4, 19, 39;
     Margate, 10-17;
     the _Maria Crowther_, 370;
     Mortimer Terrace (Leigh Hunt's), 363;
     Naples, 372-374;
     Oxford, 19-32;
     Rome, 376;
     Scotland, 118-123, 125-158
       Auchen-cairn, 119, 123;
       Ballantrae, 127;
       Cairndow, 136;
       Dumfries, 118;
       Girvan, 129;
       Glasgow, 131;
       Inverness, 158;
       Inverary, 138, 142;
       Island of Mull, 144-147;
       Kilmelfort, 139;
       Kingswells, 130, 133;
       Kirkcudbright, 120;
       Kirkoswald, 129;
       Letter Findlay, 153;
       Maybole, 130;
       Newton-Stewart, 122, 123;
       Oban, 141, 148;
       Stranraer, 125;
     Shanklin, 275-277;
     Southampton, 4;
     Teignmouth, 78-103;
     Wentworth Place (Mrs. Brawne's), 364-370;
     Wesleyan Place, Kentish Town, 360-362;
     Winchester, 280-328.
     To Bailey, Benjamin, 33, 36, 39, 40, 61, 78, 109, 111, 142, 280;
     Brawne, Mrs., 372;
     Brown, Charles, 325, 327, 360, 368, 370, 374, 376;
     Clarke, Charles Cowden, 1, 2;
     Dilke, Charles Wentworth, 40, 163, 277, 322, 328, 354, 359;
     Elmes, James, 272;
     Haydon, Benjamin Robert, 1, 2, 13, 32, 53, 85, 94, 211, 213, 214, 215,
         267, 274, 328, 363, 367;
     Hessey, James Augustus, 167;
     Hunt, Leigh, 10;
     Keats, Fanny, 21, 118, 161, 162, 166, 182, 183, 185, 187, 213, 215,
         216, 262, 263, 264, 265, 268, 270, 271, 272, 273, 275, 283, 331,
         334, 335, 337, 347, 348, 350, 352, 353, 355, 356, 357, 358, 362,
         363, 364, 368;
     Keats, George and Georgiana, 168, 187, 217, 290;
     Keats, George and Thomas, 4, 46, 48, 54, 57, 71, 75;
     Keats, Georgiana, 338;
     Keats, Thomas, 114, 123, 127, 136, 147, 153;
     Reynolds, Jane, 24, 162;
     Reynolds, John Hamilton, 3, 4, 6, 28, 44, 65, 67, 73, 82, 90, 96, 98,
         100, 103, 132, 165, 276, 282, 319, 352;
     Reynolds, Mariane and Jane, 19;
     Reynolds, Mrs., 211;
     Rice, James, 88, 186, 335, 350;
     Severn, Joseph, 265, 332, 334;
     Shelley, Percy Bysshe, 365;
     Taylor, John, 53, 58, 64, 71, 77, 99, 114, 212, 281, 286, 333, 360,
         367;
     Messrs. Taylor and Hessey, 17, 19, 78, 88;
     Woodhouse, Richard, 210;
     Wylie, Mrs., 158
 
   Lewis, 177, 189, 197, 219, 222
 
   Lewis, David, 349
 
   Life, a palace with chambers, 107, 109;
     a pleasant life, 73;
     that projected by J. K., 94;
     of a man worth anything is an allegory, 226
 
   Lisle, 286
 
   Listen, 198
 
   Little, 106
 
   Little Britain. _See_ Reynoldses, the
 
   Llanos, Senor, xix.
 
   "Lloyd, Lacy Vaughan," _i.e._ J. K., 362 and note
 
   _Lord of the Isles_, 136
 
   Lover, the, a ridiculous person, 293
 
   Lucifer, 25
 
   Lucius, Sir, 210
 
   Ludolph (in _Otho the Great_), 319, 335
 
   Lyceum, 295
 
   Lycidas, 89
 
   Lydia Languish, 83
 
 
   Macbeth, 288
 
   Machiavelli, 313
 
   Mackenzie, 201
 
   _Macmillan's Magazine_, xii. note
 
   Macready, 335
 
   Magdalen Hall visited, 19 note, 22;
     a beautiful name, 84
 
   Mahomet, 159
 
   Maiden-Thought, the second chamber of life, 107
 
   _Maid's Tragedy_, by Beaumont and Fletcher, 228
 
   Man is like a hawk, 236;
     is a poor forked creature, 254-257
 
   Mancur or Manker, 208, 245
 
   _Mandeville_, by Godwin, 51, 286
 
   Margate visited, 10-17
 
   _Maria Crowther_ (the ship in which K. went to Naples), 370, 371 note
 
   Mariane. _See_ Reynolds, Mariane
 
   _Mark, St., Eve of_, 221;
     quoted, 302, 303
 
   Marlowe, 247 note
 
   Martin, 31, 44, 53, 194, 245, 249, 292, 293, 354
 
   Martin, Miss, 225, 293
 
   Mary Queen of Scots, 6, 32
 
   Massinger, 324
 
   Mathew, Caroline, 208
 
   Mathew, Mrs., 208
 
   _Matthew_ (Wordsworth's), 68
 
   Matthews, the comedian, 297
 
   Matrimony, K. declaims against, 180
 
   Maw the apostate, 219
 
   _Measure for Measure_ quoted, 11
 
   Medicine, the study of, 104
 
   Meg Merrilies's country, 119, 123
 
   Mercury, 75, 344
 
   Mermaid lines, 70, 71 and note
 
   _Merry Wives of Windsor_ quoted, 104 and note
 
   Methodists exposed by Horace Smith, 72
 
   Millar, 339
 
   Millar, Mary, 191, 218, 219, 248, 308, 339;
     her suitors, 189, 210
 
   Millar, Mrs., 170, 176, 178, 248
 
   Milman, 87
 
   Milton, 101, 106, 142, 174, 175, 263, 355;
     anecdote of, 88, 89, 90;
     his Hierarchies, 283;
     his influence shown in _Hyperion_, 321;
     his Latinised language, 313, 314;
     a picture of him, 6;
     his philosophy, 108;
     quoted, 42, 237;
     K.'s verses on his hair, 62;
     compared to Wordsworth, 105
 
   Minerva, 344;
     her Aegis, 2
 
   Monkhouse, 50, 229, 274
 
   Montague, Lady M. W., 29
 
   Moore, Thomas, 109, 193, 202, 232;
     his _Tom Cribb's Memorial to Congress_, 228
 
   Moore's Almanack, 21, 80, 346
 
   Morbidity of temperament, 15
 
   Morley, John, xi.
 
   "Mother, your" (in K.'s American letters). _See_ Wylie, Mrs.
 
   "Mother of Hermes! and still youthful Maia!" etc., 105
 
   Mountains, effect of, 144
 
   Mozart, 193, 194
 
   Muggs, Nehemiah, by Horace Smith, 72
 
   Mulgrave, Lord, 330 and note
 
   Murray, 312
 
 
   Naples Harbour, 372 _seq._
 
   Napoleon, 174
 
   "Nature withheld Cassandra in the skies," etc., 166
 
   Negative capability needed by men of achievement, 48
 
   Nelson, 98
 
   Neville, Henry, 192, 193
 
   Nevis, Ben, described, 153
 
   Newport visited, 7, 8
 
   Newton, Rev. John, xv.
 
   Nicolini, the singer, 20
 
   Niece. _See_ Keats, Emily
 
   _Nightingale, Ode to_, 91 note, 272 note, 342
 
   Nile, sonnets on, 72
 
   Nimrod, 26
 
   Niobe, 38
 
   Northcote, 240
 
   Norval, 337
 
   "No! those days are gone away," etc., 69
 
   "Not Aladdin magian," 150
 
   "Not as a swordsman would I pardon crave," etc., 319
 
   Novello, 191, 193, 195
 
   Novello, Mrs., 197
 
   _Nymphs, The_, by Leigh Hunt, 11
 
 
   Odes, the, 362 note
 
   "Of late two dainties were before me placed," etc., 139
 
   "O Goddess! hear these tuneless numbers, wrung," etc., 259
 
   "O golden-tongued Romance with serene Lute!" etc., 59
 
   "Old Meg she was a gipsy," etc., 120
 
   Ollier, 1, 87, 179, 197, 219;
     published K.'s _Poems_, 72;
     his _Altam and his Wife_, 197
 
   _One, Two, Three, Four_, by Reynolds, 295
 
   "Opening on Neptune with fair blessed beams," etc., 25
 
   Ophelia, 80
 
   Opie, Mrs., 72
 
   Ops, 184
 
   _Original Poems_, by Miss Taylor, 23
 
   Orinda, the matchless. _See_ Philips, Mrs.
 
   Orpheus, 214
 
   "O soft embalmer of the still midnight," etc., 259
 
   _Othello_, 329
 
   _Otho the Great_, 277, 279, 280, 281, 284, 285, 323, 325, 335, 336, 340
         (sometimes referred to as the, or our, tragedy)
 
   "O those whose face hath felt the winter's wind," etc., 74
 
   "Over the hill and over the dale," etc., 90
 
   "O what can ail thee knight-at-arms," etc., 250
 
   Oxford described, 20, 22;
     visited, 19-32
 
   _Oxford Herald_, The, 112 and note
 
 
   Paine, Tom, 299
 
   Paolo, 246
 
   _Paradise Lost_, 42, 89, 108, 281, 282, 313
 
   Park, Mungo, 50
 
   Parsons, 221 _seq._, 233, 268
 
   Patmore, 106
 
   Payne, Howard, 191
 
   Peachey, 192, 217, 226
 
   Peachey family, 49
 
   Peacock, 87
 
   "Pensive they sit, and roll their languid eyes," etc., 293
 
   Peona, 38
 
   Pepin, King, the History of, 21
 
   Percy Street (_i.e._ the Hesseys), 54, 78, 88, 100, 114, 282
 
   _Peter Bell_, by Wordsworth, and the parody by Reynolds, 240, 248, 249
 
   Petzelians, 10
 
   Phaethon, 12
 
   Philips, Mrs., her verses to Mrs. M[ary] A[ubrey], 29
 
   Phillips, old, 26
 
   Philosopher's stone, 32
 
   Philosopher's back-garden, 89
 
   Physician, K.'s thoughts of becoming a, 233
 
   _Pilgrim's Progress_, 21
 
   Pindar, Peter, 49, 72, 348
 
   Pistol (in _Henry IV._), 84 and note
 
   Pizarro, 254
 
   Pliny, 233
 
   _Plutarch's Lives_, 14
 
   _Pocket-book, The Literary_, by Leigh Hunt, 190, 197
 
   Poems of 1817, 2 note
 
   Poems, original, by Miss Taylor, 23
 
   "Poet, he is quite the little," said of K., 219
 
   Poet, the Northern, _i.e._ Wordsworth, 28
 
   "Poet, why I should be a," 12
 
   Poets, advertisement to, in the _Chronicle_, 46
 
   Poets, the English, K. expects to be among, after death, 171
 
   Poets, the vices of, 211, 212
 
   Poetry, axioms of, 77;
     genius of, 167, 168;
     effect of writing on K., 18;
     K. cannot exist without, 9, 165;
     K. cannot write when "fevered in a contrary direction," 14;
     invention the Polar Star of, 34;
     a Jack o'Lantern, 81;
     other things necessary, 101;
     not written under the shadow of public thought, 96;
     should be retiring, unobtrusive, 68
 
   Politics, 298
 
   Pope's _Homer_, 13, 14
 
   Popularity, 281
 
   Porter, Jane, 219
 
   Porter, the Misses, 192, 193
 
   _Pot of Basil_, 101, 113
 
   Present, an anonymous, 192, 199
 
   Primrose Island, the Isle of Wight, 7
 
   Proserpine, 142
 
   Prose writing, genius of K. in, xi.
 
   Protector of Fanny K., 216
 
   Protestantism discussed, 108
 
   _Psyche, Ode to_, 115 note, 259
 
   Public, the, an enemy to K., 96
 
   Punctuation peculiar, preserved, xiv.
 
   Pythagoras, 89
 
 
   _Quarterly Review_, the, 37, 113, 167, 171, 224, 302
 
   _Queen Mab_, 48
 
 
   R.'s, the Miss. _See_ Reynolds, Misses
 
   Rabelais, 76
 
   Radcliffe, Mrs., 83, 221
 
   Rakehell, 44
 
   Raleigh, Sir W., 20
 
   Raphael, 17, 201
 
   "Read me a lesson, Muse, and speak it loud," etc., 158
 
   Red Riding Hood, 177
 
   Redhall, 52, 195, 202
 
   Reformation, effects of, 108
 
   Religion, K. on, 81, 256
 
   _Revolt of Islam_, 48 note
 
   *Reynolds, Jane, xii., 8, 27, 33, 43;
     as St. Jane, 39;
     a translator, 24
 
   *Reynolds, John Hamilton, xi., 2, 5, 6, 17, 18, 27, 33, 34, 35, 36, 46,
         48, 54, 57, 62, 71, 130, 142, 162, 164, 179, 198, 218, 223, 245,
         311, 324, 335, 352, 354, 376 (sometimes as John);
     anecdote of, 308;
     two articles by, 72;
     his character, 344;
     defends K., 171;
     writes for the _Edinburgh Review_, 60, 190, 198;
     poetical epistle by K. to, 91;
     his farce, 295;
     his _Garden of Florence_, 67 and note;
     his illness, 76, 90, 97, 100, 111, 113;
     he takes up law, 323, 325;
     his quarrel with Haydon, 55, 61;
     his _Peter Bell_, 240, 248, 249;
     his sonnets, 3 note, 67 and note, 69;
     his Spenserian, 103, 104
 
   *Reynolds, Mariane, xii., 26, 27, 33, 43;
     her attitude towards Bailey, 225
 
   Reynolds, the Misses, 6, 9, 44, 102, 135, 172, 173, 190, 218, 225
         (sometimes as sisters of J. H. R.)
 
   *Reynolds, Mrs., 36, 44, 102, 114, 135, 172, 225, 264, 348 (mother of
         J. H. R.)
 
   Reynoldses, the, 19, 44, 49, 97, 111, 142, 164, 165 note, 198, 225, 322
         (sometimes as Little Britain)
 
   "Reynolds's Cove," a spot so called by K., 28, 31
 
   _Rhyme, Essays in_, by Miss Taylor, 23
 
   *Rice, James, xii., 9, 31, 36, 50, 52, 64, 84, 102, 104, 111, 135, 164,
         166, 177, 198, 219, 223, 225, 249, 282, 292, 345, 354, 373;
     (once as Master Jemmy) and the barmaids, 90;
     his character, 344;
     his ill health, 33, 44, 58, 273, 276, 277
 
   Richards, 3, 72, 219, 241, 344
 
   Richardson, 301, 330
 
   _Rimini, The Story of_, by Hunt, 10, 58
 
   Ritchie, 50, 198
 
   Robertson's _America_, 254
 
   Robin Hood, 125;
     sonnets to, by Reynolds, 67 note;
     J. K. answers above, 68, 69 and note
 
   Robinson, Crabb, 72 and note
 
   Robinson, Miss, 196
 
   Rodwell, 53
 
   Rogers, 218, 232
 
   Romance, a fine thing, 88;
     projected by K., 32
 
   Rome visited, 376, 377
 
   Romeo, 25
 
   Rondeau, K.'s notion of, 207
 
   Ronsard translated by K., 165, 166
 
   Ross, Captain, 189
 
   _Round Table_, by Hazlitt, 31 and note
 
   Ruth, 125
 
 
   Salmasius, 88, 89
 
   Salmon, Mr., 212
 
   Sam [Brawne], 373
 
   Sancho, 67
 
   Sandt, 300
 
   Sannazaro, 313
 
   Sappho, 29
 
   Saturn, 184
 
   Saunders, 293
 
   Sawrey, Dr., 49, 166
 
   Sawrey, Mrs., 238, 239
 
   Scenery, 80
 
   Schoolmaster of K., xviii.
 
   Scotch, the, 118, 124, 126
 
   Scotland visited, 110, 118-158
 
   Scott, John (editor of the _Champion_), 8 note, 50, 167 note
 
   Scott, Mrs., 72
 
   Scott, Sir W., 76, 198;
     author of "Cockney" articles, 60
     and note; compared to Smollett, 51, 52
 
   Sea, a sonnet on the, 8
 
   Serjeant, the, of Fielding or Smollett, 52
 
   *Severn, Joseph, xix., 3, 49, 186, 231, 293, 306;
     orders for drawing from Emperor of Russia, 52;
     his illness, 171;
     his "Hermia and Helena," 265;
     draws a head of K., 274;
     his "Cave of Despair," 334 and note, 335;
     is with K. during his last illness and death, 373, 375, 377 note
 
   Shakspeare, xvi., xviii., 1 note, 5 note, 7 note, 8, 9, 16, 17, 25, 47,
         48, 72, 77, 80, 81, 84, 95 note, 101, 106, 107, 131, 177, 189,
         201, 221, 226, 228, 229, 263, 281, 337, 343, 355;
     his Christianity, 11;
     a presiding genius to K., 14;
     his seal, 85;
     his sonnets, 45
 
   Shandy, Tristram, 344
 
   Shanklin described, 6 _seq._;
     visited, 275-280
 
   Sheil's play, 231, 232
 
   *Shelley, 12 and note, 33, 35, 76, 365;
     captious about _Endymion_, 58;
     his _Laon and Cythna_ and _Queen Mab_ objected to, 48;
     as a letter-writer, xv.;
     his sonnet on the Nile, 72
 
   Shelley, Mrs., 12, 366
 
   Shipton, Mother, 232
 
   _Sibylline Leaves_, 18, 40
 
   Sidney, Algernon, 174, 175
 
   Sidney, Sir Philip, 10
 
   Silenus, 223
 
   Simon Pure, 248, 249
 
   Simple (in _Merry Wives_), 95 note
 
   Sister or sister-in-law (in K.'s American letters). _See_ Wylie,
         Georgiana
 
   Skinner, 245
 
   Slang of the Rice set, 50
 
   Sleep, sonnet on, 259
 
   Slips of the pen, not preserved in this edition, xiv.
 
   Smith, Horace, 33, 47, 72, 75
 
   Smith, Sidney, 309
 
   Smith, William, Southey's letter to, 10 note
 
   Smithfield, the burnings at, 108
 
   Smollett compared to Scott, 51, 52
 
   Snook, 26, 195 and note, 219, 317, 371 note;
     visited by K., 217
 
   Socrates, 255;
     and Jesus, 236
 
   Solitude, K.'s pleasure in, 181
 
   Solomon, 100
 
   "Solomon," by Haydon, 214
 
   Songs, many written by K., 72
 
   Sonnet to Keats, a, 199
 
   Sonnets by K., 2, 8, 59, 66, 81, 117, 139, 158, 238, 246, 258, 259;
     a new form, 261;
     many written, 72;
     one on the Nile, 72 and note
 
   Sophocles, 142
 
   "Souls of Poets dead and gone," etc., 70
 
   Southampton, road to, described, 4 _seq._
 
   Southcote, Joanna, 220
 
   Southey, 232, 244, 361;
     Hazlitt on, 10 and note, 16
 
   _Spectator_, The, 293
 
   Speed's edition of K., xiii. and note
 
   Spelling tricks, K.'s, not followed in this edition, xiv.
 
   Spenser, 9;
     his _Cave of Despair_ subject of a picture by Severn, 334 note, 335
 
   Staffa described, 150
 
   Stark (the artist), 76
 
   "Star of high promise!--not to this dark age," etc. (sonnet to K.), 199
 
   Stephens, 49
 
   Stevenson (Rice's nickname for Thornton), 345
 
   Susan Gale, 249
 
   Swift, 76, 344
 
 
   T., Mr., 18. _See_ Taylor
 
   Tam o' Shanter, 130, 133
 
   Tarpeian Rock, 38
 
   Tasso, 95 note
 
   Taste, Hazlitt's depth of, 53, 54
 
   *Taylor, xi., 18, 44, 53, 56, 76, 97, 111, 135, 168, 177, 199, 221, 236,
         238, 248, 250, 292, 324, 340;
     he helps K., 290;
     he is pleased with _Endymion_, 57;
     and suggests changes, 77
 
   Taylor, Jeremy, 225
 
   Taylor, Miss (author of _Essays in Rhyme_ and _Original Poems_), 23
 
   Taylors, the (as Fleet Street), 54
 
   Teignmouth visited, 78-109
 
   _Tempest_ quoted, 5 note, 7 note, 9, 245
 
   Tertullian, 10
 
   Text of this edition, xiv.
 
   Theatricals, private, described, 59
 
   Theocritus, 180
 
   "There is a charm in footing slow across a silent plain," etc., 146
 
   "There was a naughty Boy," etc., 121
 
   "The sun from meridian height," etc., 25
 
   "The Town, the churchyard, and the setting sun," etc., 117
 
   Thomson, 72, 234
 
   Thornton, 163, 345
 
   Thought, the centre of the intellectual world, 82
 
   Tighe, Mrs., 201
 
   Timotheus, 25
 
   _Tintern Abbey_, by Wordsworth, 108
 
   "'Tis the witching time of night," etc., 175
 
   Tom. _See_ Keats, Tom
 
   _Tom Cribb's Memorial to Congress_, by Moore, 228, 344
 
   Tootts, 373
 
   Tournament, suggested by mountains, 116
 
   Towers, Mr., 218
 
   Tragedy. _See_ _Otho the Great_
 
   Trimmer, Mr., 192
 
   Troilus, 180
 
   Trojan horse, 96
 
   Turton, Dr., 101
 
   _Twelfth Night_, quoted 11
 
   Twisse, Horace, 198
 
   "Two or three Posies," etc., 269
 
 
   Unreserve of K.'s letters, xiv.
 
   "Upon a Sabbath-day it fell," etc., 303
 
   "Upon my Life Sir Nevis I am pique'd," 156
 
   Urganda, 18
 
   "Uriel," by Alston, 76
 
 
   Vandyck, 361
 
   Vathek, Caliph, 134
 
   Velocipede, 233
 
   Venery, the philosophy of, 106
 
   _Venus and Adonis_, quoted, 45
 
   Verse and other quotations in letters given in full in this edition,
         xiii.
 
   _Virgil_, 18
 
   Voltaire, 76, 231, 254, 362
 
 
   Waldegrave, Miss, 170, 191, 219, 248, 292, 315
 
   Wallace, 329
 
   Walpole's Letters, 208
 
   Walton, 290
 
   Warder, 181
 
   Warner Street, 3
 
   Washington, 175
 
   Way, 221
 
   Webb, Cornelius, 39
 
   Webb, Mrs., 218
 
   Wellington, Duke of, 17, 345
 
   Well Walk (where the brothers K. lodged), 152, 183
 
   Wells, Charles, 47 and note, 48 note, 49, 50, 52, 55, 58, 59;
     his treatment of George K., 239, 245
 
   Wells, Mrs., 52
 
   Wentworth Place (occupied by Dilke and Brown), 142, 163, (K. moves to),
         187
 
   Wentworthians, the, 223
 
   "Were they unhappy then?--It cannot be," etc., 102
 
   West, 87;
     his "Death on the Pale Horse," 47
 
   "When I have fears that I may cease to be," etc., 66
 
   "When they were come into the Faery's Court," etc., 241
 
   "Where be ye going, you Devon Maid?" etc., 66
 
   "Wherein lies Happiness! In that which becks," etc., 64
 
   Whitehead, 63, 82
 
   "Why did I laugh to-night? No voice will tell," etc., 238
 
   Wight, Isle of, "the Primrose Island," 7;
     visited, 6-9, 275-279, 370
 
   Wilkie, 76, 111
 
   Wilkinson, 6
 
   William of Wickham, 284
 
   Williams, Dominie, 218
 
   Williams, Mrs., 34
 
   Winchester described, 283 _seq._, 302, 320;
     visited, 280-328
 
   Winkine (author of treatise on garden-rollers), 20
 
   Winter, Miss, 231
 
   Women, the influence of, 143;
     classed with "roses and sweetmeats," 370;
     why should they suffer? 61
 
   Wood, 10
 
   *Woodhouse, Richard, 100, 114, 168, 218, 248, 250, 282, 287 note, 289
         note, 320 note, 322, 324;
     copied letters, xi.;
     a letter from him introducing Miss Porter, 192, 193
 
   Wooler, 47
 
   Wordsworth, 2 and note, 17, 28, 33, 39, 50, 54, 55, 58, 79, 81, 95,
         114, 232, 236, 249, 361 (as the Northern Poet, 28);
     his character, 76;
     his genius, 105-108;
     his _Gipsy_, 37;
     his house, 116;
     damned the Lakes, 87;
     his _Peter Bell_, 240;
     his philosophy illustrated by his _Matthew_, 67, 68;
     his portrait in Haydon's "Christ," 16 and note;
     he is read by K., 28;
     his _Tintern Abbey_, 108;
     the "Wordsworthian or egotistical Sublime style of poetry," 184
 
   Wordsworth, Mrs. and Miss (as W. W.'s wife and sister), 87
 
   Wylie, Charles, 165, 170, 178, 189, 292, 307, 339, 341, 342, 344
         (sometimes as Charles)
 
   *Wylie, Georgiana, 75 and note, 117, 119, 192, 200, 201, 305, 306, 372
         (sometimes as sister, sister-in-law, G. minor, or little George);
     an acrostic on her name, 300;
     admired by K., 113, 169, 173;
     married to George K., xix.
 
   Wylie, Henry, 170, 176, 178, 197, 219, 231, 257, 292, 341, 346, 358
         (sometimes as Henry);
     "a greater blade than ever," 307;
     his bride cake, 339
 
   *Wylie, Mrs., 117, 158, 168, 169, 178, 189, 191, 197, 217, 222, 223,
         231, 239, 248, 257, 263, 270, 284, 292, 307, 314, 337, 338, 341,
         349 (sometimes as mother)
 
   Wylie, Mrs. Henry, 339, 346
 
   Wylies, the two, _i.e._ Charles and Henry, 239, 248, 266, 348, 364
         (sometimes as brothers)
 
   Wylies, the (as Henrietta Street), 189
 
   _Wyoming, Gertrude of_, 342
 
 
   _Yellow Dwarf_, the, 67 note, 72
 
   Young (the actor), 285
 
 
   Zoroastrians, 257
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 _Printed in Great Britain by_ R. & R. CLARK, LIMITED, _Edinburgh_.
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [A] A complete friend. This line sounded very oddly to me at first.
 
 [B] Especially as I have a black eye.
 
 [1] Macmillan's Magazine, August 1888.
 
 [2] For the letters already printed by Lord Houghton, Mr. Forman as a rule
 simply copied the text of that editor. The letters to Fanny Brawne and
 Fanny Keats, on the other hand, he printed with great accuracy from the
 autographs, and had autographs also before him in revising those to Dilke,
 Haydon, and several besides. The correspondence with Fanny Keats he kindly
 gave me leave to use for the present volume, receiving from me in return
 the right to use my MS. materials for a revised issue of his own work. In
 that issue, which appeared at the end of 1889, the new matter is, however,
 printed separately, in the form of scraps and addenda detached from their
 context; and the present edition (the appearance of which has been delayed
 for two years by accidental circumstances) is the only one in which the
 true text of the American and miscellaneous letters is given consecutively
 and in proper order.
 
 [3] The letters in which I have relied wholly or in part on Mr. Speed's
 text are Nos. xxv. lxxx. (only for a few passages missing in the
 autograph) cxvi. and cxxxi.
 
 [4] Where the dates in my text are printed without brackets, they are
 those given by Keats himself; the dates within brackets have been supplied
 either from the postmarks (as was done by Woodhouse in all his
 transcripts) or by inference from the text.
 
 [5] The autographs of these letters, all except three, are now in the
 British Museum.
 
 [6] The early letters of Keats are full of these Shakspearean tags and
 allusions: some of the less familiar I have thought it worth while to mark
 in the footnotes.
 
 [7] The references are of course to Wordsworth, Leigh Hunt, and Haydon. In
 the sonnet as printed in the _Poems_ of 1817, and all later editions, the
 last line but one breaks off at "workings," the words "in the human mart"
 having been omitted by Haydon's advice.
 
 [8] Presumably as shown in some drawing or miniature.
 
 [9] Not the long poem published under that title in 1818, but the earlier
 attempt beginning, "I stood tiptoe upon a little hill," which was printed
 as a fragment in the _Poems_ of 1817.
 
 [10] This letter, which is marked by Woodhouse in his copy "no date, sent
 by hand," I take to be an answer to the commendatory sonnet addressed by
 Reynolds to Keats on February 27, 1817: see _Keats_ (Men of Letters
 Series), Appendix, p. 223.
 
 [11] For Stephano's "Here's my comfort," twice in _Tempest_, II. ii.
 
 [12]
 
             "I'll not show him
   Where the quick freshes are."
 
   Caliban in _Tempest_, III. ii.
 
 [13] This sonnet was first published in the _Champion_ (edited by John
 Scott) for August 17, 1817.
 
 [14] Charles Cowden Clarke.
 
 [15] For Sunday, May 4, 1817.
 
 [16] The first part, published in the same number of the _Examiner_, of a
 ferocious review by Hazlitt of Southey's _Letter to William Smith, Esq.,
 M.P._
 
 [17] The poem so entitled on which Hunt was now at work, and which was
 published in the volume called _Foliage_ (1818).
 
 [18] Alluding to the well-known story of Shelley dismaying an old lady in
 a stage-coach by suddenly, _a propos_ of nothing, crying out to Leigh Hunt
 in the words of Richard II., "For God's sake, let us sit upon the ground,"
 etc.
 
 [19] Opening speech of the King in _Love's Labour's Lost_.
 
 [20] _I.e._, their likenesses, as introduced by Haydon into his picture of
 Christ's Entry into Jerusalem.
 
 [21] General Bertrand, who followed Napoleon to St. Helena.
 
 [22] On a visit to Benjamin Bailey at Magdalen Hall.
 
 [23] Littlehampton.
 
 [24] Reynolds's family lived in Little Britain.
 
 [25] William Dilke, a younger brother of Charles Dilke, who had served in
 the Commissariat department in the Peninsula, America, and Paris. He died
 in 1885 at the age of 90.
 
 [26] The _Round Table_: republished from the _Examiner_ of the two
 preceding years.
 
 [27] First Lord in _All's Well that Ends Well_, IV. iii.
 
 [28] Bentley, the Hampstead postman, was Keats's landlord at the house in
 Well Walk where he and his brothers had taken up their quarters the
 previous June.
 
 [29] G. R. Gleig, son of the Bishop of Stirling: born 1796, died 1888:
 served in the Peninsula War and afterwards took orders: Chaplain-General
 to the Forces from 1846 to 1875: author of the _Subaltern_ and many
 military tales and histories.
 
 [30] Reynolds and Rice.
 
 [31] _Sic_: for "unpaid"?
 
 [32]
 
   "She disappear'd, and left me dark: I waked
   To find her, or for ever to deplore
   Her loss, and other pleasures all abjure:
   When, out of hope, behold her not far off,
   Such as I saw her in my dream, adorn'd
   With what all Earth or Heaven could bestow
   To make her amiable."
 
   _Paradise Lost_, Book VIII.
 
 [33] Charles Wells, a schoolmate of Tom Keats; afterwards author of
 _Stories after Nature_ and _Joseph and his Brethren_. For Keats's
 subsequent cause of quarrel with him see below, Letter XCII.
 
 [34] An admirable phrase!--if only _penetralium_ were Latin.
 
 [35] _Laon and Cythna_, presently changed to _The Revolt of Islam_.
 
 [36] The family of Charles Wells lived at this address.
 
 [37] Both in fact appeared in the number for Sunday, January 4: see
 postscript below.
 
 [38] The Hampstead doctor who attended the Keats brothers.
 
 [39] The text of this letter is described by its American editor (who
 seems to have mistaken the order of one or two passages) as written in an
 evident hurry and almost illegible.
 
 [40] Mr. Kingston was a Commissioner of Stamps, an acquaintance and
 tiresome hanger-on of Wordsworth.
 
 [41] For a more glowing account of this supper party of December 28, 1817,
 compare Haydon, _Autobiography_, i. p. 384. The Mr. Ritchie referred to
 started on a Government mission to Fezzan in September 1818, and died at
 Morzouk the following November. An account of the expedition was published
 by his travelling companion, Captain G. F. Lyon, R.N.
 
 [42] The manager: of whom Macready in his _Reminiscences_ has so much that
 is pleasant to say.
 
 [43] Tea-merchant, of Pancras Lane and Walthamstow: guardian to the Keats
 brothers and their sister.
 
 [44] Of course a mere delusion; but Hunt and those of his circle retained
 for years afterwards an impression that Scott had in some way inspired or
 encouraged the _Cockney School_ articles.
 
 [45] Alluding to two sonnets of Reynolds _On Robin Hood_, copies of which
 Keats had just received from him by post. They were printed in the _Yellow
 Dwarf_ (edited by John Hunt) for February 21, 1818, and again in the
 collection of poems published by Reynolds in 1821 under the title _A
 Garden of Florence_.
 
 [46] Both the _Robin Hood_ and the _Mermaid_ lines as afterwards printed
 vary in several places from these first drafts.
 
 [47] Henry Crabb Robinson, author of the _Diaries_.
 
 [48] The Olliers (Shelley's publishers) had brought out Keats's _Poems_
 the previous spring, and the ill success of the volume had led to a sharp
 quarrel between them and the Keats brothers.
 
 [49] Georgiana Wylie, to whom George Keats was engaged.
 
 [50] This letter has been hitherto erroneously printed under date
 September 1818.
 
 [51] Reading doubtful.
 
 [52] The five lines ending here Keats afterwards re-cast, doubtless in
 order to get rid of the cockney rhyme "ports" and "thoughts."
 
 [53] "And, sweetheart, lie thou there":--Pistol (to his sword) in _Henry
 IV._, Part 2, II. iv.
 
 [54] Replying to an ecstatic note of Haydon's about a seal with a true
 lover's knot and the initials W. S., lately found in a field at
 Stratford-on-Avon.
 
 [55] _Dentatus_ was the subject of Haydon's new picture.
 
 [56] The famous picture now belonging to Lady Wantage, and exhibited at
 Burlington House in 1888. Whether Keats ever saw the original is doubtful
 (it was not shown at the British Institution in his time), but he must
 have been familiar with the subject as engraved by Vivares and Woollett,
 and its suggestive power worked in his mind until it yielded at last the
 distilled poetic essence of the "magic casement" passage in the _Ode to a
 Nightingale_. It is interesting to note the theme of the Grecian Urn ode
 coming in also amidst the "unconnected subject and careless verse" of this
 rhymed epistle.
 
 [57] _Sic_: probably, as suggested by Mr. Forman, for "I hope what you
 achieve is not lost upon me."
 
 [58] The English rebels against tradition in poetry and art at this time
 took much the same view of the French dramatists of the _grand siecle_ as
 was taken by the _romantiques_ of their own nation a few years later; and
 Haydon had written to Keats in his last letter, "When I die I'll have
 Shakspeare placed on my heart, with Homer in my right hand and Ariosto in
 the other, Dante at my head, Tasso at my feet, and Corneille under my
 ----"
 
 [59] "He hath fought with a Warrener":--Simple in _Merry Wives_, I. iv.
 
 [60] The first draught of the proposed preface to _Endymion_.
 
 [61] Changed in the printed version to--"His image in the dusk she seemed
 to see."
 
 [62] The quotation is from Slender in _Merry Wives of Windsor_, I. i.
 
 [63] Meaning the atmosphere of the little Bentleys in Well Walk.
 
 [64] "I will make an end of my dinner; there's pippins and cheese to
 come":--Sir Hugh Evans in _Merry Wives of Windsor_, I. ii.
 
 [65] The crossing of the letter, begun at the words "Have you not," here
 _dips_ into the original writing.
 
 [66] The _Oxford Herald_ for June 6, 1818.
 
 [67] Referring probably to the unfortunate second marriage made by their
 mother.
 
 [68] A leaf with the name and "from the Author," notes Woodhouse.
 
 [69] _Compare the Ode to Psyche_:--
 
   "Far, far around shall those dark-crested trees
   Fledge the wild-ridged mountains steep by steep."
 
 [70] Wordsworth's lines "To Joanna" seem to have been special favourites
 with Keats.
 
 [71] Keats here repeats for his brother the Meg Merrilies piece contained
 in the preceding letter to Fanny.
 
 [72] Reading doubtful.
 
 [73] Here follows a sketch.
 
 [74] The Swan and Two Necks, Lad Lane, London, seems to have been the
 coach office for Liverpool and the North-West; compare Lamb's _Letters_
 (ed. Ainger), vol. i. p. 241.
 
 [75] By Long Island Keats means, not of course the great chain of the
 Outer Hebrides so styled, but the little island of Luing, east of Scarba
 Sound. His account of the place from which he is writing, and its distance
 from Oban as specified in the paragraph added there next day, seem to
 identify it certainly as Kilmelfort.
 
 [76] Cary's translation.
 
 [77] No place so named appears on any map: but at the foot of the
 Cruach-Doire-nan-Cuilean, off the road, is a house named Derrynaculan, and
 a few miles farther on, at the head of Loch Seridain, an ancient fortified
 site or _Dun_, with an inn on the road near by.
 
 [78] For Loch na Keal.
 
 [79] The six lines from "place" to "dance" were judiciously omitted by
 Keats in copying these verses later.
 
 [80] Miss Charlotte Cox, an East-Indian cousin of the Reynoldses--the
 "Charmian" described more fully in Letter LXXIII.
 
 [81] Referring to these words in John Scott's letter in his defence,
 _Morning Chronicle_, October 3, 1818:--"That there are also many, very
 many passages indicating both haste and carelessness I will not deny; nay,
 I will go further, and assert that a real friend of the author would have
 dissuaded him from immediate publication."
 
 [82] Miss Charlotte Cox; see above, Letter LXX.
 
 [83] This, notes Woodhouse, is in reply to a letter of protest he had
 written Keats concerning "what had fallen from him, about six weeks back,
 when we dined together at Mr. Hessey's, respecting his continuing to
 write; which he seemed very doubtful of."
 
 [84] On the death of his brother Tom (which took place December 1, a few
 hours after the last letter was written) Brown urged Keats to leave the
 lodgings where the brothers had lived together, and come and live with him
 at Wentworth Place--a block of two semi-detached houses in a large garden
 at the bottom of John Street, of which Dilke occupied the larger and Brown
 the smaller: see _Keats_ (Men of Letters Series), p. 128. Keats complied;
 and henceforth his letters dated Hampstead must be understood as written
 not from Well Walk, but from Wentworth Place.
 
 [85] A paper of the largest folio size, used by Keats in this letter only,
 and containing some eight hundred words a page of his writing.
 
 [86] This is Keats's first mention of Fanny Brawne. His sense on first
 acquaintance of her power to charm and tease him must be understood, in
 spite of his reticence on the subject, as having grown quickly into the
 absorbing passion which tormented the remainder of his days.
 
 [87] Of Bedhampton Castle: a connection of the Dilkes and special friend
 of Brown.
 
 [88] _I.e._ on George Keats's mother-in-law, Mrs. Wylie.
 
 [89] The tassels were a gift from his sister-in-law.
 
 [90] The sheet which Keats accidentally left out in making up his packet
 in the spring, and which he forwarded with this supplement from Winchester
 the following September, seems to have begun with the words, "On Monday we
 had to dinner," etc. (p. 231), and to have ended with the words, "but as I
 am" (p. 235, line 1): at least this portion of the letter is missing in
 the autograph now before me. I supply it from Jeffrey's transcript.
 
 [91] To about this date must belong the posthumously printed _Ode on
 Indolence_, which describes the same mood with nearly the same imagery.
 Possibly the "black eye" mentioned by Keats in his footnote, together with
 the reflections on street-fighting later on, may help us to fix the date
 of his famous fight with the butcher boy.
 
 [92] Compare the repetition of the same thought and phrase in the ode _To
 a Nightingale_ written two months later.
 
 [93] Slightly misquoted from _Macbeth_ in the banquet scene.
 
 [94] By mistake for the 19th of March.
 
 [95] For "put together"?
 
 [96] Brown's younger brothers: see below, p. 245.
 
 [97]
 
   "Sometime am I
   All wound with adders, who with cloven tongues
   Do hiss me into madness."
 
   Caliban in _Tempest_, II. ii.
 
 [98] This old word for a snack between meals is used by Marlowe and Ben
 Jonson, and I believe still survives at some of the public schools.
 
 [99] This notice of Reynolds's parody was printed, with some revision, in
 the _Examiner_ for April 26, 1819.
 
 [100] There is no other autograph copy of this famous poem except the
 draft here given. It contains several erasures and corrections. In verse 3
 Keats had written first, for "a lily" and "a fading rose," "death's lily"
 and "death's fading rose": in verse 4, for "Meads," "Wilds": in verse 7,
 for "manna dew," "honey dew": in verse 8, for "and sigh'd full sore," "and
 there she sigh'd"; in verse 11, for "gaped wide," "wide agape": and in
 verse 12, for "sojourn," "wither."
 
 [101] _Sic_: obviously for "run" or "go."
 
 [102] In all probability the _Ode to a Nightingale_, published in the July
 number of the _Annals of the Fine Arts_, of which James Elmes was editor.
 
 [103] This and the next interpolation are Brown's.
 
 [104] So copied by Woodhouse: query "battle-axe"?
 
 [105] Keats's quotation from his first draft of Lamia continued, says
 Woodhouse, for thirty lines more: but as the text varied much from that
 subsequently printed, and as Woodhouse's notes of these variations are
 lost, I can only give thus much, from an autograph first draft of the
 passage in the possession of Lord Houghton.
 
 [106] Keats here copies, with slight changes and abridgments, his letter
 to Tom of July 23, 1818 (see above, p. 147), ending with the lines written
 after visiting Staffa: as to which he adds, "I find I must keep
 memorandums of the verses I send you, for I do not remember whether I have
 sent the following lines upon Staffa. I hope not; 'twould be a horrid bore
 to you, especially after reading this dull specimen of description. For
 myself I hate descriptions. I would not send it if it were not mine."
 
 [107] The beautiful _Ode to Autumn_, the draft of which Keats had copied
 in a letter (unluckily not preserved) written earlier in the same day to
 Woodhouse.
 
 [108] Sir George Beaumonts and Lord Mulgraves: compare Haydon's _Life_ and
 _Correspondence_.
 
 [109] In the interval between the last letter and this, Keats had tried
 the experiment of living alone in Westminster lodgings, and failed. After
 a visit to his beloved at Hampstead, he could keep none of his wise
 resolutions, but wrote to her, "I can think of nothing else ... I cannot
 exist without you ... you have absorb'd me ... I shall be able to do
 nothing--I should like to cast the die for Love or Death--I have no
 patience with anything else" ... and at the end of a week he had gone back
 to live next door to her with Brown at Wentworth Place. Here he quickly
 fell into that state of feverish despondency and recklessness to which his
 friends, especially Brown, have borne witness, and the signs of which are
 perceptible in his letters of the time, and still more in his verse, viz.
 the remodelled _Hyperion_ and the _Cap and Bells_: see _Keats_ (Men of
 Letters Series), pp. 180-190.
 
 [110] Referring to the fairy poem of _The Cap and Bells_, the writing of
 which, says Brown, was Keats's morning occupation during these weeks.
 
 [111] Spenser's Cave of Despair was the subject of the picture (already
 referred to in Letter CXXIV.) with which Severn won the Royal Academy
 premium, awarded December 10 of this year.
 
 [112] George Keats had come over for a hurried visit to England on
 business.
 
 [113] Hemorrhage from the lungs; in which Keats recognised his
 death-warrant, and after which the remainder of his life was but that of a
 doomed invalid. The particulars of the attack, as related by Charles
 Brown, are given by Lord Houghton, and in _Keats_ (Men of Letters Series),
 p. 193.
 
 [114] Brown having let his house (Wentworth Place) when he started for a
 fresh Scotch tour on May 7, Keats moved to lodgings at the above address
 in order to be near Leigh Hunt, who was then living in Mortimer Terrace,
 Kentish Town.
 
 [115] The _Cap and Bells_ was to have appeared under this pseudonym. By
 "begin" Keats means begin again (compare above, CXXXVIII.): he did not,
 however, do so, and the eighty-eight stanzas of the poem which are left
 all belong to the previous year (end of October--beginning of December
 1819).
 
 [116] The volume containing _Lamia_, _Isabella_, _The Eve of St. Agnes_,
 _Hyperion_, and the _Odes_.
 
 [117] After the attack last mentioned, Keats went to be taken care of in
 Hunt's house, and stayed there till August 12.
 
 [118] Chapman's _Homer_.
 
 [119] The _Maria Crowther_ had in fact sailed from London September 18:
 contrary winds holding her in the Channel, Keats had landed at Portsmouth
 for a night's visit to the Snooks of Bedhampton.
 
 [120] On the 10th of December following came a renewal of fever and
 hemorrhage, extinguishing the last hope of recovery: and after eleven more
 weeks of suffering, only alleviated by the devoted care of Severn, the
 poet died in his friend's arms on the 23d of February 1821.
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Thierry A, David King, Charles
 Franks, and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 POEMS 1817
 
 by
 
 JOHN KEATS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 "What more felicity can fall to creature,
 Than to enjoy delight with liberty."
 
 _Fate of the Butterfly_.--SPENSER.
 
 
 
 
 DEDICATION.
 
 TO LEIGH HUNT, ESQ.
 
 Glory and loveliness have passed away;
   For if we wander out in early morn,
   No wreathed incense do we see upborne
 Into the east, to meet the smiling day:
 No crowd of nymphs soft voic'd and young, and gay,
   In woven baskets bringing ears of corn,
   Roses, and pinks, and violets, to adorn
 The shrine of Flora in her early May.
 But there are left delights as high as these,
   And I shall ever bless my destiny,
 That in a time, when under pleasant trees
   Pan is no longer sought, I feel a free
 A leafy luxury, seeing I could please
   With these poor offerings, a man like thee.
 
 
 
 [The Short Pieces in the middle of the Book, as well
 as some of the Sonnets, were written at an earlier
 period than the rest of the Poems.]
 
 
 
 
 POEMS.
 
 
 
 "Places of nestling green for Poets made."
                                  STORY OF RIMINI.
 
 
 
 I stood tip-toe upon a little hill,
 The air was cooling, and so very still.
 That the sweet buds which with a modest pride
 Pull droopingly, in slanting curve aside,
 Their scantly leaved, and finely tapering stems,
 Had not yet lost those starry diadems
 Caught from the early sobbing of the morn.
 The clouds were pure and white as flocks new shorn,
 And fresh from the clear brook; sweetly they slept
 On the blue fields of heaven, and then there crept
 A little noiseless noise among the leaves,
 Born of the very sigh that silence heaves:
 For not the faintest motion could be seen
 Of all the shades that slanted o'er the green.
 There was wide wand'ring for the greediest eye,
 To peer about upon variety;
 Far round the horizon's crystal air to skim,
 And trace the dwindled edgings of its brim;
 To picture out the quaint, and curious bending
 Of a fresh woodland alley, never ending;
 Or by the bowery clefts, and leafy shelves,
 Guess were the jaunty streams refresh themselves.
 I gazed awhile, and felt as light, and free
 As though the fanning wings of Mercury
 Had played upon my heels: I was light-hearted,
 And many pleasures to my vision started;
 So I straightway began to pluck a posey
 Of luxuries bright, milky, soft and rosy.
 
 A bush of May flowers with the bees about them;
 Ah, sure no tasteful nook would be without them;
 And let a lush laburnum oversweep them,
 And let long grass grow round the roots to keep them
 Moist, cool and green; and shade the violets,
 That they may bind the moss in leafy nets.
 
 A filbert hedge with wild briar overtwined,
 And clumps of woodbine taking the soft wind
 Upon their summer thrones; there too should be
 The frequent chequer of a youngling tree,
 That with a score of light green brethen shoots
 From the quaint mossiness of aged roots:
 Round which is heard a spring-head of clear waters
 Babbling so wildly of its lovely daughters
 The spreading blue bells: it may haply mourn
 That such fair clusters should be rudely torn
 From their fresh beds, and scattered thoughtlessly
 By infant hands, left on the path to die.
 
 Open afresh your round of starry folds,
 Ye ardent marigolds!
 Dry up the moisture from your golden lids,
 For great Apollo bids
 That in these days your praises should be sung
 On many harps, which he has lately strung;
 And when again your dewiness he kisses,
 Tell him, I have you in my world of blisses:
 So haply when I rove in some far vale,
 His mighty voice may come upon the gale.
 
 Here are sweet peas, on tip-toe for a flight:
 With wings of gentle flush o'er delicate white,
 And taper fulgent catching at all things,
 To bind them all about with tiny rings.
 
 Linger awhile upon some bending planks
 That lean against a streamlet's rushy banks,
 And watch intently Nature's gentle doings:
 They will be found softer than ring-dove's cooings.
 How silent comes the water round that bend;
 Not the minutest whisper does it send
 To the o'erhanging sallows: blades of grass
 Slowly across the chequer'd shadows pass.
 Why, you might read two sonnets, ere they reach
 To where the hurrying freshnesses aye preach
 A natural sermon o'er their pebbly beds;
 Where swarms of minnows show their little heads,
 Staying their wavy bodies 'gainst the streams,
 To taste the luxury of sunny beams
 Temper'd with coolness. How they ever wrestle
 With their own sweet delight, and ever nestle
 Their silver bellies on the pebbly sand.
 If you but scantily hold out the hand,
 That very instant not one will remain;
 But turn your eye, and they are there again.
 The ripples seem right glad to reach those cresses,
 And cool themselves among the em'rald tresses;
 The while they cool themselves, they freshness give,
 And moisture, that the bowery green may live:
 So keeping up an interchange of favours,
 Like good men in the truth of their behaviours
 Sometimes goldfinches one by one will drop
 From low hung branches; little space they stop;
 But sip, and twitter, and their feathers sleek;
 Then off at once, as in a wanton freak:
 Or perhaps, to show their black, and golden wings,
 Pausing upon their yellow flutterings.
 Were I in such a place, I sure should pray
 That nought less sweet, might call my thoughts away,
 Than the soft rustle of a maiden's gown
 Fanning away the dandelion's down;
 Than the light music of her nimble toes
 Patting against the sorrel as she goes.
 How she would start, and blush, thus to be caught
 Playing in all her innocence of thought.
 O let me lead her gently o'er the brook,
 Watch her half-smiling lips, and downward look;
 O let me for one moment touch her wrist;
 Let me one moment to her breathing list;
 And as she leaves me may she often turn
 Her fair eyes looking through her locks auburne.
 What next? A tuft of evening primroses,
 O'er which the mind may hover till it dozes;
 O'er which it well might take a pleasant sleep,
 But that 'tis ever startled by the leap
 Of buds into ripe flowers; or by the flitting
 Of diverse moths, that aye their rest are quitting;
 Or by the moon lifting her silver rim
 Above a cloud, and with a gradual swim
 Coming into the blue with all her light.
 O Maker of sweet poets, dear delight
 Of this fair world, and all its gentle livers;
 Spangler of clouds, halo of crystal rivers,
 Mingler with leaves, and dew and tumbling streams,
 Closer of lovely eyes to lovely dreams,
 Lover of loneliness, and wandering,
 Of upcast eye, and tender pondering!
 Thee must I praise above all other glories
 That smile us on to tell delightful stories.
 For what has made the sage or poet write
 But the fair paradise of Nature's light?
 In the calm grandeur of a sober line,
 We see the waving of the mountain pine;
 And when a tale is beautifully staid,
 We feel the safety of a hawthorn glade:
 When it is moving on luxurious wings,
 The soul is lost in pleasant smotherings:
 Fair dewy roses brush against our faces,
 And flowering laurels spring from diamond vases;
 O'er head we see the jasmine and sweet briar,
 And bloomy grapes laughing from green attire;
 While at our feet, the voice of crystal bubbles
 Charms us at once away from all our troubles:
 So that we feel uplifted from the world,
 Walking upon the white clouds wreath'd and curl'd.
 So felt he, who first told, how Psyche went
 On the smooth wind to realms of wonderment;
 What Psyche felt, and Love, when their full lips
 First touch'd; what amorous, and fondling nips
 They gave each other's cheeks; with all their sighs,
 And how they kist each other's tremulous eyes:
 The silver lamp,--the ravishment,--the wonder--
 The darkness,--loneliness,--the fearful thunder;
 Their woes gone by, and both to heaven upflown,
 To bow for gratitude before Jove's throne.
 So did he feel, who pull'd the boughs aside,
 That we might look into a forest wide,
 To catch a glimpse of Fawns, and Dryades
 Coming with softest rustle through the trees;
 And garlands woven of flowers wild, and sweet,
 Upheld on ivory wrists, or sporting feet:
 Telling us how fair, trembling Syrinx fled
 Arcadian Pan, with such a fearful dread.
 Poor nymph,--poor Pan,--how he did weep to find,
 Nought but a lovely sighing of the wind
 Along the reedy stream; a half heard strain,
 Full of sweet desolation--balmy pain.
 
 What first inspired a bard of old to sing
 Narcissus pining o'er the untainted spring?
 In some delicious ramble, he had found
 A little space, with boughs all woven round;
 And in the midst of all, a clearer pool
 Than e'er reflected in its pleasant cool,
 The blue sky here, and there, serenely peeping
 Through tendril wreaths fantastically creeping.
 And on the bank a lonely flower he spied,
 A meek and forlorn flower, with naught of pride,
 Drooping its beauty o'er the watery clearness,
 To woo its own sad image into nearness:
 Deaf to light Zephyrus it would not move;
 But still would seem to droop, to pine, to love.
 So while the Poet stood in this sweet spot,
 Some fainter gleamings o'er his fancy shot;
 Nor was it long ere he had told the tale
 Of young Narcissus, and sad Echo's bale.
 
 Where had he been, from whose warm head out-flew
 That sweetest of all songs, that ever new,
 That aye refreshing, pure deliciousness,
 Coming ever to bless
 The wanderer by moonlight? to him bringing
 Shapes from the invisible world, unearthly singing
 From out the middle air, from flowery nests,
 And from the pillowy silkiness that rests
 Full in the speculation of the stars.
 Ah! surely he had burst our mortal bars;
 Into some wond'rous region he had gone,
 To search for thee, divine Endymion!
 
 He was a Poet, sure a lover too,
 Who stood on Latmus' top, what time there blew
 Soft breezes from the myrtle vale below;
 And brought in faintness solemn, sweet, and slow
 A hymn from Dian's temple; while upswelling,
 The incense went to her own starry dwelling.
 But though her face was clear as infant's eyes,
 Though she stood smiling o'er the sacrifice,
 The Poet wept at her so piteous fate,
 Wept that such beauty should be desolate:
 So in fine wrath some golden sounds he won,
 And gave meek Cynthia her Endymion.
 
 Queen of the wide air; thou most lovely queen
 Of all the brightness that mine eyes have seen!
 As thou exceedest all things in thy shine,
 So every tale, does this sweet tale of thine.
 O for three words of honey, that I might
 Tell but one wonder of thy bridal night!
 
 Where distant ships do seem to show their keels,
 Phoebus awhile delayed his mighty wheels,
 And turned to smile upon thy bashful eyes,
 Ere he his unseen pomp would solemnize.
 The evening weather was so bright, and clear,
 That men of health were of unusual cheer;
 Stepping like Homer at the trumpet's call,
 Or young Apollo on the pedestal:
 And lovely women were as fair and warm,
 As Venus looking sideways in alarm.
 The breezes were ethereal, and pure,
 And crept through half closed lattices to cure
 The languid sick; it cool'd their fever'd sleep,
 And soothed them into slumbers full and deep.
 Soon they awoke clear eyed: nor burnt with thirsting,
 Nor with hot fingers, nor with temples bursting:
 And springing up, they met the wond'ring sight
 Of their dear friends, nigh foolish with delight;
 Who feel their arms, and breasts, and kiss and stare,
 And on their placid foreheads part the hair.
 Young men, and maidens at each other gaz'd
 With hands held back, and motionless, amaz'd
 To see the brightness in each others' eyes;
 And so they stood, fill'd with a sweet surprise,
 Until their tongues were loos'd in poesy.
 Therefore no lover did of anguish die:
 But the soft numbers, in that moment spoken,
 Made silken ties, that never may be broken.
 Cynthia! I cannot tell the greater blisses,
 That follow'd thine, and thy dear shepherd's kisses:
 Was there a Poet born?--but now no more,
 My wand'ring spirit must no further soar.--
 
 
 
 
 SPECIMEN OF AN INDUCTION TO A POEM.
 
 
 Lo! I must tell a tale of chivalry;
 For large white plumes are dancing in mine eye.
 Not like the formal crest of latter days:
 But bending in a thousand graceful ways;
 So graceful, that it seems no mortal hand,
 Or e'en the touch of Archimago's wand,
 Could charm them into such an attitude.
 We must think rather, that in playful mood,
 Some mountain breeze had turned its chief delight,
 To show this wonder of its gentle might.
 Lo! I must tell a tale of chivalry;
 For while I muse, the lance points slantingly
 Athwart the morning air: some lady sweet,
 Who cannot feel for cold her tender feet,
 From the worn top of some old battlement
 Hails it with tears, her stout defender sent:
 And from her own pure self no joy dissembling,
 Wraps round her ample robe with happy trembling.
 Sometimes, when the good Knight his rest would take,
 It is reflected, clearly, in a lake,
 With the young ashen boughs, 'gainst which it rests,
 And th' half seen mossiness of linnets' nests.
 Ah! shall I ever tell its cruelty,
 When the fire flashes from a warrior's eye,
 And his tremendous hand is grasping it,
 And his dark brow for very wrath is knit?
 Or when his spirit, with more calm intent,
 Leaps to the honors of a tournament,
 And makes the gazers round about the ring
 Stare at the grandeur of the balancing?
 No, no! this is far off:--then how shall I
 Revive the dying tones of minstrelsy,
 Which linger yet about lone gothic arches,
 In dark green ivy, and among wild larches?
 How sing the splendour of the revelries,
 When buts of wine are drunk off to the lees?
 And that bright lance, against the fretted wall,
 Beneath the shade of stately banneral,
 Is slung with shining cuirass, sword, and shield?
 Where ye may see a spur in bloody field.
 Light-footed damsels move with gentle paces
 Round the wide hall, and show their happy faces;
 Or stand in courtly talk by fives and sevens:
 Like those fair stars that twinkle in the heavens.
 Yet must I tell a tale of chivalry:
 Or wherefore comes that knight so proudly by?
 Wherefore more proudly does the gentle knight,
 Rein in the swelling of his ample might?
 
 Spenser! thy brows are arched, open, kind,
 And come like a clear sun-rise to my mind;
 And always does my heart with pleasure dance,
 When I think on thy noble countenance:
 Where never yet was ought more earthly seen
 Than the pure freshness of thy laurels green.
 Therefore, great bard, I not so fearfully
 Call on thy gentle spirit to hover nigh
 My daring steps: or if thy tender care,
 Thus startled unaware,
 Be jealous that the foot of other wight
 Should madly follow that bright path of light
 Trac'd by thy lov'd Libertas; he will speak,
 And tell thee that my prayer is very meek;
 That I will follow with due reverence,
 And start with awe at mine own strange pretence.
 Him thou wilt hear; so I will rest in hope
 To see wide plains, fair trees and lawny slope:
 The morn, the eve, the light, the shade, the flowers:
 Clear streams, smooth lakes, and overlooking towers.
 
 
 
 
 CALIDORE.
 
 A fragment.
 
 
 Young Calidore is paddling o'er the lake;
 His healthful spirit eager and awake
 To feel the beauty of a silent eve,
 Which seem'd full loath this happy world to leave;
 The light dwelt o'er the scene so lingeringly.
 He bares his forehead to the cool blue sky,
 And smiles at the far clearness all around,
 Until his heart is well nigh over wound,
 And turns for calmness to the pleasant green
 Of easy slopes, and shadowy trees that lean
 So elegantly o'er the waters' brim
 And show their blossoms trim.
 Scarce can his clear and nimble eye-sight follow
 The freaks, and dartings of the black-wing'd swallow,
 Delighting much, to see it half at rest,
 Dip so refreshingly its wings, and breast
 'Gainst the smooth surface, and to mark anon,
 The widening circles into nothing gone.
 
 And now the sharp keel of his little boat
 Comes up with ripple, and with easy float,
 And glides into a bed of water lillies:
 Broad leav'd are they and their white canopies
 Are upward turn'd to catch the heavens' dew.
 Near to a little island's point they grew;
 Whence Calidore might have the goodliest view
 Of this sweet spot of earth. The bowery shore
 Went off in gentle windings to the hoar
 And light blue mountains: but no breathing man
 With a warm heart, and eye prepared to scan
 Nature's clear beauty, could pass lightly by
 Objects that look'd out so invitingly
 On either side. These, gentle Calidore
 Greeted, as he had known them long before.
 
 The sidelong view of swelling leafiness,
 Which the glad setting sun, in gold doth dress;
 Whence ever, and anon the jay outsprings,
 And scales upon the beauty of its wings.
 
 The lonely turret, shatter'd, and outworn,
 Stands venerably proud; too proud to mourn
 Its long lost grandeur: fir trees grow around,
 Aye dropping their hard fruit upon the ground.
 
 The little chapel with the cross above
 Upholding wreaths of ivy; the white dove,
 That on the windows spreads his feathers light,
 And seems from purple clouds to wing its flight.
 
 Green tufted islands casting their soft shades
 Across the lake; sequester'd leafy glades,
 That through the dimness of their twilight show
 Large dock leaves, spiral foxgloves, or the glow
 Of the wild cat's eyes, or the silvery stems
 Of delicate birch trees, or long grass which hems
 A little brook. The youth had long been viewing
 These pleasant things, and heaven was bedewing
 The mountain flowers, when his glad senses caught
 A trumpet's silver voice. Ah! it was fraught
 With many joys for him: the warder's ken
 Had found white coursers prancing in the glen:
 Friends very dear to him he soon will see;
 So pushes off his boat most eagerly,
 And soon upon the lake he skims along,
 Deaf to the nightingale's first under-song;
 Nor minds he the white swans that dream so sweetly:
 His spirit flies before him so completely.
 
 And now he turns a jutting point of land,
 Whence may be seen the castle gloomy, and grand:
 Nor will a bee buzz round two swelling peaches,
 Before the point of his light shallop reaches
 Those marble steps that through the water dip:
 Now over them he goes with hasty trip,
 And scarcely stays to ope the folding doors:
 Anon he leaps along the oaken floors
 Of halls and corridors.
 
 Delicious sounds! those little bright-eyed things
 That float about the air on azure wings,
 Had been less heartfelt by him than the clang
 Of clattering hoofs; into the court he sprang,
 Just as two noble steeds, and palfreys twain,
 Were slanting out their necks with loosened rein;
 While from beneath the threat'ning portcullis
 They brought their happy burthens. What a kiss,
 What gentle squeeze he gave each lady's hand!
 How tremblingly their delicate ancles spann'd!
 Into how sweet a trance his soul was gone,
 While whisperings of affection
 Made him delay to let their tender feet
 Come to the earth; with an incline so sweet
 From their low palfreys o'er his neck they bent:
 And whether there were tears of languishment,
 Or that the evening dew had pearl'd their tresses,
 He feels a moisture on his cheek, and blesses
 With lips that tremble, and with glistening eye
 All the soft luxury
 That nestled in his arms. A dimpled hand,
 Fair as some wonder out of fairy land,
 Hung from his shoulder like the drooping flowers
 Of whitest Cassia, fresh from summer showers:
 And this he fondled with his happy cheek
 As if for joy he would no further seek;
 When the kind voice of good Sir Clerimond
 Came to his ear, like something from beyond
 His present being: so he gently drew
 His warm arms, thrilling now with pulses new,
 From their sweet thrall, and forward gently bending,
 Thank'd heaven that his joy was never ending;
 While 'gainst his forehead he devoutly press'd
 A hand heaven made to succour the distress'd;
 A hand that from the world's bleak promontory
 Had lifted Calidore for deeds of glory.
 
 Amid the pages, and the torches' glare,
 There stood a knight, patting the flowing hair
 Of his proud horse's mane: he was withal
 A man of elegance, and stature tall:
 So that the waving of his plumes would be
 High as the berries of a wild ash tree,
 Or as the winged cap of Mercury.
 His armour was so dexterously wrought
 In shape, that sure no living man had thought
 It hard, and heavy steel: but that indeed
 It was some glorious form, some splendid weed,
 In which a spirit new come from the skies
 Might live, and show itself to human eyes.
 'Tis the far-fam'd, the brave Sir Gondibert,
 Said the good man to Calidore alert;
 While the young warrior with a step of grace
 Came up,--a courtly smile upon his face,
 And mailed hand held out, ready to greet
 The large-eyed wonder, and ambitious heat
 Of the aspiring boy; who as he led
 Those smiling ladies, often turned his head
 To admire the visor arched so gracefully
 Over a knightly brow; while they went by
 The lamps that from the high-roof'd hall were pendent,
 And gave the steel a shining quite transcendent.
 
 Soon in a pleasant chamber they are seated;
 The sweet-lipp'd ladies have already greeted
 All the green leaves that round the window clamber,
 To show their purple stars, and bells of amber.
 Sir Gondibert has doff'd his shining steel,
 Gladdening in the free, and airy feel
 Of a light mantle; and while Clerimond
 Is looking round about him with a fond,
 And placid eye, young Calidore is burning
 To hear of knightly deeds, and gallant spurning
 Of all unworthiness; and how the strong of arm
 Kept off dismay, and terror, and alarm
 From lovely woman: while brimful of this,
 He gave each damsel's hand so warm a kiss,
 And had such manly ardour in his eye,
 That each at other look'd half staringly;
 And then their features started into smiles
 Sweet as blue heavens o'er enchanted isles.
 
 Softly the breezes from the forest came,
 Softly they blew aside the taper's flame;
 Clear was the song from Philomel's far bower;
 Grateful the incense from the lime-tree flower;
 Mysterious, wild, the far heard trumpet's tone;
 Lovely the moon in ether, all alone:
 Sweet too the converse of these happy mortals,
 As that of busy spirits when the portals
 Are closing in the west; or that soft humming
 We hear around when Hesperus is coming.
 Sweet be their sleep. * * * * * * * * *
 
 
 
 
 TO SOME LADIES.
 
 
 What though while the wonders of nature exploring,
   I cannot your light, mazy footsteps attend;
 Nor listen to accents, that almost adoring,
   Bless Cynthia's face, the enthusiast's friend:
 
 Yet over the steep, whence the mountain stream rushes,
   With you, kindest friends, in idea I rove;
 Mark the clear tumbling crystal, its passionate gushes,
   Its spray that the wild flower kindly bedews.
 
 Why linger you so, the wild labyrinth strolling?
   Why breathless, unable your bliss to declare?
 Ah! you list to the nightingale's tender condoling,
   Responsive to sylphs, in the moon beamy air.
 
 'Tis morn, and the flowers with dew are yet drooping,
   I see you are treading the verge of the sea:
 And now! ah, I see it--you just now are stooping
   To pick up the keep-sake intended for me.
 
 If a cherub, on pinions of silver descending,
   Had brought me a gem from the fret-work of heaven;
 And smiles, with his star-cheering voice sweetly blending,
   The blessings of Tighe had melodiously given;
 
 It had not created a warmer emotion
   Than the present, fair nymphs, I was blest with from you,
 Than the shell, from the bright golden sands of the ocean
   Which the emerald waves at your feet gladly threw.
 
 For, indeed, 'tis a sweet and peculiar pleasure,
   (And blissful is he who such happiness finds,)
 To possess but a span of the hour of leisure,
   In elegant, pure, and aerial minds.
 
 
 
 
 ON RECEIVING A CURIOUS SHELL, AND A COPY OF VERSES,
 FROM THE SAME LADIES.
 
 
 Hast thou from the caves of Golconda, a gem
   Pure as the ice-drop that froze on the mountain?
 Bright as the humming-bird's green diadem,
   When it flutters in sun-beams that shine through a fountain?
 
 Hast thou a goblet for dark sparkling wine?
   That goblet right heavy, and massy, and gold?
 And splendidly mark'd with the story divine
   Of Armida the fair, and Rinaldo the bold?
 
 Hast thou a steed with a mane richly flowing?
   Hast thou a sword that thine enemy's smart is?
 Hast thou a trumpet rich melodies blowing?
   And wear'st thou the shield of the fam'd Britomartis?
 
 What is it that hangs from thy shoulder, so brave,
   Embroidered with many a spring peering flower?
 Is it a scarf that thy fair lady gave?
   And hastest thou now to that fair lady's bower?
 
 Ah! courteous Sir Knight, with large joy thou art crown'd;
   Full many the glories that brighten thy youth!
 I will tell thee my blisses, which richly abound
   In magical powers to bless, and to sooth.
 
 On this scroll thou seest written in characters fair
   A sun-beamy tale of a wreath, and a chain;
 And, warrior, it nurtures the property rare
   Of charming my mind from the trammels of pain.
 
 This canopy mark: 'tis the work of a fay;
   Beneath its rich shade did King Oberon languish,
 When lovely Titania was far, far away,
   And cruelly left him to sorrow, and anguish.
 
 There, oft would he bring from his soft sighing lute
   Wild strains to which, spell-bound, the nightingales listened;
 The wondering spirits of heaven were mute,
   And tears 'mong the dewdrops of morning oft glistened.
 
 In this little dome, all those melodies strange,
   Soft, plaintive, and melting, for ever will sigh;
 Nor e'er will the notes from their tenderness change;
   Nor e'er will the music of Oberon die.
 
 So, when I am in a voluptuous vein,
   I pillow my head on the sweets of the rose,
 And list to the tale of the wreath, and the chain,
   Till its echoes depart; then I sink to repose.
 
 Adieu, valiant Eric! with joy thou art crown'd;
   Full many the glories that brighten thy youth,
 I too have my blisses, which richly abound
   In magical powers, to bless and to sooth.
 
 
 
 
 TO * * * *
 
 
 Hadst thou liv'd in days of old,
 O what wonders had been told
 Of thy lively countenance,
 And thy humid eyes that dance
 In the  midst of their own brightness;
 In the very fane of lightness.
 Over which thine eyebrows, leaning,
 Picture out each lovely meaning:
 In a dainty bend they lie,
 Like two streaks across the sky,
 Or the feathers from a crow,
 Fallen on a bed of snow.
 Of thy dark hair that extends
 Into many graceful bends:
 As the leaves of Hellebore
 Turn to whence they sprung before.
 And behind each ample curl
 Peeps the richness of a pearl.
 Downward too flows many a tress
 With a glossy waviness;
 Full, and round like globes that rise
 From the censer to the skies
 Through sunny air. Add too, the sweetness
 Of thy honied voice; the neatness
 Of thine ankle lightly turn'd:
 With those beauties, scarce discrn'd,
 Kept with such sweet privacy,
 That they seldom meet the eye
 Of the little loves that fly
 Round about with eager pry.
 Saving when, with freshening lave,
 Thou dipp'st them in the taintless wave;
 Like twin water lillies, born
 In the coolness of the morn.
 O, if thou hadst breathed then,
 Now the Muses had been ten.
 Couldst thou wish for lineage higher
 Than twin sister of Thalia?
 At least for ever, evermore,
 Will I call the Graces four.
 
 Hadst thou liv'd when chivalry
 Lifted up her lance on high,
 Tell me what thou wouldst have been?
 Ah! I see the silver sheen
 Of thy broidered, floating vest
 Cov'ring half thine ivory breast;
 Which, O heavens! I should see,
 But that cruel destiny
 Has placed a golden cuirass there;
 Keeping secret what is fair.
 Like sunbeams in a cloudlet nested
 Thy locks in knightly casque are rested:
 O'er which bend four milky plumes
 Like the gentle lilly's blooms
 Springing from a costly vase.
 See with what a stately pace
 Comes thine alabaster steed;
 Servant of heroic deed!
 O'er his loins, his trappings glow
 Like the northern lights on snow.
 Mount his back! thy sword unsheath!
 Sign of the enchanter's death;
 Bane of every wicked spell;
 Silencer of dragon's yell.
 Alas! thou this wilt never do:
 Thou art an enchantress too,
 And wilt surely never spill
 Blood of those whose eyes can kill.
 
 
 
 
 TO HOPE.
 
 
 When by my solitary hearth I sit,
   And hateful thoughts enwrap my soul in gloom;
 When no fair dreams before my "mind's eye" flit,
   And the bare heath of life presents no bloom;
     Sweet Hope, ethereal balm upon me shed,
     And wave thy silver pinions o'er my head.
 
 Whene'er I wander, at the fall of night,
   Where woven boughs shut out the moon's bright ray,
 Should sad Despondency my musings fright,
   And frown, to drive fair Cheerfulness away,
     Peep with the moon-beams through the leafy roof,
     And keep that fiend Despondence far aloof.
 
 Should Disappointment, parent of Despair,
   Strive for her son to seize my careless heart;
 When, like a cloud, he sits upon the air,
   Preparing on his spell-bound prey to dart:
     Chace him away, sweet Hope, with visage bright,
     And fright him as the morning frightens night!
 
 Whene'er the fate of those I hold most dear
   Tells to my fearful breast a tale of sorrow,
 O bright-eyed Hope, my morbid fancy cheer;
   Let me awhile thy sweetest comforts borrow:
     Thy heaven-born radiance around me shed,
     And wave thy silver pinions o'er my head!
 
 Should e'er unhappy love my bosom pain,
   From cruel parents, or relentless fair;
 O let me think it is not quite in vain
   To sigh out sonnets to the midnight air!
     Sweet Hope, ethereal balm upon me shed.
     And wave thy silver pinions o'er my head!
 
 In the long vista of the years to roll,
   Let me not see our country's honour fade:
 O let me see our land retain her soul,
   Her pride, her freedom; and not freedom's shade.
     From thy bright eyes unusual brightness shed--
     Beneath thy pinions canopy my head!
 
 Let me not see the patriot's high bequest,
   Great Liberty! how great in plain attire!
 With the base purple of a court oppress'd,
   Bowing her head, and ready to expire:
     But let me see thee stoop from heaven on wings
     That fill the skies with silver glitterings!
 
 And as, in sparkling majesty, a star
   Gilds the bright summit of some gloomy cloud;
 Brightening the half veil'd face of heaven afar:
   So, when dark thoughts my boding spirit shroud,
     Sweet Hope, celestial influence round me shed,
     Waving thy silver pinions o'er my head.
 
 _February, 1815_.
 
 
 
 
 IMITATION OF SPENSER.
 
 
   Now Morning from her orient chamber came,
   And her first footsteps touch'd a verdant hill;
   Crowning its lawny crest with amber flame,
   Silv'ring the untainted gushes of its rill;
   Which, pure from mossy beds, did down distill,
   And after parting beds of simple flowers,
   By many streams a little lake did fill,
   Which round its marge reflected woven bowers,
 And, in its middle space, a sky that never lowers.
 
   There the king-fisher saw his plumage bright
   Vieing with fish of brilliant dye below;
   Whose silken fins, and golden scales' light
   Cast upward, through the waves, a ruby glow:
   There saw the swan his neck of arched snow,
   And oar'd himself along with majesty;
   Sparkled his jetty eyes; his feet did show
   Beneath the waves like Afric's ebony,
 And on his back a fay reclined voluptuously.
 
   Ah! could I tell the wonders of an isle
   That in that fairest lake had placed been,
   I could e'en Dido of her grief beguile;
   Or rob from aged Lear his bitter teen:
   For sure so fair a place was never seen,
   Of all that ever charm'd romantic eye:
   It seem'd an emerald in the silver sheen
   Of the bright waters; or as when on high,
 Through clouds of fleecy white, laughs the coerulean sky.
 
   And all around it dipp'd luxuriously
   Slopings of verdure through the glossy tide,
   Which, as it were in gentle amity,
   Rippled delighted up the flowery side;
   As if to glean the ruddy tears, it tried,
   Which fell profusely from the rose-tree stem!
   Haply it was the workings of its pride,
   In strife to throw upon the shore a gem
 Outvieing all the buds in Flora's diadem.
 
 
 
 Woman! when I behold thee flippant, vain,
   Inconstant, childish, proud, and full of fancies;
   Without that modest softening that enhances
 The downcast eye, repentant of the pain
 That its mild light creates to heal again:
   E'en then, elate, my spirit leaps, and prances,
   E'en then my soul with exultation dances
 For that to love, so long, I've dormant lain:
 But when I see thee meek, and kind, and tender,
   Heavens! how desperately do I adore
 Thy winning graces;--to be thy defender
   I hotly burn--to be a Calidore--
 A very Red Cross Knight--a stout Leander--
   Might I be loved by thee like these of yore.
 
 Light feet, dark violet eyes, and parted hair;
   Soft dimpled hands, white neck, and creamy breast,
   Are things on which the dazzled senses rest
 Till the fond, fixed eyes, forget they stare.
 From such fine pictures, heavens! I cannot dare
   To turn my admiration, though unpossess'd
   They be of what is worthy,--though not drest
 In lovely modesty, and virtues rare.
 Yet these I leave as thoughtless as a lark;
   These lures I straight forget,--e'en ere I dine,
 Or thrice my palate moisten: but when I mark
   Such charms with mild intelligences shine,
 My ear is open like a greedy shark,
   To catch the tunings of a voice divine.
 
 Ah! who can e'er forget so fair a being?
   Who can forget her half retiring sweets?
   God! she is like a milk-white lamb that bleats
 For man's protection. Surely the All-seeing,
 Who joys to see us with his gifts agreeing,
   Will never give him pinions, who intreats
   Such innocence to ruin,--who vilely cheats
 A dove-like bosom. In truth there is no freeing
 One's thoughts from such a beauty; when I hear
   A lay that once I saw her hand awake,
 Her form seems floating palpable, and near;
   Had I e'er seen her from an arbour take
 A dewy flower, oft would that hand appear,
   And o'er my eyes the trembling moisture shake.
 
 
 
 
 
 EPISTLES
 
 
 "Among the rest a shepheard (though but young
  Yet hartned to his pipe) with all the skill
  His few yeeres could, began to fit his quill."
 
 Britannia's Pastorals.--BROWNE.
 
 
 
 
 TO GEORGE FELTON MATHEW.
 
 
 Sweet are the pleasures that to verse belong,
 And doubly sweet a brotherhood in song;
 Nor can remembrance, Mathew! bring to view
 A fate more pleasing, a delight more true
 Than that in which the brother Poets joy'd,
 Who with combined powers, their wit employ'd
 To raise a trophy to the drama's muses.
 The thought of this great partnership diffuses
 Over the genius loving heart, a feeling
 Of all that's high, and great, and good, and healing.
 
 Too partial friend! fain would I follow thee
 Past each horizon of fine poesy;
 Fain would I echo back each pleasant note
 As o'er Sicilian seas, clear anthems float
 'Mong the light skimming gondolas far parted,
 Just when the sun his farewell beam has darted:
 But 'tis impossible; far different cares
 Beckon me sternly from soft "Lydian airs,"
 And hold my faculties so long in thrall,
 That I am oft in doubt whether at all
 I shall again see Phoebus in the morning:
 Or flush'd Aurora in the roseate dawning!
 Or a white Naiad in a rippling stream;
 Or a rapt seraph in a moonlight beam;
 Or again witness what with thee I've seen,
 The dew by fairy feet swept from the green,
 After a night of some quaint jubilee
 Which every elf and fay had come to see:
 When bright processions took their airy march
 Beneath the curved moon's triumphal arch.
 
 But might I now each passing moment give
 To the coy muse, with me she would not live
 In this dark city, nor would condescend
 'Mid contradictions her delights to lend.
 Should e'er the fine-eyed maid to me be kind,
 Ah! surely it must be whene'er I find
 Some flowery spot, sequester'd, wild, romantic,
 That often must have seen a poet frantic;
 Where oaks, that erst the Druid knew, are growing,
 And flowers, the glory of one day, are blowing;
 Where the dark-leav'd laburnum's drooping clusters
 Reflect athwart the stream their yellow lustres,
 And intertwined the cassia's arms unite,
 With its own drooping buds, but very white.
 Where on one side are covert branches hung,
 'Mong which the nightingales have always sung
 In leafy quiet; where to pry, aloof,
 Atween the pillars of the sylvan roof,
 Would be to find where violet beds were nestling,
 And where the bee with cowslip bells was wrestling.
 There must be too a ruin dark, and gloomy,
 To say "joy not too much in all that's bloomy."
 
 Yet this is vain--O Mathew lend thy aid
 To find a place where I may greet the maid--
 Where we may soft humanity put on,
 And sit, and rhyme and think on Chatterton;
 And that warm-hearted Shakspeare sent to meet him
 Four laurell'd spirits, heaven-ward to intreat him.
 With reverence would we speak of all the sages
 Who have left streaks of light athwart their ages:
 And thou shouldst moralize on Milton's blindness,
 And mourn the fearful dearth of human kindness
 To those who strove with the bright golden wing
 Of genius, to flap away each sting
 Thrown by the pitiless world. We next could tell
 Of those who in the cause of freedom fell:
 Of our own Alfred, of Helvetian Tell;
 Of him whose name to ev'ry heart's a solace,
 High-minded and unbending William Wallace.
 While to the rugged north our musing turns
 We well might drop a tear for him, and Burns.
 
 Felton! without incitements such as these,
 How vain for me the niggard Muse to tease:
 For thee, she will thy every dwelling grace,
 And make "a sun-shine in a shady place:"
 For thou wast once a flowret blooming wild,
 Close to the source, bright, pure, and undefil'd,
 Whence gush the streams of song: in happy hour
 Came chaste Diana from her shady bower,
 Just as the sun was from the east uprising;
 And, as for him some gift she was devising,
 Beheld thee, pluck'd thee, cast thee in the stream
 To meet her glorious brother's greeting beam.
 I marvel much that thou hast never told
 How, from a flower, into a fish of gold
 Apollo chang'd thee; how thou next didst seem
 A black-eyed swan upon the widening stream;
 And when thou first didst in that mirror trace
 The placid features of a human face:
 That thou hast never told thy travels strange.
 And all the wonders of the mazy range
 O'er pebbly crystal, and o'er golden sands;
 Kissing thy daily food from Naiad's pearly hands.
 
 _November, 1815_.
 
 
 
 
 TO MY BROTHER GEORGE.
 
 Full many a dreary hour have I past,
 My brain bewilder'd, and my mind o'ercast
 With heaviness; in seasons when I've thought
 No spherey strains by me could e'er be caught
 From the blue dome, though I to dimness gaze
 On the far depth where sheeted lightning plays;
 Or, on the wavy grass outstretch'd supinely,
 Pry 'mong the stars, to strive to think divinely:
 That I should never hear Apollo's song,
 Though feathery clouds were floating all along
 The purple west, and, two bright streaks between,
 The golden lyre itself were dimly seen:
 That the still murmur of the honey bee
 Would never teach a rural song to me:
 That the bright glance from beauty's eyelids slanting
 Would never make a lay of mine enchanting,
 Or warm my breast with ardour to unfold
 Some tale of love and arms in time of old.
 
 But there are times, when those that love the bay,
 Fly from all sorrowing far, far away;
 A sudden glow comes on them, nought they see
 In water, earth, or air, but poesy.
 It has been said, dear George, and true I hold it,
 (For knightly Spenser to Libertas told it,)
 That when a Poet is in such a trance,
 In air he sees white coursers paw, and prance,
 Bestridden of gay knights, in gay apparel,
 Who at each other tilt in playful quarrel,
 And what we, ignorantly, sheet-lightning call,
 Is the swift opening of their wide portal,
 When the bright warder blows his trumpet clear,
 Whose tones reach nought on earth but Poet's ear.
 When these enchanted portals open wide,
 And through the light the horsemen swiftly glide,
 The Poet's eye can reach those golden halls,
 And view the glory of their festivals:
 Their ladies fair, that in the distance seem
 Fit for the silv'ring of a seraph's dream;
 Their rich brimm'd goblets, that incessant run
 Like the bright spots that move about the sun;
 And, when upheld, the wine from each bright jar
 Pours with the lustre of a falling star.
 Yet further off, are dimly seen their bowers,
 Of which, no mortal eye can reach the flowers;
 And 'tis right just, for well Apollo knows
 'Twould make the Poet quarrel with the rose.
 All that's reveal'd from that far seat of blisses,
 Is, the clear fountains' interchanging kisses.
 As gracefully descending, light and thin,
 Like silver streaks across a dolphin's fin,
 When he upswimmeth from the coral caves.
 And sports with half his tail above the waves.
 
 These wonders strange be sees, and many more,
 Whose head is pregnant with poetic lore.
 Should he upon an evening ramble fare
 With forehead to the soothing breezes bare,
 Would he naught see but the dark, silent blue
 With all its diamonds trembling through and through:
 Or the coy moon, when in the waviness
 Of whitest clouds she does her beauty dress,
 And staidly paces higher up, and higher,
 Like a sweet nun in holy-day attire?
 Ah, yes! much more would start into his sight--
 The revelries, and mysteries of night:
 And should I ever see them, I will tell you
 Such tales as needs must with amazement spell you.
 
 These are the living pleasures of the bard:
 But richer far posterity's award.
 What does he murmur with his latest breath,
 While his proud eye looks through the film of death?
 "What though I leave this dull, and earthly mould,
 Yet shall my spirit lofty converse hold
 With after times.--The patriot shall feel
 My stern alarum, and unsheath his steel;
 Or, in the senate thunder out my numbers
 To startle princes from their easy slumbers.
 The sage will mingle with each moral theme
 My happy thoughts sententious; he will teem
 With lofty periods when my verses fire him,
 And then I'll stoop from heaven to inspire him.
 Lays have I left of such a dear delight
 That maids will sing them on their bridal night.
 Gay villagers, upon a morn of May
 When they have tired their gentle limbs, with play,
 And form'd a snowy circle on the grass,
 And plac'd in midst of all that lovely lass
 Who chosen is their queen,--with her fine head
 Crowned with flowers purple, white, and red:
 For there the lily, and the musk-rose, sighing,
 Are emblems true of hapless lovers dying:
 Between her breasts, that never yet felt trouble,
 A bunch of violets full blown, and double,
 Serenely sleep:--she from a casket takes
 A little book,--and then a joy awakes
 About each youthful heart,--with stifled cries,
 And rubbing of white hands, and sparkling eyes:
 For she's to read a tale of hopes, and fears;
 One that I foster'd in my youthful years:
 The pearls, that on each glist'ning circlet sleep,
 Gush ever and anon with silent creep,
 Lured by the innocent dimples. To sweet rest
 Shall the dear babe, upon its mother's breast,
 Be lull'd with songs of mine. Fair world, adieu!
 Thy dales, and hills, are fading from my view:
 Swiftly I mount, upon wide spreading pinions,
 Far from the narrow bounds of thy dominions.
 Full joy I feel, while thus I cleave the air,
 That my soft verse will charm thy daughters fair,
 And warm thy sons!" Ah, my dear friend and brother,
 Could I, at once, my mad ambition smother,
 For tasting joys like these, sure I should be
 Happier, and dearer to society.
 At times, 'tis true, I've felt relief from pain
 When some bright thought has darted through my brain:
 Through all that day I've felt a greater pleasure
 Than if I'd brought to light a hidden treasure.
 As to my sonnets, though none else should heed them,
 I feel delighted, still, that you should read them.
 Of late, too, I have had much calm enjoyment,
 Stretch'd on the grass at my best lov'd employment
 Of scribbling lines for you. These things I thought
 While, in my face, the freshest breeze I caught.
 E'en now I'm pillow'd on a bed of flowers
 That crowns a lofty clift, which proudly towers
 Above the ocean-waves. The stalks, and blades,
 Chequer my tablet with their, quivering shades.
 On one side is a field of drooping oats,
 Through which the poppies show their scarlet coats
 So pert and useless, that they bring to mind
 The scarlet coats that pester human-kind.
 And on the other side, outspread, is seen
 Ocean's blue mantle streak'd with purple, and green.
 Now 'tis I see a canvass'd ship, and now
 Mark the bright silver curling round her prow.
 I see the lark down-dropping to his nest.
 And the broad winged sea-gull never at rest;
 For when no more he spreads his feathers free,
 His breast is dancing on the restless sea.
 Now I direct my eyes into the west,
 Which at this moment is in sunbeams drest:
 Why westward turn? 'Twas but to say adieu!
 'Twas but to kiss my hand, dear George, to you!
 
 _August, 1816_.
 
 
 
 
 TO CHARLES COWDEN CLARKE.
 
 
 Oft have you seen a swan superbly frowning,
 And with proud breast his own white shadow crowning;
 He slants his neck beneath the waters bright
 So silently, it seems a beam of light
 Come from the galaxy: anon he sports,--
 With outspread wings the Naiad Zephyr courts,
 Or ruffles all the surface of the lake
 In striving from its crystal face to take
 Some diamond water drops, and them to treasure
 In milky nest, and sip them off at leisure.
 But not a moment can he there insure them,
 Nor to such downy rest can he allure them;
 For down they rush as though they would be free,
 And drop like hours into eternity.
 Just like that bird am I in loss of time,
 Whene'er I venture on the stream of rhyme;
 With shatter'd boat, oar snapt, and canvass rent,
 I slowly sail, scarce knowing my intent;
 Still scooping up the water with my fingers,
 In which a trembling diamond never lingers.
 
 By this, friend Charles, you may full plainly see
 Why I have never penn'd a line to thee:
 Because my thoughts were never free, and clear,
 And little fit to please a classic ear;
 Because my wine was of too poor a savour
 For one whose palate gladdens in the flavour
 Of sparkling Helicon:--small good it were
 To take him to a desert rude, and bare.
 Who had on Baiae's shore reclin'd at ease,
 While Tasso's page was floating in a breeze
 That gave soft music from Armida's bowers,
 Mingled with fragrance from her rarest flowers:
 Small good to one who had by Mulla's stream
 Fondled the maidens with the breasts of cream;
 Who had beheld Belphoebe in a brook,
 And lovely Una in a leafy nook,
 And Archimago leaning o'er his book:
 Who had of all that's sweet tasted, and seen,
 From silv'ry ripple, up to beauty's queen;
 From the sequester'd haunts of gay Titania,
 To the blue dwelling of divine Urania:
 One, who, of late, had ta'en sweet forest walks
 With him who elegantly chats, and talks--
 The wrong'd Libert as,--who has told you stories
 Of laurel chaplets, and Apollo's glories;
 Of troops chivalrous prancing; through a city,
 And tearful ladies made for love, and pity:
 With many else which I have never known.
 Thus have I thought; and days on days have flown
 Slowly, or rapidly--unwilling still
 For you to try my dull, unlearned quill.
 Nor should I now, but that I've known you long;
 That you first taught me all the sweets of song:
 The grand, the sweet, the terse, the free, the fine;
 What swell'd with pathos, and what right divine:
 Spenserian vowels that elope with ease,
 And float along like birds o'er summer seas;
 Miltonian storms, and more, Miltonian tenderness;
 Michael in arms, and more, meek Eve's fair slenderness.
 Who read for me the sonnet swelling loudly
 Up to its climax and then dying proudly?
 Who found for me the grandeur of the ode,
 Growing, like Atlas, stronger from its load?
 Who let me taste that more than cordial dram,
 The sharp, the rapier-pointed epigram?
 Shew'd me that epic was of all the king,
 Round, vast, and spanning all like Saturn's ring?
 You too upheld the veil from Clio's beauty,
 And pointed out the patriot's stern duty;
 The might of Alfred, and the shaft of Tell;
 The hand of Brutus, that so grandly fell
 Upon a tyrant's head. Ah! had I never seen,
 Or known your kindness, what might I have been?
 What my enjoyments in my youthful years,
 Bereft of all that now my life endears?
 And can I e'er these benefits forget?
 And can I e'er repay the friendly debt?
 No, doubly no;--yet should these rhymings please,
 I shall roll on the grass with two-fold ease:
 For I have long time been my fancy feeding
 With hopes that you would one day think the reading
 Of my rough verses not an hour misspent;
 Should it e'er be so, what a rich content!
 Some weeks have pass'd since last I saw the spires
 In lucent Thames reflected:--warm desires
 To see the sun o'er peep the eastern dimness,
 And morning shadows streaking into slimness
 Across the lawny fields, and pebbly water;
 To mark the time as they grow broad, and shorter;
 To feel the air that plays about the hills,
 And sips its freshness from the little rills;
 To see high, golden corn wave in the light
 When Cynthia smiles upon a summer's night,
 And peers among the cloudlet's jet and white,
 As though she were reclining in a bed
 Of bean blossoms, in heaven freshly shed.
 No sooner had I stepp'd into these pleasures
 Than I began to think of rhymes and measures:
 The air that floated by me seem'd to say
 "Write! thou wilt never have a better day."
 And so I did. When many lines I'd written,
 Though with their grace I was not oversmitten,
 Yet, as my hand was warm, I thought I'd better
 Trust to my feelings, and write you a letter.
 Such an attempt required an inspiration
 Of a peculiar sort,--a consummation;--
 Which, had I felt, these scribblings might have been
 Verses from which the soul would never wean:
 But many days have past since last my heart
 Was warm'd luxuriously by divine Mozart;
 By Arne delighted, or by Handel madden'd;
 Or by the song of Erin pierc'd and sadden'd:
 What time you were before the music sitting,
 And the rich notes to each sensation fitting.
 Since I have walk'd with you through shady lanes
 That freshly terminate in open plains,
 And revel'd in a chat that ceased not
 When at night-fall among your books we got:
 No, nor when supper came, nor after that,--
 Nor when reluctantly I took my hat;
 No, nor till cordially you shook my hand
 Mid-way between our homes:--your accents bland
 Still sounded in my ears, when I no more
 Could hear your footsteps touch the grav'ly floor.
 Sometimes I lost them, and then found again;
 You chang'd the footpath for the grassy plain.
 In those still moments I have wish'd you joys
 That well you know to honour:--"Life's very toys
 With him," said I, "will take a pleasant charm;
 It cannot be that ought will work him harm."
 These thoughts now come o'er me with all their might:--
 Again I shake your hand,--friend Charles, good night.
 
 _September, 1816_.
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNETS
 
 
 
 
 I. TO MY BROTHER GEORGE.
 
 
 Many the wonders I this day have seen:
   The sun, when first he kist away the tears
   That fill'd the eyes of morn;--the laurel'd peers
 Who from the feathery gold of evening lean:--
 The ocean with its vastness, its blue green,
   Its ships, its rocks, its caves, its hopes, its fears,--
   Its voice mysterious, which whoso hears
 Must think on what will be, and what has been.
 E'en now, dear George, while this for you I write,
   Cynthia is from her silken curtains peeping
 So scantly, that it seems her bridal night,
   And she her half-discover'd revels keeping.
 But what, without the social thought of thee,
 Would be the wonders of the sky and sea?
 
 
 
 
 II. TO * * * * * *
 
 
 Had I a man's fair form, then might my sighs
   Be echoed swiftly through that ivory shell,
   Thine ear, and find thy gentle heart; so well
 Would passion arm me for the enterprize:
 But ah! I am no knight whose foeman dies;
   No cuirass glistens on my bosom's swell;
   I am no happy shepherd of the dell
 Whose lips have trembled with a maiden's eyes;
 Yet must I dote upon thee,--call thee sweet.
   Sweeter by far than Hybla's honied roses
     When steep'd in dew rich to intoxication.
 Ah! I will taste that dew, for me 'tis meet,
   And when the moon her pallid face discloses,
     I'll gather some by spells, and incantation.
 
 
 
 
 III. _Written on the day that Mr. Leigh Hunt left Prison._
 
 
 What though, for showing truth to flatter'd state
   Kind Hunt was shut in prison, yet has he,
   In his immortal spirit, been as free
 As the sky-searching lark, and as elate.
 Minion of grandeur! think you he did wait?
   Think you he nought but prison walls did see,
   Till, so unwilling, thou unturn'dst the key?
 Ah, no! far happier, nobler was his fate!
 In Spenser's halls he strayed, and bowers fair,
   Culling enchanted flowers; and he flew
 With daring Milton through the fields of air:
   To regions of his own his genius true
 Took happy flights. Who shall his fame impair
   When thou art dead, and all thy wretched crew?
 
 
 
 
 IV.
 
 
 How many bards gild the lapses of time!
   A few of them have ever been the food
   Of my delighted fancy,--I could brood
 Over their beauties, earthly, or sublime:
 And often, when I sit me down to rhyme,
   These will in throngs before my mind intrude:
   But no confusion, no disturbance rude
 Do they occasion; 'tis a pleasing chime.
 So the unnumber'd sounds that evening store;
   The songs of birds--the whisp'ring of the leaves--
 The voice of waters--the great bell that heaves
   With solemn sound,--and thousand others more,
 That distance of recognizance bereaves,
   Make pleasing music, and not wild uproar.
 
 
 
 
 V. _To a Friend who sent me some Roses._
 
 
 As late I rambled in the happy fields,
   What time the sky-lark shakes the tremulous dew
   From his lush clover covert;--when anew
 Adventurous knights take up their dinted shields:
 I saw the sweetest flower wild nature yields,
   A fresh-blown musk-rose; 'twas the first that threw
   Its sweets upon the summer: graceful it grew
 As is the wand that queen Titania wields.
 And, as I feasted on its fragrancy,
   I thought the garden-rose it far excell'd:
 But when, O Wells! thy roses came to me
   My sense with their deliciousness was spell'd:
 Soft voices had they, that with tender plea
   Whisper'd of peace, and truth, and friendliness unquell'd.
 
 
 
 
 VI. To G. A. W.
 
 
 Nymph of the downward smile, and sidelong glance,
   In what diviner moments of the day
   Art thou most lovely? When gone far astray
 Into the labyrinths of sweet utterance?
 Or when serenely wand'ring in a trance
   Of sober thought? Or when starting away,
   With careless robe, to meet the morning ray,
 Thou spar'st the flowers in thy mazy dance?
 Haply 'tis when thy ruby lips part sweetly,
   And so remain, because thou listenest:
 But thou to please wert nurtured so completely
   That I can never tell what mood is best.
 I shall as soon pronounce which grace more neatly
   Trips it before Apollo than the rest.
 
 
 
 
 VII.
 
 
 O Solitude! if I must with thee dwell,
   Let it not be among the jumbled heap
   Of murky buildings; climb with me the steep,--
 Nature's observatory--whence the dell,
 Its flowery slopes, its river's crystal swell,
   May seem a span; let me thy vigils keep
   'Mongst boughs pavillion'd, where the deer's swift leap
 Startles the wild bee from the fox-glove bell.
 But though I'll gladly trace these scenes with thee,
   Yet the sweet converse of an innocent mind,
 Whose words are images of thoughts refin'd,
   Is my soul's pleasure; and it sure must be
 Almost the highest bliss of human-kind,
   When to thy haunts two kindred spirits flee.
 
 
 
 
 VIII. TO MY BROTHERS.
 
 
 Small, busy flames play through the fresh laid coals,
   And their faint cracklings o'er our silence creep
   Like whispers of the household gods that keep
 A gentle empire o'er fraternal souls.
 And while, for rhymes, I search around the poles,
   Your eyes are fix'd, as in poetic sleep,
   Upon the lore so voluble and deep,
 That aye at fall of night our care condoles.
 This is your birth-day Tom, and I rejoice
   That thus it passes smoothly, quietly.
 Many such eves of gently whisp'ring noise
   May we together pass, and calmly try
 What are this world's true joys,--ere the great voice,
   From its fair face, shall bid our spirits fly.
 
 _November 18, 1816._
 
 
 
 
 IX.
 
 
 Keen, fitful gusts are whisp'ring here and there
   Among the bushes half leafless, and dry;
   The stars look very cold about the sky,
 And I have many miles on foot to fare.
 Yet feel I little of the cool bleak air,
   Or of the dead leaves rustling drearily,
   Or of those silver lamps that burn on high,
 Or of the distance from home's pleasant lair:
 For I am brimfull of the friendliness
   That in a little cottage I have found;
 Of fair-hair'd Milton's eloquent distress,
   And all his love for gentle Lycid drown'd;
 Of lovely Laura in her light green dress,
   And faithful Petrarch gloriously crown'd.
 
 
 
 
 X.
 
 
 To one who has been long in city pent,
   'Tis very sweet to look into the fair
   And open face of heaven,--to breathe a prayer
 Full in the smile of the blue firmament.
 Who is more happy, when, with hearts content,
   Fatigued he sinks into some pleasant lair
   Of wavy grass, and reads a debonair
 And gentle tale of love and languishment?
 Returning home at evening, with an ear
   Catching the notes of Philomel,--an eye
 Watching the sailing cloudlet's bright career,
   He mourns that day so soon has glided by:
 E'en like the passage of an angel's tear
   That falls through the clear ether silently.
 
 
 
 
 XI. _On first looking into Chapman's Homer._
 
 
 Much have I traveled in the realms of gold,
   And many goodly states and kingdoms seen;
   Round many western islands have I been
 Which bards in fealty to Apollo hold.
 Oft of one wide expanse had I been told
   That deep-brow'd Homer ruled as his demesne;
   Yet did I never breathe its pure serene
 Till I heard Chapman speak out loud and bold:
 Then felt I like some watcher of the skies
   When a new planet swims into his ken;
 Or like stout Cortez when with eagle eyes
   He star'd at the Pacific--and all his men
 Look'd at each other with a wild surmise--
   Silent, upon a peak in Darien.
 
 
 
 
 XII. _On leaving some Friends at an early Hour._
 
 
 Give me a golden pen, and let me lean
   On heap'd up flowers, in regions clear, and far;
   Bring me a tablet whiter than a star,
 Or hand of hymning angel, when 'tis seen
 The silver strings of heavenly harp atween:
   And let there glide by many a pearly car,
   Pink robes, and wavy hair, and diamond jar,
 And half discovered wings, and glances keen.
 The while let music wander round my ears.
   And as it reaches each delicious ending,
     Let me write down a line of glorious tone,
 And full of many wonders of the spheres:
   For what a height my spirit is contending!
     'Tis not content so soon to be alone.
 
 
 
 
 XIII. ADDRESSED TO HAYDON.
 
 
 Highmindedness, a jealousy for good,
   A loving-kindness for the great man's fame,
   Dwells here and there with people of no name,
 In noisome alley, and in pathless wood:
 And where we think the truth least understood,
   Oft may be found a "singleness of aim,"
   That ought to frighten into hooded shame
 A money mong'ring, pitiable brood.
 How glorious this affection for the cause
   Of stedfast genius, toiling gallantly!
 What when a stout unbending champion awes
   Envy, and Malice to their native sty?
 Unnumber'd souls breathe out a still applause,
   Proud to behold him in his country's eye.
 
 
 
 
 XIV. ADDRESSED TO THE SAME.
 
 
 Great spirits now on earth are sojourning;
   He of the cloud, the cataract, the lake,
   Who on Helvellyn's summit, wide awake,
 Catches his freshness from Archangel's wing:
 He of the rose, the violet, the spring.
   The social smile, the chain for Freedom's sake:
   And lo!--whose stedfastness would never take
 A meaner sound than Raphael's whispering.
 And other spirits there are standing apart
   Upon the forehead of the age to come;
 These, these will give the world another heart,
   And other pulses. Hear ye not the hum
 Of mighty workings?------------
   Listen awhile ye nations, and be dumb.
 
 
 
 
 XV. _On the Grasshopper and Cricket._
 
 
 The poetry of earth is never dead:
   When all the birds are faint with the hot sun,
   And hide in cooling trees, a voice will run
 From hedge to hedge about the new-mown mead;
 That is the Grasshopper's--he takes the lead
   In summer luxury,--he has never done
   With his delights; for when tired out with fun
 He rests at ease beneath some pleasant weed.
 The poetry of earth is ceasing never:
   On a lone winter evening, when the frost
     Has wrought a silence, from the stove there shrills
 The Cricket's song, in warmth increasing ever,
   And seems to one in drowsiness half lost,
     The Grasshopper's among some grassy hills.
 
 _December 30, 1816._
 
 
 
 
 XVI. TO KOSCIUSKO.
 
 
 Good Kosciusko, thy great name alone
   Is a full harvest whence to reap high feeling;
   It comes upon us like the glorious pealing
 Of the wide spheres--an everlasting tone.
 And now it tells me, that in worlds unknown,
   The names of heroes, burst from clouds concealing,
   And changed to harmonies, for ever stealing
 Through cloudless blue, and round each silver throne.
 It tells me too, that on a happy day,
   When some good spirit walks upon the earth,
   Thy name with Alfred's, and the great of yore
 Gently commingling, gives tremendous birth
 To a loud hymn, that sounds far, far away
   To where the great God lives for evermore.
 
 
 
 
 XVII.
 
 
 Happy is England! I could be content
   To see no other verdure than its own;
   To feel no other breezes than are blown
 Through its tall woods with high romances blent:
 Yet do I sometimes feel a languishment
   For skies Italian, and an inward groan
   To sit upon an Alp as on a throne,
 And half forget what world or worldling meant.
 Happy is England, sweet her artless daughters;
   Enough their simple loveliness for me,
     Enough their whitest arms in silence clinging:
   Yet do I often warmly burn to see
     Beauties of deeper glance, and hear their singing,
 And float with them about the summer waters.
 
 
 
 
 SLEEP AND POETRY
 
 
 "As I lay in my bed slepe full unmete
 Was unto me, but why that I ne might
 Rest I ne wist, for there n'as erthly wight
 [As I suppose] had more of hertis ese
 Than I, for I n'ad sicknesse nor disese."
 
 CHAUCER.
 
 
 What is more gentle than a wind in summer?
 What is more soothing than the pretty hummer
 That stays one moment in an open flower,
 And buzzes cheerily from bower to bower?
 What is more tranquil than a musk-rose blowing
 In a green island, far from all men's knowing?
 More healthful than the leafiness of dales?
 More secret than a nest of nightingales?
 More serene than Cordelia's countenance?
 More full of visions than a high romance?
 What, but thee Sleep? Soft closer of our eyes!
 Low murmurer of tender lullabies!
 Light hoverer around our happy pillows!
 Wreather of poppy buds, and weeping willows!
 Silent entangler of a beauty's tresses!
 Most happy listener! when the morning blesses
 Thee for enlivening all the cheerful eyes
 That glance so brightly at the new sun-rise.
 
 But what is higher beyond thought than thee?
 Fresher than berries of a mountain tree?
 More strange, more beautiful, more smooth, more regal,
 Than wings of swans, than doves, than dim-seen eagle?
 What is it? And to what shall I compare it?
 It has a glory, and nought else can share it:
 The thought thereof is awful, sweet, and holy,
 Chacing away all worldliness and folly;
 Coming sometimes like fearful claps of thunder,
 Or the low rumblings earth's regions under;
 And sometimes like a gentle whispering
 Of all the secrets of some wond'rous thing
 That breathes about us in the vacant air;
 So that we look around with prying stare,
 Perhaps to see shapes of light, aerial lymning,
 And catch soft floatings from a faint-heard hymning;
 To see the laurel wreath, on high suspended,
 That is to crown our name when life is ended.
 Sometimes it gives a glory to the voice,
 And from the heart up-springs, rejoice! rejoice!
 Sounds which will reach the Framer of all things,
 And die away in ardent mutterings.
 
 No one who once the glorious sun has seen,
 And all the clouds, and felt his bosom clean
 For his great Maker's presence, but must know
 What 'tis I mean, and feel his being glow:
 Therefore no insult will I give his spirit,
 By telling what he sees from native merit.
 
 O Poesy! for thee I hold my pen
 That am not yet a glorious denizen
 Of thy wide heaven--Should I rather kneel
 Upon some mountain-top until I feel
 A glowing splendour round about me hung,
 And echo back the voice of thine own tongue?
 O Poesy! for thee I grasp my pen
 That am not yet a glorious denizen
 Of thy wide heaven; yet, to my ardent prayer,
 Yield from thy sanctuary some clear air,
 Smoothed for intoxication by the breath
 Of flowering bays, that I may die a death
 Of luxury, and my young spirit follow
 The morning sun-beams to the great Apollo
 Like a fresh sacrifice; or, if I can bear
 The o'erwhelming sweets, 'twill bring to me the fair
 Visions of all places: a bowery nook
 Will be elysium--an eternal book
 Whence I may copy many a lovely saying
 About the leaves, and flowers--about the playing
 Of nymphs in woods, and fountains; and the shade
 Keeping a silence round a sleeping maid;
 And many a verse from so strange influence
 That we must ever wonder how, and whence
 It came. Also imaginings will hover
 Round my fire-side, and haply there discover
 Vistas of solemn beauty, where I'd wander
 In happy silence, like the clear meander
 Through its lone vales; and where I found a spot
 Of awfuller shade, or an enchanted grot,
 Or a green hill o'erspread with chequered dress
 Of flowers, and fearful from its loveliness,
 Write on my tablets all that was permitted,
 All that was for our human senses fitted.
 Then the events of this wide world I'd seize
 Like a strong giant, and my spirit teaze
 Till at its shoulders it should proudly see
 Wings to find out an immortality.
 
 Stop and consider! life is but a day;
 A fragile dew-drop on its perilous way
 From a tree's summit; a poor Indian's sleep
 While his boat hastens to the monstrous steep
 Of Montmorenci. Why so sad a moan?
 Life is the rose's hope while yet unblown;
 The reading of an ever-changing tale;
 The light uplifting of a maiden's veil;
 A pigeon tumbling in clear summer air;
 A laughing school-boy, without grief or care,
 Riding the springy branches of an elm.
 
 O for ten years, that I may overwhelm
 Myself in poesy; so I may do the deed
 That my own soul has to itself decreed.
 Then will I pass the countries that I see
 In long perspective, and continually
 Taste their pure fountains. First the realm I'll pass
 Of Flora, and old Pan: sleep in the grass,
 Feed upon apples red, and strawberries,
 And choose each pleasure that my fancy sees;
 Catch the white-handed nymphs in shady places,
 To woo sweet kisses from averted faces,--
 Play with their fingers, touch their shoulders white
 Into a pretty shrinking with a bite
 As hard as lips can make it: till agreed,
 A lovely tale of human life we'll read.
 And one will teach a tame dove how it best
 May fan the cool air gently o'er my rest;
 Another, bending o'er her nimble tread,
 Will set a green robe floating round her head,
 And still will dance with ever varied case,
 Smiling upon the flowers and the trees:
 Another will entice me on, and on
 Through almond blossoms and rich cinnamon;
 Till in the bosom of a leafy world
 We rest in silence, like two gems upcurl'd
 In the recesses of a pearly shell.
 
 And can I ever bid these joys farewell?
 Yes, I must pass them for a nobler life,
 Where I may find the agonies, the strife
 Of human hearts: for lo! I see afar,
 O'er sailing the blue cragginess, a car
 And steeds with streamy manes--the charioteer
 Looks out upon the winds with glorious fear:
 And now the numerous tramplings quiver lightly
 Along a huge cloud's ridge; and now with sprightly
 Wheel downward come they into fresher skies,
 Tipt round with silver from the sun's bright eyes.
 Still downward with capacious whirl they glide,
 And now I see them on a green-hill's side
 In breezy rest among the nodding stalks.
 The charioteer with wond'rous gesture talks
 To the trees and mountains; and there soon appear
 Shapes of delight, of mystery, and fear,
 Passing along before a dusky space
 Made by some mighty oaks: as they would chase
 Some ever-fleeting music on they sweep.
 Lo! how they murmur, laugh, and smile, and weep:
 Some with upholden hand and mouth severe;
 Some with their faces muffled to the ear
 Between their arms; some, clear in youthful bloom,
 Go glad and smilingly, athwart the gloom;
 Some looking back, and some with upward gaze;
 Yes, thousands in a thousand different ways
 Flit onward--now a lovely wreath of girls
 Dancing their sleek hair into tangled curls;
 And now broad wings. Most awfully intent
 The driver, of those steeds is forward bent,
 And seems to listen: O that I might know
 All that he writes with such a hurrying glow.
 
 The visions all are fled--the car is fled
 Into the light of heaven, and in their stead
 A sense of real things comes doubly strong,
 And, like a muddy stream, would bear along
 My soul to nothingness: but I will strive
 Against all doublings, and will keep alive
 The thought of that same chariot, and the strange
 Journey it went.
 
             Is there so small a range
 In the present strength of manhood, that the high
 Imagination cannot freely fly
 As she was wont of old? prepare her steeds,
 Paw up against the light, and do strange deeds
 Upon the clouds? Has she not shewn us all?
 From the clear space of ether, to the small
 Breath of new buds unfolding? From the meaning
 Of Jove's large eye-brow, to the tender greening
 Of April meadows? Here her altar shone,
 E'en in this isle; and who could paragon
 The fervid choir that lifted up a noise
 Of harmony, to where it aye will poise
 Its mighty self of convoluting sound,
 Huge as a planet, and like that roll round,
 Eternally around a dizzy void?
 Ay, in those days the Muses were nigh cloy'd
 With honors; nor had any other care
 Than to sing out and sooth their wavy hair.
 
 Could all this be forgotten? Yes, a schism
 Nurtured by foppery and barbarism,
 Made great Apollo blush for this his land.
 Men were thought wise who could not understand
 His glories: with a puling infant's force
 They sway'd about upon a rocking horse,
 And thought it Pegasus. Ah dismal soul'd!
 The winds of heaven blew, the ocean roll'd
 Its gathering waves--ye felt it not. The blue
 Bared its eternal bosom, and the dew
 Of summer nights collected still to make
 The morning precious: beauty was awake!
 Why were ye not awake? But ye were dead
 To things ye knew not of,--were closely wed
 To musty laws lined out with wretched rule
 And compass vile: so that ye taught a school
 Of dolts to smooth, inlay, and clip, and fit,
 Till, like the certain wands of Jacob's wit,
 Their verses tallied. Easy was the task:
 A thousand handicraftsmen wore the mask
 Of Poesy. Ill-fated, impious race!
 That blasphemed the bright Lyrist to his face,
 And did not know it,--no, they went about,
 Holding a poor, decrepid standard out
 Mark'd with most flimsy mottos, and in large
 The name of one Boileau!
 
                               O ye whose charge
 It is to hover round our pleasant hills!
 Whose congregated majesty so fills
 My boundly reverence, that I cannot trace
 Your hallowed names, in this unholy place,
 So near those common folk; did not their shames
 Affright you? Did our old lamenting Thames
 Delight you? Did ye never cluster round
 Delicious Avon, with a mournful sound,
 And weep? Or did ye wholly bid adieu
 To regions where no more the laurel grew?
 Or did ye stay to give a welcoming
 To some lone spirits who could proudly sing
 Their youth away, and die? 'Twas even so:
 But let me think away those times of woe:
 Now 'tis a fairer season; ye have breathed
 Rich benedictions o'er us; ye have wreathed
 Fresh garlands: for sweet music has been heard
 In many places;--some has been upstirr'd
 From out its crystal dwelling in a lake,
 By a swan's ebon bill; from a thick brake,
 Nested and quiet in a valley mild,
 Bubbles a pipe; fine sounds are floating wild
 About the earth: happy are ye and glad.
 
 These things are doubtless: yet in truth we've had
 Strange thunders from the potency of song;
 Mingled indeed with what is sweet and strong,
 From majesty: but in clear truth the themes
 Are ugly clubs, the Poets Polyphemes
 Disturbing the grand sea. A drainless shower
 Of light is poesy; 'tis the supreme of power;
 'Tis might half slumb'ring on its own right arm.
 The very archings of her eye-lids charm
 A thousand willing agents to obey,
 And still she governs with the mildest sway:
 But strength alone though of the Muses born
 Is like a fallen angel: trees uptorn,
 Darkness, and worms, and shrouds, and sepulchres
 Delight it; for it feeds upon the burrs,
 And thorns of life; forgetting the great end
 Of poesy, that it should be a friend
 To sooth the cares, and lift the thoughts of man.
 
   Yet I rejoice: a myrtle fairer than
 E'er grew in Paphos, from the bitter weeds
 Lifts its sweet head into the air, and feeds
 A silent space with ever sprouting green.
 All tenderest birds there find a pleasant screen,
 Creep through the shade with jaunty fluttering,
 Nibble the little cupped flowers and sing.
 Then let us clear away the choaking thorns
 From round its gentle stem; let the young fawns,
 Yeaned in after times, when we are flown,
 Find a fresh sward beneath it, overgrown
 With simple flowers: let there nothing be
 More boisterous than a lover's bended knee;
 Nought more ungentle than the placid look
 Of one who leans upon a closed book;
 Nought more untranquil than the grassy slopes
 Between two hills. All hail delightful hopes!
 As she was wont, th' imagination
 Into most lovely labyrinths will be gone,
 And they shall be accounted poet kings
 Who simply tell the most heart-easing things.
 O may these joys be ripe before I die.
 
 Will not some say that I presumptuously
 Have spoken? that from hastening disgrace
 'Twere better far to hide my foolish face?
 That whining boyhood should with reverence bow
 Ere the dread thunderbolt could reach? How!
 If I do hide myself, it sure shall be
 In the very fane, the light of Poesy:
 If I do fall, at least I will be laid
 Beneath the silence of a poplar shade;
 And over me the grass shall be smooth shaven;
 And there shall be a kind memorial graven.
 But oft' Despondence! miserable bane!
 They should not know thee, who athirst to gain
 A noble end, are thirsty every hour.
 What though I am not wealthy in the dower
 Of spanning wisdom; though I do not know
 The shiftings of the mighty winds, that blow
 Hither and thither all the changing thoughts
 Of man: though no great minist'ring reason sorts
 Out the dark mysteries of human souls
 To clear conceiving: yet there ever rolls
 A vast idea before me, and I glean
 Therefrom my liberty; thence too I've seen
 The end and aim of Poesy. 'Tis clear
 As any thing most true; as that the year
 Is made of the four seasons--manifest
 As a large cross, some old cathedral's crest,
 Lifted to the white clouds. Therefore should I
 Be but the essence of deformity,
 A coward, did my very eye-lids wink
 At speaking out what I have dared to think.
 Ah! rather let me like a madman run
 Over some precipice; let the hot sun
 Melt my Dedalian wings, and drive me down
 Convuls'd and headlong! Stay! an inward frown
 Of conscience bids me be more calm awhile.
 An ocean dim, sprinkled with many an isle,
 Spreads awfully before me. How much toil!
 How many days! what desperate turmoil!
 Ere I can have explored its widenesses.
 Ah, what a task! upon my bended knees,
 I could unsay those--no, impossible!
 Impossible!
 
                  For sweet relief I'll dwell
 On humbler thoughts, and let this strange assay
 Begun in gentleness die so away.
 E'en now all tumult from my bosom fades:
 I turn full hearted to the friendly aids
 That smooth the path of honour; brotherhood,
 And friendliness the nurse of mutual good.
 The hearty grasp that sends a pleasant sonnet
 Into the brain ere one can think upon it;
 The silence when some rhymes are coming out;
 And when they're come, the very pleasant rout:
 The message certain to be done to-morrow.
 'Tis perhaps as well that it should be to borrow
 Some precious book from out its snug retreat,
 To cluster round it when we next shall meet.
 Scarce can I scribble on; for lovely airs
 Are fluttering round the room like doves in pairs;
 Many delights of that glad day recalling,
 When first my senses caught their tender falling.
 And with these airs come forms of elegance
 Stooping their shoulders o'er a horse's prance,
 Careless, and grand--fingers soft and round
 Parting luxuriant curls;--and the swift bound
 Of Bacchus from his chariot, when his eye
 Made Ariadne's cheek look blushingly.
 Thus I remember all the pleasant flow
 Of words at opening a portfolio.
 
 Things such as these are ever harbingers
 To trains of peaceful images: the stirs
 Of a swan's neck unseen among the rushes:
 A linnet starting all about the bushes:
 A butterfly, with golden wings broad parted,
 Nestling a rose, convuls'd as though it smarted
 With over pleasure--many, many more,
 Might I indulge at large in all my store
 Of luxuries: yet I must not forget
 Sleep, quiet with his poppy coronet:
 For what there may be worthy in these rhymes
 I partly owe to him: and thus, the chimes
 Of friendly voices had just given place
 To as sweet a silence, when I 'gan retrace
 The pleasant day, upon a couch at ease.
 It was a poet's house who keeps the keys
 Of pleasure's temple. Round about were hung
 The glorious features of the bards who sung
 In other ages--cold and sacred busts
 Smiled at each other. Happy he who trusts
 To clear Futurity his darling fame!
 Then there were fauns and satyrs taking aim
 At swelling apples with a frisky leap
 And reaching fingers, 'mid a luscious heap
 Of vine leaves. Then there rose to view a fane
 Of liny marble, and thereto a train
 Of nymphs approaching fairly o'er the sward:
 One, loveliest, holding her white band toward
 The dazzling sun-rise: two sisters sweet
 Bending their graceful figures till they meet
 Over the trippings of a little child:
 And some are hearing, eagerly, the wild
 Thrilling liquidity of dewy piping.
 See, in another picture, nymphs are wiping
 Cherishingly Diana's timorous limbs;--
 A fold of lawny mantle dabbling swims
 At the bath's edge, and keeps a gentle motion
 With the subsiding crystal: as when ocean
 Heaves calmly its broad swelling smoothiness o'er
 Its rocky marge, and balances once more
 The patient weeds; that now unshent by foam
 Feel all about their undulating home.
 
 Sappho's meek head was there half smiling down
 At nothing; just as though the earnest frown
 Of over thinking had that moment gone
 From off her brow, and left her all alone.
 
 Great Alfred's too, with anxious, pitying eyes,
 As if he always listened to the sighs
 Of the goaded world; and Kosciusko's worn
 By horrid suffrance--mightily forlorn.
 
 Petrarch, outstepping from the shady green,
 Starts at the sight of Laura; nor can wean
 His eyes from her sweet face. Most happy they!
 For over them was seen a free display
 Of out-spread wings, and from between them shone
 The face of Poesy: from off her throne
 She overlook'd things that I scarce could tell.
 The very sense of where I was might well
 Keep Sleep aloof: but more than that there came
 Thought after thought to nourish up the flame
 Within my breast; so that the morning light
 Surprised me even from a sleepless night;
 And up I rose refresh'd, and glad, and gay,
 Resolving to begin that very day
 These lines; and howsoever they be done,
 I leave them as a father does his son.
 
 
 _Finis_.
 
 
 
 
 
 Corrections
 
 Three spelling errors were corrected for the Project Gutenberg edition.
 The original lines appeared in the 1817 edition as follows:
 
 
 To * * * *
 Line 10:  Like to streaks across the sky,
 
 
 To Charles Cowden Clarke
 Line 82:  Of my rough verses not an hour mispent;
 
 
 Sleep and Poetry
 Line 181:  Could all this be forgotten? Yes, a scism
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
